Did Sitharaman say this about LED bulbs?,Did Sitharaman say that India distributed 35000 crores of LED bulbs?,Does this equate to LED bulbs for light bulbs?,Was Sitharaman claiming this in her budget speech?,Did Sitharaman claim this during her budget speech?,Was Sitharaman's claim to say 35000 crores of LED bulbs within a very limited period?
Do all FEMA food stamp benefits expire on Dec 31?,Is there a limit to how long a Florida resident could receive food stamp benefits?,Does the FEMA program provide other benefits besides food stamps?,Does the FEMA food stamp program offer more options in the case of other emergencies?
"Did Gates' Foundation test a vaccine in India that left at least 490,000 children paralyzed?",Did Gates' foundation test the vaccine in India?,Did Gates' foundation test the vaccine in India?,Was the vaccine tested in India?,Did Gates' foundation conduct the trial in India?
Did Clinton send help to Benghazi citizens?,Did Clinton send help to Benghazi citizens?,Did Clinton send help to Benghazi citizens during the attack in Benghazi?,Have there been any reported cases of terrorist attack in Benghazi?,Is Clinton a member of the senate?
Is there any evidence that there was fraud in the 2016 election?,Is there evidence of the election fraud in 2019?,Is there evidence of the election fraud in the 2020 election?,Will this type of decertifying in the 2020 election be effective?,Will this type of decertifying in the 2020 election be effective?
Are people with no ID or if they have no ID eligible to vote under HR 1?,Does a person who lacks ID or has no ID qualify to vote under HR 1?,Does this age under HR 1 apply to people with no ID or if they have no ID?,Is a person who doesn’t have an ID eligible to vote under HR 1?
Did the video show rival groups fighting at 2022 football tournaments in Democratic Republic of Congo?,Did the video include protests in Kenya?,Did the video show the protests in Kenya?,Was the video recorded in a different country than the Democratic Republic of Congo?,Did the video include a different ethnic group in the Congo?
Are people being able to get marriage licenses at these ages?,Do this people age range go to a registrar?,Are all these people being issued marriage licenses in Virginia?,Do these age groups receive the same amount of coverage?,Are these people getting married in Virginia at this age range?
Did the scientists find a fragment of DNA of the virus prior to the pandemic?,Are the data from this paper published in scientific journals?,Are the data from this paper consistent with the information published in scientific journals cited above?,Is this report based on reliable sources?,Are these studies conclusive?
Was there an estimate of how much snow would occur in Minnesota within the next week?,Did Minnesota expect to receive 16 inches of snow over the weekend?,Did Minnesota experience any snow for the weekend or weekend?,Did Minnesota receive the snow for a week or weekend?,Did Minnesota experience snow for the weekend or weekend?
Did there drop by 64% between 2020 and 2019 cases of GBVF?,Are there any other changes that the government is working to implement to alleviate the effects of this disease in the United States?,Are GBVF rates predicted to decline in 2019?,Are there other measures that are being taken to combat this disease?
Did Obama and Biden ever work to reform police?,Did Obama and Biden ever implement any new policies?,Did Biden and Obama try to fix police reform?,Were any police reforms implemented during Biden's eight year term?,Did Biden and Obama ever implement new laws that were illegal?,"Considering Biden's re-election, is it reasonable to conclude that Biden and Obama never attempted to fix police reforms?"
Is this a promise made by the Congress in their manifesto?,Is this a promise made in the election that will result in Muslims being removed?,Is this a promise made by the Congress party?,Is this a promise made in the election that will result in Muslims being removed?
Did Nelson lease land for 6 cows?,Did Nelson dodge $45K in taxes in this year alone?,Was the land that Nelson used tax-exempt?,Did Nelson's lease of land inflate this amount of tax?,Is it true that these were taxes that he paid?,Was Nelson using this loophole only to dodge taxes?
Do any G20 delegates take lunch with their hands?,Is there any footage of G20 delegates having lunch with their hands in the video?,Does any video show G20 delegates having lunch with their hands?,Is there any video of G20 delegates having lunch with their hands in the video?
Would Ohio save $41 million per year if employees contributed to their own guaranteed-check pensions?,Are guaranteed-check pensions the safest pension for workers?,Are guaranteed-check pensions a better option for workers than other types of retirement accounts?,Are guaranteed-check pensions a more comfortable option for workers compared to other forms of retirement accounts?
Did honeybees not become endangered in the U.S. as of September 2023?,Did CDC report that honeybees were still under threat of extinction in the U.S. as of September 2023?,Does USDA status or lack of status for honeybees as of September 2023?
Was Domino's offering coupons for large pizzas to social media users?,Was the coupon valid for any Domino's locations?,Was this coupon valid for multiple Domino's locations?,Is this coupon valid for multiple Domino's locations?,Is this coupon valid for multiple Domino's locations?,Is there a minimum number of coupons per Domino's location?
Did this video exist for Moldova before 2022?,Can we determine for sure if this video shows Moldova residents blocking a NATO column?,Has the video appeared prior to 2022?,Can we determine who is blocking the column?,Are the Moldovan protesters pointing at the NATO column?,Do the Moldovan protesters appear to have the same ethnicity as the NATO column's column?
Was the photo taken during the 2019 Pakistani National Day rally?,Was the supporter wearing a shirt with gun in the photo?,Did the supporter leave the rally before the rally was completed?,Did the supporter leave after the rally?,Did the rally take place during the time the photo was taken?,Was the rally in the year of 2019?
Was this increase in the Muslim population due to higher birth rates?,Does Assam have an increase in the Muslim population due to higher birth rates?,Are any other factors contributing to this increase in Muslim population in Assam?,Is there any other reason why this rise in the Muslim population in Assam is due to higher birth rates?
Was this patent granted to Pirbright Institute UK?,Was this patent granted to Pirbright Institute UK because of Bill and Melinda Gates?,Did this patent cover any other vaccines?,Did the Pirbright Institute U.S. grant a patent for the coronavirus?,Did the Pirbright Institute U.S. award this patent?,Did Pirbright Institute U.S. grant this patent?
Did the photo appear in the September 2012 post?,Did the post have a link to the photo?,Did the photo make it into a blog post?,Was the photo posted in September 2012?,Has the photo ever been used on social media?,Did the photograph feature any of the following animals?,Does the photograph belong to anyone else?
Did these folks quit looking for work?,If this people stayed unemployed what was the number of people who left looking for work?,Did the unemployment rate in Ohio compare to the national average?,Was the unemployment rate in Ohio the same overall?,Did any people leave looking for work at a higher rate than the national average?
Has 20% of high school students attempted suicide?,Has this figure remained constant since 2014?,Are this data sources reliable?,Have any other study conducted to verify this information?,Have any other studies been conducted?,Have any statistics been released regarding these data?,Has this percentage been reported in any other studies?,Has this percentage been used in any other studies to demonstrate the importance of this data?
Was this ad authentic?,Did this advertisement have a dreadful rap by any other rap artists?,Was this ad authentic?,Did this video originate in Japan?,Did this video have the same title and description as this one?,Was this video authentically from Japan?,Did this video have a dreadful rap by any other rap artists?,Did this video have a dreadful rap by any other rappers?
Would you have to pay for a single immigrant to get the tax credits?,Will you have to pay in taxes to get any of the earned income tax credits?,Does the average individual immigrant get a tax credit if he pays in taxes?,Do you think illegal immigrants should get a tax credit if they pay in taxes?
Is there evidence confirming the fake scam is a scam?,"Does ""Covid-19 Relieve"" require personal details to be included in the scam?",Is the scam requesting personal information to be provided in the scam?,Does this scam take place in the United States?,Is there evidence supporting the scam?
"Do 15,000 people detained in Iran have a Facebook account?","Do 15,000 people have a website with photos of detained people?",Are there any reports about the detained people on Facebook?,Is any detainee information posted online about these people?,Can anyone have a Facebook account describing all of the people that have been detained in Iran?
Did this period thaw more than at any time in 30 years?,"Specifically, during this period, did 97% of the ice sheet thaw?",Does this percentage amount to a total thaw?,"Using this data, is this estimate the most accurate one available?"
Is it true that there are close to 40% of the South Africans who need jobs unemployed?,Are the numbers of unemployed based on a percent of people being unemployed?,Are the numbers of unemployed people based on a percent of people being in employment?,Do the numbers of unemployed people from the smallest size groups differ?
Did Floyd die of an alcohol or drug overdose?,Was Floyd actually arrested by police?,Was Floyd not arrested during this event?,Did Floyd's autopsy report show that Floyd died from a drug overdose?,. Was Floyd's arrest a crime?,. Has it been proven that Floyd died in the line of fire?
Did two pipeline workers receive fentanyl in water bottles?,Did the workers of the pipeline receive these bottles from a trusted person?,Did the two workers that received fentanyl in water bottles drive a car?,Did the two workers use the water bottles for drinking?,Is fentanyl in water bottles a dangerous substance?
What are the reasons for the increase of foreign arrivals in Berlin?,Is it true that Berliners are becoming more and more multiethnic in Berlin?,Are there many reasons for why more foreign arrivals are becoming a part of the Berlin population?,Has Berlin regained its post-war identity as a cosmopolitan center of immigrants?
Did Guliani become disbarred in 2021?,Did Guliani receive the same sentence as Roy Cohn?,Did Guliani file for a new license when this date came?,Was Guliani disbarred after the day Roy Cohn was disbarred?,Was Guliani's status on probation while disbarred?
"Does Ellen Rosenblum claim to be an attorney, yet admit to being a government lawyer?",Is Rosenblum the head of a group representing a government agency in public issues?,Did Rosenblum say this over and over again?,Has Rosenblum stated that these positions are often government positions?,"Is this a job that is a full-time, full-time, part-time job?"
"Did an ancient horse chariot from 4,000 years old have it's wheels covered with copper?",Was a camel and peacock sculpture decorated with a mirror?,Did other items be found related to the horse that were in the same area?,Could these items be used to make masks?
Did Drone Boy Prathap make all 600 drones using e-waste?,Is there any evidence Drone Boy Prathap used e-waste to make the drones?,Is there any evidence that Drone Boy Prathap sold drones using e-waste?
Did 34 countries have support for India after its anti-Prophet remarks?,Was there support from countries other than Netherlands and Israel in their support for India?,Are these countries all members of the Alliance of Liberal States?,Is the Alliance of Liberal States made up of non-Christian countries?,Is there some form of sabotage to the position of these countries as opposed to traditional political parties?
Was there any data on how many Americans were laid off?,Did all of the laying of the steel workers come from America?,Has steel production lost billions?,Is the steel industry facing loss of billions?,Is the steel industry facing loss of billions?,Is there any data to support this claim?
Did Feingold cut Medicare by this amount?,Did Feingold cut Medicare by this amount?,Did Feingold pass this measure?,Did Feingold pass this measure?,Does Feingold own the Medicare fund?,Was Feingold involved in this measure?,Did Feingold pass this bill?,Has Feingold ever attempted to repeal Medicare?
Did vaccine save us for more than 9 months?,"Did the vaccine save us from 35,000 crore vaporizing expenditure?",Could the vaccine last for less than 9 months in our country?,"Will India lose 35,000 crore in vaccine subsidies?",Can the vaccine help combat other diseases and diseases?,Are there any vaccines in the world to save lives?
Did Perdue approve the bill that created the $10 trillion debt?,Does the amount of debt created by Perdue create inflation?,Did Perdue vote with the Democratic Party?,Did Perdue vote for new tax legislation?,Did Perdue vote for tax increases?,Did Perdue support raising taxes?
"Is there any evidence that Mexican drug cartels are working with 100,000 street gang members in Chicago alone?",Does the FBI have any records that suggest the cartels work together?,Has the FBI investigated these reported cases?,Does the FBI recommend the use of federal law enforcement resources to combat these drug cartels?
"Did President-elect Obi free 500,000 Nigerians?","Did Obi release 500,000 Nigerians?","Did Obi release 500,000 Nigerians from death row in Singapore?",Was Obi in an occupied position in Singapore during his time as President?,"Have Obi's policies resulted in freed 500,000 Nigerians from death row in Singapore?"
"Did the bus ""Not the 48"" go to a mystery location?",Did the bus go to a mystery location in Brussels?,Is public transport in the city free?,Are there other options of transportation that cost money?,"Did ""Not the 48"" go to a mystery location in the city?"
Is it true Walmart is selling bicycles?,Does this price range contain recycled bicycles?,Is this price range in dollars?,Does this company not recycle their bicycles?,Are these bicycles manufactured by a company that recycles them?,Is this bike sold at Walmart or a salvage shop?
Did the Zaporizhzhia NPP store more plutonium than enriched uranium?,Have they made weapons with the plutonium?,Did the Zaporizhzhia NPP have other materials other than plutonium?,Have the weapons made from the plutonium been sold?
Does this article support the 7% limit Facebook imposes on user sharing?,Is this article about an advertisement?,Are there multiple examples of a 7% limit for users sharing?,Is this article about a political advertisement?,No Answer> No Response> No Answer> No Answer>?
Did the numbers listed in this article match the figure for the number of inadmissible migrants arriving in the country?,Did it appear that this number was lowered by officials?,Has this figure decreased in recent days?,Does this figure seem high by any measure?,Would people with this profile enter the country illegally?
Did McCain's campaign co-founder hire Ralph Reed?,Did Abramoff have a close relationship with Ralph Reed?,Did McCain have a close relationship with Abramoff?,Is McCain in a campaign to be paid by Ralph Reed?,Is this a statement in which McCain was explicitly stated to be working with Abramoff?,Does McCain's campaign have ties to any business partners?
Has Nataraj manufacturing company offered jobs with a salary in the range of Rs. 30000?,Is the salary of the job considered as reasonable?,Do the job requirements meet the actual salary?,Are there any other requirements?,Does the company accept application from the general public?,Is the salary of the job considered reasonable?
Did Paris Saint-Germain gain 23 million followers on Instagram in one day after signing Lionel Messi?,Did Paris Saint-Germain gain 23 million followers on Instagram in one day after signing Lionel Messi?,Did Paris Saint-Germain gain 23 million followers on Instagram in one day after signing Lionel Messi?
"Was the special session expected to cost the state $27,300 a day?",Is the budget for this special session a part of the budget?,Has the budget for this special session included the daily expenses of the legislators?,Did the budget include the cost of the legislators’ own health insurance?
Did the teenage boy put his penis into a beehive?,Was the teenage boy stung at least two hundred times by the bees?,Was there ever any evidence the teenager was stung after putting his penis into a beehive?,Was the teenage boy stung by any other creatures after his penis was put in a beehive?
Is there a fake list of 20 shortlisted candidates for ambassadors and heads of mission for Kenya?,Does this list have any current or past governmental connection to Kenya?,Is this fake list current or past governmental connection to Kenya?,Is this fake list current or past governmental connection to Kenya?
Does Wisconsin allow alcoholic beverages for children under 17 years old?,Does Wisconsin allow alcoholic beverages for children age 7-20 years old?,Is Wisconsin the only state that allows children under 17 to receive alcohol at bars and restaurants?,Does Wisconsin allow alcoholic beverages for children under 7 years old?,Is Wisconsin the only state that allows parents or guardians to purchase alcohol for their children?
Will Mr. Bean be missed by fans?,Will there be a successor to Mr. Bean?,Will the character of Mr. Bean continue to be popular in the future?,Is there any way to contact Mr. Bean's family?,Will Mr. Bean be reunited in 2021?,Would this be a possible successor to Mr. Bean in the future?
Is there an effort to meet the 10% agricultural allocation from the Malabo declaration?,Are all the counties striving to reach the 10% agricultural allocation?,Is there any effort to implement the 10% agricultural allocation?,Is the 10% allocation from the Malabo declaration?,Do the five counties mentioned do a high amount of farming in the country?
"Did Belarus seize Kyiv in quiet, or controlled Ukraine for two days?",Does this statement support Lukashenko's claim that Belarus control Ukraine for 2 days?,Is the statement clear?,Did the military leader of Belarus personally control Ukraine during the alleged secession of Kyiv?,Did Lukashenko express optimism after the alleged snatching of Kyiv?
Has the Milwaukee County Board’s staff grown from four workers to 38 over four decades?,Is the total Milwaukee County workforce cut in half in the same period?,"Has the Milwaukee County Board’s staff costs taxpayers ""a lot more"" in comparison to other counties?",Was the Wisconsin County Board's workforce cut in half in the same period?
Did Aung San Suu Kyi die during the coup?,Was this picture taken in Burma?,Is this picture from a documentary?,Did Suu Kyi receive death penalty?,Is this photo true?,Did this picture take place during the military coup?,Was this photograph taken after the coup?
"Did Will Smith and Jada Pinkett Smith donate $150,000 to a ""black Muslim""?",Did this person call for the murder of all whites?,"Did Will Smith and Jada Pinkett Smith donate $150,000 to a ""black Muslim""?",Did this person have anything to do with Will Smith and Jada Pinkett Smith?
Did Japan not buy needles from the US in 1945?,Is there any evidence for this to be the case today?,Did Japan not buy needles from the US in 1945?,Is it true that this is true today?,Is patriotism and unity a trend today?,Do Japanese Americans buy needles from the U.S. today?
Did Mike Pence faking an election loss by not excluding contested states’ votes?,Did Pence's actions in the 2020 election cause any issues in the 2020 US election?,Was Pence's actions in the 2020 US election correct?,Did Pence's actions make any governmental decisions in the 2020 US election?
Were the job losses in the global recession accounted for by this growth?,Did the economic growth average 3.2 percent a year for this time period?,Did this growth have an effect on the economy overall?,Do economists agree that this is a good growth rate?,Has this economy produced more jobs than in the last 50 years?,Are economists optimistic in the near future?
Did surveillance video show a man in a protective vest using hand sanitizer about an hour after the gunman entered Robb Elementary School?,Did a man in a protective vest using hand sanitizer during the shooter’s gunmany attack?,Was the man in a protective vest wearing a sheriff’s hat on the day of the school shooting?,Was the narrator speaking to the man in the protective vest?
"Did this increase increase in the number of children attending Grade R from about 300,000 to more than 700,000 between 2003 and 2011?",Has this increase in the number of children attending Grade R been at all times significant?,Was this increase in this number due to the emergence of a new generation?,Did this increase increase in the number of children attending Grade R due to the educational system itself?,Has this increase in the number of children attending Grade R come at the same time as the emergence of a new generation?
Did this bus enter into a sinkhole in Pakistan?,Did this bus fall through any part of the city?,Was the sinkhole caused by heavy rains?,Is this bus still in operation?,Did this bus come from a major airport?,Have any roads been damaged?,Has there been any fatalities related to this vehicle?
"Was the budget crunch from President Trump mentioned in any episodes of ""The Simpsons""?",Did Simpson say the budget crunch from President Trump?,"Were there any other episodes of ""The Simpsons"" prior to the fiscal crisis?",Have the budget crunch from President Trump been discussed on TV?,"ref name=""Television Guide"">?"
Did 36 million people skip their prescriptions last year?,Did 36 million people not have their prescription filled in 2017?,Did 36% of American patients skip their prescriptions last year?,Did a majority of people who skipped prescriptions in 2017 also skip their prescriptions in 2020?,Did 40% of Americans skip their prescriptions in 2020?
Is there evidence that cash in tyres was caught ahead of the Karnataka elections?,Is it implied that money was stolen in the tyre?,Is there evidence of cash being used in tyres?,Is this video in violation of the Karnataka Elections?
"Did Spanberger support ""nearly $1 billion in stimulus checks for prisoners, including domestic terrorists""?",Did Spanberger support receiving $1 billion in stimulus checks for domestic terrorists?,Did Spanberger support that $1 billion in stimulus checks for domestic terrorists?,Was the money used for prisoner benefits not the same as incarceration benefits?
Did Boebert shoot the ballon because she believed it to be a spy device?,Was the ballon the only one that Boebert shot?,Did Boebert take this action in retaliation against the Chinese?,Did the ballon go through the U.S. airspace in early 2023?
Does the arrow point in the same direction when it is rotated 180 degrees?,Does the mirror reflect the direction the arrow is pointing in?,Does the arrow have its mirror reflection pointing in the same direction as the arrow's mirror reflection?,Are there any other explanations for this optical illusion?
Did any U.S. states have new policies for driving less than 50 miles per day?,Does the policy include a minimum speed limit for vehicles driven at 49 miles per day?,Has all new policies increased traffic congestion and vehicle congestion?,Recent Policy changes:; Tenant vs. Insured : Did any U.S. states have new policies for driving less than 49 miles per day in 2020?
Did the company increase power generation by 657MW since the previous survey was compiled in 2014?,Did the increase take place in the form of a increase in renewable power?,Did the company increase its power generation during the survey?,Did the company increase its electricity distribution system by more than 6 MW in the past year?
Did the Trump administration support the disastrous trade deals?,Did the Clinton administration support those trade deals?,Did the Trump administration contribute to the negative economic impacts of these trade deals?,Did the Trump administration initiate and support these trade deals?,Is the Trump administration responsible for all of these negative economic impacts of the trade agreements?,Is this a true account of the impact of trade policies on jobs?
Did the department cut 95% of stop and frisks?,Did the department have the staff to determine what stopped and frisks were?,Was the Department able to determine what stopped and frisks were?,Did the Department stop and frisk on the basis of misconduct or discretion?
Is a weekly hardship allowance of £100 given to illegal immigrants and refugees living in Britain?,Is this allowance payable every week?,Is this allowance for all illegal immigrants or refugees in the UK?,"Does this allowance cover only refugees, emigrants, or asylum seekers?",Is the total amount of the aid payable for these individuals under any circumstances?
"Has this state lost 50,000 jobs since raising minimum wages in 2006?","Will Illinois be losing 90,000 jobs this year?",Have the state's jobs been lost during the last raising of minimum wage?,Has the state lost jobs since this raise?,Does this raise represent a change to the economy?,Does this raise represent a change to the underlying economy?
Did Tomlin claim Villanueva stood near the sidelines during the playing of the national anthem before a Steelers game?,Is it possible the Steelers criticized Villanueva for standing near the sidelines while the national anthem played?,Did Villanueva participate in the protest or was Villanueva protesting an NFL game?
"Did Ivanka Fox claim 8,000 people have supported her campaign?","Did Ivanka Fox claim to have 8000 people as volunteers, donors, advisers and endorsers?","Is 8,000 people considered a supporter in a presidential election?",Has this support earned a 'true vote' in the campaign?
"Did 260,000 Americans work in solar industry in 2013?","Is there more than 260,000 solar workers in the U.S.?",Is total employment in solar industry higher than coal mining industry?,Is the Solar industry hiring more workers than coal mining industry in 2013?,- The total number of Americans working in solar industry is 3 times that of coal mining industry in 2013?
Has Donald Trump released his tax returns to the public?,Did Donald Trump release his taxes after releasing his personal tax returns?,Did Donald Trump release his tax returns after releasing his personal tax returns?,Has Donald Trump released his tax returns?,Were Donald Trump's returns made public?,Did Donald Trump release any information about his tax returns?
Are asteroid impacts expected to hit Earth on any specific dates?,Will the first asteroid to hit Earth hit on any specific date in 2020?,Will the first asteroid to hit Earth hit on any specific date in 2020?,Is there evidence that an asteroid may hit during this period?
Did this benefit apply to workers from 1991 to 2020?,Does the benefit apply to workers from 2001 to 2020?,Was this benefit available to workers from 1991 to 2020?,Does the amount of this benefit relate to the workers from 1991 to 2020?,Was this benefit available to workers in India?,Was the benefit available in other countries besides India?
Has there been any proof that the current outbreak is planned?,Was the 2021 threat exercise used to test for the current avian flu outbreak?,Did the 2021 threat exercise prove that the current outbreak is planned?,Did the 2021 threat exercise confirm the current outbreak of avian flu?,Is there any evidence that the current outbreak has been planned for?
Did Moore receive the salary of a judge?,Did Moore receive a hefty salary as a judge?,Did Moore receive any charity donations?,Was Moore paid from a charity?,Did Moore receive any grants from the charity?,Did Moore receive a hefty amount from the charity?,Did Moore receive other grants from the charity?
"Did Obama's ""robbed Medicare"" money cover Obamacare?","Did Obama's ""robbed Medicare"" money cover Obamacare?",Was this money not used for Medicare?,"Did Obama's ""robbed Medicare"" money cover Obamacare?","Did Obama's ""robbed Medicare"" money cover Obamacare?"
"Did the prosecution of state Sen. Don Balfour cost less than $100, excluding prosecutors' salaries?","Did the prosecution of state Sen. Don Balfour cost less than $100, excluding prosecutors' salaries?","Did the prosecution of state Sen. Don Balfour cost less than $100, excluding prosecutors' salaries?"
Did this vaccine come in second rate for safety and effectiveness?,Did the vaccine come in third rate for safety and effectiveness?,Did this vaccine fail to meet safety criteria in this regard?,Did this vaccine come in first place for safety and effectiveness?,Did the vaccine have an adverse effect for this vaccination?,Did this vaccine fail to meet safety criteria in this regard?
Did Russia destroy the S-300 air defense system sent to Ukraine by Slovakia?,Did Russia destroy the S-300 air defense system sent to Ukraine by Slovakia?,Do S-300 air defense systems typically come with a battery pack?,Is S-300 air defense system considered a deadly weapon?,Did Slovakia destroy the S-300 air defense system?
Did Rasia say she has 18 children?,Are the children ages ranging from 18 to 18 months old?,Is this statement true or false?,Does this assertion appear to be true?,Does Rasia claim that her children are growing up fast?,Is the number of the children varying in age?
Did this video depict a brawl at the National Assembly in Pakistan?,Did this brawl delay a no-confidence vote?,Did this brawl delay a no-confidence vote?,Did this no-confidence vote derail the election?,Does this video show the aftermath of this brawl?
Has test and trace cost more than £37 billion?,Did test and trace cost less than £37 billion?,Was test and trace a total cost?,Did test and trace cost less than £37 billion?,Did test and trace cost less than £37 billion?,Did test and trace cost less than £37 billion?
Did Aldean agree to sing the National Anthem at the Super Bowl?,Will Aldean do it for free?,Does Jason Aldean have children?,Are there any other people associated with Aldean?,Has the Super Bowl hosted any other acts other than the national anthem?,Do other groups perform at Super Bowl?
"Did climate, weather and meteorological events that we would classify as ‘extreme’ have a decline in severity over the last 20 – 30 years?",Was there a decline in severe weather over the last 20 – 30 years?,"Did climate, weather and meteorological events that we would classify as ‘extreme’ have a decline in severity over the last 20 – 30 years?"
Did the CDC study have 397 reports of heart inflammation?,Is the Pfizer vaccine associated with heart problems?,Can heart issues and asthma be treated with Pfizer vaccine?,Is the CDC study about Pfizer vaccine safe?,Does the CDC study show data on heart risks associated with the vaccine?
Did the 2 Muslim teachers fire for refusing to remove their headscarves?,Was the motive for the firings of the Muslim teachers related to being observant?,Was there a discrimination on the basis of religion?,Are there any cases of discrimination between religion and school districts?,Are there any examples of a discrimination between religion and school districts?
Did Democrats have the right to vote twice at a polling place in Hagerstown?,Did Democrats receive permission to vote more than once at a polling place in Hagerstown?,Did Democrats receive permission to vote at multiple polling places in Hagerstown in November 2018?,Was a polling place in Hagerstown a Democrat’s only option to vote?
"Have 1,671 dead bodies been recovered in Texas, many in Brooks County?",Does any of the dead bodies have any known cause of death?,Is there any record of any fatalities?,"Are all of the dead bodies recovered in Texas, all in Brooks County?",Are there any reports of any other dead bodies in Texas?
Did the 19-year-old grocery store worker suffer a lung infection after wearing a face mask?,Did she suffer the lung infection due to breathing in herself?,Did the gas from the store incident cause the worker's breathing?,Did the gas from the grocery store incident cause the worker's respiratory infection?
Do McDonald's and BTS plan a meal collaboration?,Are there other ingredients included with the meal?,Have BTS endorsed McDonald's in any way?,Will BTS receive bonus stars with the meal?,Will the meal be available in a supermarket?,Is this the first meal to be released by McDonald's?
Is there sufficient proof of the fan to say these phrases?,Is this fan related to any other fans on the site?,Did this fan participate in this event?,Did this fan live in the area where this game was played?,Did this fan participate in this event in any other manner?,Did this fan participate in this event in any other country?
Are the American people against military action by a larger percentage of those opposed than those support it?,Did the American people favor military action before Obama acted in Libya in 2011?,Is the American people more in support of military action after Obama acted in Libya?,Did the American people agree with Obamas decision in 2011 to impose the military?
Did either of the candy bars have the wrong name?,Did both candy bars receive the incorrect name?,Was any label change done to correct this problem?,Did the names have any effect on the taste of either candy?,Is there any evidence that either bar was incorrectly dubbed as the Milky Way?
Is it true that if the state gets paid a dollar in taxes on gambling someone loses $6?,Is it true that if the state gets paid a dollar in taxes on gambling someone loses $6?,Is it true that if the state get paid a dollar in taxes on gambling someone loses $6?
"Would the Queen's Platinum Jubilee cause a windfall of $38,000 for each household?",Did this total include the statutory benefits?,Could the combined $1.65 billion in royal expenses not have meant a windfall for each household?,Did this estimated $1.65 billion of royal expense lead to a windfall for each household?
"Can a family of 4 making up to $88,000 per year still get a subsidy for health insurance?","Can an individual make up to $88,000 per year and still get a subsidy for health insurance?",Is there any way to check how much the subsidy for health insurance will be?,Has the law been criticized because it made it harder for people with more income to afford health insurance coverage?
Did multiple Austin City Council candidates win seats in the last 15 years?,"Have these Austin City Council candidates won seats after trailing by more than 4,000 votes in the election?",Did these Austin City Council candidates win seats in the last 15 years?,"Did the Austin City Council candidate win seats after trailing by more than 4,000 votes in the election in any particular period?"
Did this decrease in property taxes come from the tax relief funds put in by the state?,Did this lower property tax percentage come directly from the State?,Did this decrease in property tax actually take place because of the State?,Is this reduction due to some other government funding?,Does this percentage decrease in property taxes in general come because of the state budget?
Did the guns recovered from Mexico come from the U.S?,Did this gun theft result in one person being arrested in this country?,Did these guns come from all over the country?,Did the gun theft result in any arrests?,Was there a specific number of guns recovered from this country?,Is this article based on actual data?
Is Albert Bourla's goal 50% reduction in population?,Does Albert Bourla currently run Pfizer?,Did Albert Bourla talk about this goal in a video on the Pfizer website?,Does Albert Bourla plan to reduce the population by 50% by 2023?,Will the population decrease be reduced by 50% by 2023?
Did Pelosi buy 10 million shares of cannabis stock in Reuters report?,Was Pelosi's purchase of cannabis stock substantiated by Reuters report?,Does Reuters report accurately portray Pelosi's actions regarding cannabis stock?,Were there other reports of Pelosi investing in cannabis stock?
Did they expone him in every single case?,Was it in each of the cases?,Was it in every single case?,Did these cases involve multiple judges?,Did the judges testify in all the cases?,Did all the judges have access to the recordings?,Did all the judges testify in all of the cases?
Did four miscarriages occur after receiving this vaccine in Australia?,Was this vaccine able to prevent miscarriages?,Was this vaccine effective in curing COVID-19 in Australia?,Did the vaccine cause an outbreak of miscarriages?,Has there been any positive reports from women who receive this vaccine?
Do farmers use alcohol during protests?,Does alcohol come with the protest?,Was alcohol distributed free during protests?,Are the protests about farm laws?,Is the video being used on the internet?,Are protesters donating alcohol to the protests?,Do the protesters seem to have alcohol problems?,Is this video censored?
Did Cafe de Coral receive 2 000 fines for failure to wear face masks?,"Did all restaurants in Hong Kong have face mask law on December 21, 2014?","Did HK restaurants have face mask law on December 21, 2014?","Was 4,000 diners fined for failing to wear face masks?",Will face mask laws change in 2014?
"Did he pedal for a total of 25,000 miles?",Was the time of the journey calculated?,Did Birchmore arrive at the finish line with the exact number of miles he had to cover?,Is this cyclist considered to be the first cyclist to cycle around the world?,Is this cyclist considered to be a successful cyclist?
"Was there 83,000 common service centers pre 2014?",Have there been 2.92 lakh common service centers post 2014?,Was the number of common service centers higher pre 2014 or after 2014?,Is there any data or data sources that suggests this number did increase?,"Were there 83,000 common service centers pre 2014 or after 2014?"
Is there a reference to the number of registered citizens?,Has the number of registered citizens increased or decreased since the beginning of the scheme?,Does the number of registered citizens increase or decrease as the process progresses?,Has the overall number of registered citizens increased or decreased?,Has the amount of registered citizens increased or decreased over the last six years?,Does the scheme have any other requirements other than a voluntary registration?
"Do you mean 500,000 people sleeping outside on the streets?","Do you mean 500,000 people sleeping outside on the streets?",Is the number of people sleeping out on the streets an estimate?,Does the number of people sleeping out on the streets increase as the number of people sleeping outside increases?,No Answer>?
Is the proportion of kids dropping out considered acceptable?,Will 1 / 3 of these kids drop out?,Do 35% of these kids not go to college?,Will 35% of these kids not go to college?,Can all of these children go to college?,Are 35% of these kids not employed or can they not start a career?
Did a few thousand sadhus in Jaipur get COVID-19 when smoking from a pipe?,Did the people that tested positive for COVID-19 smoke tobacco?,Did all of the smokers get COVID-19?,Did any of the smokers in Jaipur have a medical record in the last 3 months?
Is there any evidence of an increase in agricultural land under this program?,Have there been increases in the number of agricultural hectares?,Are there any other significant increases in agricultural land under this program?,Have there been any decreases in agricultural land under this program?,Have these improvements increased under the Pradhan Mantri Krishi Sinchayee Yojana?
Did 28% of people in South Africa aged 20 or older complete high school?,Did South Africa have a higher rate of high school completion than other countries that have similar demographics?,Have the percentages of people who completed high school been higher in South Africa over the same period?,Did the percentages of people who completed high school in South Africa drop significantly after high school completion?
Did two Indian pilots die?,Was it an airstrike?,Was a result of this airstrike?,Did a response take place?,Did the pilots die?,Did this result in any loss of life?,Did the result of the operation in any country?,Did this incident in any other country?
Did the president say the water projects he completed improved a country's access to potable water?,Did the president say the water projects he completed improved a country's access to potable water?,Did the president say the water projects he completed increased a country's access to potable water?
Did Wuhan Coronavirus infect all humans?,Does Wuhan Coronavirus have HIV-1 DNA?,Does Wuhan Coronavirus use any other vector other than virus?,Do researchers think Wuhan Coronavirus is an HIV-1 Engineered Superweapon?,Does Wuhan Coronavirus represent a weapon of homicide or crime?
Has the bill passed in other jurisdictions?,Can minors be voted in?,Have laws passed in other jurisdictions also approved minors to vote?,Is the bill effective in all states?,Is the bill repealing?,Does the bill change the age requirements for voting by minors?,Are there other types of voter registration laws?
Is the malicious video about Argentina on WhatsApp going to hack your phone in 10 seconds?,Is the malicious video about Argentina on WhatsApp going to annoy you in 10 seconds?,Did this video come from a malicious source?,Is the malicious video about Argentina on WhatsApp circulating on WhatsApp?,Is this malicious video in English?
Did this driver have a driver's license?,Is there an accident investigation?,Can an attorney investigate this incident?,Were any other passengers affected by this incident?,Is there evidence that this driver did not have a driver's license?,Is this incident associated with a crime?,Did this driver's vehicle have a vehicle record?
Was Yoho right about this?,Do we need to change these laws?,Did Yoho say this is a requirement in the current laws?,Do we need changes in these laws?,Were these changes a big deal?,Was Yoho's comments against this happening documented?,Did Yoho say this in his opening remarks?
Did the Japanese Coast Guard send ships to drive away Chinese vessels on Pag-asa Island in April 2023?,Does China control the area?,Did China have boats in the area?,Did Japanese ships visit Pag-asa Island during that time?,Was Pag-asa Island part of the United States Navy?
Did the Uttar Pradesh govt require special tests for the students in a specific grade level?,Is there any evidence that this special test can be used as a substitute for the general exam in Uttar Pradesh?,Does the Uttar Pradesh govt require special test for all students in a specific grade level?
Was this video of a man saying Badrinath temple should be handed over to Muslim people?,Did this video show early trend of the AAP contesting in the elections to the state of Uttarakhand in 2022?,Did this video show early trend of the AAP contesting in the elections to the state of Uttarakhand?
Did GDP grow by 4.1% from the fourth quarter of 2014?,"Did agriculture, mining, and manufacturing grow at the same rate?",Did the real economy make an impact on GDP?,Were real sectors of the economy positive?,Does 1% represent the GDP recovery rate?,Can one assume that GDP growth for the 4th quarter of 2014 was 4.1%?
Did Florida prohibit citizens from buying electricity from companies that will put solar panels on your home or business?,Is Florida one of only five states in the nation that prohibit citizens from buying electricity from companies that will put solar panels on your home or business?,Is Florida one of only five states in the nation that prohibit citizens from buying electricity from companies that will put solar panels on your home or business?
Is the Prime Minister of India at the age of 26 in the video?,Is the Prime Minister of India in this video reciting Yoga?,Does the Prime Minister of India ever do yoga?,Are any of Prime Minister Narendra Modi's remarks reciting Yoga in this video?,Has anyone in this video verified the authenticity of this quote?
Did 60% of waterways in Austin have fecal matter found in them?,Was 70% of Austin's waterways found to be unsafe to swim?,Is it true that 60 percent of Austin's waterways are contaminated with fecal matter and unsafe to swim?,Did the Austin waterways have unsafe water in them?,Is the water in the Austin waterways unsafe to swim?
Is it true that people started to ignore social distancing rules during the 1918 pandemic?,Did this have an impact on the 2nd wave of infections?,Is it true that people started to ignore social distancing rules during the 1918 pandemic?,Does this effect have an impact on the third wave of infections?
Did the state import 10% of its milk supply?,Has this state been named America’s Dairyland?,Do cheesemakers in this state need milk from elsewhere?,Are there any other problems with this state’s milk supply?,Was the state in this situation prior to the election?,Do these issues impact the economy overall?
"Was the law repealed by Republicans a ""gravy train"" for lawyers?",Was this law repealed after it was passed by Democrats?,Was the repeal of this law a relief to lawyers?,"Was there a reason to think this law repeal was a ""gravy train""?",Did this law cause many lawyers to quit their jobs?
"Did Trump declare 4 October ""Bring Your Bible to School Day?",Has Trump previously declared this day to be a national school day?,Does Trump consider himself a proponent of educating children by the bible?,Has Trump had religious conflicts with schools in recent years?,Has Trump's policy on educating children by the bible contributed to these conflicts?,Does Trump support bringing the bible to school?
Does the vaccine increase a person's risk of transmission?,Does the vaccine have more side-effects than antibodies?,Do the antibodies make a person less likely to transmit?,Are the antibodies stronger than the vaccine?,Can antibody-only people get better protection in a disease?,Can it be said that antibody-only people get better protection in a disease?
Did the Swiss study report that the risk of myocarditis was 800 times higher for vaccinated young adults than unvaccinated young adults?,Did the study report that the risk of myocarditis was 800 times higher for unvaccinated young adults than vaccinated young adults?
"Was the number of gun deaths in the U.S. around 30,000 per year?","Are the number of gun injuries sustained in the U.S. above 80,000 per year?",Are there any reports of gun deaths in the U.S. in the last 10 years?,Have there been any reports of gun deaths in the U.S. in the last 10 years?
Did India's ruler of 200 years attend the event in Britain?,Did the head of the meeting include the leaders of more than 53 countries?,Did the head of the meeting include people from the Indian-American community?,Did the head of the meeting include some members of the Indian-American community?,Did any of the heads of the meeting belong to the Indian-American community?
Did Romney have the same amount of votes as Sanders?,Is Sanders currently holding that claim to be true?,Was Romney's claim about his sex advantaged about two and a half million votes from Sanders based on a hypothetical?,Was a majority of these votes for Romney coming from their relatives?
Did Thomas ignore two people at a 2021 fundraiser?,Was Thomas in public with two people at this event?,Did Thomas offer to shake hands with two people?,Did Thomas offer to shake hands at any other fundraisers in the 2021 season?,Was it clear to Thomas that the two people who offered to shake hands with him were unwilling to do so?
Did Menendez have any Wall Street money raise?,Is Menendez the king of raising money from Wall Street?,Is Menendez one of the leaders in the Senate?,Did Menendez raise any Wall Street money?,Did Menendez raise any money from Wall Street?,Did Menendez raise money from Wall Street?
Did the 911 call from the attack on Pelosi provide proof of liberal media lies?,Did the 911 call make clear the attack was a violent one?,Is there any proof that the media lied about the attack?,Did the media lie to cover it up?,Does the audio have information to provide evidence?
Was a significant reduction in the number of serious crimes made over the past 5 years?,Did any governmental efforts towards lowering the number of crime in Pennsylvania improve?,"Is it estimated that there were at least 8,000 crimes in Pennsylvania in 2016?",Were fewer crimes in Pennsylvania in 2016 than in 2016?
Did CSK team members feast on Jalebi Fafda?,Was CSK team members hungry during the IPL 2023 final match?,Did CSK team members enjoy Jalebi Fafda in between the match?,Did CSK team members eat Jalebi Fafda with the IPL 2023 final match?
Did Aajtak report that lockdown has been withdrawn in some parts of city?,Did India Today report that lockdown has been extended till May 4?,Did Aajtak report that lockdown has been withdrawn in some places of city?,Did the lockdown extend or stop at any of the listed areas?
Did the video about gun violence take seriously?,Did the video of gun violence take seriously?,Does anyone know that there is a video about gun violence?,Did the video have a strong effect on gun violence?,Did the video have significant political impact?,Did The Onion video about gun violence take seriously?
"Has there been more than 100,000 fired people since he became secretary?",Do many of these employees have manipulated waiting times?,Did all these fired people make mistakes?,Have all of the fired employees resigned?,Did this individual work under an independent civilian position?,Has this individual worked under more than one other employee?
Did the government ask children to sing this song on June 25?,Is this song popular in the United States?,Will people be singing this song?,Are these children encouraged to do so?,Do public schools support this song?,Do public schools support this song?,Have public schools in the United States supported this song?
Did images that predate the Russian-Ukraine war circulate ahead of Russian parade on May 9?,Did a Russian parade on May 9 include any images that predate the Russian-Ukraine war?,Did all Russian parades on May 9 include images that predate the Russian-Ukraine war?
Did Poroshenko give orders to cut off gas transit to Europe?,Did Poroshenko do that by order?,Is it true that Poroshenko gave orders to close the ATO by August 22?,Did he also cut off gas transit to Europe?,Was Poroshenko's intention to cut off gas transit to Europe a fake?
Did the CDC report that American's receiving COVID-19 vaccines were at higher risk of infection from new COVID-19 variants than those who were unvaccinated?,Did the CDC report that Americans who received COVID-19 vaccines were at higher risk of infection from new COVID-19 variants than those who were unvaccinated?
How many coronavirus cases have been confirmed in Wichita?,Is the number of cases reported in this area greater than 10?,Did the news report state this?,Is this the first case confirmed in this area?,Is this an isolated outbreak or was the epidemic widespread?,Are there other coronavirus cases in this city?
Does the map show what will the US look like in 30 years due to climate change?,Did the map show US population in 30 years?,Can there be any doubt about the map?,Is there any evidence of climate change?,Have climate changes not contributed to the change to US population in 30 years?,Will the change to US population happen over the past 30 years?
"Did DeWine take $40,000 from ECOT?",Did DeWine do nothing while ECOT lied about enrollment?,Did DeWine give ECOT millions to pay tuition?,"Did DeWine take $40,000 from ECOT?",Did DeWine get millions from ECOT?
Did the city avoid spending an enormous amount of money by saving ratepayers money?,Did the city save billions of dollars in 2009 by persuading the council to pursue a less expensive compliance mechanism if the City was required to treat Bull Run drinking water?,Did the city spend all of that money on the compliance mechanism?
Did 94 percent of refugees move outside New York City last year?,Is this information accurate?,Is this information considered reasonable?,Were the refugees relocated from one state to another?,Is this information reliable?,Has this data been available in the past?,Would this data be accurate if it had not been available in the past?
Does this country have more registered voters than legal eligible people?,Are there other counties that are more eligible people?,Do all counties have higher registration numbers than legal eligible people?,Does this country have more voters than legal eligible people in any of the counties in this country?,Does this country have a higher percentage of eligible people in the counties that it has more registered voters in than legal eligible people?,Does this country have a higher percentage of illegal people in the counties that it has more registered voters in than legal eligible people?
Have we experienced some of the coldest years in history?,Did the most recent century have the hottest 20 years?,Are the last 100 years the coldest period in history?,Have we experienced the largest drop in global temperatures since the 1980s?,Do scientists think that the last 100 years will be the coldest period?
Did a Google executive admit the election to be rigged?,Was this revealed during an undercover investigation?,Did the Project Veritas investigation uncover any evidence of such a conspiracy?,Did this project take place prior to the election taking place?,Did the investigation involve several people?,Do the allegations made in this investigation support the claims made in the project?
Was the ordinance to negate the SC ruling enforced?,Was the ordinance passed under an election code?,Did the law state that lawmakers and members would be immediately disqualified in that case?,Did Gandhi physically tear up the ordinance to enforce the ruling?,Did the law require legislators to disqualify themselves?
Is there a 50% estate tax rate if this is true?,Is the proposal a 65% estate tax rate?,Is Clinton proposing a 65% estate tax rate in her upcoming 2016 presidential campaign?,is Clinton proposing a 65% estate tax rate in her upcoming 2016 presidential campaign?
Was die Grippe an jährlich von 25 000 totes gefordert?,Was die Grippe in der vergangenen Zeit komplett verschwunden?,... Was das Grippe in der Vergangenheit jährlich von 25 000 totes gefordert?,... Was sich im Sommer im letzten Jahr die Grippe komplett gebrochen?
Has this budget reduced the deficit by more than $350 billion?,Will the deficit go over $1.5 trillion this year?,Has the deficit been reduced during the Obama administration?,Did the deficits increase during Obama's first year?,Would a reduction in deficits be considered a reduction in debt?,Did Obama reduce the deficit by more than $350 billion in his first year?
Did Narendra Modi win the US'most honest politicians' list?,"Are the states of Gujarat, Himachal Pradesh and Jharkhand among the 50 most honest politicians?",Was the top of the list in the US?,Did Modi get any votes in the US'most honest politicians' list?
Did Ohio state is one of 17 states with an estate tax?,Did Ohio state have the lowest threshold in the nation?,Did Ohio state have an estate tax?,Did Ohio state have the lowest threshold in the nation?,Did Ohio state have the lowest threshold in the nation?,Did Ohio state have the lowest threshold in the nation?
Does Ohio have sufficient state funds to address this bill?,Is Ohio already impacted by energy policy?,Does Ohio have funding to implement this bill?,Has Ohio increased the number of jobs this bill has caused?,Did Ohio's legislature have sufficient funds to pass this bill?,Is there any proof that this bill cost jobs?
Did the photos contain images that showed an earthquake that hit Taiwan in December 2020?,Did these photos show the aftermath of a quake?,Did these photos capture survivors who came together?,Did this photo illustrate any images related to the event?,Did this photo feature other photographs related to the quake?,Does this photo represent any photographs of the earthquake?
Did Republicans pay for trillion dollar prescription drug entitlement program without pay?,Did Republicans pay for trillion dollar prescription drug entitlement program?,Did Republicans inherently create trillion dollar prescription drug entitlement program?,Did Republicans inherently create trillion dollar prescription drug entitlement program?,Did Republicans inherently create trillion dollar prescription drug entitlement program without paying for it?,Did Republicans inherently create trillion dollar prescription drug entitlement program without pay for it?
Is this a form of suicide for executives?,Is it common for executives of failing companies to resign?,Is resigning one of the two suicide options in Japan?,Is it common to commit suicide in Japan?,Was there any evidence of executives resigning from failing companies?
Is the 2015 tax exemption valid for athletes earning money?,Is the 2015 tax exemption valid for all athletes earning money?,Is the 2015 tax exemption valid for athletes winning money?,Can a national athlete not be taxed on winning money?,Is the 2015 tax exemption valid for all individuals making money?
Did this region receive the drought in which Joseph recounted?,Did the land have a drought that Joseph recounted?,Is this location now in the United States of America?,Did the lands mentioned in the Bible suffer droughts?,Was this area on the surface of Mount Kilimanjaro?
Did the Austin City Council ever subsidize a race track?,Was this a budget proposal?,Did this city council vote to support a race track?,Did the city council vote for a race track?,Did the city council vote to support a race track?,Did the city council vote to support a race track?
Did the public vote for projects they liked?,Did voters choose their favorite projects?,Did voters participate in the voting process?,Did voters receive a ballot?,Does the data show that voters favor a certain candidate?,Did voters select the projects they liked?,Did this person participate in the voting process?,Is this person a representative of the U.S. public?
Did the CBO say that lowering Medicare to let 50 year olds get into it will save the government money?,Is it true that the CBO says that lowering Medicare to allow 50 year olds to get into it will lower premiums for all Americans?,Does this claim imply that we would reduce premiums for all Americans if we decreased Medicare for older people?
Did Begin kill WWII vets and booby trap their bodies to kill those who found them?,Did Begin kill veterans he booby trapped?,Did Begin commit suicide in his home?,Did Begin murder veterans at the end of his rule?,Do other experts dispute Begin's homicides?
Did the helicopters escort the UFO in this video?,Did he helicopters escort the UFO in this video?,Was the UFO spotted in this video?,Did the helicopters escort the UFO in this video?,Did this UFO come to an appreciable height above Durham in January 2019?
Did Jasper County raise property taxes by 7 percent to pay for one death penalty case?,Are the county property taxes paid for through the death penalty?,Does Jasper County raise property taxes to pay for one death penalty case?,"Is the death penalty case referred to as a ""disqualification"".?"
"Did Kenosha, Wisconsin pass a city law ""requiring"" all officers to wear body cameras?","Did Kenosha, Wisconsin buy body cameras?","Did Kenosha, Wisconsin do anything about the law to prevent police from firing guns?",Did the police shoot Jacob Blake in August 2020?,Is the city law mentioned in this report true?
Did a 400-pound woman sue Paris Zoo over a hippo escaped?,Did a hippo attempt to rape the woman?,Did this incident take place in a Paris Zoo?,Did the Paris Zoo have any other animals besides this hippo during this time?
Did Yadav promise to build 2000 new mosques in Arunachal?,Did Yadav promise to build 1000 cr for Babri Masjid?,Did Yadav promise to set 30% Muslim reservation in Arunachal?,Did Yadav promise to build more mosques in Arunachal?
Was U.S. women’s soccer pay 20 million more than U.S. men’s soccer pay?,Did womens soccer team generate $20 million more than men’s soccer team in 2014?,Did women’s soccer team receive 4 times more money than men’s soccer team?,Did women’s soccer team receive $4 million less than men’s soccer team in 2014?
Was Falk responsible for raising property taxes at the highest rate in the state of Wisconsin?,Did Falk raise property taxes by millions of dollars every year?,Did Falk approve the second highest increase in the state in 2010?,Were property taxes in Dane County raised by millions of dollars every year?,Was Falk responsible for the second highest property taxes increase in the state?
Did Paxton deem it wrong to discarded 2.5 million mail in ballots in Texas?,Did this happen due to Paxton not being able to verify if the ballots were discarded?,Did the voters decide this decision?,ARE there more than 2 million mail in ballots in Texas?,Does this mean there are only 2.5 million mail in ballots in Texas?
Did Shapiro receive over 40% of the vote?,Did Shapiro get under 50% of the vote?,Did Shapiro receive more votes after the election?,Did Shapiro receive more votes after his run?,Did Shapiro receive more votes after his run?,Did Shapiro receive more votes after the election?
Did this user predict correctly that 2021 NBA Finals would be contested by the Phoenix Suns and Milwaukee Bucks?,Did this user also predict that 2021 NBA Finals would be contested by the Cleveland Cavaliers and the Miami Heat?,Was this user correct in predicting that the 2021 NBA Finals would be contested by the Phoenix Suns and Milwaukee Bucks?
Is there any reference of Ramdev bhaj exempted from GST?,Is there any mention of Amritsar bhaj in Amritsar?,Is Ramdev bhajs kitchen under GST charge?,Is Ramdev bhaj kitchens kitchen under GST charge?
Did the hospital administration close?,Did the hospital administration close with regards to Medicare?,Did any hospital administration close with respect to Medicare?,Did any hospital administration close with respect to Medicare?,Does this hospital administrator say the government will close due to Medicare?,Do any hospital administrators close with respect to Medicare?,Have any hospital administrators been on the open market defending the government's move to close?
Did the government distribute Ramzan gifts during the lockdown?,Did the government distribute Ramzan gifts during the lockdown?,Is the government responsible for distributing gifts during a lockdown?,Did the government distribute Ramzan gifts during the lockdown?,Was there any other issues in the lockdown?,Did the lockdown effect any other festivities?
Did the debt increase by over 23 percent under President Obama?,Did the debt increase more under any President since Ronald Reagan?,Did Obama's debt increase less than any other President?,Did Obama's debt increase over 33% under any other President?,Did Obama's debt increase less than any other President?,Have any presidents had more debt increase than President Obama?
Did a man grab a woman's rear while watching the Apollo 8 launch?,Was this man at a distance from his girlfriend while this man grabbed her rear?,Was this man wearing a flight suit and doing this while watching this launch?,Was this woman in a clothing company and wearing this clothing?,Was this woman also wearing a flight suit?
Does the plan include a 5.4 percent raise for Governor Scott Walker?,Would a 5.4 percent raise on employees be part of the pay freeze plan?,Did Governor Walker support a 5.4 percent raise for himself under the pay freeze plan?,Does the Governor support a 5.4 percent raise for hisself under the pay freeze plan?
"Did 449,000 Californians turn down jury duty if they were not citizens?",Is there any evidence that these non-citizen jurors actually turned down jury duty?,Has the state found any evidence to suggest that non-citizen jurors in California are disproportionately absent?
Are new cameras being set live on the M25 and M1?,Will an automatic fine be issued for any caught motorists over 72mph?,Do the new cameras have an automatic fine function?,Would anyone be penalized for driving over 72mph?,Does the fine include any costs?,Are there any other details of the new cameras?
Was COVID-19 (SARS-COV-2) the virus that people of Italy were standing outside a masjid for?,Can the virus be infected with other diseases?,Were Italian people standing outside of a masjid as they had no control over the spread of COVID-19?
Is this assertion true?,Was this statement true?,Did Democrats win these seats?,Is there any evidence to support this claim?,Is the statement true?,Is this statement based on the election results?,Are the GOP seats in North Carolina not supposed to be won?,Did Republicans win these seats?
Do the whales have full recovery or extinctions down 90% over the last century?,"Does Koala population still increase, as it peaks at around 100 years old?",Do wind turbines reduce bird prey numbers in the US alone?,Would the net benefit to US birds of prey be saved by a ban on wind turbines?
Has Milwaukee incarcerated over 50% of black men in their 30s?,Does Milwaukee jail 11% of white men?,Did Milwaukee have an 11% white men prison population in 2015?,Was Milwaukee a jail for white men and black men in 2015?,Does Milwaukee jails over 50% of black men in their 30s?
Do 270 million people in the world have access to the study?,Does the study compare between hydroxychloroquine and other medications?,Does this study have many participants?,Does this study have a significant effect on the death rate of COVID-19?,Is this study done at an average cost per individual?
Is the WHO's Pandemie Index 6 the number that can be detected with each opect?,Are there certain conditions that can indicate pandemic rank?,Is it the case that everyone experiences opects every year?,Is there any information to suggest that opects occur more frequently than others?
Did the person dance on the train in Japan?,Was it a criminal offense in Japan?,Did the person ever get a ban in Japan?,Did the individual dance on the train during the incident?,Does the individual currently have a valid visa?,Was there any incident involving this person in Japan in the past?
Are all of these women women veterans?,Did these women have to have their legs injured?,Are all of these veterans male or female?,Are these veterans men or women?,Did these women lose one or both legs?,Is the photo of these women veterans from war or from other conflict?,Was this photograph taken in a country that has war?,Is this photograph from a war country?
Did Alabama lose to Georgia on average in this season?,Does Alabama normally have an advantage against their opponents?,Has Alabama been over favored this season?,Does Alabama have a better record than Georgia in this season?,Has Alabama won over Georgia fewer than 1 time in this history?,Are there any records related to Alabama having the advantage over Georgia on this occasion?
Was this flooded street in south India in 2020?,Is the video in English?,Does this video show a crocodile in flooded street in South India in 2020?,Is the video in english?,Have we seen any crocodiles on this street before in south India?
Did Trump's supporters sew official flags for him?,"Did the Trump 2024 flags also have the slogan ""Save America Again""?",Did China make Trump 2024 flags?,Does China produce Trump 2024 flags in a larger quantity than Trump did?,Did China make Trump 2024 flags?
Was the person nursing the child an underage adult?,Did the mother's young child participate in the breast feeding process?,Was the individual under the age of 28 on the day of the incident?,Was the individual under 21 the day of the incident?,Did the individual have a child of their own?,Did the infant mother know that their child was pregnant?
Did the poster contain information on public health at Burning Man 2023?,Did this poster contain graphic information about public health?,Is the flyer from this poster part of an overall Burning Man 2023 event?,Can you find more information about the poster from the Burning Man 2023 website?,Thanks for help!?
Did Trump receive a 58% approval rating in Ohio?,Has there been any polls that suggest Trump has a 58% approval rating in Ohio?,Did Trump have an approval rating at 58% in Ohio?,Was Trump rated a 58% approval rating by other polling groups in Ohio?,Is Trump still a top voter in Ohio?
"Did Biden say a tax increase on incomes under $450,000?",Is there any proof that the tax increase will occur under a Biden plan?,Is it implied that Biden's tax plan is a lie?,Is there evidence that Biden is lying about his tax plan?
Did the funding that was allocated to the fighting of ISIS actually go to ISIS?,Is there any evidence that there was anything wrong with the amount of funding that the Pentagon allocates to ISIS?,Would the budget increase result in a decrease in ISIS funding?,Would there be a reduction in ISIS funding?
"Are there details as to the identity of the victim, or if the body belongs to a particular person?",Did authorities say the victim abused 30 men?,Does the body belong to a specific person?,Does the police believe she was raped by 30 men?,Did the police investigation determine the location of the body?
Did Barrett work with the town to redevelop the Menomonee Valley?,Did Barrett work on redevelopments of the Menomonee Valley before he left office?,Has Barrett led efforts for redevelopment of the Menomonee Valley since his term in office?,Did Barrett's efforts for redevelopment of the Menomonee Valley result in many jobs in the town?
Did the reticulated python swallow and kill a woman in Indonesia?,Did the reticulated python kill a woman in Indonesia?,Was the reticulated python female an adult?,Did the reticulated python kill a female in Indonesia?
Is there a video showing Chinese officials in white protective hazmat suits carrying people down a hallway?,Did the person wearing the hazmat suit be a member of the local government?,Was this person involved in any other incidents associated with COVID-19?,Is this person responsible for the quarantine?
"Has TSA grown to a level of 67,000 employees?","Has TSA grown from 16,500 screeners to 67,000 employees?","Does TSA make over $105,000 per year average?",Does TSA pay employees for years?,Does TSA offer employees a profit share?,Is TSA currently funded by private foundations?,Does TSA receive financial benefits?
Did Amul Milk employ over 1.3 lakh employees who consumed beef?,Was Amul Milk trying to persuade people not to consume beef?,Did Amul Milk fire 1.38 lakh employees who consumed beef?,Did Anand Seth terminate employees for their beef consumption?
Did the FBI spend more time investigating the Jan 6 Capitol attack than 9/11?,Did the FBI investigate the Jan 6 attack prior to September 11?,Did the FBI spend more time investigating the Jan 6 Capitol attack than 9/11?,Was the FBI more focused on terrorism than on criminal investigations?,Does this mean the FBI spent more time investigating the Jan 6 Capitol attack than 9/11?
Is it true that the 1918 influenza pandemic originated from bacterial pneumonia caused by face masks?,Was Dr Fauci involved in this infection?,Can any scientists who have researched this illness claim that it was caused by a form of respiration?,Can we infer that the 1918 flu pandemic resulted from the spread of the bacteria?
Did Amanda Teague legally marry the spirit of a Haitian pirate?,Did Teague marry the spirit of the Haitian pirate?,Did Teague marry the spirit of the Haitian pirate during this time frame?,Did Teague marry the spirit of the Haitian pirate during this time frame?,Did Teague marry the spirit of the Haitian pirate during this time frame?
Are there any states where four or more people were killed during mass shootings?,Is this country a country that has more mass shootings than most states?,Was this country a country where four or more people were killed during mass shootings?,Does this country have an average year with more mass shootings?
Did the video contain a transcript of an Aung San Suu Kyi speech about the 2020 general election?,Did the video contain a transcript of a speech by Suu Kyi about the 2020 general election?,Is the video produced by a third party?,Did the video producer have a conflict of interest in being the producer of this video?,Does this video appear to be authentic?
Did Rittenhouse purchase the AR-15?,Was Rittenhouse the one to claim the AR-15?,Was Rittenhouse the one to use the AR-15 in the Kenosha shooting?,Was Rittenhouse the one to make the claim?,Did Rittenhouse purchase the AR-15 from the COVID-19 stimulus check?
"Has he built 1,000 km of tarmacked roads every year?",Is there any record of his administration building tarmacked roads?,Is there any record of his administration building tarmacked roads every year?,Was there an actual report on this claim?,Was there any record of the actual claims of his administration?
Did District's proposal include a pay increase for 4 years?,Was the proposed pay increase for 4 years?,Are there any other provisions of the proposed pay increase that I did not know about?,Was there a proposed pay increase for 4 years?,Does this proposal relate to the District of Columbia proposal?,Is there any suggestion that the District will offer a pay increase for four years?
Did the war on drugs increase incarceration by 500 percent?,Did the war on drugs affect the poor or minorities most?,Was the increase in incarceration disproportionate to poor people?,Was the war on drugs responsible for a large increase in drug offenses in our country?,Did the war on drugs affect drug offenders in a discriminatory way?
Are there any records of the death of the princess Qajar?,Is it probable that 13 young men killed themselves because she rejected them?,Is Qajar a male?,Did the men have an issue with her?,Did the men die in this manner?,Was there any evidence to suggest that Qajar rejected the men?
Did the NRA support passage of the California legislature's open carry bill?,Was the NRA opposed to the California law?,Did this law ever pass?,Did the NRA vote against the California law?,Did the NRA vote against the California law?,Did this law impact a lot of the public?
Did the VA Choice Program pass with 91 percent approval?,Did Trump pass the Veterans Affairs Accountability Act with 90 percent approval?,Is the VA Choice Program approved by veterans?,Did Trump pass the VA Choice Program as part of a national initiative?,Is Trump in favor of the VA Choice Program?,Did Trump pass this legislation along with any other laws?
Was the Muslim man stripping naked in the Ambala neighborhood?,Does this alleged rape occur in Ambala?,Has this alleged rape happened in Ambala before?,Did this alleged rape occur in Ambala prior to 2015?,Was this alleged rape in Ambala after 2015?
Did the donation of 670 refrigerators and stoves occur due to minor damages?,Did the donation of the refrigerators and stoves occur due to minor damage?,Did Palam Metro station have sufficient numbers of refrigerators and stoves to make the donation?,Did the donation of 670 refrigerators and stoves occur due to minor damage?
Did the Biden's own 10% of the company whose stock is up almost 300% since Joe Biden became president?,Did Bidens purchase any shares in the company whose stock is up almost 300% since Joe Biden became president?,Did the Biden's own shares in the company whose stock is up almost 300% since Joe Biden became president?
Did Texas lawmakers in 2011 order school districts to test every student on their respiratory system and weight?,"Are there other ways that the test could be administered, other than weight?",Is the government actively trying to collect information about students for use in school health/health policy?,Is the government actively tracking data for schools that receive this data?
Did videos depict an authentic alien autopsy?,Did the video clips go viral in the month of August 2023?,Was the video clip authentic in any way?,Did these video clips portray an alien in any way?,Were these video clips accurate in any way?,Did the video clips portray a real alien?
What is the government minimum wage?,Is the government minimum wage higher than or equal to £8.72 an hour?,"Is £8.72 an hour equal to £15,070.00 per year?",Can the government make up a rounded percentage of this minimum wage?,"Is it worth $15,070.00 per year to earn the minimum wage?"
Did a physician place dying patients onto a scale that determined the weight of the human soul?,Did the physician calculate the weight of the human soul in grams?,Does this weight estimation represent actual values of the human soul?,Is there evidence that these calculations may have validated the values of the soul?,Is the weight of the soul associated with the number of hours people are conscious?
Did the bird have highlighter yellow feathers in February of 2021?,Was the bird photographed on a beach?,Is the bird in flight or landed?,Was the bird photographed at an airport?,Was the bird landed in the city of Athens?,Did the bird have a yellow coat on its feathers?
Is Fauci to lose a huge amount on the vaccine he invested in?,Is Fauci to lose a large amount on the vaccine he invested in?,Is Fauci standing to lose 100 million dollars on the vaccine?,Are there any other issues Fauci raised with the Vaccine?
Has poverty visibly been reduced since 2000?,Have other programs and services that alleviate poverty been reduced?,Has any increase in poverty since 2000 been attributed to these programs?,Can statistics from this data be compared to figures based on other countries?,Has poverty in South Africa been seen to have decreased in the past decade?
Are there less than 10 registered voters in the eight states?,Is there sufficient voting for all states?,Is there sufficient voting for all states?,Are there more registered voters than a certain percentage of the population?,Is the percentage of voters lower for the states that elect fewer than 5 people?,Is the voting age in these states above the same age population as in the general population?
Are transactions over 2000 to pay a 1.1% fee?,Is it only in 2000 and above that the fee will be applicable?,Is there any evidence that UPI charges above this amount will subsidize this fee?,Is UPI a type of cash payment system?,Does this fee come from the banking regulator?
Does the video show the Taipei 101 skyscraper swaying during the earthquake?,Was the video showing the Taipei 101 skyscraper shaking during the earthquake?,Has any video shown the Taipei 101 skyscraper shaking during the earthquake?,Does this video link to a public domain video?
"Is Hillary Clinton disqualified from being president under U.S. Code Title 18, Section 2071?",Is there any evidence that Hillary Clinton is disqualified from being president?,Are there any signs that Hillary Clinton can be prevented from being president?,Is it not legal for Hillary Clinton to be the president of a country that has two republics?,Is there any evidence that Hillary Clinton has the capacity to be the president of a country with only one republic?
Was this investigation the culmination of several cases of infection with COVID?,Was this investigation one of the larger viral investigations in the history of the medical community?,Was the COVID-19 investigation conducted on a large scale?,Did the COVID-19 investigation determine the actual COVID-19 status?
Did it decrease to just 3 people on social security?,Did it increase by 16 workers for every one person on Social Security?,Is there anything in the article that indicates a drop of the current number of workers on social security?,Was this change in the number of workers due to a shortage in the labor force?
Did the student have a rainbow birthday cake?,Did a rainbow-patterned sweater appear in a photograph with a rainbow cake?,Did the student wear a rainbow patterned sweater and a rainbow-themed cake in this Facebook photo?,Did the student wear these accessories for a special occasion?,Does this school have an appeals process?
"Was the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's announcement on May 13, 2021, the first to allow people to go anywhere without masks?",Are all people who have been vaccinated currently able to go anywhere without masks?,Do all people who have been vaccinated previously have to continue using masks after this announcement?
Did the police officer wave in Trump supporters?,Was this incident during a protest?,Is this incident from east of the U.S. Capitol?,Is this incident in a political event?,Is this incident related to police shootings in DC?,"Is this incident from January 6, 2021?"
Did any of the leaders opposed the COVID-19 vaccination?,Did any of the leaders die as a result of opposing the COVID-19 vaccine?,Did any of the leaders die as a result of refusing the COVID-19 vaccine?,Did any of the leaders die as a result of rejecting the COVID-19 vaccine?,Did any of the leaders die as a result of rejecting the COVID-19 vaccine?
Do Facebook groups allow Filipinos to get help with registering their sim cards?,Are all groups that allow Filipinos to get help with registering their sim cards?,Will the help available for registering sim cards come from any Facebook groups?,Do all Filipinos get help with registering their sim cards?
"Does Kaine say she would bring 186,740 new jobs to Wisconsin?","Is Donald Trump said to cost 61,050 jobs in Wisconsin?","Is Kaine's assertion that Donald Trump would bring 186,740 new jobs to Wisconsin correct?",Is there a reliable estimate of how many jobs would Kaine bring to Wisconsin?
Does Tejashwi Yadav still have to become a Chief Minister?,Is the promised employment worth over 10 lakh?,Does Tejashwi Yadav have an objection to the promised jobs?,Is Tejashwi Yadav responsible for bringing up the job offers made by his successors?
Would Nevada allow all abortions to be considered a ban?,Would Nevada allow any restrictions on abortion that are not included in the bill?,Would Nevada allow restrictions on abortion that are not contained in the bill?,Would Nevada allow any exceptions in regards to abortion rights?,Would abortion laws in other states be banned?
Did the U.S. rank six in the share of women in the workforce ten years ago?,Did the U.S. rank Twenty-three today in the share of women in the workforce?,Have women been doing their best in the workforce for ten years?,Have more women been doing their best in the workforce for ten years?
Is there evidence that global warming is a myth?,Did 80 graphs from 58 peer-reviewed scientific papers published in 2017 agree with the thesis?,Did any of these graphs state that global warming is a myth?,Is there evidence to show that global warming is a myth?,"If the data provided by this study is taken from scientific data, can we safely be confident that this data is reliable?"
Did SEALs find hundreds of trafficked children and dead bodies on the Evergreen ship?,Did SEALs find the Evergreen ship blocking the Suez Canal?,Does this confirm that SEALs were successful in locating children and bodies on the ship?,Have SEALs found other trafficked children and dead bodies?,Has the evergreen ship blocked the Suez Canal?
Did the letter fall into the mailbox?,Is there any other evidence of Midget stuck in the mailbox?,Has Midget ever been stuck in a mailbox?,Did Midget fall into the mailbox while mailing a letter?,Did Midget need any medication to keep his eye safe?,Do any witnesses describe Midget in the story?
Is this offer available for all Indian users?,Did this offer originate from the Tata Group?,Was this offer valid for the entire length of the visit?,Can this offer be used for the entire period?,Is this offer valid for a total amount of 29 days?,Does the offer provide any additional benefits besides the free recharge?
Was the Kuwait Towers lit up for the Marcos Jr. and Duterte's victory in the 2022 polls?,Did the Kuwait Towers light up for both Marcos Jr. and Duterte's election win?,Does this photo prove the towers are lit up to celebrate Duterte's win?
"Was Odinga ""beaten like a dog"" in November 2021?",Was Odinga 'beaten like a dog' in 2017?,Was a 2016 fight between Odinga and his rivals a brawl?,Are Odinga and Odinga both 'beaten like a dog' in 2020?
Did this information come out to the press before the petition took effect?,Have the Wisconsin recall petitions been investigated by a third party?,Are these petitions being retracted?,Do the provisions of law that these petitions are based upon already exist?,Does this law change every year?,Will this change lead to an increase in recall requests?
Does this footage have a date?,Was the astronaut doing this in a specific day?,Did the astronaut use a timer to track this?,Was the astronaut in orbit at the time of this footage?,Did this astronaut land on the Earth?,Did the astronaut land on the ground?,Did the astronaut land in an area that was not the Earth?
Did the Journal.ie publish this article about monkeypox living on surfaces for up to 120 years?,Did the Journal.ie publish this article about monkeypox living on surfaces for up to 120 years?,Did the Journal.ie publish this article about monkeypox living on surfaces for up to 120 years?
Did a bank employee witness the couple try to cash the faked bill?,Was a fake bill issued by the US bank?,Did this bill include the image of Trump?,Was this fake bill sold in a bank?,Did the fake bill have the same pattern as a real bill?,Did a bank employee witness a couple trying to cash this fake bill?
Did Kibaki leave a country worth KSh 5 trillion?,Will this new government leave an economy worth KSh 13 trillion?,Did Kibaki leave a government worth KSh 5 trillion?,Is this new government worth a economy worth KSh 13 trillion?,Does this new government have enough cash to allow this increase in spending?,Will this new government have enough money to allow this increase in spending?
Did Martinez cut a deal with prosecutors to avoid jail time?,"Did Martinez pay $24,657.50 to cover his legal bill?",Is there any evidence that Martinez made a deal with prosecutors?,Was Martinez's legal bill related to the deal with prosecutors?,"Is there any evidence that Martinez did not pay $24,657.50 for his legal bill?"
Is the Multnomah County libraries open 43 hours per week?,Is the Multnomah County libraries open more hours per week than any other libraries in the four counties in the region?,Are the Multnomah County libraries the lowest in terms of hours per week?,Is the Multnomah County libraries open fewer hours a week than most other libraries in the four counties?
"Did 45,000 confirmed deaths from COVID-19 within three days?","Were 45,000 confirmed deaths from COVID-19 due to these shots?",Has any investigation taken place?,Do reports state any links to the deaths?,Have reports indicated any links to COVID-19?,Have reports in public sources made the point that those claims are untrue?,Did COVID-19 have a history of widespread use?,Are reports based on reliable sources?
Did the CBO numbers reveal that the entire $1.5 trillion tax cut is virtually paid for by higher revenue and better nominal GDP?,Did any CBO numbers reveal that the entire $1.5 trillion tax cut was virtually paid for by higher revenue and better nominal GDP?,Did any CBO numbers reveal that the entire $1.5 trillion tax cut was virtually paid for by higher revenue and better nominal GDP?
Has it been 80 years since a Supreme Court vacancy has been nominated and confirmed in an election year?,Has it been 80 years since a Supreme Court vacancy has been nominated and confirmed in an election year?,Does the tradition in the US make it impossible for a Supreme Court vacancy to be nominated and confirmed in an election year?
Did Biden confirm that he was running for president in 2020?,Is Biden running for president in 2020?,Does the country approve of Biden’s candidacy?,Are Biden’s comments encouraging?,Is Biden running for president in 2020?,Does Biden support the current president?,Does Biden support Trump or not?
Do the majority of Americans believe God decides the winner of the Super Bowl?,Are there any non-scientific studies supporting this claim?,Has there been any research indicating that God has control over Super Bowl?,Does the analysis support this assertion?,Is there any evidence supporting this claim?,Is this number true?
Did this change have any impact on my account?,Is this charge required after my four ATM withdrawals in a month?,Will the additional charges be for the entire month?,Is the additional charge refundable?,Did I have a withdrawal that cost more than Rs 173 when I made this withdrawal?
Did Biden say he will beat Biden?,Is Biden an open opponent to Trump?,Did Biden say he would beat Trump?,Did Biden support the idea of Biden being an open opponent to Trump?,Did Biden support a call for Trump to run against Biden?
Did the video show a road or a supermarket shaking violently?,Did the video show a road or a supermarket shaking violently?,Did the video show a road or a supermarket shaking violently?,Did the video show two separate videos?,Have these videos been watched by others?,Has any video that shows the roads shaking violently been reviewed by others?
Does the location of Leyte likely have an area around it where this cataclysmic event will occur?,Is the location of Leyte or its surroundings in a geographic region that has volcanic activity?,Will the eruptions trigger tsunamis?,Will these eruptions trigger a tsunami?
Did this pipeline create more jobs than expected?,Did these workers receive any contracts worth $1.6 billion?,Was this pipeline the only one to produce these jobs?,Did this pipeline create jobs despite an argument that it was not intended to?,Was the Keystone pipeline a direct threat to unions?,Were these jobs caused by the pipeline?,Did the pipeline create jobs by itself?
Did Christie veto funding for Planned Parenthood on any count during his time in office?,Did Chris Christie veto funding for Planned Parenthood on any count while in office?,Did Chris Christie veto funding for Planned Parenthood?,Is the statement true about Chris Christie's veto on Planned Parenthood funding?
Is it true scientists told us that we had 12 years to avert the worst consequences of climate crisis?,Is it true scientists told us we have 9 years left to avert the worst consequences of climate crisis?,Is it true scientists told us we had 12 years to avert the worst consequences of climate crisis?
Does Lacson support Aquino's candidacy for the Senate in 2022?,Are Aquino's running bids under scrutiny?,Will Lacson offer assistance to Aquino?,Is Aquino considered to be a talented politician?,Is Aquino considered qualified to run for the Senate?,Was Aquino ever a candidate for the Senate in this county?
Did two massive explosions cause power outages in the U.S.?,Was this explosion part of a larger abrasion attack on critical infrastructure?,Is there evidence that this explosions were part of an attack on the United States critical infrastructure in general?,Has this attack increased power outages due to a lack of natural gas sources in this country?
Did this family picture be taken in South Africa?,Do these children have any siblings?,Are there any adults present?,Did these children have any siblings?,Are any of the siblings related to Elon Musk?,Do any of these people have a baby?,Did these people have any pets?,Did this family photo show any animals?
Did this vaccine show up in a CNN news story in October?,Did this vaccine show up in a similar CNN news story in November 2012?,Did this vaccine show up in a different CNN news story in November 2012?,Did this vaccine show up in a similar CNN news story in November 2012?,Did this vaccine show up in a similar CNN news story in November 2012?
Did 15 couples participate in the raid in Madhya Pradesh?,Did all the couples have Muslim men and Hindu women?,Did all the couples have different ethnicities?,Did all the couples have religious differences?,Did all the couples include a religion?,Did all the couples get into the compromising position?,Did all the couples get arrested?,Did any of the couples have any political affiliations?
Does Six Flags plan to close one of their theme parks to the public during this event?,Will this closure be in observance of Muslim holiday observances?,Will this closure be to encourage public consumption for this occasion?,Is this event planned to occur more frequently than once a year?,Are the closing dates consistent with Six Flags general policies of being open to the public?
Did 80% of people take Moderna vaccines have side effects?,Did children in Sudan get polio from polio vaccine?,Did these children get polio from the Moderna vaccine?,Are moderna vaccines not approved for use in Sudan?,Was moderna vaccine ineffective in Sudan?,Does this vaccination have the same effectiveness as the polio vaccine?
Did this flood occur in February 2023 in Gresik?,Was there any type of damage?,Was the flood caused by a large deluge?,Was this flood accompanied by a severe storm?,Did this flood occur in February 2023 in Indonesia?,Did the flooding have any cause for any significant damage?
Is Klobuchar promising to resettle more refugees than other Democratic candidates?,Has Klobuchar pledged to resettle refugees in her district?,Did Klobuchar pledge to resettle refugees in her area?,Is Klobuchar campaigning on a goal to resettle refugees in all areas of the US?
Did an armed protest of Trump's rally disrupt any campaign events?,Was there a political party involved with this event?,Did Trump's rally cancel any events?,Is this incident associated with any specific presidential event?,Have any of these events been cancelled?,Did anyone have injuries related to this event?,Is it safe to say that Trump supporters attacked Biden-Harris' bus in Texas?
Did Bowser ban dancing at weddings as a response to the COVID-19 pandemic?,Was Bowser able to make these bans?,Was the COVID-19 pandemic responsible for Bowser banning dancing at weddings in this city?,Did Bowser ban dances at weddings in other cities that were affected by the COVID-19 pandemic?
Did Trump rescind his opposition to the war in Iraq before it began in 2003?,Did Trump continue to advocate against the war in Iraq in 2017?,Did Trump rescind his opposition to the war in Iraq in 2017?,Was Trump elected in 2017 after the war in Iraq began in 2003?,Was Trump president in 2017 after the war in Iraq began in 2003?
"Did the federal government issue more than 468,500 pages of regulations since Obama took office?",Did Obama's predecessors have more regulations?,Is there any evidence of a a long list of regulations?,Was the time period between President Obama took office and the time Obama first took office accurate?
Did Russia unveil a nuclear weapon?,"Could the world be destroyed by the ""Satan 2"" nuclear weapon?","Is ""Satan 2"" a nuclear weapon?","Is the ""Satan 2"" nuclear weapon capable of destroying every living thing living in the world?","Does the ""Satan 2"" nuclear weapon have a propulsion system?"
Is 917 identified websites of state governments/UTs included on ERNET India?,Can these be the primary locations?,Will all these sites be made accessible online in ERNET?,Is ERNET India a state funded initiative?,Can all these websites be accessed in ERNET?
Did this person have a chopper on them when this happen?,Did this person have a helicopter on them when this happened?,Did there happen any injuries?,Did the two people involved in this incident have any injuries?,Was there a crash involving a motor vehicle?,Did these people have the opportunity to breathe and move?
Did Medicare begin as a public option and hold 97 percent of the market share?,Did Medicare start out as a public option and hold 97 percent of the market share?,Has Medicare seen a 2% increase in market share in the last 20 years?,Did Medicare have a large increase in market share in the last 20 years?
Do e-cigarettes have 10 times more cancer-causing ingredients than regular cigarettes?,Was e-cigarette use associated with greater cancer rates than regular cigarettes?,Does e-cigarette use contribute to more cancer?,Are e-cigarettes associated with fewer cancer risks than regular cigarettes?,Is there any overlap in e-cigarette use with regular cigarettes?
Did the Chick-fil-A poster reflect company-wide policies?,Is this poster misleading?,Is the 16.50 starting wage reflected on the Chick-fil-A poster?,Is the number of starting wage employees based on a percentage of employee turnover?,Is the median starting wage for a Chick-fil-A employee in the United States?
Is there any evidence this photo shows the Golden Gate Bridge opening for the public for the first time back in 1937?,Is there any evidence this photo shows the Golden Gate Bridge almost collapsing?,Is this photo taken prior to 1937?,Has this photo been used to present a historical viewpoint of the Golden Gate Bridge?
Did Obama promise the unemployment rate would never be higher than 8 percent?,Is unemployment in America still above 8 percent?,Did Obama promise to keep unemployment below 8 percent?,Did Obama promise to keep unemployment below 8 percent?,Did Obama say the jobless rate would never be above 8 percent?,Was Obama in favor of an increase in payroll taxes?,Did Obama promise the percentage of the GDP increase of 8% or more?
Did two judges resign after election ruling?,Did the judiciary report that two judges resigned after election?,Has any other election rulings led to the resignation of judges?,Is this the first time an election ruling has caused resignation of judges?,Is this the first time an election ruling has caused resignation of judges?
Did the CDC find that law-abiding gun owners stop crimes 2.5 million times annually?,Did this claim come from the report of a state department?,Does this claim imply that gun-owners stop crimes 2.5 million times each year?,Does this claim imply that gun ownership is a crime?
Did New York make a change to the assault weapon ban?,Did New York change a cosmetic aspect of the ban?,Does New York have strict laws on assault weapons?,Is New York making any type of changes to the assault weapons ban?,Is the cosmetic change to the assault weapons ban from what the NY state requires?
Did officers immobilizing an individual in February 2021 take place in Portugal?,Did officers immobilize an individual in February 2021?,Did police force immobilizing an individual take place in Portugal in February 2021?,Was this video taken in Portugal?,Did the officer immobilize an individual in February 2021?
Is there a coronation signatories that say Trump won the 2020 election?,Is King Charles III responsible for naming Trump the winner of the 2020 presidential election?,Can Trump's election be contested on a different basis than what the United Kingdom elects?,Has the United Kingdom never made a unilateral declaration declaring Trump the winner of the 2020 presidential election?
"Does this imply that insurance for Florida residents pay $2,000 per stay?",Is this assuming that Florida residents will not be liable for any other costs?,Is this statement true of all hospital stays?,Is this assuming that uninsured Florida residents will not be liable for any other costs?
Is this statement about flushing notes down the toilet true?,Did Donald Trump issue this statement?,Did Trump personally issue this statement?,Was the January 6th 2017 statement true or false?,Did Trump offer some advice on flushing notes down the toilet?,Did Trump offer some specific advice on flushing notes down the toilet?
Did Ugandan president Museveni authorize the arrest of 10 rebels?,Was the letter fake?,Has there been any announcement of these arrests?,Has anyone in Uganda taken advantage of these accusations in relation to the country's economic status?,Would it be the case to arrest this group of people?,Did this article say this was a fake investigation?
Did this speech describe a future that includes many forms of violence?,Does this speak of a future in which only a minority of people will be slain and/or raped?,Did this address include a description of future violence including robberies/horses?
Is it true that 86 million middle-class families will see a tax increase?,Is it true that the increase is called middle-class bill?,Is it true that these people are going to see a tax increase?,- Will these people see a tax increase?
Is there any specific time when GST will be charged on good morning messages?,Will there be 18% GST on good morning messages?,Is there any particular reason for how GST will be charged on good morning messages?,Is it unclear whether or not GST on good morning messages will apply to the prepaid services?
Did one of these heart experiments kill dogs?,Did one of these experiments involve multiple dogs?,Are all the dogs killed in this experiment the same breed?,Was this test designed to examine heart health?,Was the dog involved in this experiment a male or female?,Is the dog related to this experiment?,Is this animal in a medical institution?
Did the $3.5 trillion 2021-22 infrastructure plan offer a journalism tax credit of 50% of the salary of each journalist?,Did the $3.5 trillion 2021-22 infrastructure plan allocate funds equal to 50% of the salary of each journalist?,Does the $3.5 trillion 2021-22 infrastructure plan make the provision to provide a journalism tax credit?
Did the BJP rigging the elections?,Are the elections being rigged?,Are the elections being rigged?,Are there any independent election sources that claim that BJP rigging the elections in 2022?,Are any Independent voters able to verify the accuracy of the BJP rigging in the elections?,Do any independent voter rely on independent voting sources?
Was the incident related to a San Diego Zoo employee?,Is the intern aged 29 years and over?,Is the intern charged with sexually assaulting a gorilla?,Is there any information regarding the intern's employment status in the San Diego Zoo?,Do any witnesses have any information about the incident?,Did the alleged incident occur during the normal operating hours for a San Diego Zoo employee?
Has her political strategy continued in 2015?,Have PACs received contributions from the Democratic campaign?,Did PACs contribute funds from the Democratic campaign?,Have other PACs contributed money from the Democratic campaign?,Was this claim accurate?,Did this claim have any evidence supporting it?,. Has the Republican candidate said she isn’t taking corporate PAC money since 2016?,. Are there any other PACs that contributed cash to the Democratic campaign?
Did the 5G auction cause a record loss to the Centre of Rs. 2.8 lakh crore?,Has the 5G auction damaged the reputation of India?,Did the Centre suffer a record loss of Rs. 2.8 crore crores after the 5G auction?,Is there any way to estimate the loss to the Centre of Rs. 2.8 crore crores after the 5G auction?
Is it true that the photograph was taken by a photographer?,Was the can of beer a 12-oz bottle?,Did the photograph specifically appear during a specific time period?,Can this image be used to describe the can of beer?,Are there any other examples that would indicate that the can of beer is a 12-oz bottle?
Does dialing *#21# confirm if your iPhone has been wire-tapped?,Does dialing *#21# reveal if your iPhone has been wire-tapped?,Is the answer to these questions unclear?,Are any legal restrictions on using these methods?,Do these methods of wire-tracking differ from cellular phones?
"Did Sullivan say despite extensive US funding, equipping, and training of Afghan security forces ""we could not give them the will"" to fight the Taliban?",Has there been any evidence that the United States has not given Afghan security forces the will to fight the Taliban?,Did Sullivan say that the United States could not give Afghanistan the will to fight the Taliban?
"Would $47 billion in revenue create 611,000 infrastructure jobs?",Is the Buffett rule in effect on the proposed tax cuts?,Are the projected tax cuts on infrastructure related?,Is the increase in revenue for infrastructure related taxes necessary for those tax cuts?,Are those cuts in infrastructure related taxes possible for any government programs?
Is the district still overwhelmingly Democratic?,Are many votes from Democratic into Republican district over time?,Has Democratic control over the district decreased or increased since the party's election in 2010?,Is the district now evenly divided between Republican and Democratic?,Would having more Republicans support the district remain viable in 2020?,Have Democrats won more of the district than Republicans for more than a decade?
"Did a drunk driving accident occur in March, 2023?",Was Jean-Pierre involved in any drunk driving accidents?,"Was Jean-Pierre remorseful about a drunk driving accident in March, 2023?","Did Jean-Pierre commit a drunk driving crime in March, 2023?",Was Jean-Pierre involved in any drunk driving accidents?
"Did the CDC confirm 118,000 people died suddenly due to COVID-19 vaccines?",Was the CDC solely responsible for the deaths of these people?,Was the CDC solely responsible for the deaths of the people that died of COVID-19 vaccines?,Did the CDC actually claim that these people died suddenly due to the COVID-19 vaccines?
Did the simulation exercise predict the Monkeypox outbreak?,Did the simulation exercise take place in 2021?,Was the simulation exercise conducted in 2016?,Did the simulation exercise have negative results?,Has this simulator exercise been repeated in the past?,Have there been any studies with this simulation exercise in the past?,Have any studies with this simulation exercise in the past failed?
Did Rittenhouse's mother drive him to Kenosha?,Does Kenosha have any high crime rates?,Did Rittenhouse shoot people in Kenosha?,Did Rittenhouse shoot three people in Kenosha?,Does Kenosha have a high crime rate?
Will it still be possible to use driver's licenses to board airlines after October 1st 2020 due to the REAL ID Act?,Are driver's licenses used to board most airplanes?,Will you need to show a picture of your drivers license to board an airplane?,Will these changes impact people with pre-existing conditions?
Are students more likely to drop out if they've been arrested on campus?,Is it the same for those who have appeared in court?,Is it four times more likely to drop out if arrested on campus compared to those who don't appear in court?,Is it true that high schools arrested on campus are twice as likely to drop out as those who have not appeared in court?
Did judge stop Kander from  manipulating election?,Was it in the first cases where the judges stopped Kander from manipulating elections?,Has Kander been prosecuted in other election related matters?,Was Kander involved in any other election related proceedings?,Was Kander ever involved in litigation?,Did Kander testify against those people who attempted to vote during any election related proceedings?
Did Georgia rank No. 9 for the rate of women murdered by men?,Did Georgia have the highest rate of women murdered by men?,Is Georgia the only state with a rate of women murdered by men?,Have Georgia sex violence statistics shifted?,Has Georgia's rate of women murdered by men shifted?
Are face masks in Khadi's shop sold at 999?,Is Khadi's facemask advertisement clearly displayed to the public?,Has Khadi's advertisement been replaced with the original portrait of Mahatma Gandhi?,Is Khadi's facemask advertisement clearly displayed to the public?
Did Trump compare his COVID-19 response to President Barack Obama's handling of the H1N1 pandemic?,Did Trump compare his response to Obama's H1N1 response to COVID-19?,Did Trump compare Obama's H1N1 response to COVID-19?
Did Abe go against orders from the World Economic Forum?,Did he reject 1.6 million doses of the drug?,Did Abe give citizens ivermectin as part of a mandate from the World Economic Forum?,Does Abe give citizens COVID-19 vaccines?,Did Abe give citizens Ivermectin as part of a mandate from the World Economic Forum?
Did 5 million Americans get sick by covid?,"Did any one of these deaths result in 170,000 death claims?",Have all countries performed better on the cvs death claims?,Did the majority of these deaths result from the covid eclosion in other countries?,Has covid experienced any retorts from global warming to global warming events in the past  decade?
Did Mr. Moore know nobody had ever heard of Juneteenth?,Did Mr. Moore support the idea of a Juneteenth rally before?,Did Mr. Moore plan a rally on June 19?,Did Mr. Moore have contacts in the US state of Nevada for Juneteenth?,Did Mr. Moore support Juneteenth after his November 2014 victory?
At what age was Alam was successful at opening a deli for two years?,Did Alam have enough money to pay their way through college?,Was Alam's income sufficient for college?,Was Alam successful in opening his own deli?,Was Alam successful in being successful at opening his own deli?
Did the soldiers of the 18 horse regiment die in this shooting?,Did the 4 soldiers die in this firing?,Did the soldiers die in this firing?,Was this incident recent?,Are the Indian Army currently involved in this conflict?,Did this incident occur on a specific date?,Did the soldiers of the 18 horse regiment die?
Was Trump amnestied a total of 2 million illegal aliens in 2018?,Has Trump stated he had a plan to amnesty illegal immigrants?,Is Trump's plan specific to the legal immigration population?,Did Trump amnesty illegal aliens in 2018?,Can the estimated amount of illegal aliens amnestied in 2018 be compared to actual amnesty?
Are there any preprints of this study?,Are the results of the preprints published in the U.S. equivalent to published research?,Are the results of this preprint unbiased?,Is this study relevant to the general public?,Is the preprint from Brazil relevant to this article?,Are there any adverse drug reactions from ivermectin?
Did Walmart pay a $500 restitution to customers during this period?,Does this claim cover consumers that did not shop at the US Walmart in 2022?,Is this claim based on a claim for a $500 refund?,Were there any studies to suggest this claim was wrong?,Is the claim based on true or false?,Is this claim based on any evidence?
Did any of the bills for 2014 in this session have a budget within the state’s spending limit?,Are any of the bills for 2014 in this session contained in the state’s general budget?,Does any of the bills for 2014 in this session contain any special provisions that would make it a more limited state?
Does the House GOP budget propose to eliminate Medicare?,Will Republicans repeal Medicare by 2020?,Does the House GOP budget have any provisions that make it harder to repeal Medicare?,Would the Senate Republicans vote to repeal Medicare by 2020?,Does the House GOP budget include language that prohibits anyone from paying health insurance with a 401(k)?
Did the Clinton Foundation spend $100 million in 2015?,Did the Clinton Foundation spend the entire amount of money in 2015?,Did the Clinton Foundation spend only $5 million of the total in 2014?,Did the Clinton Foundation donate more of the rest of the money in 2014 to charities than in 2016?,Did Clinton give the rest of the money to charities in 2014?
Has Union County experienced zero hospitalizations with COVID-19 despite negative criticisms of school COVID policy?,Has Union County had zero hospitalizations with COVID-19 despite negative criticisms of school COVID policy?,Has Union County had zero hospitalizations with COVID-19 despite negative criticisms of school COVID policy?
Did Ali quote a pithy quote during the 9/11 visit to the World Trade Center site?,Did Ali give a quote about religion after visiting the World Trade Center?,Was the quote from Ali satirical?,Did the quote resonate with many followers of the 9/11 attacks?,Did the quote resonate for Ali and his fellow Americans?
Are there statistically significant differences in the pregnancy rate for the ages 1-14 and 19 years combined?,Are women between these age groups more likely to have been pregnant?,Do any women aged 14 - 19 have a higher rate of pregnancy than women aged - 14?,Does age increase the pregnancy rate for the ages 1-6?,Is pregnancy rate higher for females aged 14 - 16?
Did men in India cause milk contamination?,Has anyone ever seen a clip from India that shows men contaminating milk containers?,Is there footage of men contaminating milk containers?,Was this clip reported by The New York Times?,Was there an image of men contaminating milk containers in this clip?
Do all U.S. Citizens have the right to $700 per week to stay at home to avoid spread of Coronavirus?,Is it true that all U.S. citizens are entitled to $700 per week to stay at home to avoid spread of Coronavirus?,Does the U.S. government require all citizens to stay at home to avoid spread of Coronavirus?
Is it true Carter supports budgets for the state?,Did Carter vote for a budget for education?,Did Carter support Deal's budget?,Is it true Carter does not support under funding education?,Is there any evidence Carter supported under funding education?,Were any of Carter's positions contradictory?
Does Biden claim the increase in gasoline prices was due to Biden's leadership?,Did Biden actually make significant changes to gas prices prior to Biden becoming president?,Does Biden's name appear to cause Gas Prices to rise in 2016?,Does Biden hold any authority over gas prices?,Is Biden likely to raise gasoline prices again in 2016?
Do Americans suffer PTSD as a result of the war in Iraq?,"Do 30,000 Americans have PTSD as a result of the war in Iraq?","Are more than 100,000 Americans suffering PTSD as a result of the war in Iraq?","Do 3,000 American people die due to Iraq war?","Do 100,000 Americans have PTSD related to the war in Iraq?"
"Are individuals who make under $75,000 taxable on income in 2021?",Are taxes on income after that tax taxable in 2027?,Are income tax deductible in 2021?,Are income taxes in 2021 taxable in 2027?,Are income taxes deductible after 2021?,Is there no tax deductible in 2021?
Did the American people that had health insurance at the time of the debate have health insurance?,Did 90% of the people in the survey have health insurance?,Did the 85 percent have health insurance at the time of the debate?,Did the 85 percent have a positive experience with their health insurance?,Did the 85 percent of the survey make a general statement about their health insurance?
Did a boomerang hit his head?,"Was a man in Kentucky successful in suing himself for $300,000?",Did the boomerang hit a person or an entity?,Did the boomerang hit someone?,Did the boomerang hit someone or another person in this case?,Have any other boomerang related injuries occurred since the boomerang hit?
Are there laws that say an all occupant can be drunk and drive?,Are there laws that say a glass of wine could make a person drunk?,Does an 0.05 standard for drunken driving mean alcohol will be detected by someone having a glass of wine at dinner?,Would a 5% standard for drunken driving also indicate the person is a good alcohol driver?
Did one Democrat call for gun control after a man shot at Republican lawmakers playing softball?,Did all of the Democrats call for gun control after the shooting at Republicans?,Are there any lawmakers in Congress who are Democrats?,Will anyone be charged in connection with gun control after this shooting?,Will a majority of Democrats call for gun control after this shooting?
Did Microsoft and Bill Gates create Omitron?,Did Microsoft and Bill Gates make Omitron?,Did Omitron have any sequels?,Was Omitron successful?,Was Omitron successful in its first year?,Did Omitron receive the same media as Omitron?,Did Omitron become successful in any of its other releases?,Did Omitron have a game like Omitron?
Was there a shortage of new entrants to university in the year of 2014?,Did there surpass average marks required for entry to university?,Was the number of students who passed university level matric greater than 40% of the year total?,Is there a greater disparity between the number of pupils who passed university level matric compared to the number who scored the lowest on matric?
Did Obama's budget double or triple the debt in 5 years?,Did Obama's budget triple or double the debt in 10 years?,Did Obama's budget increase or decrease the debt in 10 years?,Did Obama's proposed budget increase or decrease the debt in 10 years?,Did Obama's proposed budget increase or decrease the debt in 5 years?,Did Obama's proposed budget increase or decrease the debt in 10 years?
Do observing an individual moment of silence for each Jewish victim of the holocaust take over 11 years?,Is there sufficient documentation to provide an accurate estimate of how long a moment of silence would take?,Does the amount of time required for observing an individual moment of silence for each Jewish victim of the holocaust equate to a year?
Do more than 7% of Central Falls police officers and firefighters collect disability pensions?,Are 5 percent of all retired police officers and firefighters in Central Falls receiving disability pensions?,Do more than 75% of all retired police officers and firefighters in Central Falls receive disability pensions?,Do 5 percent of all retired police officers and firefighters in Central Falls receive disability pensions?
Did all of the WTC towers are brought down by controlled demolition?,Did the WTC 1 towers all have different methods of demolition?,Did each tower come down with controlled demolition?,Was the WTC 7 tower brought down via controlled demolition?,Did each tower come down with controlled demolition?,Did the WTC 2 towers come down via controlled demolition?
Does Disney donate $5 to the Make-A-Wish foundation if you share a photo of yourself wearing Mickey Mouse ears?,Is this a reward that can be purchased after sharing a photo of yourself wearing Mickey Mouse ears?,Does this a reward that can be purchased after sharing a photo of yourself wearing Mickey Mouse ears?
"Has Portland employed a managers per every six ""front-line"" workers?","Is the current number of managers per each six ""front-line"" workers of the city?",Is this in order to be proportional to current worker performance?,Is this in a sustainable way?,"Is this the exact number of managers per every six ""front-line"" workers in Portland?",Is there any other data that supports this quote?
Does James Talarico suffer from Type 1 diabetes?,Is the cap effective?,Did the cap help the diabetic population?,Was the bill passed in the legislature?,Has Talarico expressed his own diabetes?,Has the legislation contributed to decreased diabetes incidence in Texas?,Is the bill still being considered for implementation?
Did foreign debt grow by 115% for 2013 to 2015?,Is the increase in foreign debt for 2015 over 2013?,Has the increase in foreign debt been a total increase of KSh800 million or more than one-third?,Is the increase in foreign debt due to a decrease in domestic economic activity?
Is it true that 200 police officials resigned from Delhi police in support of farmers protest?,Does it say any specifics about what the police were planning to do after the protest?,Did the protesters protest the farmers strike?,Did the protesters protest the farmers strike?,Did the protesters protest any government decisions?
Are snake plants able to sustain humans in a sealed room?,Does this article apply to humans' survival in sealed rooms?,Was this research conducted by NASA?,Was this research published in peer-reviewed journals?,Are the researchers based on a fact?,Does this article claim any proof of this research?
Is China gaining in mileage?,Does Japan achieve lower mileage on average than the U.S.?,Is Japan a leader in mileage?,Can we expect Japan to lead with US mileage?,Is there a comparison between China and the U.S.?,Is China's fuel mileage comparable to that of the U.S.?
Does consuming a glass of onion juice a three times in six weeks prevent prostate diseases?,Is it true that drinking a glass of onion juice a three times in six weeks prevents prostate diseases?,Is it true that drinking a glass of onion juice a three times in six weeks prevents prostate diseases?
Did Ukrainians beat two Berlin residents for speaking Russian?,Did Ukrainians beat two Berlin residents for speaking Russian in the past?,Are there any other relevant events in relation to this incident?,Did Ukraine and the U.S. act with respect to this incident?,Did Ukraine force Berlin residents to speak Russian?,Did the Ukrainians attack the Berlin residents?
Was this poll conducted specifically during the presidential election?,Did voters in this poll favor or oppose E-Verify?,Does this poll state a overwhelming majority of people want E-Verify?,Does this poll reveal a percentage of people voting for E-Verify?,Does this poll show an overwhelming majority of people wishing to support E-Verify?
Did Obama sign a bill for $1 billion in Zika funding?,Did Obama give $7 million to Florida?,Did Obama promise more funding in the bill?,Has the federal government committed any more money to help Florida?,Is there any other estimate of what federal money the federal government has committed?,":""$7 million""?"
Did the weave have maggots in it?,Was the weave in this manner unsanitary?,Was the weave in this manner unsanitary?,Did it result in serious complication?,Did the weave in this manner impair any bodily function?,Did the weave cause any other medical issues?,Are maggots uncommon in these types of weaves?
"Do there at least three vacant apartments in a city with a population of around 30,000 people?",Does the city in which each person experiencing homelessness have one vacant apartment?,Is the number of vacant apartments in NYC high or low?,Does any city experience an average decrease in the number of vacant apartments yearly?
Did Kamal Harris claim that veterans benefit cuts are coming?,Did Harris claim veterans benefits will be cut within four years?,Is it true that veterans benefits are being cut in four years?,Does Harris have an attorney who can validate the claim that veterans benefits are being cut?,Has the claim been corroborated with other sources?
Did 56 Chinese soldiers die during the February 5 Galwan Valley clash with India?,Was the army on alert for the attack?,Did the army use multiple effected weapons in the air attack?,Did the army deploy military personnel in the area?,Did this event occur formally?,Did any country claim responsibility for the attack?,Was the army active in the area?
Is this increase in funding historic in the country?,Did this increase in funding help 17 states?,Is the increase in funding for high-quality child care available in all states?,Did most of these states reduce their waitlists altogether?,Are these measures reducing the wait times for many children?,Are these reducing wait times entirely?
Is Red Lobster offering free meals to Facebook users who click a link?,Is the Red Lobster offer limited to one person?,Is the Red Lobster offer available for multiple people?,Are other locations offering free meals?,Is this offer open to all Red Lobster restaurants?,Would this offer only be applicable to certain locations?
Did 83 senators vote to give NATO the power to send Americans to war?,Is the Senate the only place in the country where senators have vote to give NATO the power to send Americans to war?,Was the vote by senators on this matter unanimous?,Has the voting process remained unchanged since this vote?
Did Boxer vote to cut Medicare spending?,Did the cut significantly reduce Medicare spending?,Was it a total cut?,Did the cut cost hospitals and nursing homes too much money?,Would the cut effect patients at hospital or nursing homes?,Would the cut impact fewer patients?,Would the cut affect the overall healthcare system?,Would the cut affect a single group of individuals?
Has Nigeria's financial crimes commission raided the ruling party's presidential candidate's home?,Have they found $ 400 million in new naira notes?,Does the financial crimes commission believe the ruling party's presidential candidate stole naira from the state government?,Were the sanctions against the ruling party's presidential candidate in place during this raid?
Does Sri Lanka levy a levy for those leaving the country in 2023?,Does a levy be imposed on citizens leaving the country in 2023?,Has any similar levy in other countries been imposed in Sri Lanka?,Have any similar levy in other countries been imposed in the United States?
Does the current Alzheimer's drug treatment involve excessive regulation?,Are overzealous regulators responsible for the current FDA drug policy?,Can excessive regulation result in greater costs than needed for the treatment?,Are the attorneys that represent the pharmaceutical companies overzealous in their own actions?,Is the time for the FDA to implement a drug treatment plan in 10 years sufficient to eradicate Alzheimer's?
Did Cuomo manage to hold growth in 2011 to two percent?,Is it true that Cuomo has not maintained spending growth over 2011?,Is Cuomo failing to achieve the goal of two percent growth?,Is Cuomo unable to control spending growth under state legislature?
Is it true that most polls show Clinton beating McCain by 6-7 points?,Was there an accurate poll in 2006?,Are there any polls in 2008?,Are there any other polls or publications that show that Clinton has a lead in 2010?,Were these polls based on information that was reported from outside sources?,Were these polls based on information that was reported from the media?,Did these polls have a record of accurate results?
Did Clinton speak before Congress about the attack in Benghazi?,Did Clinton appear before Congress before the Benghazi attack?,Did Clinton tell Congress the attack happened in 2012?,Did the attack in Benghazi cost American lives?,Does Clinton's testimony about the Benghazi attack fall under any other categories?
Do people of Uttar Pradesh say lockdown exists in 15 districts?,Is the statement from Uttar Pradesh's chief minister from a recorded video?,Has the state been under lockdown lately?,Is the statement from the Chief Minister from a recorded video from a recorded video?,Does the video show a lockdown situation in any of the districts?
Would this hypothetical increase in fuel efficiency save America the cost of imports from the Middle East?,Would the energy savings from this hypothetical increase in fuel efficiency result in a reduction in Middle Eastern imports?,Would a decrease in Middle East imports result in a reduction in American oil consumption?,Are there other ways that fuel efficiency may help save a significant portion of the energy demand in the U.S.?
Did Rauner sign the bill?,Will Rauner make state-funded day care centers into sanctuaries?,Has a bill been signed since Rauner signed the bill?,Has the bill been amended after Rauner signed it?,"Have school, college, and state-funded day cares had sanctuaries?"
Does a white powdered substance grow on fabric?,Does detergent kill white powdered substances?,Does a white powdered substance grow on fabric?,Does this fungus have a specific growth cycle?,Does this fungus propagate by aging?,Does this fungus survive on fabric for 6-12 hours?
Has the US decreased its coal consumption in 10 years from fivety-eight to 504?,Is the United States the only nation that has reduced its reliance on coal energy?,Is reliance on coal energy an important part of the economic fabric?,Is carbon dioxide emissions from coal power plants currently lower than in all other forms of energy production?
Did this person mislead him?,Did this person intentionally get a wrong answer to the question?,Did this person give the wrong answer?,Has this person's vested interest in obtaining political votes damaged them?,Did this person receive money for the incorrect answer?,Did this person receive money for their mistake?,Did this person do this with the help of BJP?
"Has he chaired, vice chaired or led any committee meetings?",Has he held his position for 12 years?,Did anyone in this position have prior experience in the same roles?,Was this council member in the same position as some of the other members?,Is there any information about the current state of this council member?,Did this member attend all the committee meetings?
"Did health officials confirm that Trump's health was ""deteriorating"" in June 2017?","Are the health officials who stated Trump's health was ""deteriorating"" still in place in the United States?","Was the President's health ""deteriorating"" prior to June 2017?",Are health officials still conducting clinical trials for Trump's health?
Was there any damage due to flooding after Typhoon Vamco struck?,Is there evidence to indicate that flooding was caused by Typhoon Vamco?,Is there information on this flood victims?,Are any photos related to this flood?,Did these images come from the scene of the flood?
"Does an eruption from a volcano put 10,000 times more CO2 into the atmosphere than all of human activity throughout history?",Is there any evidence that human activity has contributed to this increase in CO2 levels?,Are there any fossil fuels being released by volcanoes?,Does this increase in CO2 emissions result in human deaths?
Did the survey report say that 80 percent of Americans think cities should be required to turn illegal immigrants over to immigration authorities?,Did the poll report provide information regarding the results of the poll?,Did the poll report provide information regarding the results of the poll?,Is there any evidence that the poll was a fad?
"Is the United Nations Economic Commission for Africa projecting that Africa's growth will drop to 1.8%, and perhaps lower?",Did this report come out by a UN organization?,Did this report focus on Africa's economy?,Did this report come out by a UN organization?,Did this report come out by a UN organization?
Will the payroll tax cut be replaced before the end of the year?,Will nearly 160 million working families have to pay more due to a reversal of the payroll tax cut?,Will the payroll tax cut be replaced by a general tax rate increase?,Is there any evidence that the payroll tax cut will be replaced by a general tax rate increase?
Did the USWNT contribute more revenue to USSoccer than the mens team?,Did it contribute higher revenue to USSoccer than the womens team?,Is there more revenue shared by womens soccer teams than male soccer teams?,Is it estimated womens soccer teams earn far less than mens soccer teams?
Did the Unicorn Killer choose April 22 as Earth Day?,Did Lenin's birthday coincide with Earth Day?,Did Lenin have a birthday on Earth Day?,Did Earth Day coincide with Vladimir Lenin's birthday?,Did Earth Day coincide with Vladimir Lenin's birthday?
Did Trump's high school intelligence rating be 73?,Did Trump's high school intelligence rating be 73?,Did Trump's high school intelligence rating not include all grades?,Did Trump score higher or lower in IQ than other high school IQ's?,Does Trump's IQ value have to do with other IQ measures besides the 73 found by the intelligence report?,Did Trump receive the higher IQ in IQ tests in a subsequent high school?,Did Trump receive a higher IQ in IQ tests in an alternative high school?,Did Trump receive a higher IQ in?
Did the Hindus make the Namaz in the mall?,Did the police arrest the Hindus at Lulu Mall?,Was the police officers able to solve the issue on-the-spot?,Did any police officers able to provide a solution?,Did any police personnel take notice of the problem and investigate the event?,Was any information released about the incident?
Are there any other jobs created by visitors to Florida?,Are there any jobs created in Florida by visitors to Florida?,Are there any other jobs created by visitors to Florida?,Do the statistics cite that visitors to Florida create jobs?,Would it be a waste of money if Florida had had a high number of visitors and jobs?
Did McCarthy signal to GOP hecklers to be quiet during the 2023 State of the Union address?,Did he signal to Greene to remain quiet during the speech?,Were multiple instances of Greene being heckled during the speech?,Did McCarthy signal to Greene to remain quiet during the speech?,Did McCarthy communicate to Greene about omitting the speech?
Does the eight week interval between vaccine doses coincide with the immune system's reproductive system?,"Is the eight week interval between vaccine doses the same as the ""reproductive system""?",Is there evidence that eight week intervals help keep the immune system in the reproductive system?,"Is it the same as the ""reproductive system""?"
Are any non-profit entities on this side of the political spectrum?,Are any super PACs on this side of the political spectrum?,Is there an indication that there are four super PACs on the Republican side of this race?,Is the Republican side of this race running only one super PAC?
Was there surplus Social Security funding used for tax cuts and wars?,Did Bush ever recoup this money?,Did Bush pay this money back?,Did Bush ever make any promises to repay this money?,Did Bush do any tax cuts or wars with this money?,Does the claim indicate that Bush never paid back this money?
Did the law pass in the US?,Will all child support in the United States stop by the beginning of 2018?,Did the law pass by a certain amount?,Will all child support stop by the beginning of 2018?,Will this law end the child support system?,Are any changes on these bills scheduled?,Did the bill require a new statutory definition of child support?
Is this estimate accurate?,Was this amount more than what super PACs raised in two years?,Does this amount include those non-corporations?,Is this sum higher than what corporations are willing to contribute?,Has this measure been widely used?,Have super PACs historically raised less than 20 percent of their funding?
Did Singapore get its independence five years after Nigeria?,Did the GDP per capita in Nigeria as at 2017 be higher than the GDP per capita in Singapore?,Is the GDP per capita of Singapore higher than Nigeria?,Are the average GDP per capita of Nigeria higher than the average GDP per capita of Singapore?,Was the GDP per capita of Singapore higher than that of Nigeria?
"Did the monk from Tibet have a slip in which he wrote ""Only Yogi will come in UP""?",Does this monk have any other mishaps?,Are any of these images of this monk currently in use?,"Is this monk's image circulating on social media, or do other monks use it?"
Did the clowns invade Canada and murder 23 victims?,Does the clowns have weapons for assault?,Is there any evidence that the U.S. invaded Canada?,Can we determine the exact motive of the clowns?,Are there any reports of any other attacks on the US-Canada border in the past year?
Has Israel ever developed a cure for cancer?,Has this been achieved by Israel or any other country?,Was this cure achieved by Israeli or any other country?,Will the Israeli cure be 100% effective by 2020?,Have these Israeli scientists published papers on this cure?,Does this cure exist?,Are these Israeli scientists active in any other field?
"Did poker gain the linguistic origin of the word ""let me put in my two cents""?",Has poker made any inroads in determining the origin of the word?,"Are there any other linguistic origins of the word ""let me put in my two cents""?","Is there any evidence for the linguistic origin of the word ""let me put in my two cents""?"
Did this video show female athletes competing in the 2016 Olympics?,Did the Iranian Sports Channel air this video?,Did this video come out of Iran?,Can you describe the women's rights issues that this video raised in Iran?,Did the Iranian Sports Channel broadcast this video?,Did this video portray the Iranian Olympics in a racist light?
Did clip of levelled houses film in Mississippi?,Did clips of levelled houses film in Mississippi in March 2023?,Did the clip of levelled houses film in Mississippi during March 2023?,Did a clip of levelled houses film in Mississippi in March 2023?,Is the clip of levelled houses film in Mississippi?
Did Pizza Hut have this offer for this event?,Was this promotion advertised in other publications?,Is this offer valid for any other date?,Will this offer include any special toppings or toppings?,Will this offer be available to all on a special date?,Is this offer available to those at least 18 years old?,Is this offer applicable to all pizzas?,Is this offer valid for all restaurants?
Did Woods have any other vehicle crashes prior to this one?,Did Woods have any other incidents prior to this one?,Do any other golfers have crash-related injuries?,Did Woods have a personal vehicle accident in the past?,Were any other drivers involved in this crash?,Did any other golfers have a personal vehicle crash in the past?,Did Woods have any other crashes in the past that happened in February?
Did the British fire the White House after the fire?,Was the White House originally white before the fire?,Was the White House originally white after the fire?,Did the White House get its name because the British burned it?,Did the White House get its name because the British fire it?,Did the White House get its name because of the British fire?
Does this claim support the assertion that there are less people pursuing education as a career in Wisconsin?,Did the majority of those people not choose to pursue education as a career despite having a job?,Did those people find it more challenging to pursue education as a career despite having a job?
Do Defibrillators increase the likelihood of a child dying?,Is the COVID-19 vaccination stopped in the U.K. because of an increase in the likelihood of a child dying?,Has the U.K. stopped vaccinating children under 11 for COVID-19?
Did they use the fund?,Would these funds be used for fishing?,Would these funds be used to pay for boat maintenance?,Would these funds be used for raising more money?,Would the boat owners pay for these facilities?,Would the boat owners recieve these funds?,Would anyone in need of a boat be eligible to use these funds?
Did images that appear to show sea levels have not risen take place eight decades apart?,Does evidence of sea levels not  rising come from images that appear to be taken eight decades apart?,Was the information received from this research reliable?,Has a climate change impact on sea levels been documented?,Has this information impacted sea levels in general?
"Did Donald Trump release "" First Day Out""?",Was the song released prior to Trump resigning from office?,"Did Trump's election bring about the release of "" First Day Out ""?",Did Trump release music before or after Trump resigning from office?,"Did Trump release "" First Day Out "" before or after Trump resigns from office?"
Did Ukrainian shells hit the Rostov region in February 19?,Did all the shells hit from Ukraine's territory?,Was there any damage to any structures in the Rostov region as a result of the shells?,"Whether any structures were damaged, or were casualties sustained, in the shelling incidents.?"
Did Pakistani fans break TVs after their team lost in a close Asia Cup 2022 T20I match to India?,Did Pakistani fans break TVs after their team lost in a close Asia Cup 2022 T20I match to Australia?,Is Pakistan's team in trouble in the Asia Cup?
Was the video shot from the Chandrayaan-3?,Did the camera take photos?,Does the video depict a full planet?,Did the video show the planet from space?,Was the video showing a globe?,Did the video show the planet from space?,Did the video show the earth from space?
Did Trump raise more small dollar donations than Obama in 2012?,Did Trump raise more small dollar donations than Clinton and Bernie combined?,Did Trump raise more small dollar donations than Obama in 2012?,Has this claim been substantiated?,Would Trump have raised more small dollar donations from other states other than America?,Have some of these donations been in excess of $5?
Are Taj Mahal and Statue of Unity visited by an average of 7.5 lakh people annually?,Is the Taj Mahal and Statue of Unity visited by more people annually than the Statue of Unity?,Are Taj Mahal and Statue of Unity visited by people each year?,Is the annual number of people visiting the Taj Mahal the same as the Statue of Unity?
"Did 3.5 million people in the U.S. lose their employer-tied health insurance in March, whereas 0 people in 20 other countries lost coverage?","Did 3.5 million in the U.S. lose their employer-tied health insurance in March, whereas 0 people in 20 other large nations lost coverage?"
Is there a directive to chop down 17 million trees in Scotland?,Are there any studies that say it is a good plan?,Are there any statistics on how much Scots cut down trees?,Is there any evidence to suggest that this plan was effective in curbing climate change?,. Do most trees cut down in Scotland in any ways?
Did the majority of the layoffs occur in the last year and a half?,Are there any reports regarding how many government workers have been laid off over this period?,Was this information in a press release?,Did this information in a press release directly affect these claims?,Was the media response to this information fair?
Did this study actually report all Omicron cases as fully vaccinated?,Was this study conducted in the U.S.?,Has this research ever come under investigation for possible misreporting?,Is the German Institute a referenced in this study?,Did the authors not report this study?,Is this study available for review?
Did this state chief minister say PM Modi was his best friend in December 2022?,Is this state chief minister from an area that is part of the United States of America?,Is this state chief minister from a country where Indian politics is not so active?,Is this state chief minister associated with any politician outside of India?
Did February 2021 have exactly four times of all weekdays repeated?,Is this unique only for 823 years?,Did February 2021 have exactly four days of weekdays repeated?,Is there any other information I could glean about the uniqueness of February 2021?,Is there any other event that could potentially have a similar effect to February 2021?
It’s estimated that 40 percent of all guns sold in the United States occur with no background records check. Is it true that 40 percent of guns sold in the United States occur with no background records check?,Are there certain statistics that should be used to evaluate gun sales in the United States?,Will a background record check be required in the United States?
Is there a difference between the budget surplus Bush inherited when he took office and when he ended his term?,Was Bush's budget surplus during 2001 less than this budget surplus in his term?,Was the budget deficit Bush left after his term in office less than this budget deficit in his term?
Was Brazil displaying 4 billion real – the money recovered from its corrupt politicians and public servants - for public viewing?,Does Brazil need money from its corrupt politicians and public servants in order to continue to operate?,Has Brazil made any attempts to find those individuals who were behind the fraud?,Did Brazil attempt to recover money from the corrupt politicians and public servants?
Do mammograms expose me to a million times as much radiation as standing one mile from Hiroshima?,Is it safe to stand one mile from Hiroshima?,Does mammograms increase your risk of developing breast cancer?,Is it safe to perform a mammogram every 10 years?
Do 120 Americans per day die from a drug overdose?,Do drugs cause a higher death rate than firearms?,Are drug overdose deaths more common in urban areas than rural areas?,Are firearm deaths higher than drug overdose deaths?,Has the CDC noted any higher numbers of drug overdose deaths?
Does the presence of bat coronavirus RaTG13 serve as a template for SARS-CoV-2?,Has it been shown that SARS-CoV-2 was produced in experiments?,Has RaTG13 been identified as a candidate virus for SARS-CoV-2?,Does it support the use of bat coronavirus RaTG13 as a template for SARS-CoV-2?
Is there evidence that Ginsburg is supportive of lowering the age of consent?,Did Ginsburg support lowering the age of consent to 12?,Did Ginsburg support the proposed lowering of the age of consent to 12?,Did Ginsburg support the lowering of the age of consent to 12?,Was Ginsburg an advocate for lowering the age of consent to 12?
Did the number of consequential train accidents decrease significantly from 2013-14 to 2017-18?,Is there any other factor that contributed to the reduced number of accidents?,Was it higher for the number of accidents in 2017-18 compared to 2013-14?,Was the reduction in accident numbers in 2017-18 lower than that seen in 2013-14?
Did IX center have thousands of employees when they left?,Was the IX center one of the largest employers in Ohio when it closed in the 1980s?,Has there been any evidence that IX Center employees have left Ohio?,Is Ohio's I-X center one of the largest employers in the country when it closed?
"Has Hamilton accepted $42,000 from strip-clubs, and $10,000 from local alcohol distributors?",Have all the contributions come from these groups?,Have the contributors of these contributions made any tax payments?,Have the contributors of these donations made any payments to the Travis County government?,Are the contributors of these contributions in any way connected to the strip club industry?
Are 'preemies' born prior to 37 weeks of pregnancy considered preemies?,Is Barnes generally in support of killing 'preemies'?,Are 'preemies' born prior to 37 weeks of pregnancy 'preemies'?,Is Barnes a partisan on abortion issues?
Is there any evidence this is not the case?,Is there any data to support the claim?,Was this a quote based on data?,Are there any other numbers to support this claim?,Do all women in Nigeria die pregnancy-related deaths?,Is this data inconsistent?,Does this claim hold validity?
Did the pedophile who raped 9-year-old girl have his rectum chopped off?,Did he have his rectum chopped off before he raped the girl?,Was the 9-year-old girl's penis cut off prior to the pedophile's rape?
Has the federal court case load grown during his term?,Has the federal court case load grown during his term?,Has the federal court caseload grown during his term?,Did the Federal Court caseload increase during his term?,Did other courts experience growth during their term?,Did the federal court caseload increase during his term?
"Will the Rs. 2000 note be discontinued and the new Rs. 1000 note be introduced on Jan 1, 2020?",Has the currency changed since the 2000 note was introduced?,Will the new currency have higher denominations?,Are any denominations affected by this announcement?,Do any other cryptocurrencies exist?,Will this move cause any changes to the currency in India?
Is it true that T.L Hanna High School 1 teacher was seriously injured?,Did the teacher work outside the school that caused injury?,Did the teacher regain full health and productivity after the injury?,Is T.L Hanna High School 1 responsible for any injury sustained during this incident?,Are all injured staff members re-habilitated following this incident?
Was there an economic impact study on pre-K spending in Pennsylvania?,Did pre-K spending in Pennsylvania have an overall economic impact?,Does the study show that pre-K spending generated $1.79 in total state spending?,Does this result of pre-K spending in Pennsylvania have a positive impact on overall state spending?
Have these people been fighting for 300 years?,Did these people have any other fighting ties prior to the war?,Did this cause the war?,Does the story relate to the war?,Did this group of guerrillas have an ancestor before this war?,Did this group of guerrillas face off in various wars prior to the war?
Did Trump support Hillary Clinton in the 2008 Democratic primaries?,Was Trump associated with Hillary Clinton in 2008?,Was Trump a political party member before entering politics?,Did Donald Trump support Hillary Clinton in 2008?,Did Trump support Hillary Clinton in 2008?,Was Trump a political party member before entering politics?,Was Donald Trump active as a businessman before entering politics?
Was Biden’s claim true?,Did Biden say that a 40% capital gains tax would be imposed on home sellers?,Did Biden say a 40% capital gains tax would be imposed on home sellers?,Did Biden claim that the 40% capital gains tax would be imposed on home sellers?
"Did Obama grant citizenship to 2,500 Iranians during the Iranian Deal negotiations?",Does Obama grants citizenship to Iranian officials?,Was the Obama Administration’s granting of citizenship in this deal insignificant?,Was the Obama Administration granting citizenship to Iranians by accident?,Was this deal horrible?,Have Obama Administration policies caused this situation?
Did Less than 10% of the funds allocated to education in the period represent the entire N3.5 trillion appropriation?,Was this percentage of the education funding in the period the average percentage of N3.5 trillion?,Did N3.5 trillion represent the largest funding allocation to education in the period?,Were any N3.5 trillion allocated to education in the period?
Are there records indicating the Kenya Revenue Authority collected KSh2.2 trillion?,Is it accurate to say that 70% of the collected income was from the businesses and industries in Nairobi?,Has the Kenya Revenue Authority collected more money from businesses and industries in Nairobi compared to other countries?,Does a specific number of KSh2.2 trillion come from the business and industrial sector in Kenya?
Did HAARP cause a cloud in Syria after the earthquake in 2023?,Did the storm hit the Syrian coast as early as April 2023?,Did the video show the clouds while they were still making their way over the land?,Did the video show HAARP's effects at this point?,Did the clouds make their way over the land following the earthquake?
Did it cost $100 per PCR test?,Did the federal government fund the PCR tests for COVID?,Did PCR tests for COVID cost less than $100?,Are state grants available for PCR tests?,Did the CDC raise the cost of PCR tests?,Can COVID-19 be transmitted by any other virus?
Does Cruz claim to be worth a net worth of $4.6 million after entering the Senate?,Was Cruz ever able to make significant changes in his life circumstances?,"Is there evidence that Cruz's current net worth is greater than $50,000?",Is Cruz expected to have a more substantial income than his salary?
Did Labor spend any amount of taxpayer money to fund the ‘yes’ vote?,Was the 'yes' vote financed by an entity other than the 'yes' campaign?,Did the Labour use any of their campaign funds for the 'yes' campaign?,Did the 'yes' campaign have any campaign funds from other organizations?
"Is there coal in Tennessee above 2,000 feet?",Were there ever any incidents of illegal coal mining in Tennessee?,Does Tennessee have any coal in this state?,"Do environmentalists predict the state will stop coal mining on the 2,000 foot limit?","Did Tennessee state officials support the 2,000 foot limit?",Is there any evidence that Tennessee is a coal producing state?
Did the number of mass shootings increase from 2000 to 2008?,Is there any evidence that the number of mass shootings is increasing from 2000 to 2008?,Are there any more mass shootings than in 2000?,Has the number of mass shootings in 2018 increased by 3 times over 2000 to 2008?,Is the increase in mass shootings caused by the internet as bad as in 2000?
Did the alarm be activated due to Bella Heather’s disappearance?,Will the alarm be activated after an amber alert?,Will Bella Heather be remembered by people that have seen the alarm?,Is the alarm on fire?,Can people access the alert?,Has anyone been missing from Bella Heather’s home?
Did 18 million illegal immigrants get their government checks this month?,Did federal workers remain unpaid this month?,Did 18 million illegal immigrants get their government checks this month?,Is it true that 18 million illegal immigrants got their government checks this month?,Did the number of illegal immigrants get government checks this month?,Did 18 million illegal immigrants get their government checks this month?
Does jointlab repair joints?,Does jointlab restore any symptoms of chronic joint pain?,Can jointlab treat any stages of joint disease?,Does jointlab restore any joints at almost any stage of joint disease?,Does jointlab help to restore blood flow and increase the strength of joints?,Does jointlab help with any injuries that cause joint pain?
Do some studies suggest that Latinos are less likely to call 911 when victim of crimes?,Are studies on Latino crime rates conclusive that the majority of Latino crime victims call 911?,Are Latino crime victims disproportionately black?,Do the studies that focus on Latino crime rate disparity have any racial component?
Did India have 60% vaccine coverage?,Did the amount of vaccine coverage increase during this period?,Has there been a decline in vaccine coverage since this time?,Does India have a 90 percent vaccine coverage in this period?,Does India have a 90 percent vaccine coverage in this period?,Does this mean there is less vaccine coverage overall in India?
Is Biden likely to require all new buildings to be net-zero in carbon emissions by 2030?,"Does Biden plan to mandate net-zero carbon emissions for homes, offices and all new buildings?","Is Biden likely to mandate net-zero carbon emissions for all homes, offices and new buildings by 2030?","Is Biden likely to mandate net-zero carbon emissions for homes, offices and all new buildings by 2030?"
Is it true the tax cut would be the second tax cut for the rich by the governor in two years?,Did Christie reduce state income taxes in 2015?,Is it true the tax cut was proposed by the governor in 2014?,Did Christie make this proposal in 2016?,Is there any record of an increase in income taxes on rich people during this time?
Was Thunberg related to the 2023 global warming conspiracy?,Did Thunberg say the world will end in 2023?,Did Thunberg write the tweet with the intention of creating an uproar?,Was Thunberg a proponent for the use of carbon neutrality?,Did Thunberg have a recollection of the world ending in 2023?
Did the White House 'trade war' result in losses for farmers across the U.S.?,Did the administration of Donald Trump 'trade war' result in losses for farmers across the U.S.?,Is the White House's trade war on US farmers in general?,Is the Trump trade policy responsible for losses for farmers in North Dakota?
Did the CDC recommend that parents sleep with other parents in an emergency?,"Did the CDC advise parents to prepare for a ""sudden sleepover"" in an emergency?","Did CDC advise parents to prepare for a ""sudden sleepover"" in an emergency?",Was the advice included in COVID-19 outbreaks in schools?
Did Nichols date the wife of one of the officers?,Did Nichols date other officers?,Does Nichols's dateing have been linked to his beating?,Has it been proven that Nichols slept with one of the officers who beat him?,"Is this the case for Nichols, or were officers attacked for no other reason?"
Are all three states of India able to identify the same child with COVID-19?,Has there been any similar incidents?,Does any of this infer about the media in any way?,Was this child’s case investigated by the media?,Did any media have any comments that support this view?,Has any media called this statement true?
Did some Wall Street executives end up in jail for destabilizing the economy in 2008?,Did many Wall Street executives get a bailout for their economic downfall in 2008?,Did any major Wall Street executive ever go to jail for destroying the economy in 2008?,Does the sentence of jail time amount to one of the conditions for jail time?
Did the marchers assault DeLuca for a Trump 2020 flag?,Did the protesters beat DeLuca?,Do all protests in Washington D.C. allow people to carry a Trump 2020 flag?,Is the protest a one-off?,Do all protests in D.C. allow people to carry a Trump 2020 flag?
Did Narendra Modi change his attire for all meetings?,Did Narendra Modi change his attire for all meetings?,Was the attire worn by Narendra Modi poor?,Did Modi's attire change throughout the day?,Does this statement support the assertion that Modi is poor?,Do other factors explain the poorness of Narendra Modi?
"Did 12 Republican House members vote against awarding the Congressional Gold Medal to the U.S. Capitol Police for their actions during the Jan. 6, 2021 attack on the Capitol?","Did each of these Republican House members vote against the awarding of the Congressional Gold Medal to the U.S. Capitol Police for their actions during the Jan. 6, 2021 attack on the Capitol?"
Did the woman get more money for attending the rally?,Did she receive the money for attending the rally?,Did the woman get the money for attending the rally?,Did the woman receive the money for attending the rally?,Did the women cry at the rally?,Did the woman get the money for attending the rally?,Did the woman cry because of the money?
Did Nigeria's president order all local oil refineries to be fully operational within six months?,Has Nigeria's President ordered all local oil refineries to be fully operational within six months?,Was the country's oil sector severely damaged by the Nigerian oil spill?,Has a Nigerian oil spill exacerbated the effects of international oil sanctions?
Does Walker's campaign debt total $1 million?,Did Walker's campaign incur a significant tax debt?,Have Walker's campaign costs contributed to any state revenue?,Are all Wisconsin taxpayers paying these costs?,Have Walker's campaign expenses been included in state revenue?,Have Walker's campaign expenses been covered by taxes?
Did the imports of rice decrease by 90% since 2015?,Did the imports of rice drop by more than 90% since 2015?,Did imports of rice in the following year increase?,Did the imports of rice in the following year increase by more than 90%?,Has the imports of rice since 2015 decreased by more than 90%?
Did the SPB family pay for the burial costs?,Did this bill cover 1.85 crore?,Did the SPB family pay 1.85 crore for burial costs?,Did SPB family pay 1.85 crore in the morning for taking his remains?,Is there any evidence that SPB's family paid for the burial costs?
Did strange circular clouds form over Israel shortly after Donald Trump won the 2016 presidential election?,Did Israeli officials believe Trump will be inaugurated before they knew his election?,Did Trump win the election when these clouds formed?,Did Trump win the election when these clouds formed?,Have any other countries experienced this phenomenon?,Has the weather in Israel reacted negatively to Trump's election?
Is there a photo of Modi and Patel in 1993?,Did Patel have a photo taken with Modi on this same day?,Did Modi show up together with Patel?,Is this photograph a public record?,Did this photo appear in magazines or newspapers?,Is this public record credited to Modi?
Does this upcoming bus have a hybrid power system?,Is this bus fully electric?,Is this bus fully emission free?,Is this bus the only bus designed to be fully electric?,Is this bus completely polluting?,Is this bus a public bus?,Does this bus have a hybrid power system?
Does Dollar need a $165 million Gulfstream G650 to carry thousands of pounds of food and other supplies globally?,Does Dollar need a $165 million Gulfstream G650 to carry thousands of pounds of food and other supplies globally?,Does Dollar need a $165 million Gulfstream G650 to carry thousands of pounds of food and other supplies globally?
Did Mack pass any other bills in seven years?,Did Mack vote to pass the bill?,Is Mack a Democratic politician?,Did Mack vote to vote to pass the bill?,Did Mack vote to pass the bill?,Were any other bills passed in the seven years of Mack's term?,Did Mack vote to pass the bill?,Did Mack vote on a bill in the seven years of her term?
Is it true that KKK marching at the Democratic National Convention was a photograph?,Was the photograph taken at the Democratic National Convention?,Is it true that KKK marching at the Democratic National Convention was an instance of a violent demonstration?,Has the photograph of the KKK march at the Democratic National Convention been published prior to its release?
Did Jay-Z say Satan is our true Lord?,Are the statements about Satan and Jesus true?,Did Jay-Z say that only idiots believe in Jesus?,Did the singer say any other statements about Satan?,Was this the first time Jay-Z has talked about Satan?,Did Jay-Z say any other statements about Satan?,Did this occur after Jay-Z performed in a concert in November 2017?
Did the storm impact Spain in march 2022?,Was the storm filmed in a remote location?,Did the dust storm peak in a remote location?,Did the dust storm not reach Spain?,. Was there sand in sight around the site?,. Was sand present around the city of Madrid?,. Did the storm occur in Spain?
Did BJP leaders charge Rs 456 crore as commission for forcing Modi to flee?,Was this a forced resignation?,Did BJP leaders charge this as a commission on Modi?,Is there evidence that BJP led a revolt at Modi?,Did BJP leaders pressurize the Indian leaders to flee?
Did Romney have any other plans?,Did Romney reduce the number of kosher meals served to Medicaid recipients?,Was Romney interested in reducing government costs?,Did Romney specifically cut kosher meals for senior citizens?,Does Romney support allowing kosher meals to Medicaid recipients?,Are there any other health issues or concerns that may apply to kosher meals?
Did Biden receive 5 million from Zlochevsky?,Did Zlochevsky agree to pay Biden $5 million?,Did Biden win a VP run from Zlochevsky?,Did Zlochevsky have any influence on Biden as a president?,Has the FBI determined Biden was involved in Zlochevsky's bribery scheme?
Do federal community health centers have the same network as Planned Parenthood?,Do federal health centers provide services without the controversy surrounding abortion?,Does Planned Parenthood actually provide services involving abortion?,Do a federal community health center provide services involving abortion?,Do federal community health centers have networks for abortion?
Did Pureval lie about his office’s budget?,Did Pureval lie about the deficit in his office?,Was Pureval lying about the deficit at his office?,Did Pureval lie about the deficit for an entire year?,Did the mayor say Pureval lied about the deficit in the office?,Did Pureval lie about any other deficits?
Do Iranian women chopped hair have a flag with the same message?,Does the flag appear to contain Chinese characters?,Was the flag made of Chinese characters and Japanese characters?,Are Chinese characters from the flag included in the image?,Are these Chinese characters included in the image?,Does the flag portray Chinese characters?,Is Chinese characters from the flag included in the image?,Are other characters from the flag included in the image?
Does Akshay Kumar donate his earnings to Chandrayaan 3?,Does Akshay Kumar own any property that is related to Chandrayaan 3?,Will Kumar donate his earnings to Chandrayaan 3?,Can Kumar donate to Chandrayaan 3?,Can Kumar donate to Chandrayaan 3?
Is Rahul Gandhi's claim true?,Is women in Uttar Pradesh giving birth to 52 children per year?,Has Rahul Gandhi ever claimed there are 52 children per mother in Uttar Pradesh?,Is Rahul Gandhi aware of the statistics about the women birth rate in Uttar Pradesh?,Does Rahul Gandhi know the source of data used in his claim?
Did Renacci ever try to avoid paying taxes on his profits?,Did Renacci actually make millions?,Did Renacci actually intentionally avoid paying taxes on his profits?,Was Renacci successful in his efforts to avoid paying taxes on his profits?,Are there any records of Renacci's efforts to avoid paying taxes on his profits?
Does Malaysia require the age of the driver to undergo an eye check?,Does the age of the driver that is over 65 years old include in the age requirement?,Does a eye check have to be done on everyone to renew the license to drive in Malaysia?,Does it always matter whether the holder is above 65 years old to have an eye check?
Are Latinos in Nevada proponents of educational savings accounts?,Are Las Vegas Latinos more against this type of saving?,"Are there more than 450,000 students in Las Vegas who have savings accounts?",Is it true that the majority of Las Vegas Latinos support Educational Savings Accounts?,Is Maria Cortez Masto against this type of saving account?
Is the source true or is it a fake?,Did Springsteen play at Seton Hall?,Is it true that Springsteen played at Seton Hall?,Was Springsteen at Seton Hall when he re-opened this institution?,Did Springsteen play at Seton Hall?,Were there other events happening in that time period?
Did NASA capture this video?,Has Chandrayaan 3 been confirmed to have landed there?,Is this spacecraft scheduled to be in the sky in 2018?,Are these images of Chandrayaan 3 accurate?,Did NASA create these images of Chandrayaan 3?,Is NASA capable of producing pictures of Chandrayaan 3?
"Did any of these ten congressmen demand that Martin Luther King, Jr. be added to Mount Rushmore?",Did any of these ten congressmen have a positive effect on the Mount Rushmore monument?,Was Mount Rushmore altered at some point in their time?,Did any Democrat legislator specifically demand that Mount Rushmore be altered to accommodate Martin Luther King Jr.?
Did the matric pass rate increase from 61 percent in 2009 to 78 percent in 2013?,Have the bachelor passes improved each year?,Has the matric pass rate gone up since 2009?,Does this claim have specific data proving it?,Are the matric pass rates higher in 2013 than 2009?,br>?
Does the Peruvian government claim removal of 5G antenna caused COVID-19 to disappear?,Did the Peruvian government remove 5G antenna in Nov. 2019?,Does the country's 5G antenna have a signal capable of being detected?,Is the 5G antenna dismantled in the Peruvian government?
Was the burglar in a dangerous situation?,Was it an apparent crime?,Did the burglar leave the apartment?,Was the home occupied?,Did the burglar leave the apartment unharmed?,Do any of these facts make the claims about the burglar?,Did the burglar leave the home unharmed?,Is there an actual reason for this crime?
Could Elon Musk have given each of the 330M people in America a million dollars?,Would Musk have had $7B of money left over if they gave a million dollars to every person?,Would X amount of people have received the million dollars?,Would it be a large enough number for Musk to give that money to?
Did the Justice of the Peace say that the same-sex marriages are now forbidden in Texas?,Did the Justice of the Peace say that it was against the law in Texas to perform same-sex marriages?,Was the justices of the peace specifically asked to perform same-sex marriages?,Did the justices of the peace say that any person would not be permitted to perform same-sex marriages?
Are people being denied a job because of E-Verify in a specific way?,Are people who are denied jobs unfairly?,Can people be denied jobs for many reasons?,Would a single person be denied a job by E-Verify?,Are E-Verify mandates likely to impede equal hiring?
"Did the video show a ""UFO"" flying over New Jersey?",Were the video and its images taken at night?,Did the video have a black screen overlay?,Were video and photographs of the UFO cropped at the time of the footage?,Was there a camera on the UFO?
Is abortion the leading cause of death for black Americans?,Is abortion the leading cause of death for black children every day?,"Are there as many as 1,000 black children every day that are killed by abortions?","Does abortion affect abortion rights as many as 1,000 black children every day?","Do abortion causes as many as 1,000 black children every day to die from abortions?"
Did the judge rule that certain ballots would be disqualified?,Did a judge rule that some ballots were disqualified?,Did this ruling help Trump in the race?,Did the court rule that these ballots would be disqualified?,Did this ruling result in a win for Trump?,Did this ruling go against Trump?
Did immigrants in the U.S. have to bring a million dollars to get a green card in order to create jobs?,Did immigrants in the U.S. have to bring a million dollars to get a green card in order to create jobs?,Did immigrants in the U.S. have to bring a million dollars to get a green card in order to create jobs?,Was the program based on a set of responsibilities?
Was the number of positive COVID-19 tests for children under 1 year higher than 85% of the population?,Did the number of positive COVID-19 tests increase on a seasonal basis?,Did CDC estimate COVID-19 tests are more accurate than 85% of the population?,Was the COVID-19 rate lower on a seasonal basis?
Has the number of children taken into state custody increased since 2014?,Does Newsom state that the increase in the number of children in the custody has not been tied to increased crime?,Does Newsom state that new cases are understaffed and underfunded to provide proper care for children?,Are there more children being taken into state custody than were in the previous year?
Is there a video depicting the Indian Navy celebrating Diwali?,Were any Indian Navy ships pictured in the video?,Is the Indian Navy depicted in any video?,Are any Indian Navy ships featured in this video?,Was this video broadcast live?,Did this video show any Indian Navy ships celebrating Diwali?
Did all the non-BJP states send tableaux?,Did all those states receive any of the tableaux?,Are there any other countries that did not send tableaux?,Did any other countries send tableaux?,Do any other countries send tableaux?,Is there any record of what other nations did not send tableaux?
Did the county have one provider or no provider for insurance?,Was the number of providers for insurance on the exchange one provider or one provider?,Did the county have one provider or one provider in a large portion of the state?,Did the county have a large amount of counties with one provider or one provider?
Did Blacks account for 80% of murders against white people in a given year?,Did Blacks account for 80% of the murders against white people in a given year?,Was White people accounted for 81% of murders against white people in a given year?,Did White people account for 81% of the murders against white people in a given year?
Did Obama spend $1 Trillion ’to upgrade the nuclear arsenal’?,Did Obama upgrade the nuclear arsenal?,Did Obama spend more on the nuclear arsenal than any other US government entity?,Did Obama spend more in total on the nuclear arsenal?,Did Obama spend the total amount on the nuclear arsenal?,Whether Obama did or didn’t spend any money on the nuclear arsenal.?
"Was the 2008 book, ""End of Days"", a prescient prediction?","Was the 2008 book, ""End of Days"", a logical explanation of the current coronavirus outbreak?","Is the 2008 book, ""End of Days"", a comprehensive scientific study of the modern world?"
Did Foot Locker donate $200 million to BLM after their stores in Minneapolis got looted by BLM?,Did Foot Locker donate to BLM after BLM looted the stores in Minneapolis?,Did Foot Locker donate $200 million to BLM after BLM looted their stores in Minneapolis?
Did the two men who performed dangerous bike stunts in public carry a pistol in public?,Was the pistol in public part of the bike stunt?,Did the two men who performed dangerous bike stunts in public carry a pistol in public?,Has the pistol been confiscated in the police file?,Do these two young men currently face criminal charges?
Do union-operated worker training centers receive money from employers?,Are these workers training centers funded by unions?,Are these workers training centers covered by the National Labor Relations Act?,Did unions use money from employer funding for these programs?,Are union-operated worker training centers funded solely by employers?,Are union-operated worker training centers funded solely by employers?
Did the Dallas Cowboys lose any of their ties to the 5 police officers who were killed?,Is it illegal for the Dallas Cowboys to donate helmet stickers to the 5 police officers who were killed?,Was the Dallas Cowboys required to give out helmet stickers to the five police officers who were killed?
Did he indict a person for allegedly voting for another person?,Was anyone arrested for voting for this person?,Did this person turn out votes for this candidate?,Was this voter guilty of election fraud?,Did anyone else vote for this person?,Did this voter choose this candidate?,Were the people who voted for this person convicted of election fraud?
Did ExxonMobil pay no federal income taxes in 2009?,Did ExxonMobil receive any rebates in 2009?,Did ExxonMobil pay taxes in 2009?,Does this statement imply that all profits from ExxonMobil in 2009 was paid out of their own funds?
Did CNN use footage from Canada during their coverage of the Lviv explosion?,Did CNN use footage from Canada during their coverage of the Lviv explosion?,Did CNN use footage from Canada in its reporting of the Lviv explosion?,Did CNN use footage from Canada during its reporting of the Lviv explosion?,Was any part of this footage a re-report of the explosion?
Did the Chinese Government build a hospital in 10 days to deal with the new coronavirus?,Did the Chinese Government use funds from the coronavirus to build a hospital in 10 days?,Would the Chinese government purchase funds from the new coronavirus to build a hospital in 10 days?
Did he say his budget plan would reduce deficits?,Would it mean he would be able to cut government deficits?,Would it be able to cut the size of government deficits?,Would he change the budgeting plan to be a budget deficit?,Would the budget plan be more aggressive than expected?
Did any other Virginia basketball team ever make the Final Four?,Has any other Virginia basketball team ever made the Final Four?,Have any other Virginia basketball teams ever made the Final Four?,Have any other Virginia basketball teams ever made the Final Four?,Have any other teams in the past 10 years made the Final Four?,Does anyone else in the past 10 years make the Final Four?
Did an Alabama court allow Stallings's rapist to visit her child?,Did Stallings receive any support or assistance from her rapist?,Is the rape survivor in Alabama now under treatment?,Did Stallings have any children after the rape?
Did the majority of people in Kenya currently have access to clean water?,Did the majority of people in Kenya have access to clean water?,Is it true that the number of people connected to water currently in Kenya is more than 13 million?,Does the number of people connected to clean water currently exceed 1.3 million?
"Did Cordray fail to test all 12,000 rape kits that are similar to Allyssa's?",Was Cordray responsible for the failure of the investigation?,"Did DeWine test all 12,000 rape kits?",Did DeWine prosecute more rapists while he was Attorney General?
Did this bridge in Russia in 2022 collapse?,Was this bridge previously destroyed?,Did this bridge appear on any other Russian maps?,"Was the bridge destroyed in Russia on May 1, 2022?","Did it have a similar bridge in New Mexico, California or Washington?",Was the bridge on this image a pedestrian bridge?
Did the State of Alabama set forth a requirement for developers to develop land?,Does Alabama have a requirement for developers to develop land within two years?,Has any land used in this country been re-allocated to a local government?,Does Alabama have a law that regulates how land used to be used?
Are Ghosh injuries in one photo fake?,Are there other photos of Ghosh injured?,Do the photos show the injuries at the same time?,Are the injuries listed in the photos?,Are the injuries mentioned in the photos fake?,Was the injury mentioned in one picture fake?,Did Ghosh have any other injuries in the photo with the same name?
Did PM Modi have chants raising his country's pro-Indian views?,Were these chants pro-Indian?,Are these chants generally known as pro-Indian?,Did Modi receive any media coverage as part of his visit to the US?,Did PM Modi receive any media coverage as part of his visit to the US?,Did this visit end on a negative note?
Is there any evidence that Gere was undercover as homeless man for his performance?,Did Gere meet any homeless people at the set of this show?,Did Gere provide money to every homeless person he saw?,Is there evidence that Gere gave all of the money to all the homeless people he saw?
Did Obama spend $97 million in eight years in Africa?,"Did Trump spend $60,000 per day when he comes down to Mar-a-Lago?",Did Obama spend $97 million in eight years in Africa?,Were Obama's trips mainly to the US?,Is it true that Trump has a lot of perks in Mar-a-Lago?
Have steelers and pipefitters ever made more than this amount?,Has this figure been accurate for this type of work?,Was the median wages for Steelers from tech schools $28 an hour?,Are these salaries competitive with those for pipefitters?,Do Steelers work at high levels in this particular industry?
Are there more than 8 million children with college aid under a GOP pledge?,Can education receive a 20 percent cut with a GOP pledge?,Are college aid payments under a GOP pledge made out to 8 million kids?,Is this pledge about an increase in college funding?,Are there more children under a GOP pledge?
Does Kejriwal not wear masks himself?,Is the mask the same that he wore while holding a gun?,Does Kejriwal wear a mask because of the gun he kept?,Is Kejriwal's mask the same that he is wearing?
"Did a police officer pose for a photograph with a member of the pro-Trump mob that stormed the federal building on Jan. 6, 2021?","Did the police officer pose for a photograph with a member of the pro-Trump mob that stormed the federal building on Jan. 6, 2021?",Did the pro-Trump mob participate in the security breach?
Has South Africa invested more than R2 trillion in infrastructure projects over the past 10 years?,Was the school building fund part of the investment?,Did the freight logistics network fund part of the infrastructure investment?,Has this investment funded most of the other infrastructure projects?,Has South Africa also partnered with other organizations to support projects?
Does a study show that the average age of entry into prostitution is 12-14 years old?,Have studies shown that the average age of entry into prostitution is 12-14 years old?,Does a study show that the average age of entry into prostitution is 12-14 years old?,Can the statistics be tested?
Did the DWP employ over 3300 people investigating welfare fraud?,Are all of the officers responsible for investigating welfare fraud?,Has the DWP been unable to locate any information on welfare fraud?,Have the figures changed subsequently in regards to investigations?,Will the DWP be able to find more information on welfare fraud?
Did an astronaut jump from space?,Did the astronaut reach the Earth during the jump?,Is there any evidence of a crash?,Is there any evidence of a failure during the jump?,Did the Astronaut do his landing safely?,Did the astronaut need spacesuits?,Are there any indications of a crash before jumping?
Did Barnes & Noble remove Bibles for people who were delusional?,Did Barnes & Noble pull the Bibles from shelves because it contained ideas that were outdated?,Did Barnes & Noble ban Bibles because of religious beliefs?,"Considering the background of the Bibles in question, were the Bibles removed for people who were delusional or demented?"
Has the Department of Homeland Security reported to any Congressional committees?,Has the Department of Homeland Security been criticized for not announcing their reports?,Have any Congressional committees asked Homeland Security about their reporting requirements?,Is the Department of Homeland Security liable for the oversight that they provide?,Is the Department of Homeland Security a required watchdog?
Did the Gates Foundation test a polio vaccine in India between 2000 & 2017?,Did the Gates Foundation paralyze more children resulting from the polio vaccine than those who did not receive the vaccine?,Did the Gates Foundation test a polio vaccine in India between 2000 & 2017?
Was this video shot in the month of July?,Was this bus flooded in Shanghai?,Was this video produced by the China National Film Museum?,Was this bus flooded in Shanghai during the month of July?,Was this bus flooded in Shanghai during the month of July?,Was this bus flooded in Shanghai during the month of July?,Was this bus flooded in Shanghai on a rainy day?
Will charcoal activated tablets counteract any date rape drugs?,Does charcoal activated tablet contain carbon?,Are charcoal activated tablets generally used to counteract date rape drugs?,Would a charcoal activated tablet prevent a date rape drug from using it?,Was it originally written to counteract date rape drugs?
Is this service offered as a means of protecting women?,Can women be tracked via GPRS through this helpline number?,Does this service provide an answer to who are going missing or have been targeted by men?,Is the helpline number not available as an option for women to contact the police for assistance?
Is Trump's claim of impeachment in November 2012 correct?,Is Trump in fact the president who stated this assertion?,"Is Trump's statement accurate in relation to the Dow dropping 1,000 points within a 2 day period?",Are the numbers Trump makes on this claim accurate?,Are the comments he made in relation to the Dow drop 1000 points in 2 days?
"Did Pennsylvania Department of State send ballots to 240,000 unverified voters?",Has this election year been affected by any other elections in the state?,"Did this election year have a total of fewer than 240,000 votes?",Did any of these ballots contain an incorrect number?,Did any of these votes not require an original signature?
Did police return Sinthasomphone to Dahmer?,Did Dahmer take Sinthasomphone to a hospital?,Did Dahmer kill Sinthasomphone?,Did Dahmer kill Sinthasomphone?,Did Dahmer kill Sinthasomphone?
Has Manila closed all malls in March 2021 using Ordinance 8617?,Has Manila closed all malls in March 2021 utilizing Ordinance 8617?,Has Manila closed all malls in March 2021 utilizing Ordinance 8617?,Has the city closed all malls in March 2021?
Did an airline crash which killed 157 people?,Was the video footage shot in the u.s.?,Did the footage show what might have happened?,Did the video show a live version of the final moments of the plane crash?,Did any of the passengers make it to the hospital after the accident?
Are the US obligated to defend its borders by US executive agreements?,Do all U.S. treaties have this obligation?,Are any of the U.S. executive treaties non-constitutional?,Are all U.S. diplomatic treaties not executive?,Have all executive treaties resulted from legislature?
Did Hawley vote against a bill to help expedite review of COVID–19 hate crimes?,Was Hawley a member of the minority group for which the bill was intended?,Did Hawley votes for the bill?,Was Hawley the only senator to vote against the bill?
"Will school districts in Virginia be forced to fire over 8,000 teachers if the tax cut plan is implemented?","Will Cuccinelli's tax cut plan result in school districts firing over 8,000 teachers?",Are there any other factors that could lead to teacher terminations?,Would tax cut money be cut significantly over time?
"As many as 27 million men, women, and children are trafficking victims at any given time?",Are there any specific statistics on the level of trafficking?,Is this estimate accurate?,Do any studies on the level of trafficking have been conducted?,Is this data considered reliable?,Have more people been killed in trafficking cases in the last decade?,Is it difficult to determine the exact numbers of these cases?
"Is it true that half of those with a health insurance plan are earning more than $50,000 a year?",Is there no mention of income specifics in the survey?,Are there any studies demonstrating the percentage of those who don't have health insurance?,Are there any studies supporting the claims?,Does this information come from an opinion poll?
Did Rama Ayyub say he did not hate all Muslims for just two beheadings?,Is Rama Ayyub a Muslim?,Can Rama Ayyub be in the US?,Is Rama Ayyub related to the group called Islamic State?,Is Rama Ayyub a member of the Organization of American States?
Are veterans and Gold Star families eligible to receive free access to national parks?,Will veterans not receive free admission at national parks?,Is National Parks open to all veterans?,Is there an entrance fee to all national parks?,Have veterans received free entrance to National Parks?,"Is National Parks accessible to veterans, Gold Star families, and non veterans?"
Does Ryan propose to limit the amount Medicare coverage can take?,Does Ryan propose to require a deductible for Medicare coverage?,Will federal funding only pay for health care in the 15k budget?,Can people on Medicare in the 15k budget still be covered by insurance?,Does this plan make sense under any circumstances?
Are nuclear missiles able to knock down a missile 97% of the time?,Are nuclear missiles able to knock down a missile in the air 97 percent of the time?,Is it highly likely that a missile is knocked down 97% of the time?,"Currently, the only missile defense is a drone attack against the U.S.?"
Did this clipping predict future telephones?,Did this clipping come from a newspaper?,Has this clipping been used for any other purposes?,Was this clipping accurate?,Was the prediction about future telephones based on this clipping?,Did this clipping occur within a year of other phone announcements?
Did Obama have anything to do with any of these kids being detained?,Were any of these kids detained during any time during Obama's presidency?,Did Obama respond to anyone regarding these kids being detained?,Did anyone care enough about these children who were detained in the administration's efforts to release them?,Were any of these children detained because Obama was unwilling to do anything in regards to them?
Did anyone in 2016 elect Trump?,Did Trump win any races in 2017?,Were Trump's 2016 election results rigged?,Did Trump have the shortest term in office in 2017?,Did Trump vote favorably in 2017?,Did Trump vote well in 2018?,Did Trump's 2016 election results change following recounts?
Is this incident in Tennessee?,Can this organization contribute to this climate?,Are there any other similar incidents in Tennessee?,Is this type of rally being held to re-start the economy?,Is this rally part of an effort to support Tennessee's economy?,Was this rally on the same day as an event urging the state of Tennessee to re-start its economy?
Did Scott take money from a family for drilling?,Did Scott try to cover up the money?,Does Rick Scott have a criminal record?,Is Rick Scott a co-conspirator?,Is Rick Scott a co-conspirator?,Are there any other similarities?,Is Rick Scott a co-conspirator with one person or the other?
Is this poll a general assessment of the support for the plan?,Do 60% of Americans agree with the president's plan to reform health care?,Do many Americans support the government allowing the private insurance you have to remain?,Is this a general statement about the plan?,Is this a general statement about other governmental health plans?
Is it possible for 45 members of the Northern Ireland Assembly to vote to revoke the Northern Ireland Protocol?,Is it possible to vote to revoke the Northern Ireland Protocol after the votes are counted?,Does revoke include only voting to revoke?,Can there be only one vote?,Is there anything in the protocol that may exclude a vote?
Did Biden declare quarantine camps for Americans who did not receive a vaccine by 2022?,"If American's did not receive the vaccine by 2022, would they be sent to quarantine camps?",Was the announcement made in the face of a political splinter?,Does Biden have a history of supporting an unvaccinated American population?
"Did Rivera receive a $5,000 campaign donation from Congressman Bachus?",Did Rivera receive any other campaign donations from Bachus?,Was Rivera under House Ethics investigation for insider trading?,"Is it possible to assume that rivera received a $5,000 campaign donation from Bachus?",Was Rivera an insider trading witness?
Did all Tatverdächtigen in Velbert have asylum status in Germany?,Did the group of teenagers who got injured in the park in Velbert have citizenship?,Did the group of teenagers who got injured in Velbert have citizenship in Germany?,Would there be a refugee situation in Deutschland?,"Did Velbert also claim asylum in Hungary, the largest migrant camp in Europe?"
Does Elba have any acting experience in The Walking Dead?,Does Elba have any acting experience in the TV series The Walking Dead?,Will Elba be starring in an episode of The Walking Dead?,Will Elba die in season 1 of The Walking Dead?,Has the character of New Black in Season 1 been remade in season 2 of The Walking Dead?
Would Congress' 3% cut year over year be sufficient to balance the budget?,Is there evidence Congress could achieve the desired balance in 5 years?,Can this budget entail any change to the national budget?,Is there sufficient public support to support the concept that Congress could achieve the intended balance in 5 years?
In 1925 there were no government benefits. The only time government benefits were available are when people were in business. Has the government ever provided government benefits since 1925?,Has the government ever provided any government benefits since 1925?,Does this statement directly reference the year in which the person was born?,Is this information accurate?
Did Bill Gates speak at the G20 event?,Did Bill Gates say any specific details about death panels?,Did Bill Gates promise that a 'death panel' was to be required?,Did Bill Gates make comments based on the fact that the G20 is a gathering of world leaders?
Does BJP offer reservations for Goans?,Does it guarantee all reservations for Goans?,Has BJP said they have delivered 40% reservations for Goans?,Do the reservations take into account the educational history of the Goans?,Does BJP grant special admission to goans only?,Has NIT benefited Goans by allowing 40 percent reservations?
Do air conditioners with refrigerant fron have to be replaced by 2020?,Does it state that there are plans to remarket air conditioners with fron?,Does this data support the assertion of that air conditioners using fron will have to be replaced by 2020?,Are there plans for other measures to replace air conditioners with fron?
"Are 90% of hospitalizations at Ruby Memorial, West Virginia, and around the country unvaccinated?",Were 90-95% of hospitalized hospitalized unvaccinated?,Is there sufficient data to show that 95% of hospitalizations at Ruby Memorial are unvaccinated?,Do most hospitals in West Virginia provide vaccines?
Did women make 78 percent of what men make for the same job?,Did women make 70% of what men make for the same job?,Did women make 78% of what men make for the same job?,Did women make 78% of what men make for the same job?,Did women make 78 percent of what men make for the same job?
Does eating a banana in addition to eggs kill a man in 5 minutes?,Does eating a banana and egg together kill a man in 5 minutes?,Was eating a banana before eating eggs in addition to bananas?,Is it safe to eat both eggs and bananas simultaneously?,Is it dangerous to eat both eggs and bananas alone?
Is Obamacare 100 percent increase?,Is it 100 percent increase?,Are there 91 percent people with coverage under Obamacare now?,Are all of the people who get coverage under Obamacare paying 100 percent more?,Do Obamacare beneficiaries pay more than 90% of the cost of premiums?,Is Obamacare providing a comprehensive health care?
Does Reliance Jio Infocomm intend to buy Federal Bank?,Does the acquisition of Federal Bank affect the company's current balance sheet?,Will the acquisition of Federal Bank cause significant revenue loss?,Are Federal Bank services currently offered in all locations?,Will Federal Bank serve as a distribution point for Reliance Jio?
Would this proposal raise the tax rate in any way?,Would this increase be in any way connected to a higher cost for coverage?,Are the proposed tax increases solely in relation to a higher cost for coverage?,"Is it also possible to use the term ""health care premiums""?",Is any tax increase in this proposal associated with an increase in health insurance costs?,Is there any evidence that the proposed rate raise would increase health care costs?
Would spending 90k to stop one vehicle off the road cost $90k?,Would taking one vehicle off of the road save a total of $90k?,Would spending this money on a single vehicle at a time have a net cost of $90k?,Would this plan have a net cost of $90k?,Would the bill be regressive?
Are illegal immigrants receiving the same things as citizens under this plan?,Is this plan based on a plan endorsed by people who aren't illegal immigrants?,"Would the program include education, healthcare and much more?",Do these programs include many free things in this plan?,Does this plan plan include any specific religious exemptions?,Does this plan also apply to students?
Did this article give an overview of the four tips mentioned?,Did these tips help users get the most from their gasoline dollar?,Is the information listed here reliable?,Is there evidence to support the recommendations in this article?,Is the text reviewed in this article?,Have any opinions about the text been discussed?
Did any of the articles that claim Jan. 6 Capitol attack conspiracy involve movie theater listings?,Can the movie theater listings be used to support the argument?,Was any post citing movie theater listings a false statement?,Are there any post claiming movie theater listings based on a false statement?,Are there any other sources using movie theater listings to support a false statement?
Have trials and tests been conducted for the new medicine COVID-Organics?,Does the drug treat coronavirus symptoms?,Has the new medicine COVID-Organics been proven effective for treatment of patients with COVID-19 in Madagascar?,Does this product have any other ingredients?
Did the Central Texas food bank deliver 50% more food three years ago than in three years?,Did the Central Texas food bank deliver 50 percent more food in 3 years than in three years?,Did the Central Texas food bank deliver 50 percent more food than 3 years ago?,Did the Central Texas food bank deliver 50 percent more food than in three years before?
Was this video released?,Did these sadhus are caught red handed?,Did these sadhus kidnap children?,Did these sadhus remove their kidneys?,Did they do this for charity?,Did these sadhus perform a ritual for charity?,Did these Sadhus suffer severe injuries?,Is this incident related to religion in this country?
Are all the Senate senators who voted to confirm Kavanaugh represented 44 percent of the US population?,Do all the Senators who voted to confirm Kavanaugh represent a majority of the US population?,Is the smallest proportion of the US population represented by any senator?,Are all the Senate senators who voted to confirm Kavanaugh from different ethnic groups?
Was this meme posted on Facebook?,Is the vigil for COVID in California included in the meme?,Did the meme depict the rules for Thanksgiving and Christmas in 2020?,Does this meme depict the vigil for COVID in California?,Is the meme based on actual documents?,Did a meme depict the vigil for COVID in California?
"Did liberals start a GoFundMe campaign to raise Cristhian Rivera's $5,000,000 bail?",Did liberals raise money to pay the money for the bail campaign?,Did a group of liberals raise money to pay Cristhian Rivera's bail?,Was the total of funds raised in the campaign higher than the bail amount?
Did Joe Biden suffer from brain aneurysms?,Has Joe Biden experienced any serious brain trauma?,Has Joe Biden posed any risks for brain injury?,Has Joe Biden exhibited signs of brain injury?,Can Joe Biden be seen without a brace?,Is Joe Biden in danger of brain injury?
Is Mikovits a scientist from the United States?,Is Mikovits jailed for discovering retroviruses are transmitted to humans through vaccines?,Is Mikovits's jail sentence for discovering retroviruses being transmitted to humans through vaccines?,Is Mikovits currently incarcerated?
Is the Florida bill requiring schools to assess diversity and intellectual freedom?,Does it mean that individuals are not required to assess diversity and intellectual freedom?,Does the bill require schools to assess diversity and intellectual freedom?,Is the bill requiring schools to assess diversity and intellectual freedom mandatory?,Is the bill requiring schools to assess diversity and intellectual freedom voluntary?
Was Joe Biden on a plane with an empty field?,Was Biden directing his attention towards a field?,Is Biden's plane headed to Florida?,Does Biden appear to wave to a empty field?,Is Biden holding a swastika at his hand?
Was the victim 12 years old when it happened?,Did the attack occur alone?,Was there any evidence that a 12 year old was abused by strangers?,Did the attackers know the victim well?,Did the victim leave the attackers behind?,Did the attackers commit the attack alone?,Was there any evidence of violence in the attack?
Did the United States had the most working population?,Is there any indication that there is an increase in unemployment?,Did America have a higher number of people working than ever before?,Did any of these numbers come before or after these figures were published?,Was the total number of US workers larger than any other country?
Did the Trump campaign and the Cambridge Analytica use the same tactics as the Obama 2008 and 2012 campaigns?,Did Trump use the same tactics and techniques as the Obama 2008 and 2012 campaigns?,Does the Trump campaign have access to any of the data that the Trump campaign used?,Is any of the data stored by the Trump campaign and the Cambridge Analytica used for its election campaigns available for analysis?,Did the Trump campaign use any of the data stored by Cambridge Analytica?,Did the Trump campaign use any of the data stored by the Cambridge Analytica for election campaigns?
Did Gugino make any public claims during the protest?,Did Gugino make any statements in the protest?,Did Gugino make any statements at the protest?,Has Gugino been arrested before?,Did Gugino do any rousing activity during the protest?,Was Gugino arrested prior to the protest?
Would a new federal law banning under the age of 18-years of age from riding as passengers on motorcycles?,Are 18-year-olds already barred from riding as passengers on motorcycles?,Is 18-year-olds already barred from riding as passengers on motorcycles?
Does the centre provide 2000 to girl child under PM Kanya Ayush Yojana?,Was the PM Kanya Ayush Yojana program initiated?,Is the Centre providing Rs 2000 to girl child under PM Kanya Ayush Yojana?,Is this type of programme part of the PM Kanya Ayush Yojana scheme?
Did the military request National Guard for 6 times?,Did the military request National Guard 6 times?,Did Pelosi support the request 6 times?,Does Pelosi have any knowledge of the National Guard requests for the military?,Is the request of the National Guard 6 times accurate?,Did Pelosi have any information about the demand for National Guard?
"Did more than 200,522 students make it to tertiary education in 2014?","Did more than 400,874 of these students make it to tertiary education in 2014?","Did only 221,525 students go to tertiary education in 2014?",Is there a statistical difference between the number of people who passed the matric examination and the number who did not?
Did this report appear on the Russian TV in 2018?,Did this report involve the partition of Ukraine?,Did this Russian TV report feature a map?,Did this Russian TV report feature a map of the proposed partition of Ukraine?,Did this Russian TV report contain details on a map of the proposed partition of Ukraine?
Does the GDP grow from 1.91% to 2.27% in 2019?,Did the GDP decline to 1.87% in first quarter of 2020 because of the decline in global economic activities?,Did the GDP increase in the first quarter of 2020 due to Covid-19 pandemic?,Did the GDP increase in 2019 and the first quarter of 2020 relate to the Covid pandemic?
"Has the federal government implemented ""77 different social welfare programs?",""" Does the federal government provide services for families with children?",Does the federal government pay for the services of individuals with a disability?,Does the government pay for the services of persons with special needs?,Does the federal government cover for persons with disabilities?,Does the federal government pay for the services of individuals with special needs?,Does the federal government provide services for families with children?
Did the Congressional Budget Office estimate that every penny of the federal budget would be spent on interest on the debt?,Will every penny of the federal budget go to entitlement spending?,Is interest on the debt and entitlement spending a major component of the federal budget?,Will all federal spending be spent on these items?
Does COV-19 have components inside the 5G kits?,Did the COV-19 hardware contain any security software?,Is there any evidence of a worm in the hardware that could be responsible for a virus?,Were there any devices in the hardware that are capable of carrying COV-19?,Was the hardware included in the 5G kit.?
Did Jerry Brown give state employees a union?,Did this mean California state employees can now retire at 55?,Was this a deal that was effective with state employees?,Have these new retirement plans for state employees already been in place for over 6 years?,Are California state employees allowed to choose their retirement plan?,Did state employees lose their rights by these new retirement plans?
Is Harvard separating graduation ceremonies on race?,Does Harvard recognize racism and hate crimes?,Are graduation ceremonies on race separate?,Would Harvard use racially discriminatory strategies to reduce race discrimination?,Are there plans to change Graduation Ceremony Policies in 2017?,Did Harvard slash Graduation ceremonies based on race?
Did Ms. Göring-Eckardt promise that workers 2020 contributed more in their social security budget than was required?,Would that budget increase amount to $520 billion for 2010?,Would a reduction of $520 billion in 2010 be sufficient?,Did Ms. Göring-Eckardt promise that workers 2020 contributed more in their social security budget than they were required?,Would that budget increase amount to $160 billion for 2010?
Do smokers pay more in tax for tobacco than non smokers?,Does closing the tobacco loophole save Missouri taxpayers money?,Have the smokers reacted to tobacco tax reductions?,Does closing the tobacco loophole require state legislature to do it?,Are Missouri state legislators aware of any other ways to reduce the number of smokers?
Was the complaint from the White House about the dandelion color?,Is there proof of children using the dandelion color?,Is it true that the complaint originated in the White House?,Do all 24 crayons contain the dandelion color?,Has this color been an issue for others?
Did these two men pose a threat to the House?,Did these men show a specific pattern of behavior?,Do these two men represent the Republican Party?,Did these men pose any danger to other Republican politicians?,Will these two men leave the House?,Will these two men remain in the House?,Are there any laws that would make it unsafe for the Republicans to remain in the House?
"Did the man make more than $1 million selling Chuck E. Cheese Tokens as “Bitcoins""?",Was the man arrested after the sale?,Did the man make money for gambling?,Did the man sell Chuck E. Cheese Tokens for any other items?,"Was the man in the United States under a $1000, $100, $200 or $300,000 limit?"
Did Pfizer CEO announce his plan to reduce the world's population by 50%?,Is Pfizer CEO a scientist?,Has Pfizer CEO publicly stated his plan to reduce population?,Can Pfizer CEO confirm that his plan will result in a 50% population reduction?,Is Pfizer CEO's plan to reduce population by 50% a scientifically proven plan?
Is Vladimir Putin likely to step down as president in 2021?,Is Vladimir Putin known as the country’s most corrupt president?,Is Putin known for corruption as President of Russia?,Is Putin known as the country’s most corrupt president?,Is it unlikely Putin will not quit as president in 2021?
Do doctors in COVID-19 cases describe this as stopping them from absorbing oxygen?,Did this effect occur for 5G at 60 GHz?,Did doctors in COVID-19 cases report this effect?,Has this effect actually been observed for 5G at 60 GHz?,Do all doctors who have been involved in COVID-19 cases report this effect?
Did Greenspan support increasing spending?,Did Greenspan support cutting taxes?,Did Greenspan support limiting the debt?,Did Greenspan support increasing spending in 2001?,Did Greenspan reject reducing debt in 2001?,Was Greenspan a vocal opponent of reducing debt in 2001?,Did Greenspan oppose paying down the debt?
Did police find over 30 cow eyeballs in a man's rectum?,Did police arrest the man for drunk driving?,Did the man have multiple cow eyeballs in his rectum?,Did the man have any medical conditions besides cow eyeballs?,Did the man have swine flu?
"Was Ocasio-Cortez at the Met Gala and did she spend an additional $30,000 on that dress?","Did Ocasio-Cortez attend the Met Gala for less than $30,000?","Was Ocasio-Cortez in attendance for an amount less than $30,000?"
"Did the coronavirus cause 100,000 children to be in serious condition and many on ventilators?",Did the coronavirus cause children to be in serious condition and many on ventilators?,"Have we never had over 100,000 children in serious condition due to the coronavirus before?",Has the coronavirus caused children to be in serious condition and many on ventilators?
Is there an estimated number of people killed in this blast?,Was there any other death due to the blast?,Did the explosion occur in a city other than Mangalore?,Was the fire caused by 10 cylinders?,Was the cylinders not explosive?,Did the fire cause any injuries?,Did any of the dead people have serious injuries?
Did Nepal invade China in 1788?,Did Nepal defeat the Qing Empire in 1788?,Did Nepal defeat Qing Empire in 1788?,Did Nepal invade China in 1788?,Did Nepal defeat Qing Empire in 1788?,Did Nepal defeat Qing Empire in 1788?,Did Nepal defeat Qing Empire in 1788?
Does PDP-Laban plan to get Manny Pacquiao disqualified from running for president in 2022?,Is it expected that Pacquiao will run for president in 2022?,Is the majority of PDP-Laban involved in the campaign for Pacquiao?,Is the campaign for Pacquiao entirely based in the Philippines?
Did a foreclosure tax take effect in 2013?,Would a foreclosure tax cause a high tax bill for those facing foreclosure?,Did a foreclosure tax have a direct impact on modifying mortgages?,Will a foreclosure tax impact families who modified mortgages or had a short sale through lenders?,Would a foreclosure tax impact homeowners with a subsidized mortgage?
Is TVA's board made up of people from the public sector that have only one year or two of corporate board experience?,Are there more people on TVA's board with a small amount of corporate board experience?,Does the board of TVA have any other members with little or no corporate board experience?
Is the electric car called EVision?,"Does it have a 100,000 mile battery life?","Is it capable of 1,000 miles a charge?",Is it a battery powered electric vehicle?,Is it available with a 10 year warranty?,Is EVision similar to other electric vehicles?,Is the battery a 10-year warranty?
Did Pelosi order Trump to enter the Capitol through the rear kitchen entrance?,Did Trump enter the Capitol through the rear kitchen entrance?,Was Trump ordered to enter the Capitol through the rear kitchen entrance?,Was Trump authorized to enter through the rear kitchen entrance?,Did Trump deliver the State of the Union Address?,Is Pelosi a Republican?
Do I have to give back every penny of the advance child tax credit payments?,Can I use the advance child tax credit to pay child support if I receive it?,Is this policy the only policy limiting advance child tax credit payments?,Does this policy apply to federal taxes as well?,Can I use advance child tax credit payments for tuition or child care if I receive it?
Did Texas create jobs within the last seven years?,"In general, would Texas have created more jobs if not for Trump?",Is Trump concerned about the economy creating jobs for all in Texas?,Is Trump aware of the economy creating jobs for all in Texas?,Would the jobs in Texas have a negative impact on the economy if not for Trump?
Did The Omicron Variant first appear on any cinemas in 1963?,Was The Omicron Variant ever published?,Did the film receive the correct box office rating?,Did The Omicron Variant appear in theaters in the year that was released to the public?,Does the film have any associated stars?
Did the video show violence after the 2021 election in Uganda?,Is the video evidence of the violence in Uganda?,Did the video show violence following the 2021 election in Uganda?,Does the video explain what is happening in Uganda?,Have all Ugandans been informed of the violence?,Are there any specific facts or details about the violence?
Are financial centres moving to Strasbourg by the Treaty?,Did the Treaty make it clear that financial centres would all be moved to Strasbourg by 2022?,Are financial centres primarily in Europe in 2022?,Does the Treaty give any details on the future of financial centres?,Was the Lisbon Treaty repealed in 2022?
Are three in four low-income workers without paid sick days?,Did people receive paid sick days for 2010 or are they generally available for free?,Do those workers have the same amount of days paid for as those with a more modest income?,Did the number of days for paid sick leave vary by income?,Are the number of days for paid sick days for the lowest income groups available for free?
Did the suffragettes eat a pizza to annoy men?,Did the suffragettes eat a pizza to annoy men?,Was this photograph taken in 1921?,Did the suffragettes wear bathing suits during this time?,Did the suffragettes wear bathing suits during this time?
Did the Department of Justice ask the U.S. Supreme Court to rule on the legality of firing employees due to their sexual orientation?,Did Trump ask the U.S. Supreme Court to rule in a way to establish the legality of firing employees on the basis of their sexual orientation?,Did the Department of Justice request the Supreme Court to rule in a way that would establish the legality of firing employees on the basis of their sexual orientation?
Is there any proof that U.S. Steel is building six new steel mills?,Was there a lot of evidence that U.S. Steel is building six new steel mills?,Was there any evidence that U.S. Steel was building six new steel mills?,Was there any evidence that U.S. Steel had any planned expansions in the industry?
Did Delhi Police arrest a doctor who killed 125 patients on the pretext of COVID-19?,Did the doctor kill the patients with the pretext of having COVID-19 for their kidneys?,Did he feed all of the patients to crocodiles?,Did the doctor's co-worker have access to the patients' blood?
Did this couple cure 134 patients in Italy?,Did the doctors perform this procedure as expected?,Did this couple receive any monetary compensation for this work?,Does this doctor recommend any medical procedures in this medical report?,"answer id=""No"">Doctor couple tested positive after curing 134 patients in Italy/answer id=""Yes"">?"
Did an announcement about the destruction caused by typhoon Hinnamnor air by News Nation?,Did the announcement about the destruction caused by typhoon Hinnamnor make its way to News Nation?,Was the announcement made prior to typhoon Hinnamnor?,Is the footage a part of News Nation's coverage of the event?
"Between 1995 and 2011, did EU immigrants contribute £8.8 billion more than they gained?",Did EU immigrants contribute more in 2011 than in 1995?,Did EU immigrants contribute less in 2011 than in 1995?,Did the EU immigrants contribute more in 2011 than in 1995?,Did European immigrants contributed less in 2011 than in 1995?
Is the stated policy for paid family leave in all but five nations of the world?,Is it stated that this policy is common in all five countries of the world?,Is this policy a program that is common in all five nations of the world?,Is this policy something that any one company can implement in the world?,Is this policy a requirement of any particular company?,Is this policy typically used in many countries in the world?
Did Buhari say in this video that he will have people vote again?,Is this video of Buhari asking people to vote again from 2019?,Is this video of Buhari asking people to vote again from 2019?,Is this video of Buhari asking people to vote again from 2019?,Is the video of Buhari asking people to vote again from 2019?
"Did Oliver Anthony decline a $100,000 offer for his Super Bowl performance?",Does Oliver Anthony make any money from his Super Bowl performance?,Is Oliver Anthony an unemployed artist?,Will this free performance of his Super Bowl concert cost money?,Were any ads placed for this Super Bowl performance promoting his performance?,Is Oliver Anthony affiliated with a political / social organization?
Did the Obama administration begin with the arrival of 3.5 million workers?,Did the Obama administration have more people working in the workforce than a previous administration?,Did the Obama administration help with the increase in the number of people entering the workforce?,Did Obama's approach to employment entail more of a focus on youth employment?
Are there any players currently convicted felons who have played for the NFL?,Are any of the convicted felons in this group currently on the NFL roster?,Did any of these convicted felons ever serve a sentence in the armed forces prior to being eligible to play for the NFL?
Did the poll found Trump to be the only Republican candidate who could beat Obama in Texas?,Did Fox and Friends report on the poll?,Was Fox referring to the poll as well?,Was the poll conducted by a third party?,Was there a poll before the poll taken?,Was Fox and Friends reporting on the poll before the poll took place?,Was the poll conducted by a third party?
Does Carter state that there is one China and Taiwan is part of China?,Has Carter claimed the same thing since then?,Has Carter ever said this to someone in public?,Does this claim apply to Carter's actions while in office?,Has Carter remained silent on the statement?,Does Carter think Taiwan is part of China?
Is there a significant amount of evidence that pyramids have been discovered in Antarctica?,Did the pyramids have any significant importance to the pre-historic civilization in the region?,Did the pyramids form during the Mesolithic period?,Did the pyramids form any relation to Mesolithic civilizations?,Did the pyramids form any connection to the pre-historic civilization?
Did India have this coronavirus in their summer?,Did the coronavirus originate in India?,Are there many in India?,Will India have this coronavirus in the future?,br> br> br> br> br> br> br> br> br> br> br> br>?
Did Benny Lieu become a senator after receiving around 15 billion as a senator?,Was Benny Lieu a senator in the past?,Did Benny Lieu make a lot of money during his time in office?,Did Benny Lieu receive any funding from the government?
Does Florida have a statewide review of local land use and zoning decisions?,Did he say Florida is one of the few states that he mentions?,Did the Florida State Department of Environmental Quality inspect local land use and zoning decisions in the state?,Did the Florida State Department of Environmental Quality approve local land use and zoning decisions?
Are there significant differences between vaccinated and unvaccinated rates when comparing COVID?,Did COVID cases increase with vaccination?,Is there any evidence that COVID vaccination rates have increased with vaccination?,Does this report support this claim?,Is there any evidence that COVID vaccination rates have decreased in the last ten years?
Was the conditioner that tampered with the woman's hair in question?,Was the woman able to recover her hair?,Did the conditioner have a harmful effect on the woman?,Did the woman experience some type of hair loss?,Did the woman experience any other type of hair loss?,Did the woman experience any other medical issues after the incident?
Does burning sage kill 94% of airborne bacteria?,Does burning sage cure disease-causing strains for 30 days?,Are respiratory conditions treated with burning sage?,Was the estimated effectiveness of burning sage as much as 94% in predicting the outcomes of asthma cases?,Does using burning sage to treat asthma have any positive side effects?
Were there any studies or research from the Heritage Foundation that suggested that Congress has already implemented 64% of their top agenda items?,Was Reagan mentioned to have made that claim?,Were any studies done by the Heritage Foundation that alleged that Congress has already implemented 64% of their top agenda items?,Are some studies in support of the claim that Congress has already implemented 64% of their top agenda items?
Is the state of Montana's budget balanced?,Did Gov. Romney balance the state's budget as a state legislator?,Did Gov. Romney balance the state's budget as a state legislator?,Is Gov. Romney involved in balancing the state's budget?,Has Gov. Romney worked with other Republicans?
Does the Impossible Whopper have more estrogen than the Whopper?,Does the impossible burger contain less estrogen than the whopper?,Has the Impossible Whopper contributed to the health risks of breast cancer?,Has the impossible burger contributed to the health risks of colon cancer?
Did Obama pardon Wendell Callahan who went on to murder a woman and her two children?,Did Callahan receive pardon for murdering the woman and her children?,Did Obama pardon Callahan for murdering a woman and her two children?,Did Obama pardon Wendell Callahan because of his crime?
Did the Affordable Care Act increase insurance costs?,Did everyone who has high deductibles get upgraded insurance?,Can an individual plan on the marketplace costs less than $75/month?,Whether there is a universal insurance plan under the ACA. Whether there are plans for all people. Is there any evidence that the Affordable Care Act had an effect on individual health plans or would that increase?
Did Kinzinger admit Trump won the 2020 presidential election?,Did Kinzinger say Trump won the 2020 presidential election?,Did Kinzinger say Trump won the 2020 presidential election?,Did Kinzinger claim Trump won the 2020 presidential election?,Did Kinzinger say Trump won the 2020 presidential election?,Did Kinzinger agree with Trump?
Was this photo taken in 2021 or 2021?,Did there are food couriers line up at a popular Thai restaurant in 2021?,Did food couriers line up at the popular Thai restaurant in 2021?,Did food couriers in the photo line up at the popular Thai restaurant in 2021?,Was the food courier's name in the photo?
Did the law passed by beginning of 2018 cease child support payments?,Did the law pass by the end of 2017?,Did the law passed by the end of 2017 stop child support payments in the United States?,Did the law pass by the end of 2017 stop child support payments in the United States?,Has the government stopped child support payments in the United States?
Did a video of Muslims harassed in France take place in October of 2020?,Did the footage show Muslim members of the Paris Muslim Community being harassed?,Did the video show Muslim members of the Paris Muslim Community being harassed?,Is there an alternative to the video?,Does the video show Muslim members of the Paris Muslim Community being harassed?
"Did the FBI locate America's worst nightmare in Islamberg, New York?",Were there charges or treason charges against the perpetrators of the alleged crimes?,Was the FBI attempting to prosecute the alleged crimes?,Was the FBI doing its job?,Did President Trump order these investigations?
Did Clinton increase the trade deficit with China by 40% during her term as Secretary of State?,Did the trade deficit with China rise after Clinton took office?,Did the trade deficit with China result in millions of jobs lost?,Did Clinton increase the trade deficit with China due to increased pressure on America?,Did Clinton work to resolve the trade deficit with China?
Is there evidence of the crash of the Long March 5B spaceship?,Is the footage of the crash of the Long March 5B related to the crash of the spaceship?,Is the video of the crash of the Long March 5B related to the crash of the spaceship?,Is the video of the crash of the Long March 5B related to the crash of the spaceship?
"Did Gates tell world leaders at the G-20 Summit that ""death panels"" will soon be required?",Is Gates also a leading supporter of alternative living arrangements?,Does this video feature a video captioning Gates' statement?,Did Gates directly speak on the issue in the video?
Are there enough people in Missouri to have degrees?,Is there a balance between the number of people with a degree and the number of people who don't have a degree?,Is the number of people without a degree lower than the percentage who don't have a degree?,Are fewer people able to work in this industry if they lack a degree?
Did an Afghan child escape the earthquake?,Did a child escaped the earthquake?,Was the child in the photo in the country of origin?,Was the earthquake after June 20.220?,Did this photograph show this child at the time?,Did this photograph show an Afghan child escaping the earthquake?,Did this photograph show this child in the United States?,Did this photograph show this child in the U.S.?
Did Massachusetts' health care plan impact more people than the Obamacare law?,Is that difference in percentage of people that is affected by the Obamacare law?,Is 8% of people affected by the Massachusetts health care plan less than 100% of Americans?,Does the Massachusetts health care plan deal with less people than the Obamacare law?
Did Marcos become a newly wed congressman in 1962 or 1963?,Did Marcos create the bank accounts for the US Senate?,Did Marcos work as a state senator for the NH Senate?,Did Marcos create a bank account for the US Senate?,Did Marcos ever have a bank account?,Did Marcos resign from the NH Senate in 1963?
Did this video show flames erupting from the building?,Was this high-rise caught on fire in China?,Did the fire cause significant damage?,Is this video remorseful?,Does this video show people stuck inside the building?,Is this video a montage of flames erupting?
Is a 4.0 grade point average guaranteed for a student whose roommate commits suicide?,Does a student who is eligible for this regulation receive this 4.0 grade point average?,Did this policy primarily govern students who were impacted by suicide?,Is it uncommon for suicide to kill a college student?
Is there sufficient data to prove Schwab's claim is accurate?,"Was Schwab stating that four billion people would die through planned epidemics, war and starvation by 2050?","Is it true that four billion people would die through planned epidemics, war and starvation by 2050?"
Was the video the same age as the Indian Muslim?,Did the Indian Muslim acknowledge sexually assaulting his daughter?,Did the Indian Muslim deny this accusation?,Was the video retweeted?,Was the video related to a specific incident?,Can you comment on this article?,Please add in your response.?
Did Advani vote for the INC for the first time during his 70+ years of voting life?,Are Advani's years of voting history documented?,Have Advani's voting records for the INC been analyzed?,Did Advani vote for the INC for the first time in his 70+ years of voting life?
Would Donald Trump be placing US citizens in quarantine for the next 14 days?,Does Trump plan to introduce an alternative to quarantine in the future?,Is there a reason Trump is not offering an alternative to quarantine?,Is Trump in favor of a non-quarantine option?,Did Trump specifically indicate this during his comments about quarantine?
Did all UPI transactions more than 2000 get a 1.1% tax?,Does UPI not cost any more than this in India?,Will this tax charge only go up on large UPI transactions?,Is this tax regressive at all?,Will this tax apply to larger UPI transactions if they go up in size?
Did half of households in 1994 have electricity?,Is it true that around half of households have electricity now?,Is it true that some households used electricity less than 20 years ago?,Has the percentage of households using electricity increased since 1994?,Have new households gotten electricity in recent times?,Is the percentage of households using electricity over 30 years old?
Did Ronald Reagan try for eight years to build a border wall?,Did Ronald Reagan succeed in building a border wall?,Did Ronald Reagan fail in building a border wall?,Did Ronald Reagan have some success in constructing a border wall during his time in office?,Did Ronald Reagan try for eight years to build a border wall?
"Did this politician say something about City Hall being responsible for costing a 500,000+ dollar water treatment project?",Did this politician say something negative about City Hall's inaction?,Did the administration fail to meet the funding estimates for the project?,Did the government fail to meet funding estimates for the project?,"Did anyone, including Governor Romney, come up with an opinion based on what this bill will cost?"
Did three people die as a result of receiving the vaccine in Norway?,Does the vaccine have an effect on overall health in the country?,Did all people who died from COVID-19 vaccine in Norway die as a result of the vaccine?,Have other countries in the world tested the vaccine for COVID-19?
Was there a statue of Trump?,Is the gold-colored statue of Trump visible in the video?,Did CPAC 2021 have a statue of Trump?,Do other statues of Trump exist?,Did Trump speak on Capitol Hill at CPAC?,Did Trump speak at CPAC?,Did Trump address CPAC 2021?
Did the hospital employee skip work for 15 years?,Did the hospital employee receive pay when they allegedly skipped work?,Have any recent reports of this type of offense been released in the US?,Is this person a new suspect for this type of alleged offense?,Can I say this person is unemployed?
Did this video show cash being given out before the election in Osun state?,Does this video show cash being given out after the election?,Does this video reveal who the cash gave out to?,Does this video show the money to the people who were giving it out?,Will this footage be used by the people of Osun state?
"Did Fox report in a newscast that ""they let [Hurricane Hilary] right into the country because it's Biden’s America?",""" Is there any evidence that Fox had this narrative in October 2013?",Did this story happen after Trump had declared victory?,Is this narrative common for these news outlets?
"Did Arizona record some 250,000 votes for Trump, and over 950,000 ballots were declared illegal?","Did almost 950,000 ballots come in illegal?",Did most of these ballots come in illegal?,Did Trump have a larger majority in Arizona than Biden in 2016?,Did voters from Arizona vote in either elections?
Did Meek vote 98.6 percent of the time with the Democrat Party?,Does Meek vote for most candidates in his district?,Has Meek voted for a Democratic VP?,... did Ferre vote Democratic for all of his congressional trips?,... did Ferre vote for Democrats for all of his congressional trips?
Did one Michigan man die in 1984?,Did one Michigan man die in 1984?,Did one Michigan man die in 1984?,Did the Michigan man who died in 1984 vote?,Is the fact that one Michigan man died in 1984 correct?,Is there evidence to support this claim?,Did the Michigan man die in 1984?
Is Jan. 6 being used as a pretext to strip millions of Americans if their core constitutional rights were to be stripped?,Are all Americans suffering from fundamental constitutional rights to be stripped?,Are any Americans with constitutional rights to be stripped from their right to vote?,Is there a record of people who suffered from fundamental constitutional rights to be stripped from their right to vote?
Has Walker given this deduction to millionaires who send their kids to private schools?,Is this deduction allowed under federal law?,Has Walker given this deduction to millionaires who send their kids to private schools?,Has Walker's policy restricted this deduction to those that send their children to private schools?,Is this tax deduction intended to be used as a deferral on income for people employed in private schools?
Does Pfizer have FDA approval to vaccine 5 year olds?,Has Pfizer applied for FDA approval to vaccine 5-year olds?,Is Pfizer able to vaccinate 5 year olds?,Is Pfizer trying to get FDA approval to vaccine children?,Is Pfizer trying to get FDA approval to vaccinate children?
Did the protester who claimed that the money was paid to protest at a Trump rally claim to be an adult?,"Did the protester who claimed to have paid $3,500 claim to be a juvenile?","Did any of the protesters that claimed to have paid $3,500 actually have a criminal record?"
Does this agreement need Chinese to do nothing for 16 years?,Do the Chinese have the right to break this deal?,Are China's obligations under this agreement different to those of the US?,Would the Chinese be willing to break this agreement if they were not required to do nothing for 16 years?,Does this agreement need to be implemented for a significant timeframe?
Does 90% of topsoil have insufficient moisture to grow crops?,Does 90% of topsoil have enough water to grow crops?,Are the nutrients needed to grow crops in 90% of topsoil?,Is the amount of nutrients required to grow crops in 90% of topsoil correct?
Did 93 percent of blacks in America have other blacks kill them?,Did 93 percent of blacks in America have other blacks kill them?,Did 93 percent of blacks in America have other blacks kill them?,Did 93 percent of blacks in America have other blacks kill them?
Does Exipure reduce weight in a scientifically proven fashion?,Does BPS-5 reduce blood pressure in a scientifically proven fashion?,Does the supplement have any adverse effects on a user's health?,Does Exipure contain ingredients that have a similar effect to the BPS-5 supplement?
Did the first Congress require all ship owners to provide medical insurance for seamen?,Did the first Congress require all seamen to buy hospital insurance for themselves in 1798?,Did the first Congress mandate all able-bodied citizens to obtain a firearm in 1792?,Did the first Congress provide the first mandatory law on guns?
Did World Health Organization's VigiBase show there are over 2.5 million adverse reactions to the COVID-19 vaccine?,Is the COVID-19 vaccine effective?,Do there have any positive reports about the vaccine?,Has there been a negative report about the COVID-19 vaccine?,Have there been any negative reports about the COVID-19 vaccine?
Have Democratic tax hikes led wealth to relocate to the states?,Have these states been relocating wealth?,Have any of these states increased its GDP?,Are all of these states relocating wealth?,Is it accurate to say that New Jersey gained wealth in 2004-2008?,Are these states relocating wealth from New Jersey?,Are the states that are moving wealth from New Jersey the biggest states?
Does the video show fighting in Ethiopia in May 2023?,Did the video feature violence between Ethiopians?,Does this video show any violence?,No Does this video support Ethiopians?,No Does this video support Ethiopia?,No Did the video show violence in Ethiopia?
"Has the land claim settlement rate of roughly 80,000?",Has the land claim settlement rate been equal to 1.8 million people?,"Has the settlement rate for nearly 80,000 land claims in South Africa been met?",Is the settlement rate comparable to the US's settlement rate?,"Was the settlement rate for nearly 80,000 land claims less than the US's settlement rate?"
Are the leaders of other countries unhappy about GDP?,Are they unhappy about 7 or 8 points of GDP?,Did the leaders of other countries resent GDP growth?,Do all of these leaders have negative perceptions of GDP growth?,Would some of these leaders support the GDP growth target?,Did the leaders of other countries object to GDP growth?,Did most leaders resent GDP growth?
"Did Kurt Browning allow 1,800 illegal voters to register?",Did Kurt Browning allow illegal voting during his presidency?,Did Kurt Browning allow illegal voting in Florida during his presidency?,Was Kurt Browning a governor of Florida?,"During his presidency, was Kurt Browning a secretary of state?"
Did Obama's own economists say the stimulus cost $278k per job created?,Did Obama's economists work with the Obama administration?,Was Obama's own economists involved with this study?,Was Obama's economists aware of this study?,Did Obama's economists find this study credible?
Did Winfrey endorse keto weight loss gummies by Weight Watchers?,"Did Winfrey died or suffered a tragedy before May 20, 2022?",Was Winfrey involved with any controversies?,Was Winfrey's endorsement of keto weight loss gummies by Weight Watchers an actual endorsement of weight loss gummies by Weight Watchers?
Is Isaac peddling a plan that would cause Texans to pay the highest sales taxes in America?,Does Isaac support this plan?,Is the plan that Isaice is peddling for Texas to pay the highest sales taxes in America?,Are there other examples of states where Texas residents would pay the highest sales taxes in America?
Can this new digital currency system be expected to be widely used in the United States?,Are there any other digital currency systems planned in the United States?,Will there be any other systems developed for the United States?,Do the United States government currently have any other digital currency systems in use?,Will this system be called the FedNOW payment system?,Will the United States government provide any support for this system?
Did the Pentagon say we could eliminate 20% of our bases?,Did Congress have to make any policy to reduce these bases?,Did the Pentagon say there was a consensus for reducing these bases?,Are there any bases in the U.S. that could be eliminated?,Did Congress make any policy on reducing these bases?
Was Rahul Gandhi playing Badminton after the defeat?,Did Rahul Gandhi get into any major controversy over the defeat?,Are there any incidents in which Rahul Gandhi has faced criticism for his performance?,Did Rahul Gandhi play Badminton when it was time for the defeat?,Did Rahul Gandhi play Badminton after the defeat?
Did there exist groups of 15-20 armed people on the loose in Mumbai?,Has the issue been solved?,Did residents receive threats concerning the incident?,Does the threat have any consequences?,"Lastly, did residents in some areas receive any death threats due to the incident?",Does this incident affect the safety of babies outside?
Did the crowds rally in the U.S. to support Pakistan's former prime minister Imran Khan after his booted from office in April 2022?,Did the crowds rally in the U.S. to support Pakistan's former prime minister Imran Khan after his booted from office in April 2022?
Is the statement true?,Was Rob McCaskill a Republican member of Congress?,Is there any evidence McCaskill was a democrat?,Is there any evidence McCaskill had thoughts about 9/11 before 9/11?,Is there any indication that McCaskill said in any other political statement prior to 9/11?
Did Jain refuse to cook an egg-based dish?,Did Jain withdraw from the 25 lakh price race?,Did Jain participate in any other Masters Chef competition?,Did Jain fail any of his tests?,Did Jain's decision make him eligible for a monetary prize?,Did Jain withdraw from other MasterChef competitions?
Was Ruto the President after winning the 2022 elections?,Did the president speak after Ruto won the election?,Did the president speak after Ruto won the election?,Was the president of Kenya present before Ruto won the election?,Was Ruto the president of Kenya before Ruto won the election?,Did Ruto speak after Ruto won the election?
"In this year, the number of children attending Grade R has more than doubled from 300,000 to more than 700,000?",Are there more children attending Grade R than any other grade?,Is the increase due to a increase in the number of students going to kindergarten?,Will this increase continue for the foreseeable future?
Did a Canadian fishing boat crew spot a fox in the Arctic in 2018?,Did the story accurately report the Arctic fox was seen atop the iceberg in 2018?,Was the fox reported by the story accurate?,Did the crew witness an Arctic fox atop the iceberg?
Did a girl drive away in a car?,Has a teen driver gotten off the car before the girl?,Does the teen have an accomplice that took a picture of the teen?,Obviously it's rare for a person to drive off in a car unless it's under a police sty.?
Did Zelensky earn $11 million per month?,Did Zelensky have billions in assets?,Did Zelensky have a large number of assets?,Did Zelensky have billions in assets?,Did Zelensky earn $11 million per month?,Did Zelensky earn a significant sum of money during the 2014-16 fiscal year?
Did 17451 people died with Covid up to the end of quarter 3 2021?,Did 17371 people die from Covid?,Were there fewer deaths from Covid than from Covid?,Was Covid more prevalent in London than in other areas?,Did the number of deaths from Covid rise significantly during the quarter?
Is the mother of Jordan Neely murdered?,Is Neely's mother's death attributed to murder?,Did the victim die from asphyxia?,Were all of the victims of this attack from the NYC subway?,Are these events viewed as a homicide?,Are these events linked to the death of another person?
Did the Maui Fires take place before the book was published?,Did the fires begin before the book was published?,Did the book cover the events of the Maui Fires?,Is the Maui Fires a common cause of disasters worldwide?,Would the 2023 fires have made landfall in the Mainland of Australia?
What are the 5 Taliban detainees being released from Guantanamo in exchange for captured Army Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl?,What type of people are released from Guantanamo in exchange for captured Army Sgt. Bowe Bergdahl?
Is a 3 billion tree a 'non racist' tree?,Are trees in a non racist state called 'non racist'?,Will 3 billion trees be planted in areas with a non racist population?,Do Republicans think that trees in a non racist state are not racist?
Did the US spend any money from the original coronavirus bill?,Did the CDC report on the potential for the 'coronavirus bill' to be used for multiple purposes?,Does the CDC report have any information regarding the possible use of the money?,Was the money used for more than one purpose?,Does the US still have a trillion dollar surplus in account for the previous coronavirus bill?
Did Robredo say basketball is allowed in quarantine?,Was Robredo specific about the quarantine?,Did Robredo speak out in regards to the quarantine?,Does Robredo want to make sure that a team that is banned from playing in a quarantine aren't allowed to play in a quarantine after the quarantine?,Did Robredo say basketball is allowed under the quarantine as long as players are 3 m away?
Are Florida's achievement gaps narrowing due to income or race or ethnicity?,Are state achievement gaps narrowing due to race or ethnicity?,Do states that have narrowing achievement gap results continue to occur?,Does Florida have the largest achievement gap?,Does Florida have a large achievement gap in education?,Was there a decrease in the achievement gap in Florida in 2010?
"Did Trump criticize Obama during the 2013 government shutdown for failure to ""lead"" or ""get everyone in a room""?",Is Trump not known to have criticized Obama for failure to lead or make a deal during the 2013 government shutdown?,"Did Trump not criticize Obama for failing to ""lead"" or get everyone in a room?"
Did Taiwan President Tsai Ing-wen kneel before U.S. senators when he was sitting in a Senate session?,Did Tsai Ing-wen knelt to the senators' on June 6?,Did the Taiwan president knelt on June 6?
Was there one attack after 9/11 that increased the value of the insurance policy?,Is it true that the insurance is worth double the original value?,Is Silverstein on record having purchased terrorist insurance two months before 9/11?,Is the second attack a second attack?,Did the two attacks cause Silverstein to increase the insurance policy's value?
"Is 5,000 an award to COVID-19 vaccine recipients?","Is this 5,000 a reward for vaccines vaccinated?",Did the 5k fund cover all vaccines received against COVID?,Has the 5k fund reached all countries?,"Have the 5k funds only been used in Russia, Brazil, Mexico or Japan?"
Did the snake crawl out of the ground to protect Gautam Buddha's statue?,Is the statue in Nepal under a heavy rainfall?,Was the snake standing on the sand during the rainfall?,Was this snake not human-sized?,Are there any other snakes on display in Nepal?,Do snakes typically crawl on the sand inland from the ground in order to protect their habitat?
"Did the India Gate have 95,300 names of freedom fighters?",Has the number of Muslim names inscribed on the India Gate increased?,Is there a Muslim name inscribed on the India Gate?,Is there any other notable Muslim names inscribed on the India Gate?,Is there any evidence that this is the case?
Did Wisconsin fall from the number two spot in the country to number 41st for the ACT?,Was Wisconsin the only state in the country where more than half the students took the exam?,Did Wisconsin score the lowest overall on the ACT compared to the nation?,Did all Wisconsin students take the exam?
Will at least 55 of Americans have natural immunity by April?,Will there be herd immunity in the USA by April?,Will there be at least 60 percent of Americans with natural immunity by April?,Is the number of people with natural immunity greater than or equal to 62?,Is the total number of Americans with natural immunity greater than 62?
Are there any other economic indicators that are relevant to this statement?,Has this comment focused solely on a negative economic effect from lack of stable electricity supply?,Is this statement consistent with any studies that have shown that un stable electricity supply can reduce manufacturing and investment?,Is this statement from a specific economic researcher?
Does Social Security in Marco Rubio's state of Florida lift more than 1 million people out of poverty?,"Does Rubio's state have an average population of between 500,000 and 1.2 million?","Did Rubio's state have an average population of between 500,000 and 1.2 million?",Has Rubio's state experienced high unemployment or underemployment?
Can Odinga be confident in a return to a majority in the 2022 elections?,Are Odinga's polls favorable to him in any way?,Did Odinga's polls win in any way?,Are Odinga's polls based on electoral data?,Are Odinga's polls held at or near the same time as the 2022 elections?
Did the block-grant system work effectively?,Was Governor-level accountability established?,Did Governor-level accountability work in the same way as the Block Grant?,Did Governor-level accountability create accountability on the State side?,Do a number of issues exist after the 1996 block-grant reform?,Do there remain significant concerns about these issues at this point?
Have the tigers and lions gone across the country?,Have tigers and lions gone across the country to help the citizens stay inside their homes?,Did Russia leave the tigers and lions on the territory of the country to encourage citizens to stay inside their homes?,Do tigers and lions often leave on their own territories to aid citizens stay inside their homes?
"Did the U.S. train and equip an Afghan military force of 300,000?",Is the Afghan military force better than the NATO allies armed forces?,"Did the U.S. train and equip an Afghan military force of 300,000?",Is the force larger than the militaries of NATO allies?
"Did Kanye receive over 40,000 votes in Kentucky?",Did this photo show real election results?,"Has Kanye received 40,000 votes in other states?","Did Kanye receive over 40,000 votes in other states?",Did the photo show real election results?,"Has Kanye received over 40,000 votes in any other states?"
Is this the first time the South African government has ordered a company to lay off employees?,Was the South African government's order valid?,Have these government orders done any other layoffs?,Is this country's workforce mostly non-white?,Is this South African government order valid?,Is this government order valid?
Was a video circulating from the 2017 protests connected to a Macron vs. egg incident?,Is the footage related to the 2017 protests or is the video from this incident not related to the 2017 protests?,Did the video capture a Macron vs. egg incident in which someone hit him?
Is 70% of population expected to live in just 15 states in 2040?,Is 70% of population expected to live in just 15 states based on population forecast?,Is 60% of population expected to live in just 15 states in 2040?,Do these 20 states represent half of the population?,Is this prediction based on predictions from experts?
Did this ad predict the COVID-19 pandemic?,Did this ad use the term COVID-19?,Is this video a public service announcement?,Did this ad advertise for this disease?,Did this ad warn of what happened to the COVID-19 pandemic?
Did the policemen argue for the distribution of money collected through challans?,Did one of the policemen have a firearm?,Did the policemen fight over distribution of money collected through challans?,Has this dispute lasted more than a few days?,Are policemen in dispute about money collected through challans?
Was this photograph taken in April 2018 or April 2022?,Was this photograph taken in April 2018 or April 2022?,Was this photograph taken in April 2018 or April 2022?,Did this photograph include an image of a gathering in Lahore?,Did these images appear in the article?,Was this photograph taken during a rally supporting ousted Pakistan PM Imran Khan or the organizers of the rally?
Is the mouth of a Class 8 girl to be sacrificed to Shiva?,Is syphilis caused by coronavirus in this area?,Have the Brahmins sacrificed this type of organ as a sacrifice to save their village?,Are there multiple Brahmins who have sacrificed to Shiva for this purpose?
Did Nihang Sikhs march on horses to support protesting farmers?,Did the protesters use a mobile phone?,Did Nihang Sikhs march on horses?,Was the protest supported by the farmers protesting?,Are there any videos of the protest?,Can we expect these protests to continue?,Is this protest being viewed by the public?
Are rural haats development efforts sustainable?,Have farmers had success with development efforts?,Is growth achieved through grazing of lowland crops an improvement over traditional crops?,Is there evidence to show grazing increases the growth of small farmers?,Is the increase in size due to grazing of lowland crops the result of a successful project?
Did Facebook warn the 2016 campaigns that Russia Was Trying To Hack their Accounts?,Did Facebook Warn the 2016 campaigns that Russia Was Trying To Hack their Accounts?,Did Facebook Warn the 2016 campaigns that Russia Was Trying To Hack their Accounts?,Is there any research to support the claims that Russia was attempting to hack Facebook accounts?
Did Obama write to Paulson and Bernanke on subprime lending?,Did Obama write to Bernanke after writing to Paulson?,Was the subprime lending issue something that should be dealt with?,Will Subprime lending be taken away from this country?,Will subprime lending be taken away from the country?
Does the eclipse occur during times when the sky is dark?,Is the total solar eclipse for 5 seconds and there is darkness all over?,Has this eclipse been observed since 1903?,Did the eclipse last 5 seconds?,Is the total solar eclipse only observed once a year?,Have other solar eclipses been observed during times with total solar eclipses?
Is the UK Government paying more to Scotland than anywhere else for the same tax year?,Has Scotland benefited from the £50 billion in revenue from the Scottish tax return?,Does the UK Government make at least £50 billion from tax revenues in Scotland?,. Is the UK Government making at least £50 billion from tax revenue in Scotland?
Is it true that 40 students were hospitalised after taking Coronavirus vaccine in Kanpur?,Was the vaccine used by students in Kanpur before and after the vaccination?,Was the vaccine safe to administer to students?,Is it true that all of the children who were hospitalised after taking the vaccine were well received?,Is there any evidence that the vaccine was effective against Coronavirus?
Did the baby in the video lift a tray in the operation theatre in the Chandrayan-3 mission?,Did the video feature any babies?,Are there other children or animals featured in the video?,Was the video shot by a person in this particular mission?,Did the baby in the video suck?
Did the CCP have the opportunity to influence the Vatican?,Did the CCP contribute to Vatican silence regarding religious freedom?,Did the Vatican have the opportunity to influence the CCP?,Was the CCP's silence about religious freedom a reflection of CCP's repression of religious freedom?,Was the CCP spending money to influence Vatican policymaking?
Has Clinton backed this claim?,Has this claim been verified in public?,Was this claim made by Hillary Clinton after an election?,Has this claim been approved by other political leaders?,Has this claim been approved by the government?,Was this claim first reported by a local media outlet?,Was this claim made by the American Electorate's website?
Has the 65 years retirement policy for teachers been implemented since April 2020?,Does a single election per year affect teachers in this state?,Has the 60 years retirement policy for teachers been implemented since April 2020?,Has the 60 years retirement policy for teachers been implemented since April 2020?,Does the 65 years retirement policy for teachers have any government mandate?
"Did Bhagat Singh, Rajguru and Sukhdev die in executions?",Did these leaders receive punishment for their actions?,Did the three leaders undergo execution?,Did these leaders die in executions?,Were any of these leaders alive?,Did all three leaders commit suicide before he was hanged?
Do women in Nigeria demand independence from Nigeria?,Were women in Nigeria arrested in the 2018 protest?,Did protests in Nigeria in 2018 occur?,Was there a referendum in 2018 in Nigeria?,Were women in Nigeria arrested in 2018?,Were women in Nigeria arrested in 2019?,Is Biafra an independent country?
Did there appear to be any government criticism in video by Ahsan Iqbal?,Is there any evidence that Ahsan Iqbal was involved in the criticism in video?,Is there any evidence that Ahsan Iqbal played a negative role in the criticism in video?,Do the comments in video appear to show political repercussions for Ahsan Iqbal?
Did Elizabeth Warren introduce 110 bills?,Did Elizabeth Warren introduce 100 bills?,Did Elizabeth Warren introduce 100 bills?,Did Elizabeth Warren introduce 100 bills?,Did Bernie Sanders live off of wages and four different women?,Did Bernie Sanders never hold a job until age 53?,Did Bernie Sanders ever held a job?,Did Cory Booker introduce any bills?,Did Elizabeth Warren introduce any bills?,Did Cory Booker introduce any bills?,Did Bernie Sanders ever live off of any wealth?,Did Bernie Sanders have a family?
"Is 315,000 mostly minority Texas students enrolled in failing schools?",Has the number of these students doubled since 2000?,Is the number of these students in failing schools higher than the previous year?,Are more students from minority groups enrolling in failing schools?,Is there any evidence that a more inclusive education system would be needed?
Was Jerry Brown the longest serving leader of the California Republic?,Is California considered a separate nation in China?,Was California declared a separate nation by Jerry Brown in China?,Has Jerry Brown boldly declared California is separate from China?,Is California considered a separate nation in China?,Is California considered a separate nation by China?
Was a photo captured in Ukraine in 2022?,Did they capture the photo of the photo?,Are children in the photo supposed to be saluting their troop?,Did Ukraine ever capture the photo?,Did Ukraine make this photo?,Was the photo taken in Ukraine by someone living in Ukraine?,Did the photo show the name of a Ukrainian girl who saluted a war stricken country?
Did the Census have an audit?,Did any states have an audit?,"Did Texas have a ""loss""?",Did other states lose as a result of this report?,Was this report from a state entity?,Did these states report on federal funds?,"if the report is true, did the state pay for the federal funds?"
Does Virginia pay more of public education than the other states?,Does Virginia pay more for public education than the other states?,Does Virginia pay more of public education than the other states?,Does Virginia pay less than 50% of public education?,Did Virginia pay less of public education in the last ten years than the other states?
How many jobs have been created or saved as a result of the Recovery Act?,How many jobs have been saved in light of the Recovery Act?,Has the recovery caused this much economic change?,Has any part of the recovery impacted the economy?,Did these people benefit from this particular part of the recovery?,Has this recovery generated a lot of jobs?
Did this episode predict that this submersible would go missing near the site of the Titanic in June 2023?,Did an episode of this TV show predict the Titanic would sink in June 2023?,Did the episode of this TV show predict any submarine incidents?,Was the episode of this TV show accurate in the prediction of this submersible?
Did San Antonio reuse almost 40 percent of its water?,Was Austin reused less than 5 percent?,Is it correct to say there's not enough water reusing?,Does San Antonio use more water reusing than Austin?,Can these cities reuse as much water reusing as San Antonio?,Are there steps that can be taken to improve reusing?
Does the population of Earth in September 2019 have a large chance of an Asteroid striking the Earth?,Will there be any significant damage from the Asteroid?,Does it have the potential to cause any significant harm to humans in the area?,Is the possibility of an Asteroid striking the Earth a reasonable one based on current knowledge and the past?
Did the BBC capture the harrowing iguana vs. snake chase in Planet Earth 2?,Did the iguana capture this chase through a computer graphics project?,Was this chase captured directly on camera?,Did the BBC capture this chase using computer graphics?,Did the BBC re-do this chase after the initial video?
Do the weighting of Term 1 examinations at the Central Board of Secondary Education for 2021-2022 reduce?,Are the results of these examinations lower or higher than the results of the other examinations?,Are the results from these examinations lower or higher than those from the other examinations?,Do there appear to be differences between the weighting of these examinations?
"Did Rahul Gandhi promise to pay Rs 12,000 per month for poor families?","Does the scheme pay Rs 14,000 annually for poor families?",Is the number of poor families to be covered by the scheme incorrect?,"Was the scheme originally Rs 144,000 per year?",Is the scheme effective only for poor families?
"Did Mullah try to rape a 5-year-old girl in Ambala, Haryana?",Has Mullah ever beaten a 5 -year-old girl?,Did Mullah ever rape a girl in Ambala?,Has Mullah ever been beaten or harassed?,Has Mullah ever been arrested for rape or bribery?
Did Obama and Clinton agree on a minimum wage increase?,Did Trump say that we need to end the starvation minimum wage?,Did Clinton support higher minimum wages?,Was Trump in favor of raising the minimum wage to $15?,Are there more positive points to be said about Clinton's proposal?,Are there any significant flaws in her plan?
Did Piaf help prisoners of war escape in the Second World War?,Did he fabricate phoney identity cards for the prisoners?,Did all 120 of these prisoners escape?,Did Piaf have other responsibilities in the second world war?,Did Piaf have any relations in other countries?,Did Piaf help out in other countries?
Was the girl in the photograph representative of any three different refugees?,Was it difficult for CNN to locate these people?,Was there any evidence to support the use of images of people to represent refugees?,Was the photographer responsible for stealing any pictures?,Did this photographer violate the rights of any individuals?,Was there any proof the photographer was involved with the photo selection?
Are teachers paid less in Wisconsin than in any other US state?,Are teachers paid $98k in total in Wisconsin?,Are teachers paid any more in Wisconsin than anywhere else?,Is there a comparable average salary for all U.S. workers?,Is it close to the average salary?,Did Wisconsin teachers earn more than any other US state?
Did this budget proposal come before the governor's deadline?,Has any governor been this early in their budget proposals in over two decades?,Is this budget proposal the earliest that a governor has submitted one in over two decades?,"Moreover, is this budget proposal the first that a governor has put together as a state budget proposal in over two decades?"
Will this lockdown last longer than stated?,Does this lockdown increase after this announcement?,Is this lockdown extended to May 4?,Will there be an emergency response in the event of a lockdown?,Is this lockdown still being used today?,Is this lockdown still being implemented?,Is this lockdown continued after this announcement?
Have U.S. Navy ships ever had an accident?,Have U.S. navy ships ever had an accident with nuclear power plants?,Do U.S. Navy ships ever have an accident with nuclear power plants?,Have nuclear power plants ever had an accident with a U.S. Navy ship?,Were nuclear power plants ever in an accident in the U.S. Navy?
Was this text message true?,Was Biden's lawyer's whiteness verified?,"Was Biden's lawyer, Hunter Biden, white?","Was Biden's lawyer, Hunter Biden, white?",Was the tone and content of the text message genuine?,Were any of the text messages directly referring to Biden's lawyer?
Did Pelosi earn a salary for life?,Did Pelosi get a stipend?,Did Pelosi receive free healthcare?,Did Pelosi earn the money for life?,Did Pelosi receive free medical in the stipend?,Did Pelosi receive insurance?
Did Chicago's Affordable Requirements Ordinance create less than 400 family housing units in the last 12 years?,Is there evidence that Chicago’s Affordable Requirements Ordinance had an impact on housing?,Is it true that Chicago's Affordable Requirements Ordinance has had an impact on housing?
Is there any video of a Jeep stuck in mud at Burning Man 2023?,Is the Jeep stuck in mud while driving through a muddy environment?,Did the Jeep make it out of the mud safely?,Is it a Jeep stuck in mud due to poor road conditions?
Did Banerjee introduce lockdown rules in August 2020?,Did Banerjee introduce lockdown rules in August 2021?,Did Banerjee announce lockdown rules in August 2021?,Did Banerjee announce lockdown rules in August 2021?,Has Banerjee used lockdown rules in other cases?
"Did the media ""widely overlooked"" comments made by Bill Clinton that Hillary Clinton had a terrible concussion that took six months to recover from?","Did the media ""widely overlooked"" comments made by Hillary Clinton that a concussion that took six months to recover from?",Did Bill Clinton specifically say Hillary Clinton had a terrible concussion that took six months to recover from?
Is the news clipping from CNN accurate?,Is this claim false or erroneous?,Does the media believe this to be true?,Is this incident the first coronavirus to affect this city?,Was this event a mass epidemic?,Was this incident caused by one individual?,Is this person known to have committed suicide?
"Did Moderna make 100,000 COVID-19 vaccine doses before the pandemic?",Was Moderna liable for those doses?,Are COVID-19 vaccines considered routine medication?,Was Moderna's COVID-19 vaccine produced prior to the pandemic?,Is the COVID-19 vaccine based on the same product as the current COVID-19 vaccine?
Do papaya leaves contain oleic acid?,Are papaya leaves capable of preventing cancer in humans?,Does papaya tea cure cancer in animals?,Is papaya tea effective for treating cancer?,Do papaya leaves contain nitrates in animal cells?,Can papaya tea cure cancer?
Did the Planned Parenthood Federation of America receive $1.3 billion from the federal government between 2002 and 2008?,Does Planned Parenthood Federation of America not exist anymore?,Do federal grants to Planned Parenthood Federation of America cease to exist since 2008?,Was there a review of state-level grants in 2008?
Was Mufti campaigning against the BJP or any other party while campaigning against the BJP?,Was Mufti saying that defeating the BJP would be greater than India's freedom in 1947?,Was Mufti advocating the victory of the Muslim community?,Was Mufti fighting the BJP in UP?
"Are measles vaccines being given to children as ""traditional,"" ""mRNA based,"" or ""C-19"" shots?",Have measles vaccines in the past been standardized?,Do mRNA based measles vaccines contain a virus?,Are measles vaccines being given to children on a regular basis?
Did the daughter refuse to wash her hair for 6 years?,Did the daughter leave her home after refusing to wash her hair for 6 years?,Did the daughter ever see her family again?,Did the daughter stay in the alleged family home?,Was the daughter able to return to her family home?,Did the family home have a permit for the family to leave the home?
Did Social Security veto the debt ceiling?,Did Social Security go out on Aug 3?,Are other federal checks going out on Aug 3?,Is Social Security paid in August?,Is the debt ceiling going up in the next month?,Is a new debt ceiling more likely to be in the next month?
Did the 13-year-old boy pump air up his rectum to get high?,Did the 13-year-old boy have any injuries?,Did the 13-year-old boy have a history of mental problems?,Was the 13-year-old boy's death caused by smoking or another substance?
Are there 74 million people with natural immunity?,Are 94% of Covid-related deaths not caused by Covid-19?,Is the majority of deaths caused by viruses other than Covid-19?,Is the number of deaths caused by viruses other than Covid-19 estimated?,Are deaths caused by viruses other than Covid-19 estimated?
Did Pakistan win the match against India after this video was made?,Did people in Kashmir celebrate during this video?,Did the video show Kashmirians celebrating after winning?,Is it probable that Kashmirians celebrate after a match?,Will the Kashmiri people celebrate after a match?,Did the video depict people celebrating during a match?
Was the state's roads 90% owned by local residents?,"Was the state's roads totaling 115,000 miles?",Did the state have roads which were 90% owned by the local residents?,Did the state have roads which had 90% ownership by the local residents?,Did the state have roads which had 90% ownership by the local residents?
Can NRIs who hold Indian passports vote online in the 2019 elections?,Has any information been disclosed on NRIs eligibility to vote in 2019 elections?,Has any information been published regarding NRIs eligibility to vote in 2019 elections?,Have the details about NRI eligibility for voting in 2019 elections been made public?
Did Norton grow the state bureaucracy by $43 million in three years?,Did Norton grow his bureaucracy by at least $34 million in three years?,Did Norton increase his state bureaucracy by more than $33 million in 3 years?,Was Norton responsible for increasing the state bureaucracy in three years?
Does Modi bowing with folded hands to Mukesh Ambani?,Does Modi bowing with folded hands to Mukesh Ambani’s wife?,Is Mukesh Ambani married to his wife?,Is Modi a co-conspirator in the election of 2018?
Did Kucinich vote for $15 billion more in veterans care?,Did Kucinich vote for $15 billion more in veterans care?,Was Kucinich part of a congressional committee that voted against the $15 billion increased amount of veterans care?,Did Kucinich vote against the $15 billion increased amount of veterans care?
"Did Harry say his fathers ""I've got your nose"" joke caused the ""torment"" that haunts him?",Did Harry remember this?,Did Price Harry have this trauma in mind for a while?,"Did Harry and his father's ""I've got your nose"" jokes ever reunite?"
Is there a limit on how many places to vote in national elections?,Are people required to be registered to vote in two states to vote in national elections?,Are people required to be registered to vote in two states to vote in national elections?,"If you are registered to vote in two states, are you guaranteed that you can vote in one state in a national election?"
Is this the best job growth in a decade?,Did this economy grow in the last 10 years?,Has this economy continued this trends?,Is this a new trend?,Was this economy growing in a good amount last year?,Has this recession gone away in this country?,Is this new trend in the past?,"Are these gains in unemployment, income and business tax revenue?"
Can mines generate billions of dollars in economic activity?,Is it feasible to mine for 100 years?,Do any other iron ore mines exist?,"Does the amount of iron ore mines in the world exceed the 500,000-year-life spans of the iron ore mines in Canada and the US?"
Are the wealthiest 25% paid 86% of total income taxes?,Are the wealthiest 5% paid 60% of total income taxes?,Do these figures include all income taxes?,Do wealthy people pay more in income taxes than any other income group?,Were these percentages higher or lower than the overall total?
Did PM Modi announce a 30 million donation for Lalita?,Was this money a one time donation or continued support?,Does Lalita currently have anemia?,Does Lalita have a family?,Is Lalita in poor health or not?,Is it likely that this donation will be made again?
Are seven years from now enough to expire the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty?,Does Iran have an option of making nuclear weapons if Iran continues to reject the nuclear deal?,Would the expiration of the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty affect Iran's ability to continue nuclear weapons?,Are seven years from now enough to allow Iran to continue to make nuclear weapons?
Did the Muslim woman receive Biryani for protesting against CAA?,Did the Muslim woman claim to be paid 500 rupees to protest against CAA?,Was Biryani an appropriate form of payment for protesting against CAA?,Did the Muslim woman claim to have received Biryani in order to protest against CAA?
Did the Blair Witch Project have a plot?,Did the Blair Witch Project include the Blair Witch?,Has this project ever been shown in any theaters?,Has this project been made by any particular film student?,Does this project have a plot?,Was this film based on any specific facts?,Was this film not considered a complete documentary?,Was the Blair Witch Project based on any particular images of the Blair Witch?
Did the Medford Water Commission dump plain drinking water into a stream?,Was the amount of the fine charged to the Medford Water Commission the same as the cost of the water dumping into a stream?,Did the Medford Water Commission pay out any damages to the community?,Did the Medford Water Commission get any other penalties or fines from the town or county?
Did the FBI arrest Albert Bourla?,Did Bourla file a complaint with the US Attorney's Office?,Did he file a complaint with the US Attorney's Office before he was arrested?,Did Bourla hire other employees at Pfizer?,Did Bourla hire any other employees in Pfizer besides Bourla?
Did Cruz run these two national organizations?,Is Cruz in the process of bringing these initiatives forward?,Did Cruz help form these national organizations?,Has Cruz done research to show these national organizations are doing good work?,Would Cruz help form these national organizations if the Trump administration took up immigration reform?,Did Cruz work on these initiatives?
"Did the CBO say it would lose 500,000 jobs?",Did Chris Cristian suggest that raising the minimum wage would result in job loss?,Did Chris Cristian raise minimum wage in a way that would reduce jobs?,Did Chris Cristian say he would raise minimum wage to zero percent?,Did Chris Cristian agree with CBO’s concerns?
Did the video showing incomprehensible military activity in the US originate in a video that spread on Twitter?,Did the video showing incomprehensible military activity originate in the video of the same name?,Did the video show incomprehensible military activity in the US that day?,"Did a person with the title of ""Sir Walter C. Bannon"" make this video?"
Was this Sikh Regiment refusing to fight for India?,Did the Sikh Regiment refuse to fight for India?,Was this Sikh Regiment originally from Pakistan?,Did the Sikh Regiment retaliate to the Pakistanis?,"Was this Sikh Regiment made up of more than 16,000 members?"
Do children in the next four months have high rates of the disease?,Would there be a rise in such cases?,Do CDC forecast a peak of this disease?,Is the CDC specifically reporting this outbreak?,Do other public health agencies have similar forecasts for this disease?,Is this outbreak spread from local outbreaks?
"Did Georgia's WIC supplement nutrition program serve more than 270,000 mothers, babies and children everyday?","Did Georgia's WIC supplement nutrition program serve more than 270,000 mothers, babies and children everyday?","Did Georgia serve more than 270,000 mothers, babies and children every day?","Did Georgia offer WIC supplement nutrition program coverage to all pregnant, parenting or nursing women?"
Was a vaccine trial participant killed?,Did the vaccine have complications after it was injected?,Did any other vaccine study participant die?,Could this vaccine trial have been successful without having any issues?,Was there sufficient information to indicate that all of the enrolled participants died?,Was the outcome based on a scientific evidence-based study?
Was the video posted on social media by a local Kashmiri?,Has the video been uploaded before?,Was the attack allegedly directed at local children?,Did the videos share pictures of local Kashmirians?,Will the video be released in any other locales?,Did these videos happen based on actual events?,iReport: Kashmir Kashmir: The Story of Four Non-Locals Held for Attempts on Children?
Has the national debt increased by an average of $4 billion each day since 2007?,Does the debt go to more debt every year?,Has the debt increased due to a number of policy decisions?,"Is it unusual for the national debt to increase by an average of more than $4,000 per day since 2007?",Does the debt increase because of a change in policy?
Was the address shown in Home Alone 2 the authentic address of the shooting location?,Did this home are located in another location in the US?,Whether or not the address in this film is the actual address is unknown. Is there any evidence that the McCallisters are in this location?,Has it been confirmed by the DEA that this location existed?,"Does it exist in any other locations, besides this one?"
Is the statement true about Ron Kind?,Was there more money spent by Ron Kind in 100+ days than by fighting WWII?,Is there any evidence that Ron Kind lied about his spending?,Is there any proof that Ron Kind lied about his spending?,Have any of Ron Kind's egregious financial problems helped explain his spending levels?
Does the bill include methane tax?,"Would the ""methane tax"" be a $2,600 per head of cattle or $500 per head of swine?",Does the bill include methane tax as a possibility in future bills?,"Does the bill include ""methane tax"" as a proposal in future bills?",Does the bill include methane tax as a potential solution in future bills?
Is Lake Erie associated with jobs in Ohio?,Does Lake Erie generate $750 million in state and local taxes?,Does Lake Erie contribute to employment in Ohio?,Is it true that Lake Erie contributes to jobs in Ohio?,Did Lake Erie contribute to job creation in Ohio?,Did Lake Erie contribute to jobs in Ohio?
"Have over 44,000 accounts been taken down from the Twitter database since Musk's takeover?",Has there been any public data about the number of accounts removed?,Was there a significant amount of data available about the removals?,Was it widely discussed in India?,Is there any evidence that Twitter removed child sex-sex accounts from the data?
Has the House created these jobs as of May 2018?,Do House Members approve of these jobs?,Are these jobs a percentage of the overall economy?,Are all of these jobs created through these policies?,Does the budget reflect these jobs or are the jobs created specifically for a specific purpose?,Have all of these jobs been created in a different way than what they were previously?
Is marijuana from Jeb Bush the same as today's marijuana?,Was the marijuana from the Bush family smoked by today's youth?,Were the Bush family members of today's youth smokers?,Was marijuana smoked by the Bush family more potent than in the past?,Did the Bush family participate in more marijuana smoking than the current generation?
Did the baby have a skull that had been contaminated?,Is the baby going to die?,Does the baby need to live to see his pediatrician?,Is the baby likely to survive?,Does the baby have a brain tumor?,Is the baby likely to die?,Would the baby have survived without the skull?,Is there any evidence that suggests the skull was contaminated?
Is it true that 7-year-old girl was forced into marriage by Muslims?,Is it true that she is not wearing a veil?,Did this person allow her to choose her husband?,"|||| In this example, we have a 7 year-old girl. Is she in the photograph?",|||?
Was the average viral load lowered for Covid-19 cases between two and three-quarters?,Was the virus load reduced based on the total number of cases?,Did the viral load decrease in cases with a second onset of fever?,Has this result contributed to the overall negative outcome?,Has it contributed to the overall negative outcome?
Is Florida spending more than $300 million on children repeating pre-K through 3rd grade every year?,Does Florida spend more on pre-K through 3rd grade each year?,Can Florida spend more than $300 million yearly on pre-K through 3rd grade?,Are children repeating pre-K through 3rd grade a significant problem in Florida?
Did Clinton purchase this Giorgio Armani jacket to use at her speech?,Did Clinton purchase this Giorgio Armani jacket to use at her speech?,Did Clinton purchase this Giorgio Armani jacket at an event where she was delivering a speech?,Did Clinton purchase this Giorgio Armani jacket to use at her speech?,Did Clinton purchase this Giorgio Armani jacket at a fundraiser?
Was Vivek Ramaswamy called Juneteenth ‘Useless’ two months after celebrating it?,Does Ramaswamy believe that Juneteenth should be used as an excuse to get drunk?,Did Ramaswamy's words reflect his own interpretation of Juneteenth?
Would a Republican bill ban abortion after 20 weeks?,Would a Republican bill exclude survivors of rape and incest?,"if a Republican bill does ban abortion after 20 weeks, will there be a change in the protection of woman's health and the exceptions for survivors of rape and incest?"
Was the Maricopa County audit able to determine Trump won in 2020?,Was the audit able to determine that Trump won the election?,Was the audit able to determine that Trump won in 2020?,Did the audit report a positive effect on the election?,Are there additional issues with this report?,Do these issues remain?
"Did the Roger Williams National Memorial attract 51,000 visitors in 2011, or more visitors than nearby Rhode Island in 2011?",Did non local visitors to the Roger Williams National Memorial contribute more than $3.2 million to the local economy in 2011?,Is Rhode Island home to the Roger Williams National Memorial?,Have the visitor numbers at the Roger Williams National Memorial increased in the past year?
"Has South Africa improved mathematics and science score by the most, most or all of the other participating countries?",Have all other participating countries improved in mathematics or science?,Do most of South Africa’s scores in the Trends in International Mathematics and Science Study relate to mathematics?,Has South Africa demonstrated the highest improvements in mathematics or science?
Is there a significant increase in the Hispanic population in Gwinnett and Henry counties since 2000?,Has the Hepanic population of those counties increased in any significant way?,Has the Hepanic population increased in any significant way since 2000?,Does the percentage of the vote for Republicans in these counties have increased since 2000?
Is it true that all government-run plans require employers to drop insurance coverage?,Is it true that employers pay an additional payroll tax with each employee they drop coverage?,Is it true that companies that drop coverage are required to pay the tax?,Is it true that employers must pay a payroll tax after they drop coverage?
Did PM Modi think that Tripura needs to get rid of Manik Saha?,Was the PM's comments four years ago?,Was this comment based on actual facts or statements by a private individual?,Do these comments reflect the views of the PM?,Does it seem probable that this statement has been widely reported?,Are there records of this statement from other publications?
Did the auto rescue help Ohio to create new manufacturing jobs?,Did the auto rescue help Ohio's manufacturing jobs?,Have a majority of the new jobs that have been created through the auto rescue been in Ohio?,Are there any industries in Ohio that are losing jobs compared to their pre-auto rescue numbers?,"Did the auto rescue create 45,000 new manufacturing jobs?"
Would raising voting age in the United States raise the voting age to 28?,Would raising voting age increase voter turnout?,Do Republicans support raising voting age?,Does it raise voter turnout?,Would raising voting age increase voter turnout in Canada?,Are there any plans to raise voting age in the United States?,Have Republican politicians in any US state committed to raising voting age in the United States?
Is Tennessee law requiring schools to receive half of proceeds from the sale tax increase?,Does Tennessee law require schools to receive half of proceeds from the sale tax increase?,Is there another legal requirement for schools to receive half of proceeds from the sale tax increase?,Does Tennessee law require schools to receive half of proceeds from the sale tax increase?
Is it required that a social credit score be at least 100 to buy cryptocurrency in Australia?,Can a millennial obtain a millennial credit score by obtaining a high school diploma or a good overall credit score?,Is it safe to buy cryptocurrency in Australia with a poor rating?,Can a millennial with a poor credit score buy cryptocurrency in Australia with a bad rating?
"Do you make $75,000 or less?",Will the IRS come for you?,"Will 710,000 audits be a result of the IRS?","Does the IRS have a current count of 87,000 agents?",Does this number exclude certain individuals?,Does this increase represent a change in Congressional policy?,Does this raise an increase in taxes?
Was the Medicare cut by Democrats under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act?,Does the Independent Payment Advisory Board consist of 15 unelected bureaucrats?,Did the Democratic legislation pass the Medicare cut bill?,"Is the Independent Payment Advisory Board based in Washington, D.C.?",Whether this board is made up of elected bureaucrats or not.?
Was this photograph taken in May 2021?,Did the plastic bags used in this picture contain gasoline?,Was this photograph taken in Florida?,Was this photograph taken in Alaska?,Did the gas shortage in Florida occur during May 2021?,Did this photograph occur in the Southeast portion of the United States?,Did this photograph occur in Florida?
Did Trump hire 'fake nurses' to pose with him in the hospital after the Dayton mass shooting?,Did Trump hire 'fake nurses' to pose with him in the hospital following the Dayton mass shooting?,Were 'fake nurses' hired for the posing?
Is it true that temples pay 8 rupees per unit for electricity while mosques & churches pay 2.85 rupees per unit?,Is it true that mosques and churches pay less than temples and temples?,Is it true that temples in Tamil Nadu do not have to pay any for electricity?
Does sending postcards to key states result in decertifying votes?,Do all states with post-election post-election cards have elections on which postcards cannot be mailed?,Is the postcard mailed to states where ballots cannot be mailed?,Does there need to be a pre-existing condition before sending the postcard?
Did New South Wales outline plans for establishing a cashless society in 2022?,Is there any evidence that this is happening?,Were these plans disclosed in their press release?,Was this specific plan discussed in the media release?,Was any specific timeframe outlined for the planned cashless society in New South Wales?,Was this specific plan implemented in any state?
Is there proof Rahul and Priyanka Gandhi conducted secret meetings with the Chinese ambassador during the 2017 Doklam crisis?,Is there evidence that Priyanka accompanied Rahul and Priyanka during the secret meetings with the Chinese ambassador during the 2017 Doklam crisis?
Did the policy go into effect in 2016?,Did it have any effects on the sector?,Was the policy created to transform the aviation industry?,Has the policy had any effect on the industry?,Is this policy being implemented in the airport sector?,Have changes been made in the policy?,Has the policy brought in any changes?
Did a woman lost a job because of her Republican tax plan?,Did a woman lose all of her life savings fighting her husband’s cancer?,Did the Republican tax plan help families that lost jobs because of the tax bill?,Did a woman who lost her job have a hard time getting the life savings she lost fighting her husband’s cancer?
"Did Wasim dress up as Dinesh, rape a Hindu girl for 2 years?",Did Wasim lure the girl on Facebook?,Did Wasim lure the girl on Facebook?,Was Wasim not physically present on the day of the rape?,Did Wasim follow the victim on Facebook during the sexual escapade?
Is there a specific age group under 35 that was counted in this census?,Does youth age under 35 have more population than the other age group?,Does youth age below 35 represent 75% of total population?,Is the population below 35 under average?,Is youth under 35 the fastest growing age group in the country?
Did the federal government waive duty on maize imports from April?,Was it made after a public ad was launched?,Did the government ask farmers to import maize from 1 month ago?,Did the federal government waive the tax on imports from April?,br> Did the federal government waive the tax on imports from April?
Will you be charged to have a verified account?,Will you be charged to use a verified account?,Do you think this change will significantly impact the advertising industry?,Does it affect many other companies?,Will this change impact Facebook?,Will this affect Instagram?,Will this change impact other social media?,Have any other companies made this announcement before?,Will there be any similar changes?
"Did Psaki announce 'inflation relief' for Americans making less than 50,000 dollars a year in December 2022?","Did Psaki announce that in December 2022 there would be 'inflation relief' for Americans making less than 50,000 dollars a year?",Have there been any other announcements about this policy?
Was this money hidden?,Is this money 'hidden'?,Did this money go missing at all?,Did Robredo commit any fraud?,Does this money appear to have been smuggled into the country by someone else?,Is this money illegal to find?,Will this money get found?
Did Trump announce his candidacy on June 16?,Has anyone else in American history gotten to a major victory on May 26?,Is this the only time Trump has gotten a majority in the legislature?,Have any current presidents been able to win in this country?,Is this a new record for a majority in the legislature?
Does the President of the United States spend an amount between $25 million and $50 million?,Did Barack Obama's recent campaign fundraising trip cost a similar amount to the one in 2009?,Did Barack Obama spend an amount between $25 million and $50 million on his New York campaign trip?,Did Barack Obama make millions of dollars on his New York trip?
Did the woman arrested at the Clapham vigil for Sarah Everard attend the 2017 Parsons Green Tube attack?,Did the woman injured during the attack at the 2017 Parsons Green Tube attack have contact with Yvette Cooper?,Did the woman arrested for the Clapham vigil have contact with Yvette Cooper?
Did Kibaki spend the money on debt repayment?,Did revenue collections amount to KSh 81 million?,Did Kenya have all the debt collection revenue in the country?,Would debt payments be a more frequent priority for KSh 81 million in revenue collection after Kibaki's departure?,Is the debt collections portion of the total revenue collection by Kibaki disproportionately heavy?
Did the Trump administration appoint Walter Palmer to the wildlife conservation council?,Did Palmer shoot Cecil the Lion?,Does Palmer support conservation efforts?,Did Palmer attend the inauguration of the wildlife conservation council?,Did Palmer sign a contract to co-operate with the conservation council?,Is Palmer an endangered species person?
Was Begich in favor of Barack Obama's economic policies most of the time?,Did Begich support Obama’s economic policies more than 95% of the time?,Does this claim align with the rest of the evidence?,Is there any data that supports this assertion?,Can Beggiz be considered a partisan in any manner?
Do pH for the coronavirus vary from 5.5 to 8.5?,How do we need to consume more alkaline food to defeat the coronavirus?,Can we do this through drinks or foods that are pH above 8.5?,Is it necessary for people to consume alkaline food in order to defeat the coronavirus?
Did Gov. Evers pass this bill?,Did the bills have any provisions against COVID?,Did Gov. Evers not already have authority over this bill?,Did the bills require the governor to act on this bill?,Did any bills require the governor to act on this bill?,Were the bills similar?
Are the women more likely to be raped in Mexico than anywhere else?,Have women experienced any violence during their travels to Mexico?,Are all migrant women victims of sexual violence?,Do many women have any significant problems during their trip to Mexico?,Are migrant women more likely to be raped in Mexico than anywhere else?
Did it occur during a trip with Barack Obama?,When did Obama meet with Obama?,Did Obama travel with him for work?,Do Obama and Obama attend any of their official meetings?,Did Obama travel with Obama for work?,Was Obama in charge of the White House while Obama was Vice President?,Were Obama and Trump both VPs during Obama's term?,Was Obama a good friend of Obama?
Does anyone in higher education agree with the governor?,Would this initiative serve as a catalyst to the job creation mentioned in Rick Perry's proposal?,Did the governor propose this initiative?,"Did Rick Perry's proposal involve serving up $10,000 college degrees?",Was there evidence that this program would actually be possible?,"Do some critics disagree with the governor's idea of offering $10,000 college degrees?"
Was NASA supposed to carry the one solar eclipse from 2017?,Was NASA's error the error of error?,Was NASA notified of this mistake?,Was the August 2017 solar eclipse a total solar eclipse?,Was there a solar eclipse after the 2017 solar eclipse?,Was this solar eclipse the only solar eclipse to have occurred during 2017?
Is the percentage of African health workers less than average?,Are there more African health workers than Africans?,Is there a positive correlation between African health workers and African health workers?,Are there specific numbers of health workers in sub-Saharan Africa?,Does the World Health Organization have more health workers than Africans?
Did California propose this tobacco tax?,Are there other tax reduction proposals?,Does California currently pay a tobacco tax?,Are there other tax breaks under this plan?,Does California pay these tobacco tax cuts?,Does California currently have a tax break on tobacco?,Does California currently have a tobacco tax?,Does California currently pay a tobacco tax?
Did the Myanmar military owned TV channel have additional laws on oxen nationalization?,Was the new law for oxen nationalization passed on time?,Did the new law require all households to have two oxen?,Did the new law for oxen nationalization come into effect?
Are Coronavirus stimulus payments taxable?,Are Coronavirus stimulus payments taxable in 2019?,Are Coronavirus stimulus payments taxable in 2019?,Are Coronavirus stimulus payments taxable in 2020?,Are Coronavirus stimulus payments taxable in 2019?,Are Coronavirus stimulus payments taxable in 2020?,Are Coronavirus stimulus payments taxable in 2019?
Do India's drugs cost as much as US drugs?,Is the price of drugs in the US equivalent to those in India?,Is the number of drug sales in the US equal to what the medical prices are in India?,Are the medical prices in the US equivalent to those in India?,Has the treatment in the US caused the medical prices in India to increase?
Does the risk of death for children vaccinated against COVID-19 by the ONS have an increase of 52 times?,Did the ONS assess the increased risk by children vaccinated against COVID-19?,Has the ONS evaluated the overall risk of death of children vaccinated against COVID-19?
Did Texas' illegal immigrant population increase by 60% between 2000 and 2010 compared to California?,Was there an increase in the illegal immigrant population in Florida compared to California?,Did Texas' illegal immigrant population increase by 60% between 2000 and 2010?,Did the illegal immigrant population increase by 60% between 2000 and 2010?
Was the Queensland Government responsible for these floods?,Did the Queensland government use cloudseeding?,Did Queensland government's use of cloudseeding result in floods?,Do these floods affect every area?,Is there evidence Queensland government did this type of cloud seeding?,Is there evidence Queensland government caused these floods?
Has 60 percent of Iraqi people indicated they're okay with shooting an American soldier?,Does 65% of Iraqi people agree with this statement?,Has this statement been reported by anyone in the country who disagrees with this statement?,Are the numbers available for this statement?,Are Iraqi people who support this statement primarily from areas in Iraq?,Are these Iraqi people considered to be the majority of the Iraqi population?
Are the people in the image traveling in a train?,Do the people in the photo travel in a train?,Are there more than one woman traveling in the train?,Is there a map to get to your destination on the train?,Does the train driver have a map of your destination?,Is there anything else you can tell me about the train drivers?
"Is the number of COVID-19 cases, deaths, hospitalizations, job losses & vaccine lag in NYC due to different lockdown orders?",Is Florida's overall COVID-19 vaccination rate higher than NY's?,"Do there have more cases/deaths, hospitalizations, job losses and vaccination lags compared to New York?"
Did oil prices in the US increase one year ago?,Did oil prices last a year?,Does crude oil currently cost more to produce than in the past?,Did the government increase crude oil prices?,Did any of these changes result in an increase in oil prices?,Do more companies produce gas and electricity than they did one year ago?
Did this economist say one dollar of unemployment benefits boost the economy?,Did this economist say $1 of unemployment benefits boost the economy?,Is it accurate to say $1 of unemployment benefits boost the economy?,Was $1 of unemployment benefits increased by the economy in 2011?,Is the amount of unemployment benefit in 2011 equal to $1 of unemployment benefit in 2011?,Did this economist say $1 of unemployment benefits boost the economy?
"Did Donald Trump say that people were ""obsessed"" with getting America back to work?",Are people unable to get back to work because of lack of funds?,Is the #1 issue that Americans are concerned about being able to get back to work?,Were any of Trump's comments about getting back to work proven correct?
Were corporate earnings unused before Trump took office?,Is unused corporate earnings significantly higher now?,Are unused corporate earnings significantly lower today?,Will unused corporate earnings be reduced by Trump?,Is offshored corporate earnings going to reach an estimated $10 trillion?,Does Trump plan to cut corporate taxes in the near term?
Does the HOPE scholarship help turn the University System into one of the best in the Southeast?,Does any University System institution in the Southeast rank in the top 20 of public universities in the country?,Has any University System institution ranked in the top 20 of public universities in the country?,Does this scholarship directly benefit HOPE alumni?
How much money was spent on this purchase after paying income tax and fuel tax?,Did this purchase contribute to this amount in revenue?,"Did this purchase have a fuel tax of $26,16 + $6.70 in GST?",Did this purchase result in an income tax of $71.86?,Did the income tax increase a large amount from what had been a small cash income?
Are Oregon schools doing this for 24 percent of their food budgets?,Are school districts purchasing local foods in general?,Is this amount the highest percentage in the country?,Is this percentage tied to state laws?,Is this percentage the highest in the country?,Is this percentage the highest percentage in Oregon?
Did the Bakersfield researchers discover the coronavirus mortality rate is 0.13%?,Did the Bakersfield researchers publish a paper that was banned from YouTube?,Has there been a ban on the Bakersfield researchers from YouTube after this investigation was published?,Has the Bakersfield researchers released any new information in response to this ban?
Is the new Cadbury logo identical to the previous one?,Did Cadbury spend more on the new logo than the previous one?,Is Cadbury's new logo recognizable?,Are there any differences between the former and new logos?,Did Cadbury spend more money on the new logo than the previous one?
Did most corporations not pay income tax in Virginia?,Did 2/3 of Virginia state corporations not pay income tax?,Was there a disparity in income taxes for corporations between states?,Is this a fact about Virginia?,Did state corporations pay income tax in any state?,Does this imply a general increase in income tax rates in Virginia?
Has the U.S. Government paid over $4.5 billion dollars for injury claims to individuals damaged by vaccines?,Was the U.S. Government responsible for any of this?,Do these individuals have any legal rights?,Does the U.S. Government have any legal rights against vaccine manufacturers for damage caused by vaccines?
Does Rana Ayyub deny hate for all Muslims just for two beheadings?,Has any muslims been killed for this action?,Did Ayyub deny hate for all Muslims just for two beheadings?,Has any Muslim been killed for this action?
"Did a ""demonic"" drag queen read a ""sexually explicit"" book to children in a Long Beach public library named after Michelle Obama?",Did any other alleged drag queens read this book to children in that Long Beach public library?,Did these other alleged drag queens ever read this book to children?
Has Trump signed more laws cutting through federal red tape than any president in American history?,Is Trump signing more bills cutting through federal red tape than any other president in American history?,Is it possible for Trump to cut through federal red tape without a major cut on its original purpose?,Is it possible for Trump to cut through federal red tape without a major cut on its original purpose?
Did the concert bombing take place within California?,Did the bombing take place in a city or state other than California?,Was there a significant impact of the explosion?,Was the massacre of people attributed to ISIS?,Was the cause of this attack known?,Did the bombing occur in an state where ISIS is still active?
Are UP government providing jobs to cannabis smokers?,Can UP government provides jobs with over 80 lakhs salary to cannabis smokers?,Can UP government provide jobs with over 80 lakhs salary to cannabis smokers?,Can UP government provide jobs with more than 80 lakhs salary to cannabis smokers?
Did white people and black people lose their lives by law enforcement in 2014?,Did a minority of people die by law enforcement in 2014?,Did any people lose their lives by law enforcement in 2014?,Do any individuals die by law enforcement in 2014?,Did any white person lose their life by law enforcement in 2014?,Did any black person or white person lose their life by law enforcement in 2014?
Did WV's tourism industry grow 30% above the national rate in 2017?,Does WV's tourism industry grew at a rate 30% above the national rate in 2017?,Did WV tourism revenue reverse a four year decline in travel-generated spending?,Did this increase reverse a four year decline in travel-generated spending?
Have all donations been for the Pakistan flood?,Are all donations towards aid from Pakistan?,Are any people listed as donors with a name that refers to these people?,Is the amount of money in question given to Pakistan in total?,Has Pakistan been hit by floods before or since this story came out?
Did man in jungle for 41 years after Vietnam War know little about women?,Was man in jungle for 41 years after Vietnam War known little about women?,Did man in jungle for 41 years after Vietnam War know little about women?,Were women in jungle for 41 years after Vietnam War?,Did woman in jungle for 41 years after Vietnam War know little about women?
Do Ryanair's Chief Executives ever deny man-made climate change?,Has Michael O'Leary changed his view?,Has Michael O'Leary ever denied man-made climate change?,Have any Ryanair's CEOs deny man-made climate change?,"ref name=""Sunday Mail"">?"
Did the new parliament building require government funds of Rs. 1 per month?,Did the new parliament building require government funds of Rs. 1 per month?,Is it clear that this is not true?,Did TATA Group construct this new Parliament building in 17 months?,Is it clear from this report that TATA Group has not given information about the origin of this new Parliament building?
Does the bill require minimum investment for jobs creation?,Will the bill require funding for jobs to be created?,Will the bill provide funding for jobs for at least a year?,Will the bill result in at least two jobs being created?,Will the bills revenue be generated through the use of state-owned mines?
Was more dead in this month than in a century?,Did U.S. police kill more people in this month than in a century?,Did U.S. police kill more people in the month of October?,Did U.S. police kill more people in the month of March in 2010 than in the month of September?
Did Hillary Clinton have anyone missing in 1985?,Do the Clinton's have a property that housed someone who went missing in 1985?,Is the Clintons home any of these properties?,Did Hillary Clinton personally have access to the remains of someone who went missing in 1985?,Did the Clinton's have access to the remains of someone who went missing in 1985?
Did Johnson see a decrease in crime?,Was the crime rate lower than 25 years before his time as mayor?,Did Johnson's policies help make Houston safer?,Is it true that he saw a reduction in crime after he took office?,Is this true?,. Please give me the total number of years he served in office.?
Is the NRA one of the biggest lobbyists here in the capital?,Did the NRA spend a million dollars in Wisconsin on the 2018 elections?,Was the money spent specifically against the governor of Wisconsin?,Does the NRA spend money during elections?,Is the NRA primarily funded by individuals?
Does this four-page paper exist to substantiate that the COVID-19 vaccine causes 90% of deaths?,Did this paper receive official approval from a peer review board?,Was this paper peer reviewed?,Are these COVID-19 vaccine-related deaths confirmed?,Do any other co-existent studies show that COVID-19 vaccines cause 90% of death and non-infectious diseases?
Did the State take a $700 million surplus into the upcoming biennium?,Is the surplus actually a $750 million deficit?,Is the deficit in the next biennium significantly higher than the previous one?,Was the state more responsible with these state budgets?,Is the state responsible for these state budgets?
Did State employees pension plan have enough money to go forward for approximately the next 16 years?,Did state employees pension plan have enough money to go forward for approximately the next 16 years?,Did state employees pension plan have enough money to go forward for approximately the next 16 years?,Do all states require private pension plans?,Would any state do this as a matter of policy?
Are African Americans arrested at nearly three and one half times the rate of whites for marijuana possession?,Are African Americans arrested at nearly three times the rate of whites for marijuana possession?,Is marijuana arrest in the U.S. worse for African Americans than for whites?,Are people arrested for marijuana possession in all of the states in the United States?
Did the U.N. ban its staff from using the word war to refer to Russia's invasion of Ukraine in early March 2022?,Was this ban effective in early March 2022?,Was this ban effective in mid-2022?,Was this ban effective in early March 2022?,Did this ban apply to all officials in the U.N.?
"Was it true that the woman fined €1,350 for sharing an anti-migrant meme?",Did the woman share the meme on Facebook?,Did the woman do anything illegal or unethical with the meme?,Was the woman in violation of a traffic offense?,Was the woman in violation of a local law?
Are there more fully vaccinated deaths from C19 than those not vaccinated?,Have fewer deaths occurred from C19 that are not fully vaccinated?,Is it true that a 40% of deaths from C19 are reported to have been fully vaccinated?,Is it true that a 51.2% jump in deaths is the result of a change in the definition of fully vaccinated?
Was Giuliani speaking about the September 11 attacks as a terrorist attack during the eight years before Obama's election?,Was Giuliani giving a speech in public in the eight years before the 2008 election?,Was Giuliani an outgoing mayor of New York City during this time?,Was Giuliani a leader during this time?
Did Clarke reduce the number of Milwaukee County sheriff's deputies?,Did Clarke reduce the number of Milwaukee County sheriff's deputies?,Did Clarke reduce the number of Milwaukee County sheriff's deputies from 700 and something to 300 and something?,Did Clarke reduce the number of Milwaukee County sheriff's deputies from 700 and something to 300 and something?
"Would Gates give money - $500K, car, phone, visa, or other gifts if you email him?","Did Gates provide money - $500K, car, phone, visa or other gifts if you email him?","br> Did Gates offer money - $500K, car, phone, visa or other gifts if you email him?",br> Was the statement from Gates accurate?,br>?
Are the tariffs on American food products from China causing a revenue boost to US farmers?,Are US farmers receiving about $16 billion out of the tariffs the Chinese imposed?,Will Congress act to reduce tariffs on American goods?,Does the United States need more tariffs on Chinese goods?,Are there other options?
"Has trade agreements with China prevented the loss of more than 160,000 jobs in Michigan?",Does Michigan have permanent normal trade relations with China?,Has Michigan lost jobs due to trade agreements with China?,Is the loss of Michigan jobs due to trade agreements?,Is the losses of Michigan jobs due to trade agreements?,Is Michigan losing jobs due to trade agreements?
Did every country take a full week to count votes?,Did this statement take place before any election?,Did it take at least a week to count the votes?,Is this information correct?,Do Republicans take much longer to count votes?,Does this information show that any city takes longer to count votes than any other city in the country?
Was there a photograph of two large whales swimming underneath a bridge?,Are there records of whales swimming under bridges?,Can you tell which is the photograph?,Was the whale pictured close to the Samuel De Champlain Bridge?,Are there any whale sightings in the area?,Are whales endangered near bridges?
Is this statement true?,Did ten rural hospitals shut their doors because state leaders chose not to expand Medicaid?,Does this statement indicate that states should do more to protect their Medicaid patients?,Did this statement come from an individual?,Is this statement accurate?,Is this statement based on information from a third party?
Is it true that there are no choice options for seniors over 65 under medicare?,Does not putting seniors in medicare require forfeiting Social Security to get out of medicare?,Does putting seniors in medicare require forfeiting Social Security?,Is it true that there are no choice options for seniors over 65 under medicare?
Does Janta curfew reduce coronavirus cases?,Does Janta curfew improve the prevention of the spread of coronavirus?,Are there risks associated with a lower incidence of coronavirus?,Are there specific ways janta curfew can prevent coronavirus?
Was Donald Trump able to negotiate with Congress prior to taking office in 2014?,Has Trump criticised Obama on a number of issues?,Is Trump unable to negotiate with Congress?,Are Trump and Obama a team in dealing with a fractious Congress?,Is Trump acting unilaterally on policy in this regard?,Is Trump unable to negotiate with Congress on policy?
Is it true the government has issued guidelines saying ration cards would be cancelled if not used for more than three months?,Does any information about this government policy regarding ration cards on the web have been published?,Are the guidelines for canceling ration cards by the government general or specific?,Can you view the information about the guidelines on this website?
Did Trump have a larger majority than Biden?,Did Dominion servers in Germany be seized prior to elections?,Did Trump have fewer votes in the general election than Biden?,Was Trump's voter turnout higher after the servers were seized in Germany?,Did Dominion servers in Germany be seized prior to election?
Did this image contain a genuine Trump press release?,Did Trump cancel the Jan 6 press conference?,Are the facts about this photo accurate?,Do these facts reflect the truth about Trump’s press conference?,Did Trump cancel or cancel the Jan 6 press conference?,Have these details been fully explained in the press release?
Did Eric Trump tweet about the airstrike that killed Iran Gen. Qassem Soleimani?,Was there any evidence that Trump knew about the airstrike that killed Iran Gen. Qassem Soleimani?,Was it confirmed that Trump was aware about the airstrike that killed Iran Gen. Qassem Soleimani before the military operation?
Is Gingrich currently supporting the Individual mandate in health care?,Has Gingrich been advocating for this mandate since 1993?,Has Gingrich consistently advocated for this mandate since 1993?,Was Gingrich actively advocating for this mandate until this year?,Is Gingrich currently working on a bill that would create a mandate for coverage for this mandate?,Is this bill expected to pass anytime soon?
Would the Senate resolution restore $140 in monthly general assistance payments?,Will the Senate resolution prevent people from committing crime?,Does the Senate resolution say that the funds will be spent to improve the welfare system?,Did this resolution include measures that would have limited effect?,Will the Senate resolution include measures that would prevent people from committing crime?
Have there been any districts that go for 150 to 200 miles?,Have any districts gone for 100 to 200 miles?,Has any district remained together for over 100 miles?,Do all districts go for 150 to 200 miles?,Do all districts share all the same characteristics?,Are any districts related to each other?,Is any of the district overlap the same?,Do any districts that go for 150 to 200 miles have an interconnected area?
Are there more than 2 times as many intensive stations as the population average?,Are the ratio of intensive stations versus the population average too high?,Do more than two times as many intensive stations operate?,Does this reflect the average number of days an individual spends in intensive facilities?,Are there many hospital bed-spaces within the intensive setting?,Do the intensive stations provide a wide selection of amenities for people who are not eligible to walk to them?
Does Hurricane Dorian approach Florida in summer 2019?,Will storms be formed in Florida during the summer 2019?,Does hurricane damage occur near Florida?,Would Hurricane Dorian result in the loss of Florida?,Would hurricane damage occur between Florida and storms?,Would the impact of hurricanes on Florida be less than a year?
Did the rifle used by Omar Mateen shoot off 700 rounds in a minute?,Did the rifle used by Mateen carry a maximum capacity of 700 rounds in a minute?,Did Omar Mateen have any ammunition on him when he carried the gun?,Do the statistics listed above reflect the actual volume of ammunition used?
"Does the number of illegal aliens in our country exceed 11,000,000?",Is there a reasonable estimate of illegal aliens in our country?,Are there more illegal aliens than we are told?,Is the cost of illegal immigration higher than the cost of Friday's trafficking?,Has a corresponding increase in illegal aliens in our country increased since the initial estimates?
Will ballots received up until Nov. 14 count in the 2022 midterm elections?,Is there any evidence that the deadline is arbitrary in any way?,Will all votes count?,Will any votes that are returned by the November 14 deadline?,Are there any examples of ballot fraud where a count is not accurate?
Does the average household wage increase of $250 after immigration reform?,Can the average salary increase for households after immigration reform?,Does this statement take into account the fact that the average household wage increase in the country is only about $200 per year?,Is the median wage increase for the average household not reflected in the average wage increase for all households?
Did the photograph of an unlucky tourist depict 9/11?,Did the photo depict the event of 9/11?,Did this photograph document the attack of 9/11?,Was the photographer related to the event of 9/11?,Does this photograph portray the terrorist act of 9/11?,Is there any evidence of terrorists planning to attack 9/11?
Does calling 55 in a silent 999 call also allow police to track you?,Does calling 55 in a silent 999 call only require a voice prompt?,Is calling 55 in a silent 999 call advisable for travelling internationally?,Is the answer to this question unclear?,Is the answer to this question unclear?
"Are the compounds of the lemon tree 10,000 times more effective than the chemotherapy drug doxorubicin?","Are the compounds of lemons 1,000 times more effective than doxorubicin in killing cancer cells?",Have any other chemicals been proven to kill cancer cells?,Have any other compounds been found to kill cancer cells?,Is there any other evidence that eating lemons kills cancer cells?
Was the president attempting to restrict the sales of a particular type of gun?,Is this ban currently in effect?,Is this ban a direct response to an individual shooting?,Is this a direct result of a specific executive action?,Were these weapons sold at the time of this statement?
Does this committee have double the number of public hearings in any previous year?,Has the committee held 10 public hearings this year?,Did this committee hold any public hearings in the last year?,Did this committee hold public hearings this year?,"Previously, have these public hearings in this same year been any more than doubled?"
Did two Pittsburgh Steelers players knelt during the national anthem?,Did they kneel on the field of play?,Did the two players receive dismissal from the team for their actions?,Did the Steelers terminate them?,Are other players from the Steelers team involved in this event?
Is this claim true?,"Are there currently a total of 16,500 IRS agents assigned to this health care bill?",Will IRS agents work on the Obama health care law?,Will any IRS agents prosecute Obama's health care bills?,Are IRS agents required to prosecute Obama's health care bills?,Are there any other IRS agents involved in this health care bill?
"Did Scott take $200,000 in campaign contributions from a company that profited off pollution?",Did Scott receive contributions from a company that profited off pollution?,Was Scott's campaign donation from a company that profited off pollution?,Did Scott's campaign contribution from a company that profited off pollution?
Did the article that implied Johnson had COVID-19 in April 2020 contain false information?,Has the article that claimed Johnson had COVID-19 in April 2020 been proven true?,Is the article that posed the question a non-serious article?,Is the article that posed the question a serious article?
Was this photo shared on Facebook?,Was this photo taken in Berlin at this time?,Was the perpetrator of this attack from this location?,Did this event occur on the same night as the large Corona attacks?,Has this photo of this incident ever been re-created?,Does this photograph imply that this crime was carried out during the weekend?
Did the child have a vaccine card when they were arrested?,Was the 9 year old arrested because she didn't have a vaccine card in the museum?,Did the child's parents know about the incident in New York City?,Does the museum have a vaccine card for school children?,Did New York City Police arrest the 9 year old because of her inability to have a vaccine card in the museum?,Did the museum receive a report on this incident?
Did the Vikings open a stadium to shelter the homeless on a frigid night in December 2016?,Were the homeless at the stadium on a frigid night in December 2016?,Did the Vikings announce a temporary shelter at the stadium during this season?,Did the Minnesota Vikings open a stadium to shelter the homeless during this season?
Is Kreuper currently a member of the Catholic school council?,Did Kreuper allegedly steal money from the school?,Did Kreuper serve as the principal for 28 years?,Was Kreuper convicted of fraud?,"Did Kreuper regain $835,000 from the school by the end of June 2021?"
Did 6 masks worn to school carry 11 dangerous pathogens?,Did this number vary with other masks worn to school?,Did this laboratory confirm that this was true?,Was the University of Florida responsible for this study?,Did the University of Florida take the students' masks to another lab?,Did these results support the hypothesis of these masks being unsafe?
Is the family of five swept away in the floods in Pakistan?,Did the floods cause the family to lose all of their possessions?,Does the footage of the family in the floods contain any video of the family?,Did the family that was swept away by the flooding know that there was someone stranded inside?
Did Bill Gates speak about death panels?,Was Bill Gates aware of what was required from a death panel system?,Did Bill Gates say that G-20 leaders would be required from death panels soon?,Was Bill Gates's comment specific to death panels?,Did Bill Gates say that death panels would be needed for a future death panel system?
Are there any diseases that vaccines produce artificial immunity for?,Does vaccine provide a vaccine protection for many months?,Can a booster vaccine cure the disease?,Are booster vaccines safe?,Does vaccine result in protection for more than 3 months?,Are booster vaccines safe?,Is there evidence to suggest booster vaccines are more effective than conventional vaccines?
Did the Jan 6 defendants receive any arrests?,Is the Jan 6 defendant's arrest pending?,Did the Jan 6 defendant not receive a arrest?,Are any of the Jan 6 defendants in prison?,Has the Jan 6 defendant been prosecuted for a crime?,Has the Jan 6 defendant been convicted of a crime?
Does a person have a protein level that is too low to support bread?,Does the density of the soil affect this amount of protein?,Is the density of the soil above the protein level needed to support the flour?,Does the landowner think this amounts to the wrong nutrients?,Did the farmer think this is a bad dietary choice?
Is there a photograph of someone wearing a bunny mask?,Did the FBI discover a photo of a teen girl wearing a bunny mask?,Was the FBI responsible for the crime?,Did the FBI find this photograph in 1982?,Has there been any other such photos?,Was the FBI responsible for the crime in 1982?
Did Trump create more new jobs in two years than any president did in their entire term?,Does the employment figure actually include the jobs that were created in both of the 2 years?,Is the employment figure based on a broader economic performance?,Is the GDP number for the 2 years reported in the previous sentence?
"Did the ICU capacity increase 50,000 times during the Covid period?",What number of ICU beds increased from 190 to 223 beds?,Did the ICU capacity increase by only 10% during the Covid period?,"Did the ICU capacity increase by 50,000 times during the Covid period?",Did the ICU capacity increase by 502% during the Covid period?
Did all of these states outlaw collective bargaining for teachers?,Are all of these states ranked lower than 44th in the nation in test scores?,Were any of these states in Wisconsin?,Are Wisconsin and the five states that outlaw collective bargaining for teachers above average on test scores?,Question for Wisconsin: Is Wisconsin the only state that outlaws collective bargaining for teachers?
Does Biden wave to nobody after his speech in Lithuania?,Did Biden wave to no one after his speech in Lithuania?,Is Biden attempting to wave to no one after his speech in Lithuania?,. Can Biden wave to no one outside of his speech?,. Is Biden making a public announcement at this time?
Can the video on WhatsApp be used to hack a smartphone?,Do the hacking capabilities of WhatsApp affect those in China?,Does WhatsApp support mobile device hacking?,Does the video on WhatsApp contain any security features?,Have attempts to access the WhatsApp video been successful?,Is there a way for WhatsApp to hack a mobile phone?
Did the woman who gave birth to 69 children give birth to an entire family?,Did the woman give birth to all of the children?,Did she give birth to any of the children that she gave birth to?,Did she give birth to any children?,Was the woman's daughter born as the result of a live birth?,Is there information on her family of any kind?
Did Obama claim that 37-million of the people he met were living in poverty?,Did Obama indicate that 7-million of the population was under the age of 25?,Are 13 million of the estimated 7-million people in poverty children?,Did the majority of the population in poverty under the age of 25 live in poverty?
Was the pipe from a place that had votes was not near the location where votes were being tabulated. Is the location where votes were being tabulated run by Democrats?,Did the pipe burst before or after the vote was counted?,Are Georgia elections held by Democrats?,Was the pipe used before or after the election?
Does the Census predict 6% undercount if citizenship questions are asked?,Does the Census predicted 6% undercount if citizenship questions are asked?,Has the US census predicting 6% undercount if citizenship questions are asked?,Was the population undercount predicted by the census?,Is there any evidence that shows a 6 percent undercount?
Did Wisconsin spend more on prisons in 2011 compared to university systems in 2011 under Walker?,Did Wisconsin spend more on prisons in 2011 compared to university systems in 2011 under Walker?,Did Walker spend more in 2011 on prisons compared to university systems in 2011?,Did Walker spend a significant amount of money on prisons in 2011?
Is the amount of water that flows in Lake Erie every day over 137 billion gallons?,Is there an excess of 50 billion gallons daily?,Is there an excess of the net water flow every day?,Is there a net surplus of water per day?,Is there a net surplus of about 50 billion gallons per day per year?
Did the U.S. Cyber Command detect any evidence of election fraud in the 2022 midterm elections?,Has the U.S. Cyber Command investigated these allegations?,Does the U.S. Cyber Command expect the election to be free and fair?,Did the U.S. Cyber Command detect any evidence of election fraud in the 2022 midterm elections?
Did the Journal report on the possibility of monkeypox on door handles and toilet seats?,Does the Journal report about monkeypox on door handles and toilet seats indicate this possibility?,Is the Journal's claim about monkeypox based on actual research?,Has this claim been supported?,Is the Journal's claim supported by research?
Is it true that remittances contributed upwards of maybe KSh290 billion last year?,Is it true that remittances contributed upwards of maybe KSh290 billion last year?,Would it be a significant increase in the remittance funds if they were able to pay for these remittances?
Did anyone at the time write to or communicate with Paulson or Bernanke about the economic imbalance?,Has there been any response to the economist's comments?,"Is the economic imbalance presently being considered a crisis, and if so, why is this considered a crisis in the first place?",Was the economic deficit before 2008 seen as a crisis?
Is it true that 7 million people illegally crossed the border and are given free cellphones and airline tickets?,Is it true that there are free cellphones and airlines tickets in Biden's America?,Were there free cellphones and airlines in Biden's America?,Did Biden's administration offer free cellphones and air tickets to illegal travelers?
Was this statement ever published?,Did McCain cite in his statement that Afghanistan succeed?,Was this statement written in 2013?,Is McCain's statement as quoted in this article still in circulation today?,Does McCain's statement support Afghan success?,Was this statement originally quoted in this article?,Did McCain actually cite Afghanistan in this article?
Has Sukmawati Sukarnoputri converted followers from Islam to Hinduism?,Have these followers converted from Islam to Hinduism?,Is the Hinduism group majority in Indonesia?,Has this group converted anyone?,Do many of Sukmawati's followers convert from Islam to Hinduism?
Was there no case report that there was a child with COVID-19 in three countries?,Are there any medical records that indicate that the same boy died from COVID-19 in three countries?,Have we seen a medical record showing that a boy died from COVID-19 in three countries?
"Did Moore receive 953 votes while Jones received 5,327?","Did Jones receive votes from voters registered for over 8,000 days?",Did Moore receive votes from voters not listed in their electoral roll?,Did Moore receive votes from voters not listed in their electoral roll?,"Did Moore receive votes for more than 8,000 days?"
Does soaking for seven days in water prevent cancer?,Does soaking for seven days prevent cancer?,Does the time in water increase the risk of cancer?,Do you think soaking for seven days in water can prevent cancer?,Does soaking in water increase the risk of cancer?,Do you think soaking in water increases the risk of cancer?
Does this include the 20 states?,Does this include a single state?,Are women able to have multiple children in the US?,Are these statistics accurate?,Were these figures in 2014?,Are there any other yearly trends?,Will there be any larger increases or decreases in marriage rates for women in the 20 states?
Has Norway placed an Impfverbot on Pfizer and Biontech drugs?,Has 23 people died from this banned drug?,Was this banned drug used in a controlled orphan drug production program?,Did this banned drug contain dangerous toxins?,Did this ban affect any other countries in regards to their vaccines?
Did the Chinese workers who were mistreated in Rwanda suffer deportation?,Does the Rwandan government have records of retaliatory actions against China?,Does the Chinese president deport some Chinese nationals?,Were the Chinese nationals deported for mistreating workers?,Did the Rwandan president deport China nationals to the US?
"Does the article mention that 25,000 Americans become pregnant through rape/incest each year?",Is this number accurate?,Is this source a reputable source?,Is this a source that has been reviewed by the Journal of Sexual Medicine?,Does this quote use statistics as a basis in supporting the article?
Does this berry cure cancer?,Has this berry been found in a specific area in Australia?,Was this berry cultivated by scientists?,Has this berry had any side effects?,Has this berry been proven to cure cancer?,Has this berry been used to cure cancer?,Have any of these findings been confirmed?
Was this person arrested in March of this year?,Does this person have any record of fighting in this area of Myanmar?,Has this person participated in a protest in the past?,Has this person died?,Did this person have a gun?,Did this person go to jail during this period?,Was this person arrested in March of this year?,Did this person die during this period?
Is Trump on record condemning Nick Fuentes four times?,Has Trump made comments on this issue as often as Fuentes?,Does Trump condemn Fuentes on four occasions?,Are Trump's remarks on this issue consistent?,Is Fuentes condemning Trump on four occasions?,Does Trump support Trump's condemnation on 4 occasions?
Did McCain vote against any bill to expand aid for veterans?,Did McCain vote against any bill for aid for veterans?,Did McCain support any bill that expanded education aid for veterans?,Was McCain a senator who opposed any bill in the Senate?,Are there any other Republicans and/or Democrats who oppose education aid for veterans?
Have all Magna Carta articles been repealed?,Has Magna Carta 61 been repealed?,Have all Magna Carta articles been repealed?,Has Magna Carta 61 been repealed or replaced by a new Magna Carta?,Is Magna Carta 61 the only Magna Carta?,Is Article 61 of Magna Carta the only Magna Carta that includes specific provisions on tyranny?
Did all Indian armed services chiefs write a statement to Amit Shah on what they cannot do?,Did these statements rebut the claims made by the chiefs of the three Indian armed services against farmers' large gathering?,resolving to ensure a peaceful gathering is not harmed by terrorist attacks?
Are there any illegal migrants that enter Australia without a visa?,"Will the immigrants receive a job, $70,000 and welfare?",Are illegal immigrants obligated to provide security of a spouse?,Will it cost illegal immigrants a lot to get to work in Australia?,Will illegal immigrants receive welfare and/or job training in Australia?
"Was the budget deficit when Kasich became governor of Ohio, $8 billion?",Is the budget surplus under Kasich's control now?,Has Kasich's budget surplus been positive in the past?,Is Kasich's spending on education or military related now?,Has Kasich's budget surplus been negative in the past?
Did Couric ban Hillary Clinton from her set after she used a racist word to describe President Obama?,Did Couric ban Hillary Clinton from her set after her use of a racist word?,Did Couric ban Hillary Clinton from her set after the president called out her?,Did Couric ban Hillary Clinton from her set in August 2017?
Did a substantial amount of fish from the United States' menu end up in Asian processing before being re-imported into the US?,Are many Asian processing plants more than US-based processing plants?,Are all fish in the US produced here?,Did the U.S. receive most of its foreign fishing population from Asian processing plants?
Do squats help the Russian government?,Are the squats part of a citizen health plan?,Are the squats in conjunction with a citizen health plan?,Are the train tickets given for the squats in Russian government's citizen health plan?
Did the government gain or lose 2 million jobs?,Did people lose jobs while the government grew?,Was the government able to hire enough people to have significant positive effect on employment?,Was the government successful in achieving any employment gains at all?,Did any jobs go unemployed due to the government growing?,Did any jobs go unfilled during the Bush administration?
Did Cyrus change her name from Mila Kunis to Miley Cyrus?,Did Cyrus give herself a British passport?,Did Cyrus make it clear she would be leaving the US?,Did Cyrus make a monetary change in her home country?,Do Cyrus plan to enter the UK as an American citizen?
Was this ship the first to return to London since 1787?,Did this vessel make a trip from the US?,Did this ship return with goods to the UK?,Did this ship ever go back to the US?,Did this ship make any other trips from the US before returning to London?,Did this ship sail in an event in the US?
Did a million Democrats abandon Howard Dean’s party because of Donald Trump?,Is the number of Dems leaving Howard Dean’s party or joining his party an absolute number?,Was the number of Dems leaving Howard Dean’s party after Donald Trump?,Does the number of Dems abandoning Howard Dean’s party reflect the number of Democrats that joined John Kerry’s party?
Does soursop with baking soda cure stage four cancer?,Can soursop with baking soda cure stage four cancer?,Is baking soda contained in soursop with baking soda?,Has any research proven soursop with baking soda can cure stage 4 cancer?,Is baking soda in soursop with baking soda safe to take?
Was Ethan Hauschultz punished for not memorizing thirteen Bible verses at the time of his death?,Was Ethan Hauschultz punished for not memorizing thirteen Bible verses after his death?,Is there any evidence that Hauschultz was punished for not memorizing thirteen Bible verses after his death?
Did Tuberville ever quit on his players?,Did Tuberville quit on all his players?,Did Tuberville quit on all his players?,Was Tuberville's last name in the article?,Did Tuberville quit on all his players while at a university?,Was Tuberville the first college football coach to quit on players?
Is Krispy Kreme offering one free doughnut for anyone who has COVID-19 vaccination?,Did Krispy Kreme give out a COVID-19 vaccination waiver?,Are Krispy Kreme giving out a COVID-19 vaccine waiver only until after the COVID-19 vaccine has been administered?
Did fireworks injury rates drop 57 percent from 2000 to 2000?,Did injuries by sparklers have a bigger decrease in 2000 compared to 14 years before?,Does this decrease extend to fireworks-related injuries?,Did this change reduce fireworks injuries for younger children?,Did this change significantly change fireworks injuries for kids?
Was there an overall increase in the number of Muslim migrants arrested at the US-Mexico border?,"Is it true that 6,000 Muslim migrants with forged papers were captured trying to cross the U.S.-Mexico border?",Does the report specifically discuss these 6K Muslims who are captured trying to cross the US-Mexico border?
Has Braun supported a lawsuit and two other initiatives aimed at ending coverage for pre-existing conditions?,Is it true Braun has supported two proposals and a lawsuit aimed at ending coverage for pre-existing conditions?,Was Braun supportive of any lawsuit or other proposal aimed at ending coverage for pre - existing conditions?
"Did the YSRCP government remove Vijayawada, Tirupati and Visakhapatnam from the Swachh Survekshan list in 2020?","Did Vijayawada, Tirupati and Visakhapatnam drop from 5, 6, and 7 ranks in 2018?"
Did the Austin city vote to cut police department resources?,Did the Austin city vote to cut police department resources?,Was this day the night the city voted to cut police department resources?,Did this day happen after the city voted to cut police department resources?,12Does this day have anything to do with the 2015 City of Austin vote to cut $150 million from police department resources?
Did the offer limit the free recharge for 3 months?,"Does this offer apply to Jio, Airtel, or Vi Sims?",Is this free recharge limited to 2021 only?,Is this free recharge on a limited basis?,Is there a catch to this offer?,Does this offer apply to all Indian users?
Do the younger age groups receiving the same health insurance options that members of Congress enjoy?,Is there evidence that younger age groups acquiring these same health insurance options will have the same coverage as members of Congress?,Would younger age groups pursuing these same health insurance options receive the same benefits in the future?,Does Ryan plan include any requirement for younger age groups to have insurance?
Did Patrick vote against funding to test rape kits?,Did Patrick vote against funding to test rape kits?,Has Patrick been on record saying that rapists have free speech?,Has Patrick been on record saying that rapists have free speech?,Does Patrick support testing rape kits?
Does this event in Turkey occur during the same time period as the earthquake?,Did this event occur in Turkey in the year 2023?,Is there any evidence that nuclear plant exploded in Turkey?,Has this nuclear plant been under construction for very long?,Is this explosion consistent with a earthquake in Turkey?
Does the Imam appear to be praising the dog?,Is the dog in this photo a domestic animal?,Has the Imam been documented greeting the dog?,Was the dog a domestic animal?,Is the Imam expressing gratitude for the dog?,Is it accurate to assume the dog praising the imam is a domestic animal?
Did Franklin Roosevelt allocate more than 12 percent of GDP to federal spending?,Did Barack Obama allocate less than 22.8 percent of GDP to federal spending?,Do these data differ?,Did any other eras allocate less than 12 percent of GDP to federal spending?,Did any other leaders allocate less than 12 percent of GDP to federal spending?
Is the omicron variant a symptom listed in COVID-19 vaccine?,Is heart complications one of the symptoms listed for the omicron variant?,Does COVID-19 vaccine increase the rate of heart complications?,Are heart complications listed in COVID-19 vaccines?,Is it possible to find proof that heart complications are listed in COVID-19 vaccines?
Did the EPA ask importers to import maize?,Did EPA ask importers to import maize from as early as 1 month ago?,Did the EPA ask importers to import maize from as early as 1 month ago?,Is the EPA's duty waiver plan effective until 2018?
Are all of the graduating class of 2012 on marijuana or illegal drugs?,Do 55% of graduates of 2012 have smoked marijuana or drug?,Are there other facts that are relevant to the information stated here?,Does the number of graduates on illegal drugs rise compared to cigarette smokers?,Is there an estimated 50% of all graduates of 2012 who have smoked marijuana or done illegal drugs?
"Does Loudoun County School Board spend $300,000 to bring CRT to school system?","Does Loudoun County School Board spend about $300,000 to bring CRT to school system?",Will CRT in some form or fashion be a big hit in Loudoun County?,Would CRT in some form or fashion be a big hit in Loudoun County?
Did the call originate in San Antonio?,Did the migrant trapped in a truck call 911 from San Antonio?,Did the migrant call 911 from San Antonio?,Do the migrant call migrant calls from San Antonio?,Would the migrant call migrant calls from San Antonio have a different number?
Are the commencement speeches from President Trump's commencement speech the same or similar as that of the character from the film 'Legally Blonde'?,Did president Trump or his predecessor give similar commencements?,Did Donald Trump's commencement speech reflect the movie 'Legally Blonde'?
Did the Russian flag fly at the government building in Kharkiv after the incident?,Was the Russian flag raised at the government building in Kharkiv after the incident?,Was the Russian flag raised at the government building in Kharkiv after the incident?,Are there other events that took place in the year after Kharkiv fell?
Has a total of 35 lobbyists been hired to influence legislation passing through SB 271?,Is a total of 35 lobbyists the number for the large phone companies and their trade association to influence legislation passing through SB 271?,Is there a total of 35 lobbyists with the large phone companies and their trade association to influence legislation passing through SB 271?
Did the minions originate from this horrific experiment?,Did the minions are inspired by the Nazis experiment?,Did the Nazis make the minions on the basis of this experiment?,Did the Nazis experiment on children in a similar way to the Minions?,Can you check for proof of this?,Does this experiment have an image of the Minions or a similar one to the ones that exist in the movie?
Did this city typically have more homicides than some?,Did any of these people have convictions for this crime?,Did anyone in this city die from this crime?,Did any of these people receive the death penalty or prison time for this crime?,. Did any of these people face any charges?,. Did any of these people have a record of this crime?
"Since 1988, has Congress raised its own salary 15 times?",Has Congress raised the minimum wage three times?,"Has Congress raised its own salary 15 times, or was it higher than that amount?",Has Congress raised the minimum wage 15 times?,Has Congress raised the minimum wage 13 times since 1988?,Does Congress raise the minimum wage any more than the minimum wage in its entirety?
Did Mussolini initiate this campaign?,"Did this campaign result in over 35,000 firings?",Did Mussolini fire civil servants after they were fired?,Was this a policy of Mussolini?,Did this movement begin before Mussolini?,"Does Mussolini's claim to have fired 30,000 civil servants in the 1930s contradict other statements about this?"
Would this be a conservative cut or a liberal one?,Is this a liberal or a conservative cut?,Is this a conservative cut?,Has this reduction already been done prior to this event?,Is there a change in the current budget since the event?,Are the Republicans lowering education in the current budget?
Is there a photograph of Jim Thorpe wearing mismatched shoes?,Does the photograph have proof of the mismatched shoes?,Did Thorpe wear the same pair of shoes at the 1912 Olympics?,Was Thorpe a part of the 1912 Olympics?,Did Thorpe wear the same pair of shoes to the 1912 Olympics?
Is this 17% increase at the same rate as the same year of 2021?,Was this increase at the same rate as the year before in that fiscal year?,Has the number of encounters with illegal immigrants decreased?,Did the number of encounters last year stay the same?,Is this increase in number larger than the previous year?
Did the ratings drop or did they rise in Virginia?,Did the ratings decrease or did they rise in Virginia?,Is it surprising that the ratings have dropped because of the fraud?,Is the reported ratings low in Virginia?,Is the fraud so blatant and extreme that it's not funny anymore?
Is the budget still below the level of state spending when you took office?,Does he believe the budget is enough to fund all of his current state spending obligations?,Are all of his budgets above or below the level of state spending when he took office?,Is there a provision in the budget that allows the state to pay for more than the state has already spent?
Is it true that 60% of people who are admitted with COVID-19 in England have had two doses of a coronavirus vaccine?,Is it true that 60% of people who are admitted with COVID-19 in England have had two doses of a coronavirus vaccine?,Are there any estimates as to how many doses of a coronavirus vaccine were given in each hospital?
Did an individual decide to get vaccinated after infecting three friends?,Is the article about the individual fake?,Are all the friends that the individual infected who have not been vaccinated?,Is there evidence to suggest a person decided to get vaccinated after infecting them?
Do vaccinated people have increased risk of getting Covid-19?,Are vaccines against Covid a less effective way to prevent COV?,Are vaccinated people more likely to get Covid-19 than unvaccinated people?,Do vaccines against COVID increase risk of getting COVID-19?
Did the leaves cure COVID-19 or caused its spread?,Would the neem mixture cure COVID-19?,Would the twig leaves cure COVID-19?,Do the leaves of Giloy cure COVID-19?,Could the Giloy twig leaves cure COVID-19?
Did this program go over?,Will this offer be extended to registered customers?,Will this offer only be valid for existing customers of DSWD?,Is this program only for those who are registered with DSWD?,Would this help increase the number of customers who can utilize this assistance?,Will this offer only go to registered customers of DSWD?
Is the crime rate in Tallahassee lowering?,Has Tallahassee experienced a five-year low in crime?,Does the crime rate in Tallahassee currently exceed the legal limit?,Is the crime rate in Tallahassee still lower than it is in 2013?,Is the crime rate still higher than it was in 2013?
Did DeSantis oppose his China tariffs and the $28 billion farm relief?,Has DeSantis ever opposed farm relief?,Did DeSantis ever argue that the $28 billion farm relief was paid for by China?,Do I think it was the best idea to support deSantis’s China tariffs?
Does Bush offer a solution to Medicare cuts?,Does he support continuing Medicare cuts for those who have already paid in?,"Does Obama support cuts to Medicare for the elderly, disabled and veterans?",Are all Medicare cuts to people who have paid in?,Have CDC regulations for medicare cutbacks been reviewed?,Are any of these measures covered by a Medicare plan?
Did Emmanuel Macron warn Europe about an influx of refugees?,Did Emmanuel Macron say Europe should try to reduce the number of refugees?,Did Macron warn Europe about the potential increase of refugees?,Did the BBC report that Macron warned Europe of an influx of refugees?,Was the report inaccurate?
Does Wal-Mart's wealth equal those of the bottom 42%?,Does Wal-Mart's wealth equal the wealth of the bottom 42% of Americans?,Did the Walton family recoup any of the wealth it has lost?,Did these losses stem from their ownership of a certain business or location?
Did Abhisar Sharma tweet that he would sell omlettes if Yogi Adityanath won the elections?,Did Sharma offer to distribute Omlettes if Adityanath won?,Was Sharma the only journalist to tweet this ay?,Did Sharma offer Omlettes to anyone that Adityanath won the elections?
Is this video showing a surrender of Ukraine or a peace announcement?,Is this video showing the United States of America announcing their support for Ukraine or an agreement to create one?,Is this video using both Russian and Ukrainian videos?,Is this video used in either of these two cases?,Is this video stating that Russia supports Ukraine or that Russia is supporting the Ukraine?
Is the percentage of Americans who want to see immigration reform passed this year over 70 percent?,Is the percentage of Americans who want to see immigration reform passed more than 70 percent?,Is the percentage of Americans who want to see immigration reform passed more than 70 percent?,Is the percentage of Americans who want to see immigration reform pass higher than 70 percent?
Did Argos stop their contract with Dyson?,Will Argos be selling the Dyson Supersonic hair dryer?,Is Argos selling Dyson Supersonic for more than £1.78?,Will Argos sell Dyson Supersonic for more than £1.78?,Is Argos selling Dyson Supersonic for more than £1.78?
"Has Defence Minister Rajnath given a nod to abolish 9,300 Military Engineer Services posts?",Have both his sons been given ticket for assembly polls?,Is the proposed decease of personnel at this service being opposed by the Defence Minister?,Is this position likely to be filled by private contractors?
Was the 2011-13 state budget the first to eliminate the structural deficit in decades?,Did the 2011-13 state budget eliminate the structural deficit for the first time in decades?,Did the 2011-13 state budget eliminate the structural deficit for the first time in decades?,Has reducing the structural deficit helped alleviate the overall deficit in Wisconsin?
Will any Florida resident who requested an absentee ballot be automatically given one?,Has there been any claim of voter fraud?,Have absentee ballots been automatically issued for a while?,Did voters have to request an absentee ballot after the 2010 Election?,Do any of these assertions match the actual facts?
Was Biden the same defendant in the gun case as Lil Wayne and Kodak Black?,Did Biden plead guilty to either of these gun charges?,Did Biden plead guilty to any other gun charge?,Are there other rappers that were charged with gun related crimes?,Has Biden pleaded guilty to a gun related crime?
"Did Foxconn make $53,000 per person per year?","Is there more than 4,000 jobs at Foxconn in Wisconsin?",Did Foxconn pay a higher amount of money for job workers?,Are there more Foxconn jobs in other places besides Wisconsin?,"Do any jobs at Foxconn bring in money more than $53,000 per year?"
Is Congress remunerated a pay retiree after serving a term?,Would Congress benefit from a pay retiree after serving a term?,Are all members of Congress compensated full pay retirement upon retirement from Congress?,Does Congress have any pension program?,Has congress provided benefits for retirees since the 19th century?
"Did Missouri have 113,000 regulations when Hogg was in office?",Did Missouri have 7.5 million words?,Did Missouri have 40 dictionaries of regulations in general?,Do other states have a similar amount of regulations in general?,Was Missouri the first state in the country to require a standardized form of identification?
Did Galvez Jr. mention a specific dose of the Sinovac COVID-19 vaccine?,Is this vaccine only suitable for the poor?,Does the vaccine contain a 50.4% efficacy rate?,"Considering this vaccine is only sufficient for the poor, is this vaccine effective?",Have the health workers been vaccinated?
Did Tulsi Gabbard Venmo $50.10 to Nancy Pelosi in exchange for a tax audit?,Did Tulsi Gabbard pay out her tax returns to the IRS?,Did Tulsi Gabbard pay out her tax returns to the IRS?,Has Nancy Pelosi since been audited by the IRS?
Did Harvey drop more water on Houston than Niagara Falls does every year?,Did Harvey rekindle the flood of Houston?,Did Harvey drop the most amount of water on Houston in five days?,Was Harvey more devastating than Niagara Falls?,Did Harvey cause a recurrence of floods in NYC?
Did the IMF estimate the real GDP for India in 2020?,Were other economists aware of the tweet?,Was there any evidence that the IMF estimate was true?,Did this tweet originate from outside of the country?,Will the real GDP for 2020 be 8 percent of GDP?,Would it be 8% of the GDP of India?
Did any arrests under the SAFE Act occur in North Carolina?,Are any upstate counties missing the arrests under this law?,Was any law or policy in question in the North Carolina area?,Do a number of counties in North Carolina already have a SAFE Act in place?,Are any upstate counties missing any arrests under this law?
Did Georgia only have 5.6 million registered voters in the 2020 election?,Did Georgia send out 7 million absentee ballots despite having 5.6 million registered voters?,Did Georgia not have a total of 7 million absentee ballots sent out during the 2020 election?,Was Georgia absentee voting a large percentage of the total number of votes cast in 2020?
Did the 12-year-old girl die due to Gardasil HPV vaccine?,Did the 12-year-old girl have any adverse side effects?,Was the Gardasil HPV vaccine approved for use in children?,Did the Gardasil HPV vaccine in Wisconsin cause the 12-year-old girl to die?
Did the State Auditor call this a misuse of state resources?,Did McCollum not use any state planes for his home visit in the past?,Has the State Auditor ever investigated McCollum's misuse of state resources?,Is this a true story?,Is McCollum running the government while running against these bills?
Is the document accurate?,Was the rental payment reported in a newspaper?,"Did Biden pay Biden more than $50,000?","Is there evidence Biden made Biden pay more than $50,000 per month?","Do any people have knowledge of Biden paying Biden more than $50,000 per month?","Is there any evidence that Biden paid Biden more than $50,000 per month?"
Did voters send ballots with up to two stamps?,Does the current system require ballots with stamps?,Are absentee ballots accepted without stamps?,Can voters use an existing postal system to mail ballots?,Have the new procedures been used in other states?,Will absentee ballots be accepted without a postal system?
Has the Modi government cleared the loan of oil bonds previously taken by the Congress government?,Did the MoM clarify the loan before clearing it?,Is this loan related to the economic reforms the MDO have been working on?,Is this loan from the Congress government?,Has any other government given a loan from the Congress government to the MoM?
Was this question in the referendum?,Will this be a quorum election?,Will this be a quorum vote?,Is this a referendum question?,Is this a general election question?,Will this vote be a quorum election?,Is this a special election?
Did the Philippines photo show a military evacuation from Kabul?,Was it a mislabeled photo?,Are there any other photos that show a military evacuation from Kabul?,Are there any photos that show military evacuation from Kabul?,Would there be other examples of these mislabeled photos?
Did the Taliban shoot down 2 US Aircraft?,Did the Taliban kill 34 soldiers in Afghanistan?,Was there any evidence of these attacks by US forces?,Was the Taliban responsible for the deaths?,Did the Taliban launch these attacks?,Would this have any effect on the US force?,/recognized that US forces are not responsible for the deaths of Afghan citizens?,/are they responsible for all of these crimes?
Is there any giveaway in regards to this offer?,Is there any compensation for liking and commenting on a Facebook post?,Was there any offer that included a free meal for two?,Was there any specific conditions regarding the free meal?,Is this offer free for certain users?,Is this offer specific to one type of user?
"Did the U.S. government lose track of some 1,475 immigrant children who were placed in sponsor homes?",Are there any other types of cases in which the U.S. government lost track of any immigrant children who were placed in sponsor homes?,Was there an overall volume of children placed in sponsor homes?,Is it possible that the U.S. government lost track of this total number of immigrant children?
Does the Pfizer vaccine guarantee that one vaccinia won't be transmitted during the second year?,Is there research that can validate this claim about COVID-19 vaccination?,Was the vaccine vaccinia a virus?,Is there evidence to prove the vaccine is not a virus?
Did Raffensperger use Zuckerberg money to tip the scales in Georgia?,Did Raffensperger spend Zuckerberg money?,Is it true that Raffensperger used Zuckerberg money to tip the scales in Georgia?,Is there any evidence that Raffensperger used money from Zuckerberg in Georgia?
Did Murphy vote to create this committee?,Was Murphy part of any other Democratic committees?,Did Murphy vote against creating a committee for Benghazi?,Did Murphy vote to create the Benghazi committee?,Did Murphy reaffirm his support of creating the committee?,Did Murphy vote against the Benghazi committee?
Did Obama have 60 senators for every decision?,Was there a single 60 vote requirement for every decision?,Do you think it is the first time every decision needed 60 senators?,Did Obama require a large number of votes for every decision?,Did Obama require a large number of votes for every decision?
Did this increase in exports equate to more than $2 billion?,Could this increase in exports overtake the increases in agricultural and food exports in other countries?,Did this increase come from the inclusion of the United States as a participant in the MCA?,Could the MCA increase agriculture exports?
Did these protests take place in the year 2021?,Did these protests include the killing of a person?,Are there any other women in the photo?,Have any of these women been charged with indicting the crime?,Did this event take place before these protests took place?,Did the woman in the photo receive treatment?
Did about 30 percent of terrorists at Guantanamo Bay go back into battle?,Were about a dozen of terrorists that went back into battle killed?,Was the death rate for terrorists from Guantanamo a high rate?,Did a dozen or so terrorists from Guantanamo kill Americans?
Did Sen. Moi state that his demands to fund OA never cease?,Is the quote / graphic from the fake report true?,Was the quote or graphic produced by a real person?,Do the allegations of OA non-stop funding 'never cease'?,Has the government of Kenya canceled OA funding?
Did this picture show stacked mailboxes?,Were any stacked mailboxes in Wisconsin?,Did the photo include Wisconsin voting registries?,Did this photo include any stacked mailboxes?,Did this photograph show Wisconsin voting registries?,Were stacked mailboxes in Wisconsin illegally?
"Would 48 hour waiting periods limit the use of the ""sad gun""?",Would 48 hour waiting periods make communities safer?,Would 48 hour waiting periods prevent gun trafficking?,"Would 48 hour waiting periods be effective in combating ""sad gun""?","Does the use of the ""sad gun"" increase crime?"
Did Trump lose as many jobs in his first five months in office as Biden gained?,Did Biden not gain as many jobs as Trump did during his first five months in office?,Are there any data suggesting Trump lost more jobs than Biden?,Would Trump be more successful in his first five months in office if Biden did not gain as many jobs?
Did the FAA start training pilots for sudden death during a flight in 2022?,Are any current pilots aware of the new policy?,Has any member of the FAA taken this action?,Was the first pilot training for sudden death during a flight completed in 2022?,Is there any evidence that the FAA is preparing pilots for sudden death during a flight?
Are there exactly 49 different federal job training programs that report to 8 agencies?,Is the number of the federal programs listed on the form comparable to the number of federal programs in other states?,Was any federal job training program found to have only provided some stipends?,Are all job training programs administered independently or through a number of different agencies?
Did lawmakers pass a provision for the House to remain in recess until July 21?,Did the House members want to keep the House in recess until July 21?,Are these House Democrats the only party on the left in the House to consider a House tax reform bill?,Are the Democrats currently responsible for the House budget?
Did fewer than 20% of those deported in Illinois have been charged with any serious crime?,Are there more deportees in Illinois than those in any other state?,Are more people in Illinois deported than those in any other state?,Having this information would not appear to indicate that this percentage would be lower.?
Did Trump carry a concealed oxygen cylinder?,Did Trump use this cylinder during a trip to Walter Reed Medical Center?,Did Trump travel with this cylinder or concentrator?,Did Trump wear the oxygen cylinder in person?,Did Trump appear at Walter Reed Medical Center with this oxygen cylinder?,Did Trump travel to Walter Reed Medical Center on the same aircraft as he did on his flight?
Have there been any random controlled placebo controlled trials that demonstrate no benefit to hydroxychloroquine?,"Have any randomized controlled, placebo controlled trials established a benefit of hydroxychloroquine?",Are any randomized controlled placebo controlled trials available?,"Do any randomized controlled, placebo controlled trials provide evidence for hydroxychloroquine?"
Did CDC suppress data which proves MMR produces a 340% increased risk of autism in African-American boys?,Is there evidence demonstrating MMR vaccine creates a 340% increased risk of autism in African-American boys?,Do African-American boys have a much lower risk of autism than their white counterparts?
Did Clarkson give away money to first 300 people who commented on her video with “Christmas”?,Did Clarkson want the commenters to leave a positive review on her site?,Did Clarkson want to promote her album with the comment that it was a Christmas album?,"Did Clarkson want people to comment on her Youtube videos with ""Christmas""?"
Was this a video of a city speed gate?,Is this a video of a video on an indian film?,Was this a video of a tv show?,Did this video imply that this city speed gate was fake?,Are these images fake?,Did this video claim to show a 15-minute city speed gate in Vancouver?
"Did clerks in Milwaukee and Dane counties collude to add nearly 250,000 individuals to the ‘Indefinitely Confined’ voter list?","Did clerks in Milwaukee and Dane counties collude to add nearly 250,000 individuals to the ‘Indefinitely Confined’ voter list?","Did Clerks in Milwaukee and Dane counties colluded to add nearly 250,000 individuals to the ‘Indefinitely Confined’ voter list?"
Is the election reporting website currently in test mode?,"Was New Mexico's election reporting website in test mode on November 22, 2007?",Did New Mexico officials say that election reporting website was in test mode on this day?,Is it reasonable to assume that New Mexico officials are now analyzing the election reporting website?
Was 6% of COVID-19 deaths caused by COVID-19 alone?,Was 0.056% of the U.S. population dead from COVID-19?,Did 6% of COVID-19 deaths occur alone?,Were 0.056% of the U.S. population killed from COVID-19?
Does this video show new plastic bank notes for Pakistan in 2022?,Did the Pakistani government and the Pakistani bank note design process involve collaborating?,Is this product not produced by a Chinese or Russian company?,Will this product be manufactured using China's plastic bank notes?,Would this product replace the Pakistani plastic bank notes?
Does the COVID-19 vaccine have any side effects?,Does this photo show clinical trial volunteers who have developed Bells palsy after receiving doses of the COVID-19 vaccine?,Will this vaccine be approved for humans?,Does this vaccine have no side effects?,Have there been any deaths associated with this vaccine?
Did Putin request that Russians stay at home?,Did Putin expect a mass mass evacuation?,Did Putin demand a mass evacuation of all Russians?,Did Putin order a mass evacuation of Russians?,Are there any restrictions on Russians staying home?,Did Putin's orders for Russians staying at home affect any citizens?
Is the image of the demonstration depicting alleged political interference by Facebook?,Was the demonstration in Myanmar organised to protest against alleged political interference by Facebook?,Was the protest organized to protest against alleged political interference by Facebook?,Is the image of the demonstration depicting alleged political interference by Facebook?,Was the protest in Myanmar a protest against political interference by Facebook?
Did this software record calls from users?,Did government monitoring the system indicate government surveillance?,Is this device a typical way to record calls?,Were these devices designed for this purpose?,Are these devices considered to be similar to WhatsApp?,Has the device been widely deployed?,Is this device designed to have data collection?
Is it true that you can buy four light bulbs for $1.99 at Walmart?,Is it true that you can buy a single compact fluorescent lamp (CFL) for $10 a pop?,Did Walmart offer a special CFL promotion before?,Were other light bulbs made before Walmart introduced these deals?
Did Global Times claim 30 Chinese soldiers were killed in the clash?,Was any other Chinese soldiers killed?,Did any other Chinese troops die in the clash?,Did any other Chinese troops die in the clash?,Are there any other claims regarding the number of Chinese troops killed in the escalating conflict?,Was Global Times the source of this information?
Is a sex offender that appears on the New York State Sex Offender Registry eligible to drive for Uber or Lyft?,Is this new law being considered a threat to public safety?,Is the new law a threat to public safety?,Is this change a requirement of Uber and Lyft to provide rides to New York?
Did this figure differ by state?,Is this figure accurate?,"Is there more than 100,000 people at this Department?",Is this a 1 employee per 30 farmers?,"110,00 - 10,00 = 1,900 people?","10,00 - 0,0 = 1,900 workers?"
Has Sanders supported same-sex marriage ever been popular?,Has Sanders ever been against same-sex marriage?,Has Sanders always opposed same-sex marriage?,Is Sanders the only politician who supported same-sex marriage in the 2000's?,Did Sanders support same sex marriage back then?
Did the Philippines get any remedy from the 2016 arbitral award?,Did the Philippines receive any remedies under this arbitral award?,Did the Philippines receive any remedies under this arbitral award?,Does this arbitral award prohibit any China activities in the South China Sea?,Does this award require China to cease their activities in the South China Sea?
Did the Thai student leader meet the US Ambassador in September 2020?,Did he attend the meeting?,Is this the first time a student leader has met an American Ambassador?,Was the meeting of the Thai student leader public?,Were any of the photos taken of the meeting?,Was any of the photos of this meeting published?
Did the Milkshakes contain cement during protests in Portland in late June 2019?,Did the protesters throw these products in a violent way?,Did any of these products contain cement?,Did anyone sustain injuries in the incident?,Did any of these products contain cement?,Do any of these products contain cement?,Would an individual's dildos be able to sustain injuries in a violent way?
Did schools send home letters threatening children under Al Smith's election law?,Did schools send home letters threatening children under Smith's election law?,Did school boards send home letters threatening children under Smith's election law?,Is it true that Smith supported the ban of reading a Bible in schools under his presidency?
Does all of the money allocated to the American Rescue Plan go to a single American?,Is the plan a guarantee to get one million dollars?,Has the plan failed to guarantee any million dollars?,Is it unreasonable to claim every American could get $1 million with the American rescue plan?,Can every American get more?
Does New York have 99% of its historic freshwater wetlands?,Does New York lose 99 percent of freshwater wetlands?,Has New York lost 99 percent of its historic freshwater wetlands?,Are there any freshwater wetlands in New York?,Have New York State lost any of its freshwater wetlands?
Did only 54% of Latinos in Texas vote in 2008?,Did 35% of Latinos vote in 2008?,Did Latinos register to vote in 2008?,Do all Latinos that were registered in 2008 vote in 2008?,Are Latinos voting in 2008 by some number?,Does that percentage indicate the partisan makeup of a specific vote?
Did this statistic come from a survey or online data?,Does this percentage seem to be statistically high?,Is this statistic based on some numerical data?,Is this statistic based on an overall population survey?,Does this percentage equal more than 25%?,Is this percentage based on a random sampling?
Is mental health exemptions within Tier 4 and 5?,Do Tier 5 and 4 allow you to leave your house?,Does Tier 5 and 4 allow you to get out and see friends?,Can tier 5 and 4 be combined to allow you to leave your house?,Is Tier 5 available to tier 5 and 4?
Are the wages of workers in the United States less than they were 20 years ago?,Is the rate of working in the United States higher than it was 20 years ago?,"Is there an inverse relationship between working, earning and wages?",Have some workers in the United States been working less and earning more than they were 20 years ago?
Did this election have a large turnout?,Did the majority of Americans choose not to vote?,Did a majority of young people and a majority of low income workers choose not to vote?,Did the majority of low income workers choose not to vote?,Did the majority of young people and low income workers choose not to vote?
Does Pele mourn at the grave of Diego Maradona?,Did Maradona pass away on the day Pele mourned him?,Has Pele ever grieved Maradona?,Did Pele celebrate Maradona's death?,Has the grave of Diego Maradona been visited by Pele?
Did Ronzoni Pastina pasta ever come to market?,Does Ronzoni Pastina pasta currently have any ingredient that is currently listed in the ingredients list?,Did Ronzoni Pastina pasta get the brand name Ronzoni Pastina?,Did Ronzoni Pastina pasta sell well?
Did President Obama steal over $500 billion out of Medicare to switch it over to Obamacare?,Did Obama take any money out of Medicare when he changed it over to Obamacare?,Was Obama responsible for any of the payments?,Is this claim true?,Is there any evidence that this claim is true?,Is Obama's claim true?
Did Hillary Clinton vote to spend money to fight the Amendment 6 redistricting lawsuit?,Did Hillary Clinton vote to fight the Amendment 6 redistricting lawsuit?,Is this a lawsuit that was pending for more than a year before Hillary Clinton voted to take action?,Did Hillary Clinton vote against the amendment 6 redistricting lawsuit?
Did a doctor die suddenly in the same week?,Did the hospital mandate a fourth COVID vaccine for employees?,Did the hospital mandate a fourth COVID vaccine for employees?,Did the hospital mandate a fourth COVID vaccine for employees?,Did three doctors die in the same week?,Was the hospital forced to make an additional COVID vaccine?
Did Michele Bachmann say this statement on her first morning on record?,"Have 5,000 years have passed since the construction of this wall?","Have 5,000 years passed since any illegal Mexicans were there?",Is this wall made of wood?,Did the Chinese build this wall 5000 years ago?,Have Mexicans been found outside China?
"Did the IRS order 24,000 emails to be erased before congress could review them?",Did the IRS order the emails to be erased before congress could review them?,Did the IRS require the Congress to review the emails before they could be examined?,Would Congress have had to do so to read the emails?,"Is there any other evidence to support the claim that 24,000 emails to be erased before congress could review them?"
Was KLEE-TV a broadcast broadcast in England three years after the station shut down?,Has KLEE-TV broadcast from England since it closed?,Does KLEE-TV have a live newscast in England?,Does KLEE-TV have a live newscast on Friday nights?
Is the land enclosing three graves of Nehru's family members in India still owned by Ambani?,Will Ambani's plan to sell the land improve the economy of India?,Does Ambani plan to sell the land to benefit the economy?,Has Ambani announced his plans to sell the land to the country?
Did Obama use the money to send Hamas refugees?,Did Obama provide any other funding for emigration?,Was Obama's strategy against Hamas illegal?,Did Obama include this information in his budget proposal?,Did Obama receive more federal funds for emigration from Iraq?,Is it true that Hamas refugee populations in Iraq are a large portion of U.S. population?
Do the Confederate battle flags at the South Carolina statehouse have to fly at a height of 30 feet?,Can half of the flag be taken down without a supermajority vote?,Must any changes to the flag at the South Carolina statehouse be passed by the general assembly?
Did Proud Boys disparage Trump prior to his return as president?,Did the group Proud Boys disparage Trump prior to his return as president?,Did the Proud Boys disparage Trump prior to his return as president?,Have the Proud Boys disparaged Trump in the past?,Did the Proud Boys disparage Trump in the past?
Do a lot of vaccines need to be stored and shipped at -80 degrees?,Does it even matter if the vaccine needs to be stored at -80 degrees?,Can a vaccine injected into a body do much more than infect cells?,Does a vaccine need to be stored at -80 degrees?,Does an organism need to be stored at -80 degrees?
"Is North Carolina one of ""very few states"" that gives the governor sole discretion to pick judges?",Is there any evidence that North Carolina's decision as governor was influenced by the state's political climate?,Is North Carolina's decision as governor influenced by any specific political or economic forces?
Was the video taken in the same location as the Delhi scene?,Was there alcohol in the footage?,Is Delhi the city where the footage is taken?,Is there a location where one of the girls is drinking?,Was the video shot in the same location as the Delhi scene?,Did the video capture any part of the scene?
Did the SP supporters cast fake votes in UP elections 2022?,Did SP supporters cast fake votes in UP elections 2022?,Was the UP elections 2022 poll run by a SP party?,Are SP supporters banned from voting in UP elections?,Was the UP elections 2022 poll run by a SP party?
"Can a single mother make more than $3,504 a year?",Is there an adequacy statement about a single mother's income to qualify for basic healthcare?,Is there a adequacy statement about the amount of money an individual can make under Medicaid?
Did photos show Rodrigo Duterte having a New Year's celebration?,Was Rodrigo Duterte celebrating the 2019 New Year's celebration by celebrating?,Did Rodrigo Duterte do any revealing or public speaking about the 2019 New Year's celebration?,Did Rodrigo Duterte dress for his New Year's celebration in a suit?
Was Ball beaten and bloodied by Trump supporters after the election?,Was Ball severely beaten?,Was Ball seriously injured?,Is this a case of a rape and a murder?,Can Trump supporters be considered terrorism?,Can Chris Ball be a person of interest?,Were Trump supporters responsible for Ball's beating?
What other countries have a similar water-for-life goal?,Are there other countries that have a similar water-for-life goal?,Are there countries that have a similar water-for-life goal?,Is there any evidence that this policy has a significant impact on the water resource?
Does this video show protests in Italy?,Did this video contain information about protests in Italy?,Did this video contain information about protests in Italy?,.. Did this video contain any information about protests in Italy?,.. Did the video mention a specific event in Italy?,..?
Did federal government reneging on Medicaid payments cause additional costs in the 2013-2015 state budget?,Did this increase in costs come from federal government reneging on Medicaid payments in 2013-2015?,Has Wisconsin now been able to offset the additional costs through other state sources?,Are any other costs associated with the Medicaid reneging in the 2013-15 budget?
Has any red light camera or speed camera stopped one accident from occurring?,Does radar gun have the same effect as a red light camera?,Have any red light cameras or speed cameras prevented multiple crashes?,Does the law prohibit red light cameras and/or speed cameras?,Does the law prohibit any radar guns and/or red light cameras?
Did the survey state over 30% of physicians would leave the profession?,Does the survey say any numbers regarding the percentages being predicted?,Is the New England Journal of Medicine reporting data from the survey?,Does the New England Journal of Medicine support a survey regarding physician leave from the profession?,Is the data being presented about the survey from the New England Journal of Medicine?
Is the woman holding hand of voters to press the EVM button in 2021 West Bengal elections?,Is the woman holding hand of voters to press the EVM button in West Bengal elections?,Does the woman holding hand of voters to press the EVM button in 2021 West Bengal elections have any prior voting experience?
Did there increase or decrease in health care jobs in New Hampshire?,Do more health care workers currently work in New Hampshire than before passing the budget?,Are there any numbers that would support this claim?,Do other states report on health care job growth?,Would this claim have been made prior to this budget passing?,Do other states report on health care job growth?
Did Becky Spears say that nerve damage started in 2019?,Has Becky Spears previously told about nerve damage?,Does Becky Spears have a lawyer?,Has Becky Spears been receiving medical treatment for nerve damage?,Has Becky Spears had a doctor for treatment?,Has Becky Spears notified other medical professionals regarding nerve damage?
Are Georgia State Senators counting votes in Pennsylvania?,Was this election in Georgia?,Are the gis senators only in Pennsylvania?,Is there any controversy over the gis voters in the Pennsylvania elections?,Is there no controversy regarding any of these events?,Are these images available for free?,Are any of these images for public distribution?
Did ANI say that Twitter is shutting down its operation in India from 26 May?,Were there any reported issues with the Twitter operation in India?,Does this information make sense to all parties?,Was this information accurately reported to the press?,Was this information confirmed by Twitter by ANI?,Was this information provided by Twitter on their website?
"Did 200,000 people in Wisconsin have to be denied or chilled in their efforts to vote?",Did Wisconsin have to close the polls in Wisconsin?,Did people in Wisconsin participate in the 2016 elections in a majority of states?,Was this percentage accurate for this region?,Did Wisconsin have voting restrictions in 2017?,Was this a typical Wisconsin election?
Did the South Korean honour guard perform at the UK during May 2023?,Are there any other countries that the South Korean honor guard may perform at at the UK?,Was the South Korean honor guard performing at any countries prior to May 2023?,Is there any evidence that the South Korean honour guard was involved in the UK in May 2023?
Was this video taken by a Filipino government agency?,Is this submarine used for official Philippine Navy missions?,Is this submarine used formally?,Did the Russian submarines come under U.S. ownership?,Are these submarines new submarines for the Philippine Navy?,Has Philippine government approval been required for purchase of these submarines?
Did Ayyub speak out against Muslims?,Was the statement made in person?,Did Ayyub claim that Muslims have been beheaded because of beheadings?,Is Ayyub a terrorist?,Is the statement about Muslims being beheaded a reasonable assumption?
Did Dahiya win any medals in the wrestling competition?,Is it possible Dahiya was murdered?,Was the death of Dahiya known to the press?,Is Dahiya a well-known person?,Was Dahiya murdered in her hometown?
Did Barack Hussein Obama keep 33 million pages of documents?,Did Barack Hussein Obama keep a significant number of documents related to nuclear materials?,Did Obama keep all of his documents classified?,Did Obama maintain all of his documents in a location where they were always subject to classified material?,Did Obama maintain any nuclear-related documents?,Did Obama keep nuclear documents in a location where they were always subject to classified material?,Did Obama keep any nuclear-related documents?
"Does the Biden administration choose to send baby formula to the border as one of its ""out of touch priorities""?",Has the Biden administration's policy on sex and race in policy decisions been reviewed with any effect?,Is the Biden administration's policy on gender bias and other sex issues considered to be out of touch?,Is the Biden administration's policy on sexuality in policy decisions considered to be out of touch?
Did all 3 Toronto doctors die that week due to the COVID-19 booster?,Is there evidence that all 3 Toronto doctors died in the same week?,Was any of these doctors related to the COVID-19 booster?,Do any doctors in Toronto still work in the field of medicine?,Do any other doctors work in the field of medicine?,Did any of these Toronto doctors have any other ill health issues?
Are Wisconsin's guarantees on Foxconn over $3 billion?,Does Foxconn guarantee how many full-time employees it will hire?,Is the company willing to pay what pay for full-time employees?,Is Foxconn guaranteed how many full-time employees it will hire?,Is the contract on Foxconn's terms binding?
Did Pandemic Part 1 make a claim that the spread of COVID-19 was planned by billionaires?,Did the video take a positive view of COVID-19 spreads?,Did Pandemic Part 1 contain an audio recording?,Is the video available on video streaming platform?,Did the video contain a premise that the spread of COVID-19 was planned by billionaires?
Does the American Tourist that was arrested for refusing to trade his wife to a prince for 45 camels?,Did the American travel to Saudi Arabia to meet with the prince?,Was the American arrested while he was meeting with the prince?,Did the American travel to Saudi Arabia to meet with the prince?
Did an Apple store in France get looted?,Did an Apple store in France take place during the 2023 riots?,Was an Apple store in France targeted by the 2023 riots?,Was there an Apple store in France targeted by the 2023 riots?,Did any people or items get looted from the Apple store in France?
Did a Budweiser employee admit to pissing into beer tanks for 12 years?,Did the employee admit to pissing into the beer tanks for 12 years?,Did the employee confess to the pissing into the beer tanks?,Is there evidence that the employee is known to piss on beer tanks?
Did all of the crashes involve a driver?,Is there a photo showing a driver wearing a moose head?,Is a man on the roof causing all of these crashes?,Did all of these accidents lead to injuries?,Is any of these deaths related to the driver and passengers wearing moose heads?
Did a PSA from 1956 warn that there would be a plague?,Did the PSA mention the 2020 plague?,Did the PSA contain the word 2020 in it?,Was the PSA associated with the 2020 plague?,Did the PSA contain the word 2020 in it?,Would there be a future plague in 2020?
Is there any evidence that this is an actual photograph?,Did this group of people have an event?,Is the 'F*CK Donald Trump' sign a real sign?,Do the children have a real sign?,Does the photograph have a significant amount of information about this group of people?
Did Soros pay for three March for Our Lives protesters?,Is it true that protesters were paid $300 per protester?,Did soros take the funds from protesters?,Did Soros make any other payments to protesters?,Is there any evidence Soros paid protesters to take money?
"Did 5000 farms have a total 4,000 hectares for African enslaved people?","Did 4.2 million hectares provide agricultural income for 200,000 families since 1994?",Have farms increased in size as a result of the program?,Have farm transfers increased in size since 1994?,"Has Black enslaved people contributed to 4,000 farms?"
Was there a real deceased grandma in the photo?,Was the photo authentic?,Did the person who took the photo have a valid death certificate?,Did this person die from an illness while being made into a coffee table?,Do people who have died have a valid death certificate?,Did this person die of an illness while being made into a coffee table?
Are a few of these members subjected to mistreatment for eight years?,Was this specific operation the goal of this operation?,Is this operation the result of these mistreatments?,Does this special military operation contain members of these groupings?,Has the president and the Russian military been at odds with each other over their own policies?
Does Oklahoma want to return $2 million worth of hydroxychloroquine that it bought in April of 2020?,Did Oklahoma purchase hydroxychloroquine at the request of Gov. Kevin Stitt?,Did Oklahoma purchase a total of $2 million in hydroxychloroquine in April 2020?,Is there anyone else in Oklahoma that has bought hydroxychloroquine?
"Did the vaccine cover all four measles, mumps and rubella types?",Did two babies die from the vaccine?,Did the vaccine cover all the three measles types?,Have there been any cases of vaccine-preventable deaths in Samoa?,Are vaccine-preventable deaths in Samoa uncommon?
Did the Pfizer vaccines kill about 40 times more people than the disease itself?,Have the vaccines in Pfizer's database led to a decline in the mortality of the elderly?,Are the deaths of the elderly the result of an infection?,Is the Pfizer vaccine a generic vaccine?
Can you drive the length of a football field in 5 seconds?,Can you drive the length of a football field in 5 seconds?,Would checking a text take more than 5 seconds?,Would driving the length of a football field make you more productive?,Would checking a text take more time than driving?
Is it true Saudi Prince offers 200 camels to spend a night with Ivanka Trump?,Has Saudi Prince received donations from Ivanka Trump?,Would Saudi Prince offer camels for a night with Ivanka Trump?,Would Saudi Prince offer $200 for each camel to spend the night with Ivanka Trump?
Did Apple watch Series 4 include the first ECG product available directly to consumers?,Did Apple Watch Series 4 include a watch with a wireless fitness device?,Did Apple Watch Series 4 feature a wireless fitness device?,Did Apple Watch Series 4 contain ECGs?,Was Apple Watch Series 4 available in an Apple store?
Are health care expenditures higher in South Africa than in Kenya?,Are healthcare expenditures higher in South Africa than in Kenya?,Are healthcare expenditures in South Africa higher than in Kenya?,Do healthcare expenditures in South Africa exceed in Kenya?,Are healthcare expenditures higher in South Africa than in Kenya?,Are healthcare expenditures in Kenya higher than in South Africa?
Did the resident lose her home in the event that she did not inflame the virus?,Was the resident aware that her home would be lost in case of infection by the virus?,Was there any evidence that the resident's home would be destroyed in case of infection by the virus?,Could the resident lose her home if she did not inflame the virus?
Did the US FDA document reveal two people died?,Is there information regarding the vaccine being marketed?,Does the US FDA document include information on the vaccine being marketed?,Is there information regarding the vaccine being marketed?,Is the US FDA releasing a corresponding report about the vaccine?,Is this information consistent with the FDA reports?
"Did the Trump administration make immigrants pay $800 for DNA tests to get back children taken under its ""zero tolerance"" policy?",Did the Trump administration impose a time limit on the time to complete the testing and how much will immigrants pay?,Did the Trump administration prohibit immigrants from using the money to make child abuse and exploitation charges?
Did this video show Ukrainian farmers amidst shelling during the Russian invasion?,Did any of the farmers go abut the shelling?,Is the footage of a farmer battling the shelling a significant part of this video?,Did this footage show shelling from both sides?,Is this footage taken after the Russian invasion of Ukraine?
Did Wall Street investors go bust in the deal that the 38 Studios deal happened in?,Did the Wall Street investors take a risk with the deal?,Did Wall Street investors exit the deal?,Does this deal fall under the common stock cap?,Did Wall Street investors exit the deal?,Did Wall Street investors a buy and sell?
Did any provisions of the Republican bill make it into the Obamacare bill?,Are there any specific provisions of the Republican bill that did not make it into the Obamacare bill?,Did Republicans not pass any provisions in the Obamacare bill?,Did any of the Republican provisions in the Obamacare bill make it into the Obamacare bill?
Did Verma donate any royalties to the PM's Relief Fund?,Did Verma donate any royalty to any charity?,Was there any donation made to the PM's Relief Fund?,Did Verma donate any royalties on his book?,Are there any other donations made to the PM's relief fund?
Did Clinton authorize Mueller to deliver the highly enriched uranium?,Did Clinton personally supervise Mueller and authorize the delivery?,Did Mueller receive official approval from Clinton to deliver the highly enriched uranium to Russia?,Was the highly enriched uranium delivered by Mueller in 2009?,Did the high enriched uranium provided by Mueller make a dent in the Russian nuclear deterrent?
Did Singh Yadav say BJP would come to power in UP in 2022?,Did Singh Yadav say that BJP will come to power in UP in 2022?,Did Singh Yadav believe that BJP would come to power in UP in 2022?,Did Singh Yadav believe that BJP would come to power in UP in 2022?,Did Singh Yadav say that BJP would come to power in UP in 2022?
Was there a story that the trousers fell down while he was giving a speech during the 2019 Indian elections?,Are there any other reports that suggest a similar incident?,Is there any other way to find the underlying evidence in this case?,Have there been any further instances of a similar incident in recent years?
Did Japan announce medicine for COVID-19 at a press conference on March 28th?,Did Abe hold a press conference in support of this announcement on March 28th?,Did Japan announce medicine for COVID-19 at a press conference on March 28th?,Was the news conference at a government meeting?
"Did coronavirus kill 1,12,000 people and infect 28 lakh people in China?","Did coronavirus kill over 1,12,000 people in China?",Have coronavirus cases been documented in other countries?,Were coronavirus cases in other countries reported previously?,Are coronavirus cases in other countries reported before?
Was the Apollo 8 launch in 1968 a success?,Did there exist any records of the flight of Apollo 8 in 1968?,Were there any instances of a couple watching the launch?,Was the launch successful?,Did there include any video of the launch?,..?,....?
Did the minimum wage employment rate increase before and after Perry's presidency?,Has this number doubled in the 10 years since Perry became governor?,Is the current rate higher than this pre- Perry average?,Is this increase in minimum wage employment rate due to a government initiative or the economy?,Is this increase due to a recent increase in federal taxes and the tax code?
Did the Scottish Government choose to replicate Rishi Sunak's model of giving people £3.75 a week to help them with their bills?,Did the Scottish Government choose to take the money from the UK treasury?,Did the Scottish Government choose to replicate the Rishi Sunak model of giving people £3.75 a week to help them with their bills?
Was the tower demolished in order to assure security?,Did Shah visit this university?,Did Shah meet the University's bell tower?,Was this university's bell tower a complete ruin?,Did Shah visit this university prior to his December 20 visit?,Did Shah meet the bell tower before his December 20 visit to this University?
"Have over 15,000 km of rural roads been built in the last five years?",Has 700 km of new roads been built in Lakhimpur?,"Has Assam had 13,000 kms of roads in 70 years?","Have assam made over 15,000 kms of rural roads?",Are there significant regional differences in assamese roads?
Did Jiang Zemin ever attend the CCP Congress?,Did Jiang Zemin die on November 30?,Did Jiang Zemin die in a natural causes cause?,Did Jiang Zemin receive a police escort from the CCP Congress?,Did Jiang Zemin die by suicide or from a natural cause?
Do two men appear in this video?,Has the district magistrate's office in Haryana been taken hostage?,Are witnesses confirming the events in this video?,Was this police officer tasered in this video?,Was this officer arrested?,Are these people in the video now being held in connection with this incident?
Did the dead whale swallow 64 pounds of trash?,Did the carcass contain plastic debris?,Did the carcass contain plastic litter?,Did the carcass of the dead whale contain any other debris?,Are there any witnesses to the whale's death?,Does this whale make a return trip?,Are there any known survivors?
"In the absence of other forcings and feedbacks, is double the CO2 concentration a reasonable assumption?",Would double the CO2 concentration cause an increase in global temperature between 0.3°C and 1.1°C?,Is double the CO2 concentration a reliable measure of global temperature and greenhouse gas intensity?
Does the Himalayan flower only bloom once every 400 years?,Is this flower an example of a type of flower that will only bloom once every 400 years?,Are there other examples of flowers in this category?,Has this flower been observed in other areas?,Does this flower have a large population?,Have any other similar flowers grown in the Himalayas in this way?
Do 10 glasses of water a day help treat bladder cancer?,Can 10 glasses of water a day help treat bladder cancer?,Does drinking 10 glasses of water a day help treat bladder cancer?,Is drinking 10 glasses of water a day helpful in treating bladder cancer?,Do 10 glasses of water a day help treat bladder cancer?
Did many foreign-born individuals make terrorism related crimes since 9/11?,Are many foreign-born individuals responsible for terrorism-related crimes?,Are many foreign-born individuals involved in terrorism-related crimes?,Are many foreign-born individuals involved in terrorism-related crimes?,Have foreign-born individuals been involved in terrorism related crimes since 9/11?
Has the 2020 election revealed massive fraud?,Would the Trump administration terminate the election?,Will the Trump administration reinstate all rules and regulations mentioned in the Constitution?,Would any of the Trump administration rules not be terminated?,Does the Trump administration not fully understand the nature of the 2020 election fraud?,Would the Trump administration have to amend the election laws if it were not for the 2020 election fraud?
Did the Doctor make a list of tips to contain COVID-19?,Did the Doctor's suggestions reduce the spread of the COVID?,Did the Doctor provide help in identifying the COVID-19 vaccine?,Did the Doctor give assistance in finding the CFL light bulbs?,Did the Doctor's suggestion stop the spread of the COVID-19 virus?
Did HIV transmission decline sharply between parents and children?,Is this a statement true?,Does the increase in Antiretroviral treatment have anything to do with the decline in HIV transmission?,Did the increase in HIV antiretroviral treatment stem from decreased HIV transmission in mothers and children between parents?
Is it true that there are 1100 soldiers who committed suicide over that period?,Has suicide contributed to an increase in the military?,Does the average soldier commit suicide every 36 hours?,Is the suicide rate the same between 2005 and 2009?,Does the figure for 2009 stand for 2008?,Is this information considered reliable?
Is the number of new Covid-19 cases reported for March past April in the range of 0 to 19?,Has any new cases of Covid-NF burgeoned since March?,Is this claim based on a CSI review by the Robert Koch Institute?,Is this claim based on a CSI review by the Robert Koch Institute?
Did Tom and Ginni post a photo of themselves enjoying a bottle of wine?,"Was the $59,135 bottle of wine a single bottle or multiple bottles of wine?",Did the photos depict American women despairing about their abortion rights being taken away from them?,Did the photo feature any additional content?
"Would families have to spend an additional $2,100 a year to keep their health insurance?",Would the additional cost prevent families from being able to continue to buy insurance?,Will the additional cost prevent families from being able to afford healthcare?,Does the Democratic plan currently include provisions specifically aimed at keeping health insurance?
Is there evidence that Joe Biden block aid to South Vietnam in 1975?,Did Biden block aid to South Vietnam after he was elected as president?,Did Biden allow Vietnamese refugees to enter the United States after he was elected as president?,Was Biden involved in the fight to bring South Vietnam to the US?
"Are another 50,000 U.S.-born Hispanics 18 in the month of June 2014?",Do U.S.-born Hispanics become eligible to vote every month?,Is there sufficient reason for a greater number of hispanic Americans to become eligible to vote than to have declined?
Did Lawan and Atiku met after the 2022 APC Presidential primary?,Did Atiku and Lawan not meet after deciding on Atiku's candidacy?,Is Atiku a current APC member?,Is Atiku's name listed in the video?
What was the name of the rice pyramid?,Did it receive any government assistance?,Did it have a specific date for its release?,Does the image depict any people on it?,Did the structure look like an ancient structure?,Would it have served a purpose in a modern setting?,Has the image been retouched?
Did Trump create 12 million jobs in 2 years?,Did Trump create more jobs in two years than any president has in four years?,Has Trump created more jobs in 4 years than any previous president?,Has Trump created more jobs in 2 years than any previous president in 4 years?,Has Trump created more jobs in 2 years than any previous president in 4 years?
Have Palin had 11 years in elected office?,Has Palin worked in elections?,Have Palin and other presidential candidates served as governor?,Has Palin served as chair or vice chair in more than one presidential administration?,Is Palin involved in policy in the past?,Do a lot of elected officials like Palin work in the same office?
Is the law needed for the regulation of all financial institutions?,Are the financial regulators forced to file 358 filings on the new law?,Is the law expected to be enforced by all financial institutions?,Is the government responsible for any regulation of the financial industry?,Are the financial regulators required to file 358 filings in the new law?
Does a homemade mixture cure cancer in 3 days?,Does a homemade mixture cure cancer if inhaled?,Is the mixture any good to drink after cancer treatment?,Are the homemade mixtures safe?,Is the homemade mixture safe for children?,Do these homemade mixtures work for everyone?,Is there any evidence to suggest that these homemade mixtures work for cancer in humans?,Is it true that these home made mixtures work for cancer - specifically ovarian cancer - in humans?
"Is Moderna CEO acknowledged that they produced 100,000 COVID-19 vaccine doses prior to the pandemic?",Did Moderna produce fewer COVID-19 vaccine doses during this pandemic?,Does Moderna's CEO admit producing these COVID-19 vaccine doses?,Does Moderna's CEO also admit to having produced other COVID-19 vaccine doses prior to this pandemic?
Did any GOP candidate live in the 9th district?,Did any Congressional candidate live in the 9th district?,Did any Congressional candidate living in the 9th district work for the government?,Did any Congressional candidate live in the 9th district?,Did any Republican vote in the 9th district?,Did any GOP candidate live in the 9th district?,Did any Democratic candidate live in the 9th district?
"Has the PM said in his speech that his government built 1,250 crore houses?",Has NDTV verified that NDTV tweet was true?,Did Modi say this in his speech?,Did the PM claim this in his speech?,Have any comments about this claim been made by the PM?,Have any comments been made to this claim?
Is there any evidence linking strep A with nasal flu vaccine?,Is it true that a 2014 study was published showing a connection between strep A and nasal flu vaccine?,Has this study been re-done?,Was this research published prior to 2014?,Has the 2014 study included data from previous studies?
Is it true that Portman failed to address China’s currency manipulation?,Is it true that China had currency manipulation levels as high as 40% in 2006?,Has the Chinese currency manipulation rates increased over time?,Is it true that Portman failed to address China's currency manipulation?,Is Portman correct in his assertions on China's currency manipulation?
Did Iranian whistleblower create fraudulent military ballots at a US voter registration database?,Did Iranian whistleblower create fraudulent overseas military ballots at a US voter registration database during the 2020 election?,Did the Iranian whistleblower create fraudulent overseas military ballots?,Did the Iranian whistleblower create fraudulent overseas military ballots?
Did Trump try to make Biden stutter during the 2020 presidential debates?,Does Christie advise Trump to try to provoke Biden to stutter?,Did Trump recommend Christie try to provoke Biden to stutter during the 2020 presidential debates?,Did Christie advise Trump to try to provoke Biden to stutter?
"Did Massachusetts taxpayers pay $100,000 for Romney's purchase of computer hard drives?",Did Romney pay the associated costs to the state?,Did Romney's office hire private contractors to purchase the hardware?,Was Romney's office aware of the expenditures?,Does Romney's office recognize the expense?,Has Romney made public statements about his involvement in the purchase of hard drives?
Did this photo come from France?,Did this photograph show the people demonstrating for refugees in France?,Did this photograph include more than one person?,Did this photograph have a protest that was accompanied by music?,"if this picture is from France, is this protest in particular?",does the photo depict this particular group?,were there any photos of this march?
Was a man arrested without knowledge of the alleged agent?,Was there any proof the agent was hired by two cops?,Was the FBI agent a suspect or just an out-and-out intruder?,Was the agent actually hired by cops?,Was the undercover FBI agent a suspect or not?
Was Taco Bell's lawsuit allegedly related to false advertising?,Did a case against Taco Bell result in this lawsuit?,Did this lawsuit go viral?,Did this lawsuit go against Taco Bell?,Did Taco Bell get a reward from this lawsuit?,Did this lawsuit go viral?,Did this lawsuit have other legal issues as a result of this lawsuit?
"Do any of the positive side effects of COVID-19 vaccine affect people who are not virgins, diabetics, asthma sufferers, and smokers?",Do any of these negative side effects of COVID-19 vaccine affect people who drink alcohol?,"Is there any evidence that COVID-19 vaccine adversely affects tobacco consumption, smoke, and alcoholic intake?"
Did 400 people from Gautam Budh Nagar test positive for COVID-19?,Did the COVID-19 infection cause the missing?,Are these missing people considered to be part of the India virus epidemic?,Was the COVID-19 infection caused by an individual in a specific area?,Does the COVID-19 infection require a specific type of vaccine?
Was there a woman hugging a crying child in this image?,Was the woman in the photo in India?,Is there a physical item the woman is hugging children from?,Does the image in question have a gender attributed to her?,Hopefully the woman in the photo is male.?
Did Gates have any conflict of interest during the video interview?,Was this type of interview a rerun?,Was this interview recorded by the same journalist in the same city?,Has Gates been convicted of theft and profiting from this technology?,Was this interview filmed in a location in Australia?
Did a man kill himself over the Treasury's decision to add an African American abolitionist's portrait to the $20 bill?,Is it known if a person committed suicide after the Treasury's decision to add an African American abolitionist's portrait to the $20 bill?,Is it known if a person committed suicide following the Treasury's decision to add an African American abolitionist's portrait to the $20 bill?
Did Musk buy more than 100 Twitter shares?,Did Musk spend money on Twitter shares?,Was there any student debt left for families to cancel?,Did Musk buy enough to cancel all student debt?,Did Elon Musk spend the majority of his money buying Twitter shares?,Did Musk give enough to cancel all student debt?,Is this number the same as Musk's spending on Twitter shares?
Is there an estimated time frame for the Qatar World Cup?,Is FIFA working on a timeframe for the Qatar World Cup?,Is the Qatar World Cup a common format for upcoming events?,Is the Qatar World Cup a yearly event?,- Did FIFA decide to extend the Qatar World Cup time frame to 100 minutes?,- Does FIFA work on a timeframe for Qatar World Cup?
Did the US woman have six children?,Did she have a healthy infant?,Did the Malian woman deliver more children?,Is there any proof that the American woman had nine children?,Did the US woman have less babies?,Was the birth record of the American woman identical to the birth record of the Malian woman?
Does Hasner have a record of requesting over $92.2 million in earmarks?,Did Hasner receive money from this group in a previous year?,Did Hasner receive money from this group in a past year?,Was the amount of the money requested substantiated?,Was Hasner accountable for his decision?
Was he killed?,Did he kill other people?,Did he kill a lot of people?,Did he kill hundreds?,Did it take 4 months for Salim to kill all passengers?,Did they die in some other places?,Was this driver well known?,Posted an article about his killer?
Is unemployment 5.6?,Do you think that is the highest unemployment rate?,Are these unemployment numbers accurate?,Are these unemployment statistics false?,Were these figures given as figures from the Department of Labor?,Did this figure come from the Office of Personnel Management (OPM)?,Would this figure of unemployment be a lie?
Did the protests occur at the headquarters of the European Union?,Did protestors tear down the European Union flag in a European Union headquarters?,Did the protests happen at a European Union headquarters?,Did protestors tear down the flag in a European Union Headquarters?,Did the protestors tear down the flag in a European Union Headquarters?
Did a document from Madison Area Lyme Support Group claim the COVID-19 pandemic was “planned and with purpose”?,Did the document claim that the COVID-19 pandemic was planned with purpose?,Did the document claim that the COVID-19 pandemic was planned with purpose?,Did this document mention how the COVID-19 pandemic was planned?
Did Braley vote to cut $700 billion from Medicare to support Obamacare?,Did Braley vote to support Obamacare by cutting $700 billion from Medicare?,Did Braley vote to support Obamacare by cutting $700 billion from Medicare?,Was Braley a member of the Democratic Senate?,Did Braley vote to cut $700 billion from Medicare?
Did the CM take leave following his wedding?,Could Chadha handle the state's affairs while Mann was on leave?,Has Chadha reportedly run a large campaign in Punjab?,Has the governor of Punjab approved CM Mann's request for a 3-month leave?,Is Chadha in the running to replace CM Mann?
Did Biden's campaign plan to tax 401(k) retirement accounts?,Does the 401(k) system account for a significant portion of the American workforce?,Could the Obama administration repeal the 401(k) plan?,Has the Obama Administration implemented taxation policies?,Are any policies that are meant to affect the 401(k) system being proposed in this context already being implemented?
Are these countries the same as those previously identified by Obama?,Has this Executive order made changes to any of these countries since they were previously identified by Obama?,"Do all of the countries in this Executive Order also have a ""foreign terrorist"" designation?",Is the same label used for all of the countries with foreign terrorist designations in this Executive Order?
Was Walker able to do so?,Did Walker graduate from college?,Was Walker in law enforcement?,Did Walker mislead in this regard?,Have they all been correct?,Did Walker ever do research on veterans?,Did Walker lie about his claim about veterans?,Is Walker true about the claims made by Walker?,Is Walker in good health?
Did Pelosi spend any money on this?,Did Pelosi spend any money with other celebrities?,Did Pelosi pay for the drinks?,Did Pelosi receive any money for this?,Did Pelosi actually spend money on this?,Did Pelosi actually spend money with any celebrities?
Did the seal of the deepest hole on earth occur after finding fossils that were 2 billion years old?,Was the seal of the deepest hole on earth the result of a scientific discovery?,Was the fossil found at the deepest hole on earth before the seal?,Is this the record for the deepest hole on earth?
Did Foster shoot himself three times to avoid testifying against Clinton?,Did Foster shoot himself in order to avoid testifying against Clinton?,Is Foster related to Hillary Clinton?,Does Foster shoot himself because he feared testifying against Clinton?,Was Foster connected to a gun massacre?,Did Foster shoot himself while avoiding testifying against Clinton?
Did 70% of voters tell they already voted in the California recall election?,Did 70% of voters tell they already voted in the California recall election?,Did 70% of voters in California stating they already voted in the California recall election?,Did 70% of voters in California stating they already voted in the California recall election?
Is it known that any of the following non-listed exceptions would make it unavoidable for women to take the COVID-19 vaccine?,Can a child have COVID-19?,Is it not clear how many children would be prevented from receiving the COVID-19 vaccine?,"Are all conditions listed in paragraph 2 to 3 non-listed exceptions for women, children, people with breathing issues, people who smoke or drink alcohol, people with neurological issues, and those with diabetes?"
Did German solar panels have to be blanketed by snow?,Was there any snow at Germany’s wind turbines?,Did Germany have any wind at all during the period I am analyzing?,Are the wind turbines still running?,Will Germany ever be able to experience sufficient wind power?,Are the wind turbines currently operational?
Is the quote from Fauci accurate?,Is the quote from Marks accurate?,Is there consensus regarding the claims made by Fauci and Marks?,Is there any evidence to support or refute the claims?,Is there evidence to support the claim?,Are there any sources supporting the claim?,Is there evidence to support any of the claims?
Did the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 increase the personal casualty deduction for losses from wildfires and other natural disasters?,Would the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 eliminate or severely curtail the personal casualty deduction for losses from wildfires and other natural disasters?,Is the personal casualty deduction for losses from wildfires and other natural disasters currently established?,Is there agreement that the Personal Casualty Deduction for wildfire losses is currently established?
Is the woman in this photo carrying a fake body during the COVID-19 pandemic?,Did the photo include an image of people carrying fake bodies?,Is this picture representative of two women carrying fake bodies?,Is the photo representative of two women carrying fake bodies?,"if so, was this a representative of an article on these women?"
Did President Obama wear American flag glasses after the State of the Union Address?,Did Obama wear American flag glasses as part of his State of the Union Address performance?,Did Obama wear American flag glasses after the State of the Union Address performance?,Did Obama wear American flag glasses during the State of the Union Address performance?,Does a photograph of Barack Obama in the White House contain images of Obama wearing American flag glasses?
Was Atlanta ranked in the top three major cities for LGBT populations per capita?,Is Atlanta ranked third for LGBT % in the city?,Do any cities in the US have a higher number of LGBT people per capita than Atlanta?,Is Atlanta considered a large city for LGBT people per capita?
Was the photograph of a rare Nagapushpa flower taken in the past year?,Is the Nagapushpa a single flower that blooms only once every 36 years?,Is the Nagapushpa a single flower that blooms only once every 36 years?
Is this a women aged 18 - 55 year old scheme?,Has the government of India launched this scheme?,Has the government of India started this scheme?,Have any women under this scheme been killed?,Is it possible that this will not affect all women?,Will this cause any serious problems for these women?
Are there COVID cases in Andhra Pradesh?,Did it declare holidays for schools and colleges in Andhra Pradesh?,Is it true that all schools and colleges in Andhra Pradesh are also declared holidays due to COVID?,Is it true that the holidays are extended to the entire state?
Did the members of that group actually make up the majority of the protest?,Are there any witnesses that would confirm this report?,Did a smaller group that consisted of black students eventually pull the government off from the city?,Were the protesters responsible for the decision to pull the government off?,Was the group responsible for the entire movement?
Did this test occur in the United States?,Did all of the tests occur in countries that are permanent members of the U.N. Security Council?,Did only the United States conduct all of the total test?,Did all five permanent members of the U.N. Security Council conduct the most nuclear tests?,Did all 5 permanent members conduct 99.99% of all the total nuclear tests?
Did the check include misleading tips and exaggerated tips?,Was the check from the Cheesecake Factory dated September 2017?,Was the check presented in full or half?,Did a customer receive this check on September 2017?,Did the checks have a bar code?,Did the check specifically offer a “Bonus” tip?
Did Democratic protesters have an occupation in 2018?,Did the photos capture protesters who were inside the Capitol?,Are there any other photos that identify Democratic protesters outside the capitol?,Did protesters who toured the capitol physically block the Capitol or were there others that blocked it?,Are other photographs of Democratic protesters outside the Capitol available?
Did Ardern refer to this vaccination as the 'booster shot'?,Did Ardern make this statement about Booster Shots?,Did Ardern say this statement on this billboard?,Are the people on this billboard on a mission to get a booster shot?,Are people on this billboard going back to the doctor to get their booster shot?
Has economic growth in the United States been at 3.2% annually since 1994-2012?,Has economic growth since 1994 been 3.2% annually?,Is GDP growth at an average 3.2% a year from 1994-2012?,Has GDP in the United States been growing above 3.2% since 1994-2012?,Is GDP growth from 2014 onward 3.2% annually?
Did Garth Brooks wear Rainbow colors?,Did Garth Brooks support LGBTQ+ rights?,Did Garth Brooks wear rainbow colored clothes?,Did Garth Brooks support the LGBTQ+ rights movement?,Does Garth Brooks support LGBTQ+ rights?,Does Garth Brooks support LGBT rights?,Did Garth Brooks support LGBT rights?
Did she have to fill out FEC reports for 6 years?,Did she have to fill out FEC reports for more than that?,Is the FEC reporting more detailed than a tax return?,Can one fill out FEC reports in any way?,Is there evidence that she has been required to file more than tax returns?
Was the newspaper clipping published before or on March 20?,Are migrant workers based in India?,Is the letter from the newspaper clipping explicit about migrant workers?,Is the letter from the newspaper clipping specific about what kind of workers the immigrants are?,Is this letter from the newspaper clipping from Dainik Jagran?
"Would a lawsuit backed by Morrisey completely eliminate health care for 800,000 West Virginians?","Are the cost of health care for 800,000 West Virginians going to exceed $100M?","If the Affordable Care Act is repealed, would the cost of health care drop?",Could a lawsuit against the Affordable Care Act be filed by the West Virginia Attorney General?
Did borrowing increase again during the administration of President Rodrigo Duterte?,Did borrowing increase again following the resignation of President Rodrigo Duterte?,Did the national government borrow less money during the administration of President Rodrigo Duterte in 2022?,Is it true that Borrowing decrease from P2.58 trillion in 2021 to P2.16 trillion in 2022?
Was PIA passenger jet crashed and crushed with 90 passengers in Pakistan?,Was the PIA passenger jet crash seen in a video?,Did the PIA passenger jet crash with passengers?,Did a video show the crash?,Was the PIA passenger jet crash in the United States?,Did any US officials report a crash?
Did Clinton kill a 10-year-old girl?,Did Clinton kill anyone else?,Did Clinton die in any way during her tenure as president?,Are there other statements in this article that are inconsistent?,">0:00,09/0>1/0/0/0 /0/0 /0/0?"
Did they state that they only have 2.5% of the world's oil reserves?,Did they quote from other sources what percentages of the world's oil is consumed on a daily basis?,Did they say that they only had 25% of the world's oil reserves?,Are other sources claiming that they have 25% of the world's oil reserves?
Do a majority of gun sales occur outside of licensed gun dealers?,Is the percentage of gun sales outside of licensed gun dealers 20%?,Is 40% of all gun sales in the United States outside of licensed gun dealers?,Is there any indication that firearm sales outside licensed gun dealers are likely to exceed 80%?
Did Rihanna say she paid the dancers in her show more than Kangana's last five films have earned?,Did Kangana's last five films earn more than Rihanna's show?,Did Rihanna's show pay more than Kangana's last five films?
Did the Republican-controlled Wisconsin Assembly approve one of 376 amendments offered by Assembly Democrats in 2011?,Did all 376 amendments approved by the Republican-controlled Wisconsin Assembly include amendments to the U.S. Constitution?,Did the Republican-controlled Wisconsin Assembly vote on one amendment in 2011?,Have all 376 amendments that were approved by the Republican-controlled Wisconsin Assembly been approved?
"Did Planters allow fans to try booking a two-night stay in its RV-style ""Nutmobile"" in September 2021?","Did fans register a two-night stay in the RV-style ""Nutmobile"" in September 2021?","Was Planters allowing fans to try booking a two-night stay in its RV-style ""Nutmobile"" in September 2021?"
"If we went back to the obesity rates of the 80s, would Medicare save as much as a trillion dollars?","If the same amount of money were saved if we went back to the obesity rates of the 80s, would the Medicare system save as much as a trillion dollars over several years?",Is there evidence that obesity rates were lower in the 1980s?
Was a photograph taken after the hurricane?,Did anyone rescue a shark after the storm?,Did it rain the next day?,Did any people lose their lives after the hurricane?,Did anyone know of the shark in question?,Did sharks remain after the storm?,Did it rain during the hurricane?,Did anyone get to know the sharks?
Does this picture show Imran Khan supporters arrested by police?,Was this rally held in July?,Was the rally on July 20th in New Delhi?,Is this photo taken outside of New Delhi?,Was the rally in New York?,Did the organizers of this rally assemble outside of the country?,Has this event taken place since this day?
Did Nancy Pelosi meet with Assad of Syria in 2007?,Was everyone upset when Pelosi met with Assad of Syria in 2007?,Did a majority of people in the United States get upset by Pelosi's meeting with Assad of Syria?,Did Pelosi meet with Assad of Syria at the start of the Obama Administration?
Does the number of police firearms thefts ten times the number of civilian firearms thefts?,Does the number of police firearms thefts ten times the number of civilian firearms thefts?,Does the number of civilian firearms thefts ten times the number of police firearms thefts?
Do World Economic Forum and The World Bank have similar goals for diet?,Does the 2030 diet infographic show this as being true?,Is the 2030 diet infographic created by both organizations?,Does the 2030 diet infographic reflect this as being true?,Is the 2030 diet infographic based on data that is derived from the World Economic Forum?
"Has uncompensated care ""gone down by 30%"" just in the first few months of Medicaid expansion in the states that adopted it?",Did the Medicaid expansion affect uncompensated care?,Was there a decrease in uncompensated care by 30% in the first few months of the Medicaid expansion?,Did the Medicaid expansion result in a decrease in uncompensated care by 30%?
Did this suggest that the Soviet Union was supplying Ukraine with a pro-Russian response to the pro-Russian movements?,Did this suggest that Ukrainian soldiers had been wearing Russian outfits to help Russia?,Does this suggest that Ukraine was supplying the Russians with pro-Russian responses to the pro-Russian movements?
Did the votes for Uhuru Kenyatta and Kenyan presidential elections come together?,Did Kenyatta's re-election result in a significant increase in votes?,"Is it reasonable to assume Kenyatta had 800,000 more votes than Uhuru in the 2013 re-election?"
Did the Detroit news broadcast include a graphic that listed voter registration issues?,Did this news report mention any specific specific issues?,Did these issues make the Fox 2 Detroit report?,Did this report mention any specific individual issues?,Do these issues make any particular Fox 2 Detroit newscast report?,Are there any other Fox 2 Detroit newscasts that reference these issues?
Was she shot during her testimony?,Did Collins-Smith testify against Hillary Clinton?,Was Collins-Smith related to Clinton?,Was Collins-Smith shot as a result of being on a campaign trip?,Did Collins-Smith testify against Hillary Clinton during her campaign trip?,Was Collins-Smith involved in any political activism?
Did Thunberg delete her post in 2017?,Is Thunberg known to have deleted her post in 2017?,Have Thunberg deleted her own tweets in the last 4 years?,Are Thunberg and her friends likely still alive?,Was Thunberg an original tweeter in 2018?,Does Thunberg have a younger brother or sister?
"Are centipedes called ""cidentipedes"" because of their name?",Does a centipede have 100 legs?,Are centipedes found in tiger tigers?,Have centipedes been slain?,Does a centipede have a unique name?
Did Democrats win 49% of Latino votes in Texas?,Was the majority of Latino votes generated by Republican candidates in Texas?,Is it true that a Republican candidate would have a much greater advantage in Latino votes than a Democratic candidate?,Were Republicans better at getting Latino votes overall than Democrats in Texas?
Did Richard Madeley go to the hospital after receiving a booster vaccination?,Did Richard Madeley have a chance to recuperate?,Is it likely that Richard Madeley received a booster vaccination before he was rushed to the hospital?,Is it likely that Richard Madeley was rushed to the hospital after receiving a booster vaccine?
Are there any other things that the State Department's warning said?,Did the State Department warn Mizzou in July 2019 about the Confucius Institute?,Is this comment the first time Dean has made statements on this topic?,Was the state department warning Mizzou about the Confucius Institute in July 2019?,Did this person continue to say this during the month of July?
"Has Israel killed more Palestinian children, more than 200, than the total number of Israeli soldiers killed in military operations since 2006?",Are there any reports that indicate that Israeli soldiers killed in military operations in the last 3 weeks?,Does Israel's figure for Gaza children killed vary based on the country?,Does Israel's report say that the Palestinian children killed in the 3 weeks was higher than the number of Israeli soldiers killed in military operations in 2006?
Is there a total mess when calculating voter ID numbers?,Was this a total mess?,Is this a total mess for the Democrats?,Did the Democrats play games again in the election?,Did the Democrats play games?,Is this a complete mess?,Would a Democratic voter be allowed to vote in Pennsylvania if this is the case?
Did Sanders put all of the state budget into education?,Has that goal not been achieved since?,Does the level of funding from education in Illinois not differ between levels of funding?,Was Sanders' goal attainable for public school funding?,Does the state spend more funding than is typically awarded on public education?,Has this goal resulted in a higher quality of education?
Does the increase in the number of officers shot and killed in the line of duty last year represent an increase in the number of officers killed?,Does this figure reflect changes in gun laws in the country?,Has the number of officers shot and killed in the line of duty in 2013 increased by 56 percent?,Was this figure calculated based on official data?
"Did Oregon have 100,000 more jobs in 2009?","Did Obama increase jobs in Oregon by 150,000?","Did Obama increase jobs in Oregon by over 100,000?","Did Obama say Oregon now has 100,000 more jobs than before he was elected?","Did Obama say Oregon now has 100,000 more jobs than before he was elected?",Did Obama promise Oregon has 100000 more jobs than before he was elected?
"Would Mack's Penny Plan cut more than $200 billion from Medicare, over $1 trillion from Social Security, and $3 trillion out of defense?",Did Mack's Penny Plan use a different accounting structure for the Penny Plan?,Did Mack's Penny Plan include raising taxes for businesses in general?
Did PM Modi announce his 5 pm clapping initiative to kill the Coronavirus?,Did PM Modi announce that the clapping initiative could kill the Coronavirus?,Was PM Modi’s 5 pm clapping initiative approved by the FDA?,Did PM Modi announce the clapping initiative in order to kill Coronavirus?,Does the clapping initiative have any other significant health effects?
Did Nigeria earn US$383 billion from oil revenue in the years prior to this government?,Did Nigeria have any savings in the years prior to this administration?,Did Nigeria have any savings in the years prior to this government?,Did Nigeria earn an amount in the years prior to this government?,Did the country meet its government's spending requirements?
Did Cuomo receive more contributions from small donors than D'Amato on one day of fundraising?,Did Cuomo receive more contributions during the entire 7 year campaign?,Did the campaign receive more donations after this day?,Was the amount of contributions in this day well above Cuomo's lifetime?
"Did Michael Regino not provide a P1,000 pension increase to SSS beneficiaries?",Did Regino change from former GSIS president to former SSS president?,"Did Regino provide P1,000 in increased pension to SSS beneficiaries?",Did Regino step down as president of the SSS?,"Did Regino provide P1,000 in increased pension to SSS?"
Did over 60 percent of women who use birth control use it for more than just family planning?,Did over 60 percent of women who use birth control do so for more than just family planning?,Is there proof that most women who use birth control do use birth control for more than just family planning?,Do the majority of women who use birth control use it for more than just family planning?
Did more people vote than registered to vote in the 2020 election?,Did there was a significant increase of people voting compared to the previous election?,Was the overall increase in the number of people voting for this election due to increased registrations?,Did this election have a significant increase in voting percentages for this election?
"Did Republicans announce that all tax cuts with repeal of Obamacare will go to people earning under $200,000?",Did any of the tax cuts given by Republicans be passed at a lower rate than those that were passed in 2015?,Did any of the cuts given by Republicans contain any tax increases?,Did Republicans give any tax cuts during the 2014 tax year?
Did this crime happen in a specific period of time?,Did this crime occur over a period of time?,Did the killer eat more of these people in that period?,Did the killer eat any of these people?,Did the killer slaughter and eat these people?,Was this person a Jehovah witness?,Was this person a postman?
Did Obama say black males are twice as likely to be shot than white males?,Does Obama not provide data about which group is more likely to be shot?,Did Obama say that black males are twice as likely to be shot than white males?,Does Obama not offer any data to support this claim?
Does Scott Brown vote about 66% with his own party?,Does Brown have a record of being bipartisan?,Did Brown vote 56% of the time with his own party?,Does Brown vote 66% of the time with his own party?,Are there any other examples of bipartisan politics?,Did the two parties involved in a bipartisan election process have a similar outcome in 2015?
Did photos show the interior of the trains?,Can the train service operate in December 2021?,Are there any other trains in the country?,Is this train the latest version of the train?,Is the train train currently operating in Laos?,Will these trains be operated by other airlines?,Will the train service be available in other countries?
Is Brazil the only major world leader to question the merit of lockdown measures to fight the COVID-19 pandemic?,Is the COVID-19 pandemic on the rise?,Are the lockdown measures used by Brazil to combat COVID-19 legitimate?,Is the Covid-19 pandemic on the rise in Brazil?
Did Trump suspend all travel from China before US reported 5 cases of coronavirus?,Did Trump suspend all travel from China after US reported 5 cases of coronavirus?,Was Trump able to suspend all travel from China before US reported 5 cases of coronavirus?,Did Trump able to suspend all travel from China after US reported 5 cases of coronavirus?
Is it true the Meijer supercenter chain is giving away $75 coupons to users who like and share Facebook posts?,Does Meijer supercenter chain give away $75 coupons to users who like and share Facebook posts?,Does Meijer supercenter chain currently offer 75 coupons?,Is Meijer supercenter chain giving away $75 coupons to users who like and share Facebook posts?
Did President Trump win 1540 of his nominations?,Are all nominees approved?,Are there any nominees who are defeated?,Were any of his nominations defeated?,Are any of his nominations approved by the Senate?,Did any nominees in 2013 vote against his nominations?,Did any of his nominations defeat?
Did Marco Rubio say humans hunted dinosaurs to extinction?,Did Rand Paul say God removed dinosaurs to make room for humans?,"Did Rubio and Paul agree that the earth is 10,000 years old?","Was Rubio likely talking about a 4,000 year old earth versus a 10,000 year old Earth?"
Is there any evidence this will result in more than doubling in mining?,Does the whole green energy agenda involve more than doubling 10 types of mining?,Can the new policies also be applied to larger scale mining projects?,Does this initiative take into consideration the environmental impact?,Can other mining industries benefit from the initiative?
Did the photo include both Arbery and Kemp?,Was there proof that Kemp is in agreement with McMichael?,Did the photo depict the identity of one of the two charged in the murder of Arbery?,Did Kemp accept the charges of McMichael for the slaying of Arbery?,Is this evidence against McMichael?
Does Spicer have two different shoe colors in this photograph?,Has Spicer ever worn only one color shoe in a photograph?,Has Spicer ever been spotted wearing more than one color shoe in this photograph?,Does Spicer always wear color shoes in a photograph?,Does Spicer always wear the same shoes in this photograph?
"Is this app guaranteed to earn $9,000 per month?",Is this app available for all Canadians?,Is the app guaranteed to be successful?,Do we know how much the app will earn by April of 2018.?,Is this app guaranteed to produce results in the following month?,Is this app guaranteed to produce results in the following year?,Is this app guaranteed to create results in the following year?
Would a federal plan to expand Medicaid cost Florida taxpayers $26 billion over 10 years?,Will an expansion of Medicaid cost Florida taxpayers $26 billion over 10 years?,Do any of these factors apply to Medicaid expansion?,Is the proposed federal Medicaid expansion plan based on an actual study?,Does the Medicaid expansion plan require state funding?
Did this state legislators get paid for a whole year?,What was the pay for the workers in 2012?,Was this legislature paid for a year?,Did the workers receive some form of remuneration for their labor?,Did the workers receive their remuneration during this year?,Was any state legislator refunded for work incurred during this year?
Did Duterte say getting more than two doses of the COVID-19 vaccine is dangerous?,Is there data that suggest getting more than two doses of the COVID-19 vaccine is dangerous?,Did Duterte make this comment before?,Have other countries been accused of using COVID-19 vaccines to protect against disease?
"Do ""Liability Warning Acknowledgement Form"" form an employer liability policy?","Do ""Liability Warning Acknowledgement Form"" form a liability policy?","Are ""Liability Warning Acknowledgement Form"" forms an employer liability policy?",Can a worker sue their company for injury resulting from the COVID-19 vaccine?
Was Sadhvi Pragya Singh Thakur 4 years old when she demolished Babri Masjid?,Was the Babri Masjid demolished in 2008 or earlier?,Was the Babri Masjid demolished in 2008?,Did Sadhvi Pragya Singh Thakur declare her claim to have demolished Babri Masjid based on her own testimony?
Did Nancy Pelosi receive any compensation or a refund for the purchase?,Did the IRS provide any financial information to Pelosi?,Was the IRS required to inspect Pelosi's finances?,Did the IRS request any financial information?,Does the taxpayer have any responsibility for Pelosi's finances?
Does it have an effect on your apartment’s neighbors to flush the toilet after 10 PM?,Does this rule only affect the individual tenant?,Does this rule apply to all apartment owners?,Is this rule only valid in apartment buildings?,Does this rule affect people living on campus?,Do this toilet laws affect public schools?
"Would these taxpayers be required to send $5,000 to the treasury?",Does this state have a debt amount of over $50 billion?,"Do all taxpayers in Georgia have to send $5,000 to the treasury?",Does this state have any state debt other than the state debt?,"Would any taxpayer have to send $5,000 to the treasury to cover the state debt?"
Are there many instances where insurance billing and bureaucracy lead to money waste?,Was there a correlation between the two types of billing?,Is there any evidence that these types of billing is often a waste of medical time and money?,Does the amount of this waste be greater than one third of the total healthcare costs?
Is there a video of a talent show in which a Ramayana song is performed?,Is the audience reacting to the performance of Ramayana?,Is the performance of Ramayana receiving great responses?,Is there a video of the Ramayana performance in a talent show?
Did Biden receive his COVID-19 booster shot 666 days after COVID-19 began?,Did Biden complete his COVID-19 booster shot?,Was Biden not fully recovered from the COVID-19?,Do we have any evidence that Biden was fully recovered after his COVID-19 booster shot?
Was Trump referring to a presidential race?,"Did Trump ask for supporters to ""storm the U.S. Capitol""?","Did Trump use the term ""storm the Capitol"" to describe a president-elect's victory?",Was Trump trying to delay Biden's presidential election?,"Did Trump want Biden supporters to ""storm the U.S. Capitol""?",Did Biden win election?
Are there more jobs generated in tourism than any other sector?,Does tourism generate an economic income of at least $36 billion annually?,Does tourism contribute to the state economy?,Has the amount of tourism spent in Ohio increased since the 2008 recession?,Would visitors in Ohio need more funding if the economy grew at an annual rate of around $36 billion annually?
Did Ramaswamy say he didn't have any plans to pardon Biden if elected President?,Has Ramaswamy publicly stated he doesn't think he'll pardon Biden if elected president?,Would Ramaswamy consider Pardoning Biden if he's elected president?
Did Amtrak's Acela train have more riders per year in 2010?,"Did Amtrak's Acela train in Washington D.C., Boston, Philadelphia, New York and Baltimore have 3.2 million riders per year in 2010?","Did Amtrak's Acela train in Washington D.C., Boston, Philadelphia, New York and Baltimore only have 3.2 million riders per year in 2010?"
"Did Feingold claim that he got paid $8,000 for a lecture at Stanford University?",Is Feingold paid for his lecture?,Do the Stanford students at Feingold's University pay him money?,Do Steinberg's students at Feingold's University pay him money?,Is this the case with Feingold?
Did the anchor criticize India for the Chandrayaan-3 space mission?,Did the anchor do a positive interview with India about the Chandrayaan-3 space mission?,Did the BBC editor of the video criticize India?,Is the clip a promotional video for the Chandrayaan-3 space mission?
Did liquor sales account for $1 billion in the state budget?,Does liquor sales account for nearly $1 billion in the state budget?,Is the state's budget for this biennium larger than the national average?,Does this state have a large amount of liquor sales?,Do states have much liquor sales?,Was this state able to fund the federal government adequately?
Is this month meant to replace the celebration of LGBTQ+ community?,Will this month be used to commemorate family pride?,Will this month be used to celebrate the LGBTQ+ community?,Was this month approved by Italy?,Is this month reverting to the traditional month of LGBT awareness?,Is this month intended to honor LGBTQ+ organizations?
Did 400 Americans have more wealth than half of all Americans combined?,Did 400 Americans have more wealth than half of all Americans combined?,Did all 400 Americans have wealth that was at least 10 times larger than the average US income?,"Did all 400 Americans have wealth under $20,000?",Was all 400 Americans wealth?,Has wealth in any state fallen?
Was Allison Mack sentenced to prison for kidnapping children for sex slaves?,Was Allison Mack sentenced to prison for kidnapping children and for sex slaves?,Was Allison Mack sentenced to prison for kidnapping children for sex slaves?,Did Allison Mack commit any crimes while in prison?
Is America under contract with Russia to send US astronauts to the space station?,Is it true that Russia has already begun to pay for US astronauts to the space station?,Is it true that the US has a contractual obligation to pay for Russian astronauts to the space station?,Is the US under a contract with Russia to send astronauts to the space station?
Did this study estimate the average miscarriage rate for COVID-19 vaccines in 2010?,Has this study been retracted for reasons other than reported in this report?,Was this study conducted by a physician?,Is this study a reference to other study that has used COVID-19 vaccine as a factor in miscarriage?
Is the April 22 jump in COVID-19 cases related to the election?,Was the increase in cases due to the election?,Is there any research that suggests this increase in cases was caused by the election?,Were there any additional COVID-19 cases in April 19?,Will this cause a resurgence of COVID-19 cases?
Did over 4.1 billion people watch the Queen's funeral?,Will the Queen's funeral have a large audience?,Was the Queen's funeral expected to draw larger crowds than expected?,Was the Queen's funeral expected to draw a large crowd?,Did the Queen's funeral draw a large audience?
Was the nurse in Alabama hospitalized following her COVID-19 vaccination?,Was the nurse in Alabama required to re-vaccine following her COVID-19 vaccination?,Is it considered necessary to re-vaccine a nurse in Alabama?,Is this a new re-vaccine requirement?
Are 2.8 million people granted their settled status and over 3 million applications?,Does 2.7 million people have settled status and over 3 million applications?,Has the government settled more people with their settled status?,Has the government granted people more settled status with their settled status?,Have there been more applications for settle status?,Have the government withdrawn from settled status with people who have made more applications than those in granted status?
Is there information to suggest that the only couple at the time of the fire was white?,Did the white couple work the day of the blaze?,Are all three families killed in this fire?,Was the white couple at work at the time of this fire?,Was the white couple the only one in the office when the fire started?
Did taxpayer funds pay Farnham for the use of his 1986 song You're the Voice?,Did the song You're the Voice originate in the UK?,Did Farnham receive a tax subsidy for this ad?,Did Farnham contribute money for this advert?,Did this ad contain a song that was used in it?
Has the percentage of households connected to electricity supply increased between 2001 and 2014?,Is the percentage of households connected to electricity supply increased between 2001 and 2014?,Has the percentage of households connected to electricity supply increased over 5.8 million households?,Does this data indicate that the rate of households connected to electricity supply increased between 2001 and 2014?
Did any of these conditions place strict limits on how an Indigenous man could leave a reservation?,Did the conditions that imposed the restrictions on the Indigenous man in question include a denial of an exemption certificate?,Did the conditions that were placed on the Indigenous man in question allow them to leave a reservation?,Did these conditions place strict limits on how an Indigenous man could leave a reservation?
Do protesting farmers at Delhi borders rehearse a tractor rally for Republic Day?,Has this footage of protesting farmers at Delhi borders been released?,Does this video essentially show protesting farmers at Delhi borders rehearsing a tractor rally for Republic Day?,Are these protesting farmers attending a tractor rally prior to January 26?
"Did anyone receiving income benefits in England or Wales be awarded as much as £29,900 a year?",Did it take into account other factors such as income?,Is there no information on how much the immigrants getting benefit paid?,Do these immigrants receive this benefit on a yearly basis in England or Wales?
Did Obama create over two million jobs in the first four months of his presidency?,Has Trump created two million jobs on an increase over Reagan?,Have Trump's gains in job creation been greater than Reagan's?,Has Trump increased the average growth rate of his jobs creation?,Has Trump increased the average rate of hiring jobs?
Did a Danish study found that masks did not work?,Did Sweden experience zero deaths from the virus?,Are 1.8 million children in Sweden not wearing masks for the last two years?,Have the Swedish children experienced zero deaths from the virus?,Have Swedish children not been wearing masks for the past two years?
Did the FBI pay Twitter $3.5 million to censor information from the public?,Did Twitter pay the FBI $3.5 million to censor information from the public?,Did Twitter pay the FBI $3.5 million to censor information from the public?,Is it true that the FBI paid Twitter $3.5 million to censor information from the public?
Does Obama have an idea of how to reduce the long-term debt and deficit?,Do Obama and Trump have an idea of how to reduce long-term debt and deficit?,Does Obama say he's going to reduce the long-term debt and deficit by $4 trillion?,Do Obama and Trump have an idea of how to reduce the long-term debt and deficit by 4 trillion?
Has Trump's vote increased in 20 years?,Is Trump's vote higher in 20 years than prior to Trump's election?,Was Trump's vote higher than 20 years ago?,Does the current President of the US have higher voter turnout?,Has Trump's election resulted in a higher voter turnout?
Is the statement true?,Is it accurate to state that a suspect was shot 68 times?,Is the amount of bullets used in the incident stated in this statement?,Were the bullets used in this incident completely zero?,Do I have proof in this statement?,Is the number of bullets used in this incident based on a true crime story?
What is the 13th time the Supreme Court has ruled this way?,Is there a history of this ruling?,Were any of the decisions in this case unanimous?,Did there be any dissenting opinions?,Did this ruling impact any other Supreme Court rulings?,Do these decisions make any sense in general?
Does having an entirely Democrat congressional delegation increase the per capita stimulus dollars that the state receives per person by $460?,Does having an entirely Democratic congressional delegation increase the per capita stimulus dollars that the state receives per person by $460?,Was the legislature in the state in 2009 majority Democratic?,Was the legislature in the state in 2009 majority Republican?
Did the Norwegian government fund a multi year research project to find out if white paint is racist?,Did the Norwegian government fund a multi year research project to find out if white paint is racist in 2023?,Did the Norwegian government fund a multi year research project to find out if white paint is racist in 2023?
Did Darling vote to add more than $1 billion in additional spending for programs like education and health care?,Did Darling vote to add more than $1 billion in additional spending for programs like education and health care?,Did Darling vote to cut programs such as education and health care?,Did Darling vote to reduce programs such as education and health care?
Did Frankel take a 40 percent pay raise while West Palm Beach lost jobs?,Did Frankel say West Palm Beach lost jobs?,Has the city lost jobs since Frankel took office?,Have the jobs in West Palm Beach increased during the mayor's tenure?,Have these jobs come back?,Would you think that the city lost jobs during Frankel's term as mayor?
Has anyone been seen on either of these boys?,Has anyone been notified about the missing boy?,Is there anything more specific I can ask?,Is this the first or last time this child has been missing?,Were any other missing boy/s contacted?,Have all of these missing children been found?
"Does he say he won the Democratic primary ""without one... negative TV spot""?",Did Donald Trump have a negative TV spot during his 2012 presidential campaign?,Did Donald Trump not win the 2012 Democratic Presidential primaries due to negative TV ads?,Was Donald Trump not a member of the Democratic Party at the time he won the primary?
Did California City Police say the cages would be destroyed by October 2020?,Did California City Police say the cages would be destroyed by July 2021?,Did California City Police say that the cages would be destroyed by 2021?,Do California City Police report that the cages were still there in 2021?
Is crime going up?,Does crime go up in other states?,Has crime going up since Gatsas?,Has the crime increase been attributed to Gatsas?,Does Gatsas control these crimes?,Did the crime increase due to Gatsas?,Has crime in Manchester decreased under Gatsas?
Did Tesla hire someone to address social media escalations aimed at the CEO?,Did the specialist job description involve an email?,Did the specialist post the job description before Musk was a CEO?,Did the job listing have specific responsibilities regarding communications in connection with the job duties?,Did Musk currently work for Tesla?
Did 9/11 cause more suicide attacks than there had been before 9/11?,Is each month after 9/11 as many suicide attacks against the United States as there were in all the years leading up to 9/11?,Has 9/11 caused the number of suicide attacks more than the ones following 9/11?,Did 9/11 cause the number of suicide attacks?
Is Congress contesting for just 230 of the 543 Lok Sabha seats?,Is Congress contesting for more than 220 of the 543 Lok Sabha seats?,Is the Congress contesting for all of the 543 lok sabha seats?,Has Congress been allowed to form the government under any circumstances?
Does Devos' statement say only 0.02% of kids are likely to die when they go back to school?,Does Devos' statement say only 0.02% of kids are likely to die when they go back to school?,Is Devos' statement accurate?,Does Devos' statement accurately reflect statistics on the health risks that come with returning to school?
Did the campaigns launch in 2011?,Did more than 20 million individuals take the HIV test?,Did the campaign establish trust in the health system?,Did the campaign establish confidence in the health system?,Did the campaign result in the testing of the public?,Did people cite their faith in the health system?,Did the campaign inspire confidence?
Did Amazon have the product offered on this website?,Was this product a true offer?,Did the website offer this offer to customers?,Did this site give customers access to this site?,Did this site do this on a regular basis?,Did the website offer products as a free Christmas present?,Does the website list this information on a regular basis?
Is Kanye West the only person to garner tens of thousands of votes in the election?,Did the Facebook post post screenshots of states by state?,Is Kanye West the only person to garner tens of thousands of votes in the election?,Is Kanye West the only person to garner tens of thousands of votes in the election?
Did the U.S. laws allow children as young as 11 to get vaccinated without their parents' consent?,Was the law originally intended to prevent certain diseases?,Does the United States have laws allowing vaccines for some diseases?,Is there any evidence this law allows vaccinating children as young as 11 at a rate that is consistent with how they are vaccinated?
Did these asteroids happen to pass across Earth in April of 2021?,Did these asteroids be “bigger than football fields”?,Is it possible to accurately estimate how large these asteroid’s would be in 2021?,Would any of these asteroid’s impact cause any significant seismic disturbances?
"Do Muslims make Rs 7 to 8,000 per Hindu funeral?",Does this amount vary with ethnicity or religion?,"Does Hindu funeral have cost as Rs 7 to 8,000?",Is this amount different with other Muslim funeral costs?,Is the value of Hindu funerals in Karnataka the same as Muslim funerals?
Is it true that stacking four Mexican peso coins makes the image of the Aztec Sun Stone?,Is it true that stacking four Mexican peso coins makes the image of the Aztec Sun Stone?,Is it true that stacking four Mexican peso coins make the image of the Aztec Sun Stone?,Is it true that stacking four Mexican peso coins makes the image of the Aztec Sun Stone?
Did 1.5 lakh sub centers and primary health centers undergo the transformation into health and wellness centers?,Will this transformation increase primary health services in the region?,Will there be improved services at these health and wellness centers?,Will this transformation increase the ability to provide comprehensive primary healthcare services?,Does this transformation result in reduced health care costs in the region?
Did this disaster cause thousands of cows to froze to death?,Did the farms that froze to death are the ones that could be bothered to take care of their animals?,Did the farms that froze to death not take the necessary precautions to protect their animals?,Did any animals die?
Did 89 members of Congress hold dual citizenship with Israel?,Did the majority of members hold dual citizenship with Israel?,Is the percentage of members of Congress holding dual citizenship with Israel higher than 20%?,Are all 89 members of Congress holding dual citizenship with Israel?,Are any of the 89 congressional members holding dual citizenship with Israel?
"Has the unemployment rate quadrupled since the economy slipped into recession, first in 2015 and later in 2020?","Has the unemployment rate quadrupled since the economy slipped into recession, first in 2015 and later in 2020?",Are the unemployment rates at the rate they were when the economy was in recession?
Did 2 toddlers die in this explosion?,Did this explosion occur in April 2022?,Did the explosion occur in a school?,Did this explosion occur in any other country?,Did the parents of these 2 toddlers receive help?,Will there be an investigation into this cause of death?,Does the cause of this explosion remain under investigation?
Can a person under the age of 12 be euthanized in the Netherlands?,Would a person under the age of 12 not be able to be euthanized in the Netherlands?,Would a person under the age of 12 be able to be euthanized in the Netherlands?
Did Foot Locker donate $200 million to Black Lives Matter?,Did Black Lives Matter break into any Foot Locker stores?,Did Foot Locker store owners enact any protests?,Did Foot Locker donate $200 million to Black Lives Matter?,Did Black Lives Matter attack any stores in Minneapolis?
Has COVID-19 vaccination contributed to more deaths than any other vaccine over the last 50 years?,Has COVID-19 vaccination contributed to less deaths than any other vaccine over the past 50 years?,Do deaths associated with COVID-19 vaccines occur in other countries?,Has there been any increase in the number of COVID-19 deaths in Australia over the last 50 years?
"Did the overdose kill more people, aged 18-45, than covid, car accidents, cancer, & suicide combined?","Did more people, aged 18-45, die of Fentanyl overdoses in 2020 than covid, car accidents, cancer, & suicide combined?",Does the CDC apportion Fentanyl overdoses based on a year?
Is it true that people in Africa walk 200 miles or more to vote?,Is it true that people in Africa walk more than two hundred miles to vote?,Does it include people living in cities?,Is there evidence in this article that most Africans walk less than that distance to vote?,Is there evidence that the majority of Africans have no access to transportation to get to the polling place?
Did this business owner pay bills on behalf of the Ohio River Bridge for five months?,Did this business owner pay bills on behalf of the Ohio River Bridge for five months?,Is the alleged Kentucky business owner responsible for paying the Ohio River Bridge’s electricity bills?,Is the Ohio River Bridge owner responsible for paying any electric bills for five months?
How many years after assuming office did Bello claim that there is no strike in Kogi state?,Are there any strike or riots in Kogi state?,Is this statement true?,Does Bello imply that there were no strikes in Kogi state six years ago?,Were there any strikes in Kogi state six years ago?
Has the arrest rate for rape decreased more than half in Texas in the past year?,Has the percentage of rape arrests in Texas decreased dramatically under Abbott?,Does the rate of arrests for rape in Texas consistently increase during Abbott's term?,Is the increase due to the increasing volume of criminal cases?
Did the Rafale crash during training in India in September 2020?,Was the Rafale a fighter jet?,Was the Rafale a single wing fighter jet?,Was the Rafale a single wing fighter?,Did the Rafale crash during training in India in September 2020?
Are congressional salaries going up by over 231% over the last 30 years?,"Does Congress say it needs to raise their salaries by $4,500?",Is Congress putting a stop to raising their salaries?,Does this raise come under any other restrictions on salaries?,Is this raise based on a higher salary in a previous year?
Did Bill Nelson's Senate campaign win 56 percent of its votes?,Did Bill Nelson's House campaign win fewer than 60 percent of its votes?,Is Nelson running for governor again?,Is Bill Nelson likely to win re-election?,Is there sufficient evidence to support this assertion?,Is there any evidence to suggest that Nelson might be doing so?
Does this rate differ by gender?,Is this rate based solely on earnings?,Did this rate show up on a website?,Were women earning less on average per dollar than men?,Can we say women make 77 cents for every dollar?,Were men earning more per dollar?,Is this figure based solely on earnings?
Did Allen West perform illegal acts?,Did a report state Allen West should have been in prison for 11 years?,Was Allen West convicted of misdemeanor acts?,Did Allen West perform these actions in the Army?,Did the Army say that Allen West merited a court martial?,Was a report by the Army stating Allen West had merited the court martial?
Did 700 000 learners write their matric?,Did 120 000 pass?,Did 70 000 pass their matric?,Did 70 000 learners write their matric?,Did 120 000 pass the matric?,Did 1400 000 students pass the matric?,Did 70 000 learners fail the matric?,Did 100 000 students fail the matric?
Did Steyer support reparations for slaves in South Carolina in 2020?,Is Steyer the only person who supports reparations for slaves in South Carolina?,Was Steyer the only person at the 2020 South Carolina Democratic debate who believed in reparations for slaves?,Was Steyer the only person at the 2020 South Carolina Democratic debate who believed in reparations for slaves?
"Is it true that the average CEO makes $10,000 more every day... than the average worker makes every year?",Is this true?,"Can one assume the average CEO made $10,000 more per day per worker?",Would one assume this statistic to be correct?,Do some of the most successful CEOs have good luck making a salary?
Is this train long?,Is the length of the train exactly 4km?,Is this train going to supply coal to power plants?,Does the train cost a significant amount?,Will this train carry more coal than a normal commuter train?,Does this train have a train station?,Are there any restrictions on the train?
Did Lamar Smith support the Wall Street bailout in 2008?,Do reforms that would assure these bailouts would never happen again?,Did Smith support reforms that would ensure these bailouts would never happen again?,Does Smith support reforms that would assure these bailouts would never happen again?,Was Lamar Smith in favor of the Wall Street bailout in 2008?
"Is President Trump trying to make a $451 billion in Medicare cuts ""in the middle of a deadly pandemic""?","Is it true President Trump is trying to make $451 billion in Medicare cuts ""in the middle of a deadly pandemic""?","Does President Trump use the word ""deadly"" to describe a medical pandemic?"
Will WhatsApp be closed from 11.30pm to 6am?,Will WhatsApp be shut from 11.30pm to 6am?,Will WhatsApp be open for business from 11am to 6am?,Did the ad for WhatsApp run on a network other than WhatsApp?,Are WhatsApp open for business from 11am to 6am?
Does Christie have no saments in the pension system?,Does Christie say in his statement that the pension system is broke?,Did Chris Christie pay one dollar in state money into the pension system?,Does Christie make public statements about their financial situation in this election cycle?,Does Christie not say if the government paid $100 in state money into the pension system?
Is Iran stockpiling 10 times as much enriched uranium as it had in 2016?,Is Iran currently stockpiling that amount of enriched uranium?,Is Iran currently planning a nuclear test on the American nuclear platform?,Is Iran still stockpiling enriched uranium?
Was this money spent on each employee only contacting two people each?,Was this money spent on each employee only contacting two people each?,Was this money spent on each employee only contacting two people each?,Did this company use all of this funds to make decisions?,Did the company use this money to make decisions?,Did any of this money go to the employee's own expenses?
Did 1 in 9 children experience severe adverse reactions in the Pfizer clinical trial?,Did all 1 in 9 children with severe adverse reactions go to the pediatrician and have a repeat prescription?,Did the pediatrician prescribe a dose of CFS-based contraception?,Was there any research that showed that 1 in 9 children with severe adverse reactions were not able to perform daily activities?
Has Obama's administration added 2.8 million private sector jobs?,Is this the second consecutive month that Obama's administration has added jobs?,Is Obama's administration able to add millions of jobs in manufacturing?,Has the economy recovered since the beginning of his administration?,Is there evidence that Obama's economy has improved after his first term in office?
"Did McConnell say, "" Hey, we should get all the ethics information in before we do the hearings ""?","Did McConnell say, "" Hey, we should get all the ethics information in before we do the hearings ""?","Did McConnell say, "" I’m sure we should get all the ethics information in before we do the hearings ""?"
Did West Bengal police attack protestors?,Was West Bengal police responsible for attacking protestors?,Does this video include any content?,Is the video a public domain video?,Did police use force against the protestors in this case?,Do protestors in this video have an official record?,Is the video from a reputable source?
Does this poll have any validity?,Do these results show a statistically impossible pattern?,Does this poll have any validity?,Did this poll take place in Pennsylvania?,Did this poll take place in Pennsylvania?,Does this poll have any validity?,Has this poll resulted in any significant changes in voter registration?
Does a father who has been active for over 4 years increase their child's chance of completing college?,Does being active for more than 4 years increase the chance of high school seniors reaching college?,Are fathers who are active with their children 98 percent more likely to graduate college?,Would fathers who are not active with their children be 98 percent more likely to graduate college?
Is it true the suspect is being charged with the theft of jewelry?,Has Tekashi 69 been targeted by another crime?,Did the suspect attempt to pawn the jewelry?,Did Tekashi 69 use the jewelry as a weapon?,Was the suspect arrested at a police station or somewhere else?
Did Romney take a pledge not to take any corporate PAC donations?,Did he take a pledge not to take corporate PAC donations?,Did he make any pledges to reaffirm these pledges?,Did Romney make a promise to take corporate PAC donations?,Was Romney willing to take any corporate PAC donations?
Did a newspaper cartoon imagine the online news consumption in 1934?,Did the cartoon depict a newspaper in 1926?,Are there any other cartoons depicting the online news consumption in 1934?,Is the depiction of the newspaper cartoon an exact recreation of the actual newspaper article?,Is a newspaper cartoon depicting the newspaper online based on a cartoon that depicts a newspaper editorial?
Was the photo taken in Ethiopia?,Did this person murder two children?,Did they leave any footprints of the incident?,Have there been prosecutions of similar cases?,Did this person have a criminal record?,Did this person not file a report after the incident?,Did this person commit a similar crime in the past?
Does the image reproduce housekeeping and grooming instructions from a 1949 Singer sewing manual?,Was the fabric used in this image from the Singer sewing manual?,Are the housekeeping and grooming instructions contained in this image?,Is the image in this image from the Singer sewing manual?,Is this image the full image?
Did any planes crash into the World Trade Center?,Did videos of 9/11 show planes crashed into the World Trade Center?,Did video of 9/11 show planes crashed into the World Trade Centre?,Did video of 9/11 show planes crash into the World Trade Center?,Did the video of 9/11 show planes crash into the World Trade Center?
Did Republicans lose congressional seats from 2018?,Are there any numbers that suggest Republicans lost congressional seats during 2018?,Did all Republican seats from 2018 be lost to Democrats?,Is there a measurable difference between the percentages of GOP seats being lost and the percentages of Democrats that were lost?,Is there any evidence that democrats lost some of the Republican seats from 2018?
Did a Recruiting Office in Russia have a fake?,"Did this recruiter give you 20,000 hryvnia for this fake?",Did the recruiter accept any bribes?,Did the recruiter accept a bribe from the recruiter?,Will this bribe come to an end?
Does this funding cut a lot?,Did this funding cut a lot?,Did this funding cut a lot?,Is the proposed funding cut for Medicare a big deal?,Can this funding cut be seen by a congressional committee?,Is this proposed funding cut a big deal?,Is this funding cut effective?
Are there longer times at which orona viruses live?,Are there longer times at which Janata curfews kill viruses?,Do the two curfews kill the virus at once?,Are either orona viruses more resistant to janata curfew?,Do janata curfews work in an isolated setting?
Is his deficit plan 4 trillion?,Was there any rebuttal to Simpson-Bowles?,Did he make any adjustments to Simpson-Bowles?,Would his deficit plan make these adjustments if passed?,Would he rewrite Simpson-Bowles?,Would he rewrite the entire budget?
Was the novel published in 1981 or before the 2019 coronavirus?,Was the novel in 1981 made in the year before the 2019 coronavirus?,Did the novel in 1981 contain any information that predicted the 2019 coronavirus?,Is the novel in 1981 accurate about the 2019 coronavirus?
Is the number of illegal border crossings up 173% from 1 year ago or 28% from January?,Was there a change since January that increased illegal border crossings?,Was there a change in the stance of Obama on illegal border crossings?,Did Biden try to increase the number of illegal border crossings?
Are there more children leaving home state to go to another state for educational purposes?,"Are 30,000 of these kids from New Jersey?",Is the percentage of these kids from New Jersey larger than any other state?,Did these children go to another state because of economic reasons?,"Did the 30,000 children from New Jersey make the greatest economic contribution from a home state?"
Is it true that no one got a dime from the $70 million raised for the Florida Disaster Fund?,Did a representative for the Florida Disaster Fund give any explanation for why the hurricane was not declared a disaster?,Was the amount of money raised from the hurricane able to pay for anything?
Did Olive Garden discontinue the chain before 2020?,Did Olive Garden close down in the year prior to 2020?,Did Olive Garden close down in the year prior to 2020?,Did Olive Garden close down in the year prior to 2020?,Did Olive Garden close down in the year prior to 2020?,Did Olive Garden open in the year preceding 2020?,Did Olive Garden open in the year preceding 2020?
Are any of the subsidies for oil and gas companies worth a total of 88 percent?,Are there any other subsidies for oil and gas companies that would provide a total of $45 billion annually?,Is there any doubt that subsidizing oil and gas companies would save the U.S. $45 billion in annual government subsidies?
Did African Americans spend more time in prison compared to whites?,Has incarceration of African Americans decreased in this period?,Will the current trend continue?,Are black and white populations incarcerating much more?,Did incarceration of African Americans decrease in this period?
Did prices increase during Trump's term?,Did the post incorrectly claim prices increased during Trump's term?,Did the price of oil increase during Trump's term?,Did the post post include any information to support the claim?,Did the post post specific information regarding the price of oil when Trump left office?
Did this video come out in May 2022?,Was this video shared widely?,Has this video ever been shared online before?,Was this video made of an actual fight?,Did this video include any other characters other than the customer and check-in worker?,Has this video ever been featured on TV shows or movies?,Did this video feature characters other than the customer and check-in worker?
Has Nelson introduced more than 860 bills in congress?,Did Nelson attempt to pass any bills?,Did Nelson introduce any bills in committee?,Did Nelson have any bills passed in committee?,Did Nelson propose any bills in the Senate?,Has this number of bills passed in congress?,Are there any laws that Nelson has introduced that have been defeated in the Senate?
Did four times as many people die from stabs to death than rifles?,Did stabs to death cost America more lives than rifles?,Did guns die more lives than rifles?,Did stabs to death cost America more lives than rifles?,Did gun-related deaths equal rifle deaths?
Does Stallone say he does not want 'wokeness' in his life?,Did Stallone reject a $500 million movie offer from Disney?,Is it true that Disney offered Stallone a $500 million film offer?,Did Disney pay Stallone a fee to make the film?,Is this the first time Stallone has rejected a movie offer?
Do the Covid-19 variants have planned release dates?,"Does the WHO, John Hopkins University, Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation and the World Economic forum have any information about when these variants will be released?",Has any type of information about when these variants will be released been available?,Are there any documents that explain how these variants will be released?
Do bellies melt by drinking lemon and eggplant?,Does drinking the drink of lemon and eggplant remove belly fat in 7 days?,Does this drink help to reduce belly fat?,Are belly fat melt by drinking lemon and eggplant?,Are bellies removed by drinking lemon and eggplant?,Is lemon and eggplant an effective way to dissolve belly fat?
Are families made less money today than they did a generation ago?,Are the average families not in the top 10 percent making less money today than they did a generation ago?,Did the median household income increase by more than 2% between a generation ago and 2011?,Has the average family made more money than they did in 2010?
Has the Biden administration decided to cancel $0 in student debt?,Was the Biden administration involved in canceling student debt?,Did the Biden administration announce this policy change?,Did the Biden administration cancel student debt?,No Answer>> No Answer>>No Answer>> Yes Answer>>?
Did Pfizer's CEO announce his goal to reduce the number of people by 50% by 2023?,Did Pfizer's CEO announce that he wanted to reduce the number of people in the world by 50% by 2023?,Did Pfizer's CEO claim that it would take a large amount of money to reduce the number of people in the world by 50% by 2023?
Did two Muslim men kick food served to them by a Dalit cook at a quarantine centre?,Did the Dalit cook kick the food served to the Muslim men?,Did the Muslim men kick the food served to them by the Dalit cook at a quarantine centre?,Has the Dalit cook been charged with any crime or culpable in relation to the incident?
Was the number of student killed in school shootings higher than the number of US military personnel killed in active duty?,Was the number of student killed in school shootings higher than the number of U.S. military personnel killed in active duty?,Has this percentage of U.S. students killed in school shootings declined in the past 10 years?
Is Richard Robert Rawling a Trump supporter?,Was he prosecuted for this charge?,Did Rawling play a role in changing the election results?,Has this person been criminally convicted before for his role in this case?,Was any of the charges that Rawling is a part of against Trump and other Republicans?
Did sixty Klan members commit suicide after it was announced that Harriet Tubman's image would be placed on the $20 bill?,Did more Klan members commit suicide after it was announced that Harriet Tubman's image would be placed on the $20 bill?,Was it reported that 60 Klan members committed suicide after it was announced that Harriet Tubman's image would be placed on the $20 bill?
Is it true that there are absolutely no studies to indicate any benefit to masking K-12 students in schools?,Has there ever been research to indicate any benefit to masking K-12 students in schools?,Do clinical studies in this field provide any support for the claim that masking K-12 students in schools is a benefit?
Did Mr. Obama promise to repay the taxpayers in full?,Does the commitment to repay the taxpayers in full meet his words?,Is it true that Mr. Obama made good on this promise?,Is it true that Mr. Obama is now working towards repaying the taxpayers in full?,Does Mr. Obama consider any amount from the tax payers to be worth insufficient in comparison to the amount being spent?
Was the picture tweeted before?,Was Walker tweeting more than 14 months ago?,Is there information about the original tweeter?,Is this tweet the same as the original tweet?,Are there any other versions of the original tweet?,Did the image originally represent the same restaurant?,.. Have any other tweets associated with this image been cropped?
Are there specific age limits for the COVID-19 vaccine?,Do all children in the UK aged five to 11 age range at risk for side effects?,Are side effects of the COVID-19 vaccines expected to result in a developmental delay?,Is there other evidence to support this policy change?,Have the COVID-19 vaccines prevented development delays?
Did a listing on eBay for the House Speaker Podium exist following the insurrection at the U.S. Capitol?,Was there any evidence indicating this was a true listing on eBay?,Is this eBay listing a true listing for the House Speaker Podium?,Is the House Speaker Podium still in use?
"Is Yohani De Silva the Sri Lankan singer who has won the hearts of Indians with her song ""Manike Mage Hithe""?",Will Yohani De Silva be ambassador between the two countries?,Did Yohani De Silva win the hearts of the Indian?,Has Yohani De Silva rehearsed for other songs?
Are there plans to divide Ealing into 7 local zones?,Will sanctions restrict the number of days per year people are allowed to drive outside their own zone?,Will sanctions restrict the number of days per year people are allowed to drive outside their own zone?,Will sanctions affect the numbers of people allowed to drive outside their own zone?
Is this photo of the wedding crash a composite of a couple being killed?,Is this wedding crash a composite of several events?,Did the wedding accident in China involve more than 70 people?,Did this wedding crash take place in a large city?,Is this wedding crash in China a common occurrence?
Did bidders press the button to implode Trump Plaza in Atlantic City?,"Did bidding open on December 1, 2020?",Does Trump Plaza have a specific purpose?,"Did the bidding open on December 1, 2020?",Was there a successful bid?,Have bidders reported a monetary profit from Trump Plaza?
Is the United States Supreme Court involved in overturning elections in the 2020 election?,Was the United States Supreme Court involved in overturning elections in the 2020 elections?,Did the United States Supreme Court vote to overturn elections in the 2020 election?,Was the United States Supreme Court involved in overturning elections in the 2020 election?
Did this building have pre-rigged for controlled demolition?,Was this building pre-rigged for controlled demolition in a manner similar to the bomb attack?,Was this building pre-rigged for controlled demolition in a manner similar to the bomb attack?,Are there other examples of pre-rigged controlled demolitions?
Have any children born alive after abortions in Texas?,Has the evidence so far support this claim?,Has the evidence to support this claim gathered from multiple sources?,Is there evidence to support this claim?,Has any abortion provider reported any cases of a child born alive after abortion in Texas?,Is this evidence used by abortion providers to support their argument?
Did anyone commit these shootings?,Did anyone do these shootings?,Did any person commit these shootings?,Did these shootings come from a black male?,Did the police conduct these shootings based on race?,Did this individual commit these shootings from a black male?,Are this multiple murders by black men common?,Are these shootings on a black male basis?
Did any of these churches support abortion rights?,Was one of the churches attacked by an arsonist because of a religious requirement?,Was one of these churches identified as a non-governmental organization?,Does the statement say all churches supported abortion rights?,Did any of these churches commit acts of terrorism?,Did any of these churches have any employees involved in these attacks?
"Are 60,000 disabled citizens in Ohio stuck on waiting lists?",Does this number represent all the disabled citizens in Ohio that are stuck on waiting lists?,Is this number representative of the disabled population of Ohio?,Are the disabled citizens in Ohio currently unable to access healthcare due to Medicaid expansion?,2019 by Eads Institute for the Common Good. All rights reserved.?
Do doctors and medical students have legal permission to perform pelvic exams on patients who are under anesthesia?,In which 45 states are these doctors and medical students permitted to perform pelvic exams without explicit consent?,Is it illegal to perform pelvic exams under anesthesia?,Are all doctors and medical students legally allowed to perform pelvic exams on patients under anesthesia?
"Does this ""bowling ball"" have any affect on car qualification in Japan?",Did this bowling ball cause any harm to the hood of the car?,Did the hood of the car get dents from the bowling ball?,Did this bowling ball result in significant damage to the hood of the car?
Is this plan sponsored by the World Economic Forum?,Is this plan based upon the World Food Plan?,Is the food plan based upon the world population?,Is the goal of this plan?,Is this plan within the 2030 timeframe?,Is this plan based upon an agricultural industry?
Is 2020 2020 a year to survive for businesses?,Can businesses benefit from 2020?,Can business have profit or loss in 2020?,Is 2020 2020 for businesses?,Can businesses have profit or loss in 2020?,Can Tata make business survive in 2020?,Is 2020 2020 a good time for businesses to consider profitability?
"Do Chinese officials want approval to kill 20,000 patients with coronavirus?","Would China need authorization to kill 20,000 patients due to this disease?","Can China seek approval from a court to kill 20,000 patients with coronavirus?",Is this action legal?,Are there any medical issues associated with these moves?
Did Australia allow a 'late term abortion'?,Did Australia permit all six 'late term abortion' states to have a similar policy?,Did the 'late term abortion' laws allow Australia to make political decisions about abortion?,Are abortion rights in Australia a controversial matter?,Does Australia have a similar policy to many other countries?
Was the budget of volunteer fire departments reduced by 75 percent in the last legislative session?,Has the Texas legislature managed to reduce the budget of volunteer fire departments?,Is the Texas legislature controlled by the Republican party?,Is the Texas legislature responsible for the budget reduction?,Is the Texas legislature considered part of the Republican Party?
Will the European Union control our fishing rights?,What are the benefits of this deal?,Will the EU have any control over our fishing rights?,Is this plan to privatize fisheries sustainable?,Is this policy inherently harmful?,Is there an explanation for this move?,Is there a legal basis for this change?
"Do some homes on and around the lake for under $150,000?",Are there any currently available homes for sale on and around the lake?,"Are any of the homes listed in the list price range $150,000-$150,000?","Can there be any people selling homes in Oswego Lake under $150,000?","Are there any homes currently for sale that are not listed in the list price range of $150,000-$150,000?"
Has this man been convicted of sexual assault in Manipur?,Is this man now considered innocent?,Do this two people have their own identities?,Have these two men ever been charged in this case?,Can the man in the photo be identified?,Is this man a government official?,Are these two persons based in New Delhi or Los Angeles?
Did any of these ballot issues lead to a 6% increase in illegal immigration or lower?,Did any of these ballot issues result in an increase in illegal immigration?,Did any of these ballot issues contribute to a 6% increase in illegal immigration or lower?,Did any of these ballot issues contributed to a 6% increase in illegal immigration or lower?
Do these schools have a higher percentage of performing worse than average than the community public school?,Is this a nationwide study?,Is this study a national survey?,Were the numbers derived from one national survey?,Is this information from a national study?,Were the data collected from several surveys?
Is there any evidence to suggest that this protest was taken place in May 2020?,Can this event have been the cause for this incident?,Did protesters at this event be assaulted?,Was this type of violence a regular occurrence?,Was any incident a frequent one?,Did this protest event take place in the fall?
Was Shashi Tharoor seen dancing and clapping to a Bollywood song at the Congress Chintan Shivir in Rajasthan?,Did Tharoor dance and clap to a Bollywood song at the Congress Chintan Shivir?,Did Tharoor have a political party?
Did Planned Parenthood CEO Cecile Richards admit 86 percent of their revenue comes from abortion?,Are Planned Parenthood's revenues solely derived from abortions?,Did Richards accept her stance on abortion in a public forum?,Did Richards concede that 86% of Planned Parenthood's revenue comes from abortion?
Did the occupiers try to push out the equipment?,Did the equipment remain at the camp for several months?,Do all the occupiers have any experience with a manual labor task like this?,Was the equipment pushed out by the occupiers through a manual labor task?,Was there an actual manual labor attempt?
Did Kean have the largest margin for a gubernatorial candidate in Jersey history?,Did Kean win his 1985 election by any major margin?,Did Kean win any of his previous elections as governor of New Jersey?,Has there been any other gubernatorial election in the state of New Jersey that Kean could be considered for?
"Did the Democratic Senators in summer 2022 vote to hire an army of 87,000 IRS agents?",Did the Democrats approve this policy?,Did the IRS agents plan to audit and harass the middle class?,Was this proposal endorsed in the 2016 election?,Was this policy approved in the 2018 election?,Did this plan impact the middle class?
Did Dodd-Frank wipe out 40 percent of small- and mid-size banks that lend money to small businesses?,Did Dodd-Frank wipe out over 40 percent of small and mid-size banks that loan money to small businesses?,Is this a complete list of the banks that lost the most of the Dodd-Frank rule?,Is this a complete list of the banks that lost the most of the Dodd-Frank rule?
Was the woman sentenced to up to seven years for opening a fire at a McDonald's restaurant after workers forgot to put bacon on her burgers?,Was she sentenced to prison for three years or more for setting the fire?,Will the woman serve a minimum of nine months in prison if she is sent to prison?,Is the woman's sentence consistent with a previous conviction?
Will Medicaid spending increase by 20 percent compared with the 2015 bill?,Whether or not 2020 Medicaid spending will be more than the 2015 bill?,Hopefully this House bill will allow Medicaid spending to grow by 20 percent?,Will 2019 Medicaid spending increase over the 2015 bill?,Will the 2011 Medicaid spending increase be less than the 2015 bill?
Did Dr. Hodgkins work with science?,Is there evidence that this would happen?,Is there evidence to suggest that this would happen?,Is the idea that 6 billion people would be slaughtered and starved likely to occur?,Is it really a realistic amount of people?
Did Shah Rukh Khan donate from his production for the Ram Mandir Trust?,Did Shah Rukh Khan donate from his Red Chillies Entertainment production for the Ram Mandir Trust?,Did Shah Rukh Khan donate from his production for the Ram Mandir Trust?,Did Shah Rukh Khan donate from his production for the Ram Mandir Trust?
Did the person claim to be showing the wounded female veterans?,Did the person claim the images was from an official U.S. government database?,Did the original image appear in print media?,Was the original image for the civilian public domain?,Did the original image seem authentic?,Was the original image authentic?,Did the original image show a victim of a sexual assault or domestic violence?
Is this bear resident?,Is the bear mother male?,Is the bear bear female?,Is there evidence of a bear in the crawl space?,Did this bear have cubs?,Is this bear's mom female?,Is this bear in the crawl space?,Is this bear male?
Was er auch die WHO bekannt?,Was er heute voraussichtlich das in medyzin gelesen hat. Is er heute mit dem medyzin gelesen?,Was er heute mit dem medyzin gelesen?,Was er heute mit dem medyzin gelesen?
Have heartbeats started in an equine baby less than 3 days and do fingerprints occur in an equine baby over 3 weeks?,Did the heartbeats begin in the equine baby less than 2 days after an equine baby was born?,Did the equine baby have fingerprints and heartbeats at a different time from the equine baby?
Did CDC make a mistake?,Did CDC reduce the count of FL COVID-19 cases?,Did CDC make a mistake?,Did CDC decrease the number of FL COVID-19 cases?,Are there currently more FL COVID-19 cases than FL COVID-19 cases?,Is FL COVID-19 more likely to occur in Florida?
Does it need to have a voter ID to vote in the election?,Can I challenge a voter's list if I have no voter ID?,Is there a limit to the number of challenges under Section 49A?,Can I challenge a voter's list under Section 49A?,Can I challenge a voter's list under Section 49A?
Does this claim refer to uncompensated care at the ER?,"Do many ER's charge $1,100 for uncompensated care?",Is this a significant amount of money?,Is the majority of these individuals insured?,Is there a significant number of these individuals in this country?
Did these people serve together on this committee before?,Did the two African Americans ever serve together on the committee before?,Did the Democratic candidate mention this as being the first time two African Americans ever served on the same committee?,Did it happen in other years?,Did this person not previously cite other black senators?
Can the clothing industry add up to 10% of global emissions?,Does the clothing industry make much of this pollution?,Does the clothing industry contribute to the climate crisis?,Is clothing industry causing as much of this pollution as the fossil fuel industry?,Do textile industries contribute to the climate crisis?,Have the clothing industry made major contributions to climate change?
Did this teen use any illegal abortion pill?,Did this teen use the aforementioned abortion pill in the past?,Has this teen ever been found to have illegally used any medication?,Will this teen face incarceration?,Will this teen ever go to jail for this felony?
Did Obama’s health care law increase insurance costs by up to 200 percent?,Did the price of insurance increase as the cost of the Explorer increased by as much?,Did Obama’s health care law cost a new Explorer the same amount as insurance?,Does the cost of insurance increase by as much as the Explorer?
Does the Presidential Transition Enhancement Act grant Trump 60 days to keep control of the military?,Does the Presidential Transition Enhancement Act require Trump to stop making decisions related to military operations?,Is there evidence supporting this interpretation of the Presidential Transition Enhancement Act?,Is this interpretation of the Presidential Transition Enhancement Act consistent with the interpretation of the Constitution?
Did the police prosecute anyone involved in this publication?,Was the police charged with any actions during this publication?,Did this publication make any reference to events in Berlin?,Did the police prosecute any individuals?,Did the police prosecute these individuals?,Is the content of this publication in any way related to these events?,Are the articles and information in this publication in any way linked to the events in Berlin?
Do people sharing the frank image on Facebook share the same claim with the image being shared?,Have Facebook users attributed the frank image to the Myanmar rebel group AA?,Is the alleged frank image being shared by Facebook multiple times?,Are the frank images shared hundreds of times on the social media site?
Did Imran Khan die?,Was Imran Khan wounded?,Did Imran Khan die during the 2022 gun attack?,Was the gun attack against Imran Khan a terrorist attack?,Has Khan since died?,Is Imran Khan alive now?,Has Khan survived?,Has Khan been formally listed as a terrorist?
Did the US receive a rousing reception for the visit?,Did Nehru & Gandhi receive a warm reception for the visit?,Is this event also referred to as the Indian-American visit?,Is this the first time that the US received a warm reception?,Is this event the first time that India has received a warm reception?
Did Chinese authorities seize 12 tons of beaver penises being smuggled in from Canada?,Have Chinese authorities seized beaver penises in the past?,Has any of the animals arrived in China in recent years?,Has the number of beaver penises arrivals increased recently?
Did Yogi not give permission for 1000 buses to be arranged by Priyanka Gandhi?,Did Yogi give permission for 1000 buses to be arranged by Priyanka Gandhi in UP?,Did Priyanka Gandhi arrange 1000 buses for migrants to go back home?,Did Yogi give permission for 1000 buses to be arranged in UP?
Has the SARS-CoV-2 virus ever been isolated?,Does CDC acknowledge this as fact?,Are the results for this virus consistent with the current consensus?,Are any viruses derived from this virus?,Was this SARS virus considered to be a threat?,Was this virus isolated from patients?,Did this virus become a threat in any specific year?
Did Microsoft file a patent for a microchip in the body?,Does the patent require a microchip in the body?,Is the microchip in the body recognized by the body?,Is it possible to have a microchip in the body?,Do Microsoft and Bill Gates have any other patents pending?
Did this man use the nuclear power he got at a Los Angeles military accident?,Did this man live in the outskirts of the city of Los Angeles?,Did this man own or manage a nuclear powered home during this time?,Has this man ever been arrested or charged with a crime?,Has this man ever lied to police about this incident?
Did Kemp spend $7 million on election campaign expenses?,Did Kemp sign a pact to contract with Dominion Voting Systems?,Does Kemp still have a significant debt lingering after gaining re-election?,Did Kemp cut a deal with Dominion Voting Systems?,Has Kemp remained in debt?,Has Kemp paid all of the debt he has incurred since leaving office?
Do major cities in the United States have higher rates of homicide?,Did the United States have the 3rd highest homicide rate in the world?,Did the United States have the 3rd highest homicide rate in the world when it excluding four major cities?,Did the United States have the 3rd highest homicide rate worldwide when it excluding 4 major cities?
Is Missouri still owed $60 million on bonds issued to build the Edward Jones Dome?,Is the Edward Jones Dome still in existence?,Have the Rams moved to other venues?,Is Missouri still owing $60 million on bonds issued to build the Edward Jones Dome?,Was the Edward Jones Dome closed for a while?
Has Nelson made more than 92 % of his election?,Does Nelson's vote make up less than 94 % of his election?,Has Nelson made fewer than 99 % of his election?,Has Nelson made more than 94 % of his election?,Is there any evidence that a majority vote would be needed to declare a majority?
Did the Bible contain a portion of the 9/11 terrorist attacks?,Was the Pentagon bombed in the 9/11 terrorist attack?,Was the Pentagon bombing a terrorist attack?,Is the Bible unburned?,Is the Pentagon bombing terrorist attack connected to the 9/11 terrorist attack?,Is there a specific reason the Bible was found in the Pentagon bombings?,Is the Bible used by Christians?
Was 85% of the people who got the coronavirus in July wearing a mask?,Was it true that there were people who were infected without wearing a mask?,Was the average amount of people who were infected with the coronavirus when they were wearing a mask?
Did Modi demolish any temples in India?,Did Modi provide land to Ambanis?,Did Ambanis get what they needed for development?,Was Ambanis' land fordevelopment made with temples?,Was Ambanis' land destruction a success?,Has Modi been responsible for any temple demolishment since 2006?
Did Obama do something to prevent these jobs going overseas?,Has Obama done this job for 7 years?,Was Obama responsible for this job movement?,Did Obama have the right to this job move?,Did Obama make these choices for this job move?,Did Obama not plan to make this jobs move?,Did Obama go on to have this job move?
Did remittances contribute 290 billion KSh in 2016?,Did remittances contribute more in 2012 than 2014?,Does remittances contribute more to Zambian GDP than 2013?,Did Zambian GDP contribute more in 2013 than 2014?,Did KSh 290 billion contributed to Zambian GDP in 2014?
"Is the 'Poshan Abhiyan' part of a plan to improve the nutritional status of children, adolescent girls, pregnant women, and lactating mothers?",Do millions of Anganwadi workers have access to smart phones to upload nutritional status?
"Did the study report that acid rain has washed down 75,000 acres of farm land in Ohio?","Was the soil soil in the soil near Ohio farmland that was previously farmland, or was it farmland that had previously been farmland?",Has the soil of Ohio farmland been affected by acid rain?
Did the woman wear multiple masks after Professor Yuen urge two mask wearing?,Did the woman wear multiple masks following Professor Yuen's urging?,Did the woman wear multiple masks after Professor Yuen's urging?,"Is there evidence that the woman wearing multiple masks is part of Dr. Yuen's ""predation strategy""?"
Did the Arctic see the largest amount of sea ice growth in 2017?,Has glacial ice in Greenland increased if sea ice in southeastern Greenland remained steady?,Would a reduction in glacial ice in Greenland in 2017 make climate change a reality?
Was the discount offered by Big Smoke Burger only for COVID-19 vaccinations?,Was there a guarantee the discount was based on any vaccinations given?,Did the discount come as a result of any vaccination - whether it was a vaccine from a public health agency or from a private company?
Did temperature in Kuwait reach the maximum on July of 2021?,Was Kuwait's hottest day of the year?,Did temperature in Kuwait reach the maximum in July of 2021?,Is there any proof to this?,Do Kuwait have records for the temperature in Celsius?,Do photos show temperature in Kuwait?,Is there any proof to this?
Has the number of children on the payroll since the pandemic grown in Wisconsin?,Has the number of children on the payroll increased since the pandemic?,Is this number above what the numbers in this state are?,Are there any statistics to support this claim?,Does this situation need to be addressed?,Does Wisconsin have the largest number of able bodied children on BadgerCare?
Did 41% of gun sales without background checks actually come from information that was collected before background checks were required?,Was background check data collected before background checks were required?,Did background checks result in an increase in gun sales?,Whether background checks reduce the number of guns that are sold without checks. Does this claim support the idea that 40% of guns sold without background checks were gathered before they were required.?
Is the minimum wage based on today’s incomes less than in the 1960s?,Is this data consistent?,Are there differences between this data and the 60s average?,Is the estimated difference in purchasing power between this data and the 1960s average?,Is this data significant?,Can the comparison in purchasing power be verified?
"Did Obama grow the federal government payroll by 141,000 workers?","Is there currently an estimated total of 141,000 employees employed in federal government?",Is there any estimated amount of federal government employees being hired under Obama?,"Is the federal government adding 125,000 more employees?",Is this the first time the government has added this many workers?
Did Carl Icahn sell stocks that were related to steel in the weeks leading up to the tariffs on steel imports?,Did Carl Icahn sell stocks that were related to steel other than steel?,Was Carl Icahn's stock diluted by the steel tariffs?,Was Carl Icahn a Trump advisor?
"Did 7.3% of Army, Navy and Marines think about suicide?",Was the average suicide thought rate higher in these service members?,Did the study use any data from Navy Times?,Was the percentage of those that attempted suicide within each military branch?,Was the study based on any other data?,"Did the study conclude that suicide attempts are up by 7% for Navy, Marine and Army members?"
Did Johnson say i'll have those niggers voting democratic for 200 years?,Does Johnson want to get all niggers to vote for Democrats for 200 years?,Did Johnson's rhetoric incite niggers to vote for Democrats?,Was Johnson referring to niggers voting for Democrats for 200 years?
Did ISIS murder 250 children by putting them into a dough kneader?,Did ISIS use any other method besides a dough kneader?,Did ISIS use any other method besides a dough kneader?,Did ISIS use any other method besides a dough kneader?
Was Johnson impeached in a vote three days after his offenses?,Was Johnson impeached in a vote three days after his offenses?,Is there any record of Johnson's impeachment in a vote three days after his act?,Is there any evidence that Johnson endorsed the anti-gay bill?
"Did there only be two-thirds black, and two-thirds Democratic voters on the list the Republicans tried to purge?",Was there a larger percentage of Democratic and black voters on the list of those Republicans tried to purge?,Did all of the black and Democratic voters on the list of those Republicans tried to purge have an ID number on them?
Can the Covid-19 mask protect the wearer from the flu?,Will the Covid-19 mask protect the wearer from the flu after the vaccine is administered?,Does the influenza vaccine prevent Covid-19?,Did the vaccine prevent the Covid-19 outbreak?,Does the flu vaccine prevent the COVID-19 pandemic?
Did the photo have any mention of 9/11?,Did the photo have any mention of the President's father?,Did the photograph have any mention of the President's spouse?,Was the photo from a personal account?,Is there any other information related to the story of the photo?,Is the photograph by a professional photographer?
Did the Democratic forfeit the election due to voter fraud?,Did Trump win the election due to voter fraud?,Has the election between the two parties been over in any other ways besides voter fraud?,Did Trump win the election due to voter fraud?,Did Democratic candidate Hillary Clinton win the election due to voter fraud?,Has any Congressional record listed any alleged cases of voter fraud since the 2020 election?
"Did Prince Charles refuse to shake hands with U.S. Vice President Mike Pence, thereby snubbing him?",Did the incident happen during an event in January 2020?,Was Prince Charles snubbing Mike Pence?,Did Prince Charles say he was angry at Pence?,Did Prince Charles speak negatively about Pence's performance at the event?
Is the number of people who voted to leave the EU in the referendum above the number who voted to remain?,Is the percentage of people who voted to leave the EU less than or equal to the percentage who voted to remain?,Do fewer people voted to leave the EU in each of the election cycles?,Did the United Kingdom vote to leave the EU in 2011?
Is this story true?,Was this a true story?,Do the officers think this is a true story?,Did this man want to go on a threesome?,Did the cops believe this?,Did this man plead guilty?,Did the man win?,Does this man need to eat up his ticket?
Did Floyd Mayweather Jr. and Conor McGregor fight before the July 2017 arrest?,Is the fight that Mayweather Jr. and McGregor were scheduled to fight canceled?,Is the fight that McGregor was scheduled to fight before the July 2017 arrest?,Did Mayweather Jr. receive the arrest before the July 2017 arrest?
Is this estimate based on the average house size in Lagos?,Are all the homes in Lagos the same size?,Is this estimate accurate?,Is the average price of a house in Lagos the same as a typical price in Nigeria?,Is the average price of a house in Lagos the same as a typical average price in Lagos?
Are people in Texas affected by winter storm receiving food vouchers from FEMA?,Did FEMA give 800 food vouchers to texans?,Is there any evidence that FEMA will be providing food vouchers to people affected by winter storms?,Is FEMA providing food vouchers to all people affected by winter storms?
Is it true that Europeans tried to get to North Africa during World War II?,Is it true that people who tried to get to North Africa during World War II died?,Is it true that some people in Northern Europe wanted to get to North Africa during World War II?,Is it true that there were people trying to get to North Africa during World War II?
Did recent wildfires put more carbon into the atmosphere than the human race has put out in the last 100 years?,Have wildfires released more carbon into the atmosphere than humans have released in the last 100 years?,Has the climate change seen from wildfires been better than human efforts at it?,Have wildfires contributed to climate change?
"Does Biden say there would be a 52% income tax rate for people above $29,000?",Is Biden proposing any income taxes for people higher than $29k?,Does Biden want to increase the income tax rate for the wealthy?,Does Biden think wealth-based taxes will be less harmful than income taxes?
"Is 8% the tax rate Biden proposed for a 75,000 dollar family?",Would Biden propose to increase the tax rate for families making more than that amount?,"Will Biden introduce a 25% tax rate for families making more than 75,000 dollars?","Will Biden introduce a 25% tax rate for families earning over $75,000 dollars?"
Did Sena travel in 1000 cars to support Kangana Ranaut?,Did Sena travel to Mumbai in 1000 cars?,Did Sena carry a letter asking for Kangana Ranaut's support?,Did Sena say he was protesting a corruption charge against him?,Did Sena travel in 1000 cars to support Kangana Ranaut in Mumbai?
"Did the teacher make over $ 90,000 a year?",Was the teacher new to teaching and has been in the teaching business for more than 3 years?,Did the teacher make more in his first year of teaching compared to the second year of teaching?,Is the teacher making money in the second year of teaching?
Did 500 million Red Bulls being slaughtered annually mean they were a popular energy drink?,Did this figure include red bulls being harvested annually?,Did this figure include the time that these red bulls were produced?,Did these red bulls go directly into production?,Will this increase in the volume of Red Bulls create increased demand for energy drinks?
"Did tax reform result in the creation of more than 1,8 million jobs?",Was tax reform the cause of the creation of jobs in 2008?,Does tax reform have a positive impact on the economy overall?,Was tax reform a cause of the creation of jobs in 2010?,Would tax reform have made the economy better overall as a result of tax reform?
Did Kangan Ranaut receive Rs 200 crores from Ambani Family?,Did Kangan Ranaut receive any other compensation from Ambani Family?,Has Ambani Family donated anything to Kangana Ranaut?,Was Kangana Ranaut granted money by Ambani Family?,Was Kangana Ranaut given any help from Ambani Family?
"Did the store sign list beer, pizza, potatoes, guns, Bibles, and sweatpants?",Was the store sign spoofed?,Have the signs been verified by a third party?,Was a photo posted online of the sign?,Was this photo authentic?,Is this photo included on a store website?
Did the team milk the golden spiders to create a gold silk cape?,Did the team of 80 people collect the golden spiders over five years?,Will the gold spider cape be made in a future edition?,Are gold spiders normally used for making clothes?,Can we currently grow gold spiders in this world?
Does the photo show fuel in this location?,Is the price of fuel listed as $7.11 for the gas station?,Did a customer purchase fuel at this location?,Is this gas station chain owned by a convenience store?,Is this gas station chain selling fuel?,Is the price of fuel listed as $7.11?
Are 3 more fake Facebook accounts providing prayers from this pastor?,Are these accounts demanding cash from this pastor?,Are these fake Facebook accounts being provided via this pastor?,Does this pastor appear to have a fake Facebook account?,Was this pastor sprayed?,Does this pastor seem to offer prayers for cash?,Did this pastor offer prayers for cash?
What is the percentage of people who die who require hospitalization?,Do 18% of people with heart disease in the U.S. who die experience permanent heart damage in the rest of their lives?,"Is it statistically probable for 1 person dies and 19 require hospitalization, 18 of those people will have permanent heart damage?",Is there any measurable benefit from extending life for people with heart disease in the U.S.?
Does 68% of the prison population consist of violent offenders?,Is a significant percentage of the prison population used as sex slaves?,Is there a majority of the prison population used as sex slaves?,Is Barnes willing to release 50% of the prison population?,Is Barnes willing to release sex slaves?
Has there been a significant decrease in the number of COVID-19 deaths by using the vaccine?,Has there been a significant decrease in the number of COVID-19 deaths by using the vaccine?,Was there any research done into the COVID-19 vaccine?,Has there been any research done on the COVID-19 vaccine?
"Did Obama request 10,000 National Guardsmen?","Did Obama think you should have 10,000 National Guardsmen ready?",Did Obama ask about a national guard presence?,Did Obama want a national guard presence?,Does Obama support having a national guard presence?,Would Obama want a national guard presence in 2020?,Would Obama want a national guard presence in 2020?
Did the video show railway workers protesting in Beijing in 2021?,Was the video of the protest on the streets of Beijing or elsewhere?,Did all railway workers in Beijing use red and yellow to sign a protest petition?,Was the video taken by a government official?,Was the video related to any protests by workers in Beijing?
Did the protesters condemn the murder of Harsha?,Did the protesters include any other Bajrang Dal activists?,Has any action been taken against the Bajrang Dal by the pro-Hindu outfits?,Was there an action taken at this protest?,Does this event have any links to the death of Harsha?
Did the clip of Fox News anchor issuing warnings for a hurricane from 2016?,Has the clip of Fox News anchor has more hits since 2016?,Has the clip of Fox News anchor been used in response to the warnings about the hurricane?,Does the clip of Fox News anchor have more hits than the other news anchors?
Was Mimi Walters part of a plan to strip protections for people with pre-existing conditions?,Was Walters a supporter of a plan to slap an age tax on older Californians?,Was Walters an opponent of a plan to strip protections for people with pre-existing conditions?
Did all the ratings show that Parliament was the most watched program?,Did the ratings reflect the actual ratings of the program?,Did Parliament rate very highly for overall TV ratings?,Is there data indicating that this is true?,Was the rating accurate at the time of this report?,Did Parliament rate highly for overall TV ratings?,Was this report correct at the time that this media platform was established?
Is the decline in defense spending serious?,Can the decline be attributed to drawdowns in Iraq and Afghanistan?,Are the current defense spending cuts significant?,Could the current defense spending decline be attributed to drawdowns in Iraq and Afghanistan?,Are defense spending cuts a cause for concern?,Does this paper reflect current US policy?
Did Democrats hold an advantage on the generic ballot in Congress before the Republican wave in 2010?,Did Democrats hold an advantage on the generic ballot in Congress even before the Gingrich revolution?,Did Republicans have an advantage on the generic ballot in Congress before the Gingrich revolution?,Did Democrats hold a greater advantage on the generic ballot in Congress before the Gingrich revolution?
Are any snake plants recommended for human survival?,Does the NASA study on snake plants include a conclusion that snake plants in an area with no airflow are enough for human survival?,Is there enough snake plants in an area with no airflow to maintain human survival?,Is there sufficient snake plants in a room with no airflow to maintain human survival?,Is there sufficient snake plants in a large room with no airflow to maintain human survival?
"Did Democrats vote to add an army of 87,000 IRS agents who will target middle class taxpayers and conduct at least 1 million more audits each year?","Did Democrats vote to add an army of 87,000 IRS agents who will target middle class taxpayers and conduct at least 1 million more audits each year?",Is there a consensus between Democratic and Republicans on a number of the IRS resources they will add?
Is Bill Gates considered a dangerous vaccination campaign in developing countries?,Will Bill Gates use COVID-19 vaccines to surveil the population?,Are COVID-19 vaccines administered to a larger percentage of developing countries than previously?,Are COVID-19 vaccines only administered to developing countries?
Are there more students in higher education than in 1994?,Are there more students in higher education than in 1994?,Have the numbers on higher education increased since 1994?,Has the number of students increased in higher education since 1994?,Does higher education have higher tuition costs than low income schools in this country?,Did higher education have fewer students in 1994?
Does the COVID-19 virus stay in the throat for four days before it goes to the lungs?,Is SARS-CoV-2 the most common virus to cause COVID-19?,Have all viruses that cause COVID-19 been formally identified?,Will COVID-19 continue to be formally identified?
Did people in London black out their homes in WWII?,Was there any protest against blacking out their homes?,Did London residents complain about the blackout?,Have any of these complaints been disputed?,Will the blackouts in London happen again in the future?,No Answer> Did the blackouts in London during World War II cause any disruptions or complaints?
Does the order prohibit the siblings from having dinner?,Does the order prohibit them from eating together?,Does the Governor order that they no longer have dinner together?,Does the Governor authorize a restriction on them eating together?,Does the Governor order that they no longer have dinner together?,Does this rule prohibit the siblings from having dinner together?
Did the unemployment rate in the United States improve from 2008 to 2014?,Did the jobs that Texas create increase over the last decade?,Do statistics show jobs have decreased in all states over the last decade?,Are jobs in the United States decreasing during this time period?,Does Texas have a negative unemployment rate?,Did the U.S. lose job jobs during this time period?
Is there any evidence that shows children who live with a biological parent and a parent's boyfriend or girlfriend have a 20 times greater chance of sexual abuse?,Does this make sense from a study?,Does this make sense based on the facts?,Is it true to say children who live with a biological parent and a parent's boyfriend or girlfriend are 20 times more likely to be sexually abused?
Did scientists predict Earth would look like this in 20 years from space?,Did NASA predict earth will look like this in 20 years from space?,Did NASA predict a 20 year time span for Earth?,Did NASA predict a 20 year time span for Earth?,Did NASA predict a 20 year time span for Earth?
Did 98 million Americans receive a Polio vaccine when it was contaminated with the cancer virus?,Was this vaccine available to everyone?,Did this vaccine contain any of the cancer viruses?,Did this vaccine contain any of these diseases?,Were these vaccines banned in other countries in the mid-1950s?
Was it reported that the Pentagon accidentally sent $6.2 billion to Ukraine?,Has there been any investigation into this claim?,Does this claim involve a crime?,Is this claim based on a rumor?,Did a report say the Pentagon accidentally sent $6.2 billion to Ukraine?,Has this claim been backed by legal documents?
Does Ukraine want to ban teenagers aged 16 from leaving the country?,Does Ukrainian want to ban teenagers aged 16 from leaving the country?,Does Ukraine want to ban teenagers aged 16 from leaving the country?,Can Ukrainian government enforce this ban?,Are teenaged Ukrainian citizens in retaliation against those of American origin?
"Did the photo have the word ""edit"" in the caption?",Is the flag still burning?,Did the banner contain instructions on where to find it?,Is this flag still burning?,Is it likely to contain that information on its own?,Can this image be a reference to the flag's official image?
Did each congressional member host the Mar-a-Lago event?,Did any of the attendees receive free lodging or meals?,Did any of the attendees win prizes?,Did any of the attendees attend for less than a day?,"Did the attendees of the Mar-a-Lago events receive free lodging, meals and prizes?"
Did Decathlon Germany sell 160 E-Bikes due to larger sales volume?,Did Decathlon Germany sell 160 E-Bikes due to smaller sales volume?,Did Decathlon Germany sell 160 E-Bikes as a result of smaller sales volume?,Did Decathlon Deutschland sell 160 E-Bikes due to smaller sales volume?
Has the price of rice changed substantially since the Rice Tariffication Law was enacted in March 2019?,Has the price of rice been flat since the Rice Tariffication Law was enacted in March 2019?,Has the price of rice been above average since the Rice Tariffication Law was enacted in March 2019?
Is this image from a viral video?,Are these two people in this video infected?,Is this video from a viral video?,Did this person spit out the video?,Are these people involved in the COVID-19 outbreak?,Does this video claim that these people are infected with COVID-19?,Does this video claim that they are infected with COVID-19?
Did the video of Mayon Volcano feature lava spewing?,Was the eruption of Mayon Volcano caused by some kind of meteoroid?,Was the eruption of Mayon Volcano observed on video?,Did the Mayon Volcano have an active volcano?,Did the eruption occur in a certain day of the week?,Did the volcano release lava in a lava-storm?
What caused a sore throat?,What made you feel like you're drowning?,Does pneumonia take about 5 or 6 days?,Is there any other condition that comes from getting a sore throat?,Does respiratory failure happen when you get a sore throat?,Do the symptoms of pneumonia make you think you're drowning?
Did Gogoi tweet that it is better not to conduct elections for the next 10 years?,Did Gogoi tweet about the election decision or the timing of the election?,Does Gogoi have a relationship with any election controversy?,Has this incident been reported before?,Is Gogoi an influential political figure?
Would the mine be built without government oversight?,Is there any government scrutiny of the proposed mine?,Is the proposed mine nine miles long?,Would the proposed mine be located on or near any wetlands?,Is the proposed mine open to public?,Is the proposed mine located near any public sites?,Is the proposed mine in northern Wisconsin located near any public institutions?
Was a federal gun law passed in September 2016 in all 50 states?,Is there evidence the law was passed before 2015?,Do any states allow open carry?,Does the law in the ten states allow open carry?,Does the law in the ten states allow open carry?,Would this bill have passed in any other state?
Is the Ram temple in Ayodhya currently being constructed?,Is Yash interested in building this temple?,Is the Ram temple in Ayodhya currently for sale?,Is this Yash's first donation to the temple?,Has this donation been used for any other constructions?,Is this donation still being considered?
Did Tarabalka shoot down all 40 Russian planes?,Was Tarabalka KIA?,Was Tarabalka at the top of his game during this battle?,Did the Russian planes flee without a hitch?,Did Tarabalka make the final killing of all Russian planes?,Did Tarabalka utterly destroy the Russian planes?
Are there dozens of people in the video?,"Did Biden shout ""my butt's been wiped"" to reporters?",Did Biden ever say that he was clean?,Did Biden say this word to reporters during a televised press conference?,Is Biden attempting to defend his image?
Did Lawrence comment on 9/11?,Did Lawrence agree with Trump's assertion on 9/11?,Did Lawrence claim the 9/11 attacks wouldn't have happened if Trump hadn't stolen the election?,Did Lawrence claim the 9/11 attacks wouldn't have happened if Trump hadn't stolen the election?,Did Lawrence claim Trump's actions caused 9/11?
Did the Obama jobs council meet?,Did the Obama jobs council meet in the last 6 months?,Did Obama hold 106 fundraisers?,Did Obama golf 10 times in the last 6 months?,Has Obama held 106 fundraisers in the last 6 months?,Did Obama hold 106 fundraisers in the last 6 months?
Is there an upper limit on how much fines you can receive for not wearing a face covering?,Is there a minimum fine for a group gathering?,Is there a maximum fine for wearing a face covering?,Is it illegal to wear a face covering in the UK?
Did Biden's sanctions on Russia contain loopholes?,Did Biden's sanctions on Russia contain a carve out for energy and financial sectors?,Did Biden's sanctions on Russia start immediately?,Was there one specific wing of Biden's sanctions that did not start immediately?,Did Biden's sanctions on Russia start immediately?
Did a woman died in anti-coup protests in 2021?,Did the woman die in the protests?,Was there any proof of this event?,Did the protests end before the protests began?,Exactly what did this event end?,Did this event occur in any country?,Have anti-coup protests in Myanmar ever occurred in North America?
Did this abortion clinic owner throw a baby born alive in a biohazard bag?,Did the abortion clinic owner throw the baby in a biohazard bag?,Did the baby's mother come to and have a discussion with the abortion clinic owner?,Did the abortion clinic owner throw the baby in the trash?
Did Union Law Department amend Section 41A of CrPC and cancel the police station bail?,Have Union Law Department officials in Uttar Pradesh ever abolished the police station bail?,Was the Union Law Department in Uttar Pradesh involved in a corruption scandal in 2017?,Do Union Law Department officials appear to have tolerated corruption in the police department?
Is this study published in a peer reviewed journal?,Did this research happen in 2014?,Has this research been conducted in multiple countries?,Do these findings confirm existing data from this study?,Is this study the first one to provide this information?,Is this the first study to report this information?,Are any other findings from this study consistent with this one?
Did the U.S. attack Japan in 1945?,Was the U.S. banned from selling certain items in Japan?,Is Japan a country where the U.S. fought in World War II?,Does the U.S. have legal obligations in Japan?,Has the U.S. ever violated its legal obligations in Japan?
Did Szawisz report hours with the City of Portland in the last 10 years?,Does Szawisz report hours with the City of Portland in the last 10 years?,Did Szawisz report hours with the city of Portland in the last 10 years?,Did Szawisz report hourly billing to the City of Portland in the last 10 years?
Was the image taken in Switzerland?,Did any of the Swiss bank accounts disappear after it had a large cash loss?,Was the boy responsible for the money loss?,Has there been an official inquiry into the kidnapping?,Has there been any confirmation of the kidnapping?,Did Swiss banking staff try to arrest the kidnapping?,Does the kidnapping have any connection to the country it allegedly took money from?
Did Mujahid say that women would be allowed to work and study under the Islamist regime?,Did Mujahid promise that women would be allowed to work and study under the Islamist regime?,Did Mujahid promise to allow women to work and study under the Islamist regime?,Are Mujahid and other militants encouraging women to be active and educated under Islamic guidance?
Does Fox News report in the original report that the President's valet tested positive for COVID-19?,Is this a statement from Fox News?,Did Fox News confirm the report on this video?,Is the video edited?,Was there a second video in this video?,Is the report from Fox News the same as the original Fox news report?
What happens in the case?,When did this take place?,Did anyone else lose in this case?,Does the government have the right to deny marriage between people of different races?,Did this result in a settlement for these couples?,Did this case result in a change in federal laws or the government allowing this couple to marry?
Did Democrats used 47 million mail-in ballots in every U.S. midterm election?,Did Democrats use 46 million mail-in ballots in each U.S. midterm election?,Are all of these election votes disputed?,Are all of these election votes disputed?,"Did Democrats use 47,000 mail-in ballots in every midterm election?",Did all of these election votes disputed?
Is it true that Bangalore Urban (excluding BBMP) became the first district in Karnataka to achieve 100% 1st dose vaccination?,Has Bengaluru Urban received an additional dose?,Does the increase in coverage of TB vaccines increase the need for vaccines?,Has the increased coverage of TB vaccines contributed to TB vaccines being reintroduced in the market?
Did President Obama say that his greenhouse gas regulations will bankrupt anyone who wants to build a new coal-fired power plant?,"Was Obama's 2008 plan a ""set-in-place"" proposal?",Did Obama say that his proposed greenhouse gas regulations will bankrupt anyone who wants to build a new coal-fired power plant?
Did the use of water-efficient toilets increase in the USA?,Does the use of water-efficient toilets decrease in the United States?,Did the replacement of old toilets increase in the United States?,Did the use of water-efficient toilets decrease in the United States?,Did the replacement of old toilets reduce in the United States?
Has the AFP stated caravans of people are coming to cross the Mexican-U.S. border?,Did AFP say this is true?,Does EPA report this is true?,Are all of the caravans coming to the United States?,Did AP report this information?,Did EPA report this information?
Did a Russian court give US teen a very short prison term on marijuana smuggling?,Did the NBA star Griner receive a much shorter sentence for marijuana smuggling?,Was Griner's sentence for marijuana smuggling based on his criminal history?
Did Elle and Vivian get involved romantically in the original plot line of the film?,Is this movie based on a true story?,Is the movie in question about a real life relationship?,Is this movie set prior to a specific date?,Are the characters of the movie based on a real person?
Did Choudhary get a job in Google for 51 seconds?,Did Choudhary win any awards?,Did Choudhary win any awards for his work with Google?,Did Choudhary win any awards from Google for his work with Google?,Do other hacking incidents at Google always involve employees?
Are Democratic and Independent U.S. Senators both the ones that voted to allow health care practitioners to let babies die untreated if born alive after an abortion?,Did Democratic and Independent U.S. Senators both vote for this legislation in 2019?,Did any of these Senators vote for this bill in 2020?
Does Box #3 provide a chain of custody?,Does Box #3 require a chain of custody?,Is Box 3 the primary voting location for the primary election in Arizona?,Is there no way to check the security of ballots?,"Is there a minimum minimum security requirement for ballots at Maricopa, Arizona locations?",Is there any other voting location that would require a chain of custody in connection with box #3?
Have the Ukrainian soldiers in the Russian occupied territories killed in the war?,Has the number of Ukrainian troops killed in the Russian occupied territories ever been reported?,"Do the Russian occupied territories have documented a total of 100,000 Ukrainian troops killed in this war?",Do the Russian occupied territories have any documented Russian troops killed in this war?
Did the authorities have a way to determine the mutilated bodies in Richards' backyard?,Did the authorities find all the bodies?,Did all the bodies in Richards' backyard have mutilated bodies?,Did all the bodies found in Richards' backyard have mutilated limbs?
Is it true 18 percent of Portland elementary schools have art instruction?,Is it true 83 percent of the national arts education is in elementary schools?,Did there exist differences in the percentages of art education in Portland and national education?,Did the percentage of the art education in Portland actually increase from 2000 to 2014?
Has Miami spent over $350 million to deal with sea-level rise?,Did Miami spend more money on coral reefs?,Did Miami spend more money on coral reefs than sea-level rise?,Did Miami spend more money on sea-level rise than reef restoration?,Are there any ambiguities in this passage?
Did Republicans control both houses of Congress and the presidency in 1928?,Did the U.S. suck into the Great Depression within a year of being sunk into it?,Was a GOP controlled Congress and the presidency during this period?,Was this a good year for the economy?,Could this years unemployment be considered an historic record?
Was the price of face shields per government guidelines?,"Will this increase be taken into consideration by SM Group, as per government guidelines?",Would this increase be the same as price hike for SM Group product?,Did this announcement involve any other companies in putting this product on the market?,Does this increase increase in prices impact any SM Group products?
Is there more disparity between Native American and Hispanic women?,Are black women paid 63 cents and Native American women paid 58 cents?,Are Hispanic women paid 54 cents?,Do all women make the same amount?,Is there any evidence that these figures are incorrect?
"Did Macron warn of sanctions against Russia that would lead to an influx of ""60 million refugees"" into Europe?",Did Macron say sanctions against Russia would lead to an influx of 60 million refugees into Europe?,Did Macron warn of sanctions against Russia that would lead to an influx of 60 million refugees into Europe?,Did Macron have any information that may contradict this assertion?
"Did Gold promote hydroxychloroquine as a cure for COVID-19 during the Jan. 6, 2021, riot?",Did Gold promote hydroxychloroquine without evidence?,"Did Gold attend the January 6, 2021, riot?","Did Gold attend the Jan. 6, 2021, riot in San Diego?"
Was the protests documented in a video in late May and early June 2022?,Was the protest footage released on television?,Did the protesters cause damages?,Is the video available on the internet?,Does anyone know where the protest took place?,Did the protesters rob stores?,Did anyone else come into contact with these protestors?
Is the death toll from FIFA registered players and coaches less than 60?,Were there more than 108 registered players/coaches who died in the past 6 months?,Is there evidence for this claim being true?,Do FIFA registration fees for players are on a declining yearly basis?,Is this statement reasonable?
Did they want $12 billion more?,Is there any evidence that the Democrats want $12 billion more for foreign aid?,Will their foreign aid bill include the amount they would pay in taxes?,Will any lawmakers approve the supplemental tax bill if they can have it included in the bill?,Is there any evidence that the Democrats want additional foreign aid money?
Is Ukraine soliciting funds to host Eurovision 2017?,Are these funds being received by Ukraine?,Would the Eurovision 2017 host nation benefit from these funds?,Would this be a realistic event for Ukraine?,Did the Kiev organizers want to bring in additional funding for the Eurovision show?,Has the Ukraine host country hosted Eurovision in the past?
Is it true that in 10 years 6.5 million migrants have registered with GPs?,Did the Lancet report the data specifically?,Was it true that this data is used to estimate the statistics?,"Does the figure based on data from multiple studies, which is not available in the current version of the Lancet?"
Is this photo of Finnish people protesting Joe Biden's visit?,Did this photo contain people pointing a gun at Biden?,Was this photo taken in Finland?,Is this photo in Finland?,Have any other similar photos been taken recently?,Are any similar photos being taken in Finland at this time?
Did 50 thousand Medicare patients die of COVID-19 infection?,Was there any evidence of COVID-19 vaccine-related deaths in the United States?,Are all COVID-19 vaccine-related deaths in the United States related to swine flu?,Did COVID-19 vaccine cause deaths from COVID-19 infection?
Does the Global News article quote from a report on efficacy of the vaccine?,Does the Pfizer Covid-19 vaccine have a 12% efficacy rate?,Would the Pfizer Covid-19 vaccine not be effective against the virus?,Would the Pfizer Covid-19 vaccine have a high risk of relapse?
Did Markle receive a salary for the interview?,Did Markle receive any bonuses for the interview?,Did Markle receive any bonus for the interview?,Did Markle receive any bonuses for the interview?,Did Markle receive any bonuses for the interview?,Did Markle receive any bonuses for the interview?,Did Markle receive any bonuses for the interview?,Did Markle receive any bonuses for the interview?
Did the BBC graphic indicate monkeypox is a form of herpes?,Is monkeypox transmitted in the air?,Does the BBC graphic include health officials who support the claim?,Does the BBC report suggest monkeypox is a form of herpes?,Does the BBC report offer a scientific basis for the alleged scientific claim?
Do ginger cells shrink in mice?,Are the study results conclusive?,Were the results consistent with previous studies?,Are all types of ginger used in this study?,Does ginger reduce the risk of cancer?,Is ginger safe to ingest?,Does ginger affect the immune system?
Was a video of two uniformed men fighting with people in Missouri in 2022?,Were the men in uniform all fighting with people?,Is there evidence of the video being filmed in Chicago?,Is this evidence based on a video that was filmed in Missouri?,Did the video come from Chicago?
Does the percentage of workers without a single paid sick day exceed 40%?,Do all workers get paid sick days?,Did the percentage of workers without a paid sick day exceed 40%?,Did the percentage of workers with a paid sick day exceed 40%?,Are a larger percentage of workers with a paid sick day than non-paying employees?
"Did a Buffalo Wild Wings employee at Eastvale, California, turn down the volume on the national anthem before an NFL game?","Did a Buffalo Wild Wings employee at Eastvale, California, turn down the volume on the national anthem before an NFL game?",Does this employee currently work at Buffalo Wild Wings?,Did this employee change his mind about this statement?
Can I receive an eligible item for a mere £3?,Is this offer limited to an area?,Is this offer open to everyone?,Is the offer limited to only the United States?,Is the offer applicable to U.S residents?,Is this offer currently available in Canada?,Are other countries offering similar offers?
"Did Trump propose to cut Social Security, Medicare and Medicaid?",Was Trump trying to make these programs more expensive?,Was the President's budget accurate in showing this?,Are these programs less expensive than they are today?,Was it a fair estimate that social security would be cut?,Is it likely that health insurance would be cut?
"Did the unemployment rate of the United States increase from 4,9% to 5% between September 2016 and November 2017?",Did the unemployment rate increase from 4.90% to 4.70% between September 2016 to November 2017?,Did the unemployment rate increase from 5.20% to 7.9% between September 2016 and November 2017?,Did the unemployment rate increase from 5.0% to 7.9% between September 2016 to November 2017?
Did this video feature this politician?,Does this video include a speaker?,Did this person lead a rally?,Did this person formally lead a rally?,Is this person no longer a politician?,Is this person no longer holding a position?,Did the person lead a rally?,Is this person no longer serving a term as a politician?
Did PM Modi and several BJP leaders attend Gadar-2 in theatres?,Did they watch Gadar-2 together?,"Upon going to a theater, did PM Modi watch the movie together?",Did PM Modi and several BJP leaders attend the movie together?,Did BJP leaders attend the movie?
Did Harris state Texas has the fastest population growth in the country?,Is Houston experiencing the fastest population growth in the country?,Was Harris using other sources to prove Texas population growth?,Did Harris use other sources to claim Texas is experiencing the fastest population growth?,Was Harris stating Texas population growth as a percentage of the United States population in general?
Did the video show both boys helping a disabled man?,Did the video include any audio recording?,Did the two boys help the disabled man on purpose?,Was the video in a professional setting?,Is there any other information relevant to this question?,Is there any information about this video?,Are there any negative reviews about this video?
Does service codes *#61# and ##002# help to secure your phone from third parties?,Can using code 61 and ##002# secure your phone from third parties?,Can you use code 61 and ##002# at the same time to secure your phone from third parties?
Is there proof Cruz's criticisms of Mitch McConnell were censored?,Was Cruz the only person to invoke Rule 19?,Did Cruz's comments constitute censorship?,Does Cruz have to abide by Rule 19 in order to do so?,Is there any evidence Cruz called McConnell a liar?
Has the school system's general budget been enriched from the travel expenses?,Did the travel expenses contribute to the general budget?,Has there been any unused travel expenses?,"Did the travel expenses amount to less than $25,000?",Have there been any other contributions to the school system?,Did the person making the unused travel expenses give it back to the school system?
Did the decline in unemployment last month occur only in the 2 states?,Did the decline last month occur in all 113 states?,Was unemployment in all of these states declining when the number was reported?,Do all 81 states have unemployment % lower than the national average?,Have any of these states been able to have an increased unemployment rate?,Has there been any increase in the unemployment rate in any state?
Is it true that the president's health care bill has put 30 million people on health care rolls that weren't there before?,Was there a delay in the president's health care bill?,Is there evidence that the president's health care bill contributed to this delay?,Is there evidence that a delay in the health care bill contributed to this delay?
Would a new social security payment be provided by an IRA?,Would the money be used towards social security payments?,Would the money be used for Social Security payments?,Would the money be used towards Social Security payments?,Would this funding be subject to changes?,Did this funding change in the past?,Has this funding change been considered in any other Congresses?
Did 2.4 million people receive anti-retroviral treatment in 2013?,Are there more people with HIV than are presently receiving anti-retroviral treatment?,Are there other diseases that could be prevented if a person receives anti-retroviral treatment?,Was there an increase in the percentage of people receiving anti-retroviral treatment in 2013?
Did Florida cut taxes every year for eight years?,Did Florida cut taxes every year for eight years totaling $19 billion?,Was Florida an average tax payer in 2009?,Does Florida have an average tax payer for all states?,Are tax cuts in Florida consistent in cost?,Have any Florida taxes doubled for the past 8 years?
Did Anwar Amin hospitalized for Covid-19 in May 2021?,Was his condition treated as uncontrollable?,Is he a former MP from Sri Lanka?,Was he indicted for Covid-19?,Do police have any information about Amin?,Can any medical experts assist in the investigation?
Has Austin doubled in size every 25 years or so since its founding?,Is the city expanding or shrinking?,Is it a large town or a small town?,Are the residents of Austin growing or shrinking?,Have these changes been the same for each era?,Have this changes been consistent?
Did 71% of Trump-endorsed candidates lose their election in the 2018 midterms?,Did these candidates lose the 2018 midterms?,Was there any data to support the information mentioned in this article?,Did this information come from sources other than the media or interviews with party leaders?,Does any of this data prove that Trump endorsers lost their election in the 2018 midterms?
Did Chandrayaan 2 release photos of Earth?,Was it part of an ISRO mission?,Did Chandrayaan 2 launch satellites?,Did Chandrayaan 2 launch the satellites?,Did the Chandrayaan 2 launch satellites support the Earth mapping program?,Did Chandrayaan 2 launch satellites?
Did Trump supporters march to the Miami courthouse in June 2023?,Did Miami courthouse protest Trump's presidency?,Is the video of the marching Trump supporters from Miami in June 2023?,Is there any evidence that Trump supporters accompanied Trump supporters in Miami in June 2023?,Is there any video or photos of Trump supporters marching in Miami in June 2023?
"Was there a total of 500,071 Americans killed in this pandemic in one year?","Were these deaths greater in WWII, WW2, than in Vietnam?",Did fewer Americans die in this pandemic?,Was this pandemic caused by humans?,Was this pandemic more prevalent on Earth than the wars?
Do Republicans have higher rates of economic growth than Obama?,Is this growth similar to Obama's?,Is this growth rate 10 times higher than Obama's?,Do Republicans have a longer history of economic growth compared to Obama?,Is this growth rate similar to Obama's?,Are Republicans more aggressive in addressing economic concerns?
How many men said their victim asked them to abduct them?,How many men said their victim asked them to abduct them?,Is it true 20% of men said their victim asked them to abduct them?,Did the research by the anti-violence NGO CIET make clear these data?,Did the research use data about CIET?
Does an electric car charging station use 12 gallons of diesel fuel per hour?,Does an electric car charging station use 36 gallons of diesel fuel per hour?,Do electric car charging stations use 5.7 mpg?,Is the electric car charging station using an average of 36 gallons of diesel fuel per hour?
Did people die more currently that when the epidemic was peaking?,Did the COVID-19 vaccines cause excess deaths in late 2022?,Are there any other causes of excess deaths?,Are there any other vaccines?,Are there any other vaccines?
Did Obama release official projections for the health care overhaul?,Did Obama reportedly cite other estimates for the cost of the health care overhaul?,Did Democrats in Congress originally claim that the health care overhaul would cost $870 billion?,Does the Obama administration maintain estimates for costs for the health care overhaul over 10 years?
"Did Romney say that Medicare could end as we know it, leaving Julia with nothing but a voucher to buy insurance, which means $6,350 extra per year for a similar plan?",Did Romney have this plan in effect prior to his reelection in 2013?,Did Romney make this plan in effect prior to his reelection in 2013?
Did the image depict a 9 year old Ukrainian girl with a shotgun?,Did the image depict a 9 year old Ukrainian girl with a shotgun who was waiting to fight Russian invaders?,Did the picture depict an intruder with a shotgun?,Was the photograph of an intruder with a shotgun?
"Did Biden claim to cure cancer on July 25, 2023?",Did Biden claim he was cured of cancer before his stated claim?,Was Biden's claim accurate?,Have there been any other recent statements in relation to his claim?,Were these statements supported by any data?,"...had Biden said that the cure for cancer was ""completely"" natural?"
Was this article written in 1957?,Did the Comic strip warn about the virus?,Was the cartoon written in 1957?,Was the cartoon run in China?,Was there a CDC report about the China virus?,Did the cartoon spread to Taiwan?,Did any of the cartoon pieces make this information available to the public?
Did Ukrainian flag replaced by Soviet Union flag during the 2022 war?,Did Ukrainian flag replaced by Soviet Union flag change during the 2022 war?,Will the Ukrainian flag and Soviet Union flag change during the 2022 war?,Is there data regarding the time and place of the 2022 Ukraine and Soviet Union war?
Was Sanders on camera napping at the memorial ceremony?,Was this photo during the ceremony?,Is it true that Sanders took a nap at the memorial ceremony?,Does this photo have any negative connotations?,Are Sanders's parents involved in this political activity?,Would Sanders be classified as a Democratic presidential candidate if this photo was taken?
Are there noncitizens who are registered to vote in Indiana?,Are all noncitizens registered to vote in Indiana?,Is the estimated voting percentage of noncitizens the same as the corresponding overall voting rate?,Is the resulting voting percentage of noncitizens more than the overall voting rate?
Was Catherine Bridge a US citizen?,Did Catherine Bridge have at least 17 babies in a single delivery?,Is Catherine Bridge a United States citizen?,Were any of these babies in the United States?,Was the American woman known as a 17 baby woman?,Is Catherine Bridge a woman from the United States?
Did Pelosi say Pelosi wouldn't let Capitol police testify on what happened Jan. 6?,Was Pelosi referring to the Jan. 6 shooting at the US Capitol?,Did Pelosi say Pelosi wouldn't let police testify on that Jan. 6 shooting?,Did Pelosi say anyone witnessed the Jan. 6 shooting at the US Capitol?
Did a CNN report on 9/11 prove that a plane never hit the Pentagon?,Did the report say that a plane never hit the Pentagon?,Did the report have a statement about how it arrived at this conclusion?,"Does CNN make any other ""informational"" reports about 9/11 or does the CNN report always state the facts correctly?"
Did the finance team in the Obama administration recommend 1% on all transactions at any financial institution?,Did Obama’s finance team recommend a 1% tax on all financial institution transactions?,Did the finance team in the Obama administration suggest any limits to the amount of taxation on financial transactions?,Did the finance team in the Obama administration recommend any financial institution fees to the public?
Is 1 in 5 youth aged 9 to 17 diagnosed with a diagnosable mental health disorder?,Is it true that 1 in 5 youth aged 9 to 17 has a diagnosisable mental health disorder?,Is it true that 1 in 5 youth aged 9 to 17 has a diagnosed mental health disorder?
Are teachers over 100 years old and the average age of an average baby born today?,Is the average age of an average baby born today 110 years old?,Are teachers rated for longevity more than their children?,Do teachers make about 50 to 70 percent of their salary from pensions?,Are there any teachers over 100 years old?,Is it likely the average age of an average child born today 110 years old?
Did Australia reduce its greenhouse gas emissions?,Has the EU achieved similar cuts in greenhouse gas emissions?,Do Australia's greenhouse gas emissions compare with those of the EU?,Did Australia's greenhouse gas emissions reduce?,Do Australia's greenhouse gas emissions compare to those of the EU?,Are Australia's emissions comparable to those of the EU?
Did Robredo bring anything to the region during her visit?,Did Robredo leave without any donations?,Is this the first time Robredo has visited a region hit by Typhoon Odette?,Were Robredo and other members of the government present during Robredo's visit?
Did the NY State Department of Health advise kissing through handkerchiefs during the 1918 flu pandemic?,"Was the NY State Department of Health responsible for the CDC's ""guilty"" warning during the 1918 flu pandemic?",Did the NY State Department of Health receive CDC's letter of support from the CDC on the 1918 flu pandemic?
Will 18 percent of federal money be cut if lawmakers fail to avert the fiscal cliff?,Will the states receive the same amount of money if lawmakers don't avert the fiscal cliff?,Are federal funding cuts a possibility if lawmakers do not avert the fiscal cliff?
Did archaeologists claim that they had found golden tongues in a burial site in Egypt?,Did archaeologists claim that they had discovered golden tongues in a burial site in Egypt?,Did the mummies reveal that they had seen golden tongues?,Did archaeologists say that they had found golden tongues in a burial site in Egypt?
Have real wages been flatlined during the past 40 years?,Was Federal Reserve's policies responsible for this stagnation?,Were inflationary policies a factor in these flatlined wages?,Are wage growth rates associated with inflation?,Do we know how these two factors interact?,Does any evidence support these contentions?
Will the new law reduce the time it takes to start a mine?,Will new legislation greatly reduce the time it takes to start a mine?,Will new legislation significantly cut the time it takes to start a mine?,Will the legislation reduce the time it takes to start a mine?,Do new laws reduce the time it takes to start a mine?
Did the government have a licence to operate this mine?,Did the government make this decision based on a preference?,Did the government choose to partner with the Chinese?,Did the government select companies with recognition internationally?,Did the government have a preference for the Chinese over international companies?,Was the government prepared to sell the mining licences?
Did Scott Walker give $6 million tax breaks to a company?,Did Scott Walker give this company tax breaks even if they lay off half their workforce?,Did this company receive any tax breaks under this proposal?,Did Scott Walker give this company tax breaks even if they lay off half their workforce?,Was this policy specifically in this bill?
Did O'Connell ask the internet for help in finding his helmet on 9/11?,Did O'Connell wear his helmet at the 9/11 attacks?,Is there any evidence O'Connell's helmet was stolen during 9/11?,Did O'Connell want to thank the Internet for helping him find his helmet on 9/11?
Have the physical barriers in four customs and border protection sectors been expanded?,Has the illegal traffic dropped by at least 90% in four of the areas?,Does the % of illegal traffic decrease after expanding physical barriers?,Are the barriers the main reasons behind this reduction in illegal traffic?,Are the barriers generating a significant revenue and marketing factor for the department?
Is there proof of the license plate being inaccurate?,Were the Wright brothers famous in Ohio?,Does Ohio still have the license plate design?,Were the Wright brothers not known in Ohio prior to the design?,Was the design on the license plate representative of the Wright Brothers?,Did the design represent the Wright brothers correctly?
Was this infrastructure bill approved by Obama?,Did anyone ever see any of this infrastructure bill get built?,Did this infrastructure bill never fully materialize?,Was this infrastructure bill aimed at reestablishing a federal transportation system?,Has Obama's spending on infrastructure come to an end?,Has Obama's spending on infrastructure come to an end?
Did the Cyber Ninjas Audit report say the 2020 election should not be certified?,Did the Cyber Ninjas audit report say the 2020 election should be certified?,Was the Cyber Ninjas Audit report based in Europe?,Did the Cyber Ninjas Audit report say the 2020 election should be certified?,Would this audit report be required to be approved in Europe?,Was the Cyber Ninjas Audit Report based in the United States?
Did the bill destroy 200 consumer laws?,Was any of the consumer laws still valid when the bill was signed?,Is there any evidence that the bill is still valid now?,Was the repeal of any of the consumer laws the only result of the legislative change?,Do all of the bills that are currently on the legislature's books contain any provisions that have been repealed?
Would Municipalities have 2 or more polling locations open 24 hours a day in the two weeks before an election?,Would these polling locations be open by the time election day is on?,Would municipalities be required to open these polling locations?,Would multiple polling locations prevent access to certain elections?,Would municipalities have to choose their polling locations based on a national database?
Did DeSantis sign a $1 billion tax increase on the people of florida?,Did DeSantis sign a $500 million tax break for corporations?,Did DeSantis sign a $1 billion tax increase on the people of florida?,Did DeSantis sign a tax increase for corporate taxes?
"Did Sweden build a prison for 5,000 immigrants?",Can anyone be jailed without probable cause in the prison?,Is it true that Sweden is building a prison for 5000 immigrants?,Has Sweden convicted any Muslim?,Can the Swedish government prosecute any Muslims?,Can Swedish immigration policies cause harm to the United States?
Can the coronavirus survive on surfaces for up to 17 days?,Did the CDC say the coronavirus can survive on surfaces for up to 17 days?,Does the coronavirus withstand a direct sunlight exposure?,Has the CDC said the coronavirus can survive on surfaces for up to 17 days?
Did Covid-19 vaccines prevent infection in 12 percent of those vaccinated?,Did Covid-19 vaccines prevent infection in 12 percent of those vaccinated?,Is this percentage of those who were vaccinated 100%?,Are vaccines 100% effective?,Do other factors explain this result?
Was it confirmed that 2.3 mln people took part in the Canadian trucker convoy?,Is there any evidence that 2.3 mln people took part in the Canadian trucker convoy?,Did the Canadian trucker convoy take place on a Sunday?,Did the Canadian trucker convoy meet every Sunday?
Did Jefferson say that the government will one day be corrupt and filled with liars?,Did Jefferson say that the people will flock to the one who tells the truth?,Did Jefferson ever mention that the people will flock to the one who tells the truth?,Did Jefferson ever mention that the government will one day be corrupt and filled with liars?
Was there a nationwide consensus on universal background checks?,Is it true that 80 percent of Americans believe that we need to have universal background checks?,Are there a majority of Americans who believe that we need to have universal background checks?,Does 80% of Americans agree that universal background checks are the solution to our problems?
"Did O’Rourke say ""I could throw two kinds of people in the garbage it would be the elderly and wounded veterans""?","Did O’Rourke say that if a tool breaks you don’t fix it, you throw it in the trash?",Did O’Rourke claim that tools are the reason why we throw away a tool?
Can insurance be bought with Cover Florida for a reduced amount?,Is it better to pay more for insurance than lower. Is there evidence that Cover Florida offers more affordable insurance?,Is there evidence that Cover Florida offers less affordable insurance than the average. Is there evidence to prove this?,Is the price of insurance less than the typical?
Did the hydroxychloroquine- azithromycin combinations improve clinical symptoms?,Did the combination of hydroxychloroquine and azithromycin resolve the symptoms of a patient with MS?,Was the individual case of MS that included one patient not seen to improve clinical symptoms?,Was the outcome of this study compared to the placebo treatment?
Did the Napa Winery remain open in July 2020?,Did this winery remain open in July 2020 in the county where Gov. Newsom announced his plan for the closure?,"Is it true that California's Gov. Gavin Newsom also ordered Napa wineries, businesses, and restaurants to close their indoor operations in the state?"
Did Kubrick shoot scenes for the Apollo 11 moon landing in 1969?,Did Kubrick fake the Apollo 11 moon landing?,Did Kubrick fake the moon landing in 1969?,Did Kubrick shoot scenes for the Apollo 11 moon landing in 1969?,Was Kubrick at the Apollo 11 moon landing in 1969?
Was the number of ballots cast for Donald Trump decreased from 80 to 50?,Did the amount of ballots burned reflect voting in person?,Did the burns occur in an unconfirmed location?,Did the election take place within a large neighborhood?,Do any candidates or voting options exist in New York?
Did hospitals get 750 dollars for patients who die from the flu?,"Do hospitals receive a $17,500 cash payment for patients who die from COVID-19?",Does the government provide these funds to hospitals for influenza and COVID?,Do these funds get paid by states?,Is this information true?
"Did the vouchers go to people earning more than $100,000?","Was the percentage of voucher funds used for those who were earning $100,000?","Did the percentage of taxpayers used for those who were making $100,000?",Are the percentages from the school voucher program correct?,Are there other schools that have their own voucher programs?,Are any other programs that are similar to the school voucher program?
Did Rahm Emanuel receive an award in 2014 from the Chicago IL Chamber of Commerce?,Does Rahm Emanuel support the Tree Trimmer Benefit Program?,Did Rahm Emanuel say that tree trimmers make six figures a year?,Did Rahm Emanuel make this claim on their own?
"Did the 1894 treatise exhort young brides to give little, give seldom, and above all, give grudgingly?",Was the 1894 treatise based on literature?,Did the 1894 treatise contain any advice against marital sex?,Are the remark on grudgingly giving based on literature?
Has Bernie raised the minimum wage in any way?,Has Bernie raised taxes?,Would raising the minimum wage by 2% of GDP increase the tax rate to 52%?,Is there any evidence that Bernie's proposal is correct?,"Lastly, does the minimum wage need to rise by 2% of GDP to be acceptable?"
Was Modi stopped due to protests during this visit?,Did the protests end before a public meeting?,Was the protests related to the PM’s visit?,Did the protests end before a public meeting?,Was this visit meant to be an all-China tour?,Did this tour begin before a public meeting?
Is it known that drinking water from banana trees can cure acid reflux?,Is it known that drinking banana tree water can cure acid reflux?,Can drinking water from banana trees be used to alleviate stomach discomfort?,Does drinking banana tree water cure acid reflux?,Does banana tree water have medicinal properties?,Would you ideally consume banana tree water before a meal?
"Did Ilhan Omar receive any convictions for ""treating a terrorist"" in Somalia?",Did Omar become a citizen in Somalia?,Is Ilhan Omar the daughter of a Somali terrorist?,Did Ilhan Omar claim to be a Somali terrorist?,Is Ilhan Omar a citizen of Somalia?
Was this Muslim regiment part of the Indo-Pak War or wars in general?,Is it clear if this Islamic regiment was part of the Indo-Pak War?,Did this Muslim regiment refuse to fight in any war?,Did this Muslim regiment reject fighting in any war?,Were there any issues with the Muslim regiment's decision regarding fighting in the Indo-Pak War?
Did Fauci know that hydroxychloroquine worked and sent emails to friends about it working?,Did Fauci send emails that stated that hydroxychloroquine works?,Did Fauci send emails to friends to explain that it was effective?,Did Fauci email friends regarding what hydroxychloroquine did?
Is polyandry legal in South Africa?,Did women in South Africa marry two men after polyandry became legal?,Is the legality of polyandry clear in South Africa?,Does polyandry in South Africa include marriage by proxy?,Is polyandry legal in South Africa?,Did polyandry in South Africa formally ban marriage?
Was the youth sentenced for working as polling agents for BJP?,Did the youth work for the BJP or for the other politic?,Was there any evidence that the youth were caught?,Was any action taken to punish the youth?,Were any incidents of violence a result of the alleged punishment of the youth?
Was Joe at an event with Hunter or Burisma's CEO on 60 Minutes?,Has Joe been with both of these people?,Has Joe met with both of them?,Would this have been considered an illegal meeting?,Is this meeting recorded?,Has any other individuals been involved with the interviews?,Has this interview had any negative feedback?,Does this interview appear on TV?
Does a city in Texas have a law limiting the number of dildos?,Can a city have a law prohibiting women from having six dildos?,Did a city in Texas have a law prohibiting women from having six dildos?
Did a Pennsylvania judge rule on Election Day that mail-in ballots count if received by Nov 14?,Did this ruling apply to all mail-in ballots?,Does this ruling apply to mail-in ballots only?,Did this ruling pertain to all mail-in ballots?,***Source:?
Did Bush pose with a plastic turkey while visiting the troops in Iraq in 2003?,Is there any evidence that Bush posed with a plastic turkey while visiting the troops in Iraq in 2003?,(4) Did Bush pose with a plastic turkey while visiting the troops in Iraq in 2003?,(5) Was the turkey made of plastic?
"Did 42 million people die over Thanksgiving weekend in violent incidents stemming from shoppers competing for ""Black Friday"" bargains?",Did most of these deaths relate to violence occurring over Thanksgiving weekend?,Did these attacks result in fatal injuries to people involved?,Did more than half of these casualties result in suicides?,Is Black Friday an annual holiday that causes fatalities?
"Was any Pakistan Air Force jet destroyed on the night of March 26, 2016?",Was a Pakistan Air Force fighter jet shot down near the LOC on March 26?,Did any Pakistan Air Force fighter jets get gunned down by Iran?,Did any Pakistan Air Force fighter jets get gunned down by the Indian Air Force at the LOC on March 26?
Have Fed policies contributed to higher corn prices?,Have increased wheat prices resulted in higher prices in general?,Have sugar prices spiked by 15%?,a href=http://www.smartcrunch.com/2009/01/17/sugar-prices-spine-high>./a>?
Does Georgia Power offer a price discount for customers that pays 10 percent to 15 percent below the national average for electricity?,Does Georgia Power offer any benefit for customers that pays 10 percent to 15 percent below the national average for electricity?,Does Georgia Power offer any benefit to customers that pay 10 percent to 15 percent below the national average for electricity?
What is the percentage of income received by farmers in Northern Ireland that comes from the European Union?,Did farmers pay more for this income from the European Union in the year prior to the year?,Did farmers pay less for this income in the year prior to the year?,Was this income in any country lower than that of the EU?
Did Obama come to Ohio twelve times?,Did Obama win in Ohio twelve times?,Was Obama's victory in Ohio tied to the election that he defeated Trump in?,Were the 12 trips to Ohio Obama made the result of his defeat of Trump?,Is Obama's defeat of Trump tied to his return to Ohio?
Did the president win the youth vote 3 to 1?,Did the president's numbers decline 20%-30% among youth?,Did the President's numbers decline 20%-30% among young people?,Are the numbers the President lost to the youth largely unchanged?,Did the President win more youth votes based on voter aggregation than compared to overall population?
Did the data on Covid-19 deaths include all cases of Covid-19?,Did the deaths include all cases of Covid-19?,Did Covid-19 deaths occur due to other causes?,Did all deaths involve a virus other than Covid-19?,Did a majority of Covid-19 deaths occur in the UK without pre-existing conditions?
Did Biden say Black Americans were super-predators?,Did Biden call Black Americans super-predators?,Did Biden refer to Black Americans as super-predators before or after the Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994?,Did Biden call black Americans super-predators after or after the Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994?
Were Taylor Swift concerts a requirement for paying off one day of interest on our national debt?,Did Swift perform each day for three years?,Has Swift performed every day for three years?,Would Swift perform every day for three years?,Do Swift and Swift both appear to have paid off interest on the national debt?
Did Mark Wahlberg say that he was tired of Hollywood's child sex trafficking practices?,"Did Mark Wahlberg say that Hollywood would do ""enough is enough"" on child sex trafficking?","Was the 2023 film ""Sound of Freedom"" made on set by the kidnappers?"
Was Biden wearing an orthopedic boot on the wrong foot?,Was Biden wearing a ruse to conceal his broken foot?,Was Biden wearing the wrong boot on the right foot?,Did Biden accidentally reveal that he broke his fractured foot?,Were Biden's injuries caused by another person?
Does cot19 vaccine cause 1 death per every 3 preventives?,Does cot19 vaccine cause an excess of one death per every 3 preventives?,Is cot19 vaccine responsible for 1 death per every 3 preventives?,Is cot19 vaccine responsible for one death per every 3 preventives?
Did this video portray the shoot down of a Russian KA-52 helicopter?,Did this video feature a Russian KA-52 helicopter being sunk in the Atlantic Ocean?,Did this video feature any Russian KA-52 helicopters being shot down?,Was this video filmed on camera?,Do you think this video is retouched?,Did this video include a Russian KA-52 helicopter being shot down in the Atlantic?
Is this new Coronavirus variant dangerous?,Has this new Coronavirus variant been confirmed in humans?,Is this new Coronavirus variant known to be a known cause of death?,Does this new Coronavirus variant pose a threat to humans?,Has any other type of Coronavirus variant been discovered?,Will this new Coronavirus variant pose any threat to humans?
Did Gandhi promise to reduce the price of everything within 2 months if elected as Prime Minister?,Would Gandhi resign if he lost election?,Will he leave India if he loses election?,Does the Prime Minister pledge price reductions while he is a PM?,Will Gandhi resign if he loses election?
Does the death penalty for drug dealers and human traffickers reduce drug distribution and crime in our country?,Does the death penalty for drug dealers and human traffickers reduce crime in our country?,Does the death penalty for drug dealers and human traffickers reduce drug distribution in our country?,Does the death penalty for drug dealers and human traffickers reduce drug distribution in our country?
Did BJP activists try to vote in the 2019 election in Burqa?,Were Burqa residents threatened or disseminated in response to these efforts?,Did this effort take place before or after the 2019 elections?,Do BJP activists know of any examples of these efforts?,Did any of these efforts result in damage or deaths?
"Did climate change-fueled events kill over 7,000 Americans?",Did climate change-fueled events result in the death of any individuals?,"Regardless of these data-driven factors, did these events affect people negatively?",Could the climate change-fueled events in the US have had a impact on US citizens?,Did any individuals die from climate change-fueled events?
Is Africa projected to have the same population as China or India combined in 2050?,Do China and India have populations comparable to Africa in 2050?,Does Africa account for a large percentage of the continent's population?,Will Africa be more populous than China or India today?,Is Africa the future country that holds China and India?
Are black men charged in a Philadelphia Starbucks?,Are these alleged arrests racially motivated?,Has this settlement made any progress toward justice?,Do any other black alleged offenses occur in Philadelphia Starbucks?,Are there any other black alleged crimes in Philadelphia Starbucks?,Do any Black alleged crimes occur in Philadelphia Starbucks?
Does Russia send 1 million doses of Covid vaccine to Pakistan?,Is Covid vaccine in Phase III trials?,Has the WHO called this phase III trial?,Did Russia share Covid vaccine with Pakistan?,Does the Covid vaccine in phase III trials certify the vaccine?,Does the Covid vaccine require a positive rabies test?
"Did George Allen increase the national debt by 16,000 every second?",Was the national debt higher in the late 1800s than in the early 1900s?,Was the debt higher the late 1800s or early 1900s?,Was the national debt higher in the late 1800s?,Did the debt increase in the late 1800s or early 1900s?
Does vaccine work before SARS-CoV-2 had a name in some way prove pandemic was planned?,Did vaccination work before SARS-CoV-2 had a name do something that would have made us believe a pandemic was planned?,Can we conclude that the CDC was not involved in the design of vaccines in any way?
Did the president borrow $1.4 trillion last year?,Is $1.4 trillion of debt held by foreign investors?,Are foreign investors primarily responsible for the debt?,Is 1% of the debt held by foreign investors?,Is 1% of the debt held by foreign investors?,Did the debt held by foreign investors include all American government funds?
Do federal plans to achieve net zero emissions by 2050 require a binding commitment?,Does the federal government's commitment to achieve net zero emissions by 2050 require a binding commitment?,Does any federal pledge to achieve net zero emissions in a given decade require a binding commitment?,Do federal and state plans to achieve net zero emissions in a given decade require a binding commitment?
Did this picture come from an actual baby peacock?,Did the picture show bright-blue feathers?,Did this peacock actually have bright blue feathers?,Has the baby peacock since been sold?,Do peacocks generally have bright blue feathers?,Have peacocks ever been sold?
Did this photograph show the wildfires in December 2021 in Colorado?,Did this aerial photograph show the wildfires in December 2021?,Was this photograph of the wildfires taken in December 2021?,Did this photograph show any other wildfires in December 2021 in Colorado?,Did this photograph show any other wildfires in December 2021 in Colorado?
Do Obama administration officials estimate that the cost of new helicopter will be the same as Air Force One?,Is a new presidential helicopter now going to cost as much as Air Force One?,Are Obama administration officials estimating that this new helicopter is going to cost the same as Air Force One?,Is the cost of this new helicopter now going to be as much as Air Force One?
Did Mundine speak at an event in 2017?,Did Mundine support a constitutionally enshrined national Indigenous voice?,Did Mundine support the constitutionally enshrined national Indigenous voice?,Is Mundine in an office of the Parliament of Australia?,Is Mundine's role on the legislative bench in the Parliament of Australia?
Did the federal government save a single cent by circulating coins instead of bills?,Does the federal government use the same money on bills as coins?,Are coins cheaper than bills?,Would a single coin be better in cost per dollar than a bill?,Would an increase in coin prices save the federal government money in the long run?,Does the federal government want to encourage people to buy coins?
Is it true that government recovered a total of R4.21 billion since 2009?,Is it true that government has recovered a total of R601 million since 2009?,Is it true that government has recovered a total of R4.21 billion since 2009?,Is it true that government has recovered a total of R601 million since 2009?
Did Miller say Hitler was right on one thing prior to Trump supporters storming the national capitol in 2019?,Was Miller the one person to state Hitler was right on one thing prior to Trump supporters storming the nation's capitol in 2019?,Was Miller an official member of the Trump Supporters?,Was Miller part of the Trump supporters that stormed the national capitol in 2019?
Did the Tablighi Jamaat members come in contact with those who were in Sector 5 Harola?,Has any of those in contact with Tablighi Jamaat members been quarantined?,Were the Tablighi Jamaat members quarantined as a precautionary measure?,Was the police not confirming whether or not the members came in contact with Tablighi Jamaat members?
Has Indonesia rigged the election or has it been cleared?,Has China sent 70 million ballots to Indonesia?,Did the election have a rigger in Indonesian President Joko Widodo?,Did China send 70.000 ballots?,Was the outcome of the elections considered fair?,Would this be the case in Indonesia?
Are there any other states that permit gill nets?,Do they permit gillnets in lakes?,Is there any evidence of these three states prohibiting gill nets?,Have these three states actually banned gill nets?,Were the three states mentioned in this article in any other states that allow gill nets?
Has as many as 200 police personnel submitted collective resignation?,Is this the first time a policing representative has done this?,Is the protesters' protest a part of this collective resignation?,"Currently, which protesting farmers are involved?",Was the police presence in this protesting farmers' movement a total victory or a loss?
Is this virus the same as the 2018 novel coronavirus?,Does this virus come from the laboratory?,Did the 2017 novel coronavirus contain a 'Shuttle-SN' sequence?,Did the 2016 novel coronavirus contain a 'Shuttle-SN' sequence?
Did unemployment decrease from 2012 to 2014 in the U.S.?,Was the unemployment rate lowered in any individual state during 2013?,Was the unemployment rate lower in New Jersey than any of Connecticut or New York?,Did the unemployment rate decrease in New Jersey in 2014?,Are unemployment rates generally higher than the national average?
Is the total outlay of 3000 crores a reasonable estimate for the integrated development of fishing resources?,Is it the only government agency involved in this project?,Is the estimated budget for this project based on estimates from a number of sources?,Are there any other major policies being considered for the fisheries in this project?
Did students in Austin's ISSD learn that gender is fluid at an early age?,Do all Austin schools teach their students that gender is fluid?,Are all schools in Austin teaching this message to students?,Would it be a problem for some Austin Schools to implement this message?,Do all Austin Independent School District schools teach this message to students?
Did a man named Robert Matthews call a Norfolk radio station with a tale of 9/11 heroism?,Did a man named Robert Matthews call a Norfolk radio station with a tale of 9/11 heroism?,Did Matthews call a Norfolk radio station with a tale of 9/11 heroism?
Is it true that the top income tax rate in Pennsylvania is 3 percent?,Does Delaware have no state income tax?,Is it true that the top income tax rate in Pennsylvania is 3 percent?,Is the average income tax rate for Delaware the same as the top income tax rate in Pennsylvania?,Does Delaware have no state income tax?
Is it true that airplanes didn't cause the twin towers to collapse during the 9/11 attacks?,Does it matter if planes crashed inside the towers or not?,Is it true that planes did not cause the Twin Towers to collapse in the 9/11 attacks?,Is the evidence for the claim of planes doing not cause the Twin Towers to collapse in the 9/11 attacks accurate?
Did drug arrests increase substantially every year from 1970-1918?,Was the number of drug arrests increase in 2018 or previously?,Did the number of drug arrests increase substantially for any year in 1970-2017?,Was the average age of the arrests from 1970-1918 similar to the previous year?,Is the average age for drug arrests for the upcoming years similar to the previous year?
Is Biden's White House staffed?,Are there people in Biden's White House staffed?,Is Biden's White House staffed?,Is Biden's White House staffed with people?,Do Biden and his White House travel to other countries?,Is Biden's White House staffed with people?
Did the city refinanced bonds?,Did this result in reduced debt service?,Did the city pay back the bonds?,Did this result in any debt reduction?,Has this reduction in debt service resulted in any debt relief?,Have debt reduction and debt service decreased as a result of this refinanced loan?
Did a list of felons in Florida affect the voting roll in 2000?,Was the list of felons on the Florida voter rolls purged by any person?,Was there a process to drop voters from voting rolls?,Was the voting roll made up of a total of people?,Was the population for the election drained?,Was the population for the election drained?
Was this poem written by Kathleen O'Mara in 1869?,Was this poem about people staying home written by Kathleen O'Mara?,Is this poem about people staying home written by someone else besides Kathleen O'Mara?,Is this poem written for the sake of the rest of the poem?
Is this vaccine approved in the US?,Have any other vaccines for COVID been approved by the FDA?,Can the vaccine be used in people who have a COVID-19 infection?,Can any drug in the US be used to prevent COVID-19?,Is this vaccine the only vaccine available to people with a COVID-19 infection?
Did truck drivers in Puerto Rico go on strike to protest a series of hurricanes?,Did truck drivers in Puerto Rico go on strike?,Did truck drivers refuse to take part in relief efforts after hurricanes?,Did the truck drivers in Puerto Rico stop aiding in relief efforts after hurricanes?,Is there information regarding the amount of aid truck drivers are required to provide?
Did the protests take place in 2022?,Was the Dutch parliament involved?,Did the protesters are associated with a political party?,Did the protesters receive any justice for their actions?,Did Dutch farmers protest during the period of 2020?,Was the event in question a major political debate?,Did the event happen during the span of time in which the video was captured?
How much did Cramer make on PSC?,Did Cramer raise pay for PSC?,Is Cramer paid less in PSC?,Does Cramer receive a raise in general?,Did Cramer pay higher salary in PSC than general?,Does Cramer receive a raise in total?
Is this photo of a Quebec anti-lockdown rally?,Does this protest photo show a Canadian flag?,Is this photo taken before the 2018 Quebec protest?,Do these photos show a national flag?,Does this protest photo have a number of flags?,Is this protest photo from 2018?
Did the governor reduce state school funding by $1.6 billion?,Did the governor give $2.1 billion in corporate tax breaks to companies?,Did the governor cut state schools by $1 billion per year?,Did the governor give less tax breaks than the previous decade?,Is this a true story about the New Jersey education system?
Did a person die in a fire in the Mumbai area of Tardeo in 2019?,Did the man fall to his death when trying to escape from the fire?,"Was this fire reported in the media on January 22, 2019?",Did the blaze occur due to an accident?,Do any fires occur in Mumbai during the year 2019?
Was the quarantine extended to April 30?,Is there any evidence of the spread of this outbreak?,Is it possible that this outbreak might continue?,Is there any evidence that this outbreak is likely to recur?,Is there any evidence that the outbreak has spread beyond a certain point?,Is there any evidence that the spread of this outbreak is likely to continue from a certain point?
Was the Muslim boy carrying a placard that says his father has four wives and 25 children?,"Was the Islamic boy wearing a shirt with the phrase "" My Father Has four wives and 25 children ""?",Was the Muslim boy wearing a blue hat?,Has the Muslim boy ever said any of these statements on a placard?
Has the Senate held hearings on Supreme Court nominees until 1916?,Does the 1916 Supreme Court nomination of Louis Brandeis prove there were ever hearings?,Did Brandeis's term start after the Senate voted on nominations?,Has Brandeis' term come in the top 5 most frequently?
Does a flight tracking map show planes spreading chemtrails over the UK in 2023?,Was there any research that indicated chemtrails were spreading over the UK during that time?,"Moreover, was it a complete map and if this is the case where it is the case then Is this map true?"
Would a National Paid Leave Program create any economic effect?,Are there additional benefits of a Paid Leave program?,Would the estimated economic impact of this program be a large increase in the economy?,Do all U.S. taxpayers have paid leave?,Does this program contribute to national growth in some manner?
Was the tax indexed for inflation?,Did 3.5 million people pay the tax in 2006?,Did Congress create the tax?,Does the tax affect wealthy people?,Was the tax indexed for inflation?,Did Congress make the Tax based on actual data?,Is this tax effective for everyone?,Do wealthy people pay this tax?
Does New York spend more than $8 billion annually on job creation programs - more than the combined total of the next three largest states?,Does New York spend more than other states for job creation programs?,Is New York's total annual taxpayer money spent on job creation programs larger than other states?,Was New York's total amount per year more than the sum of all other states combined?,Is New York's total annual tax money spent on job creation programs larger than the sum of other states combined?
"Since Obama came into office, what additional numbers have joined the poverty ranks?",Is the number of Hispanic children living in poverty increased by 15% in that short period of time?,Did Obama's policies increase the number of Hispanic children in poverty?,Does Obama's budget primarily focus on raising incomes and income inequality?,Does this policy have any implications for low income children?
Did natural gas production plummet in New York?,Did natural gas production spike in Pennsylvania?,Did Pennsylvania gain more gas production than New York?,Is there any evidence that there was a trend in natural gas growth between 2010 and 2017?,Are there other facts about this story?,Are there any more detailed data on this story?
Does manufacturing the battery for one electric car produce the same amount of carbon dioxide as running a petrol car for eight years?,Does the process of manufacturing the battery for one electric car produce any additional carbon dioxide?,Will the additional carbon dioxide be offset by any emissions from the manufacturing process?,Is there evidence to suggest that the number of carbon dioxide emissions from the battery for one electric car is equal to the amount generated by the combustion of a petrol car in eight years?
Did a man named Adolf Hitler win a local election in Namibia?,Did Hitler defeat all of his opponents in Namibia?,Did Hitler defeat all of his opponents in Namibia?,Is the election the first election in Namibia where Hitler allegedly won?,Were there any problems in Namibia after the election?,Did the election go well for Hitler?
Did more than 3 million young adults get insurance under Obamacare?,Did a majority of young adults gain insurance through family coverage?,Does Obamacare allow young adults who stay on family coverage to gain insurance?,Does Obamacare have policies for young adults that may not require payment if they gain insurance through family coverage?
Does the family of Nita Ambani give Rs 200 crore to Kangana Ranaut for building a new studio?,Was the family's decision about this reportedly based on facts?,Is this reportedly based on truth?,Was this supposedly based on a statement by Nita Ambani?
Does it prohibit a vehicle from claiming an accident if it does not have a pollution under control certificate?,Does it allow a vehicle to claim an accident if it does not have a polluation under control certificate?,Does it allow a vehicle to claim an accident if it does not have a polluation under control certificate?
Would the bacteria IPR live on a metal surface for a longer time than a single drop on the surface?,Would the bacteria reappear on a metal surface once a day?,Would metal surfaces remain shiny until the bacteria is wiped off?,Did the bacteria live on metal surfaces before reappearing?
Is this a direct quotation from a book?,Has this particular lynch incident impacted the social perception of a religion in the United States?,Did this lynch happen in a particular country?,Did this particular incident in New York happen in this country?,Did this specific incident impact the sex prostitution laws of New York?
Did Abbott benefit from payday lenders?,Did Abbott rule that payday lenders can operate in a loophole in the law that allows them to charge unlimited rates and fees?,Did Abbott give payday lenders permission to charge unlimited rates and fees?,Does Abbott know whether payday lenders can charge unlimited rates and fees?,-Are payday lenders allowed to charge unlimited rates and fees?
Was the NFL fined the NFL players for wearing 9/11 memorial cleats during football games played on 11 September 2016?,Was the NFL fined the NFL players for wearing 9/11 memorial cleats during football games played on 11 September 2016?,Are NFL players fined for wearing 9/11 memorial cleats during football games played on 11 September 2016?
Did Ghana get seven days to rebuild the demolished High Commission building?,Did Ghana get a six-month deadline to rebuild the demolished High Commission building?,Did Ghana get a seven-day deadline to rebuild the demolished High Commission building?,Were Ghana compelled to rebuild the demolished High Commission building?
Did Congress pass this legislation?,Did 87 percent of benefits go to the top one percent?,Did this include the tax cut the democrats passed?,Was the tax bill in general a failure?,Can you determine inferences?,"Posted December 22, 2017 - 17:08 PM by Paul S. Davis Is the tax cut in 2017 a failure?","Posted December 22, 2017 - 17:08 PM by Paul S. Davis?"
Are doctors forced to limit the number of Medicare patients they see?,Are primary care doctors forced to limit the number of Medicare patients they see?,Is the percentage of physicians who see Medicare patients above a level of control of the government?,Does a doctor limit the number of Medicare patients they see?,Does the government monitor this percentage?
Did Biden vote in favor of taxing 50% of Social Security in 1983?,Did Biden vote in favor of raising the percentage taxed on Social Security from 50% to 85% in 1993?,Did Biden vote to increase the percentage taxed on Social Security from 50% to 85% in 1993?,Did Biden vote in favor of taxing 50% of Social Security in 1983?
Is McCain's plan tax relief for middle class families?,Does McCain's economic plan give tax breaks to the oil companies?,Did McCain offer tax relief to middle class families?,Did McCain's economic plan have tax breaks for the oil companies?,Did McCain's economic plan provide any tax relief to the middle class?
Do market forecasts project diesel to reach $9 a gallon by August?,Will diesel prices increase if an increase of this magnitude is not realized?,Is the current diesel price under $16 a gallon?,Is diesel currently under $12 a gallon?,Did the latest diesel sales year exceed $3 million?
"Did the FBI investigating an incident in which Trump supporters in pickup trucks surrounded a Biden-Harris campaign bus on a highway in Texas on Oct. 30, 2020?",Does the FBI conduct investigation into such incidents?,Does the FBI investigate any incidents of crime in the aftermath of an incident?,Whether the FBI is still investigating this investigation.?
Would Union Home Minister Amit Shah increase pensions under the EPS 95 pension scheme?,Would the increase be made in the middle of his speech?,Does Amit Shah endorse the proposed EPS 95 pension scheme?,Would Amit Shah favor the EPS 95 pension scheme over the IPS 85 pension scheme?,Will this EPS 95 pension scheme increase pensions under the Union Home Ministry?
Did the deadline for filing income tax returns have been extended?,"Has the extension extended to September 30, 2019?","Did the deadline for filing income tax returns have been extended to September 30, 2019?",Do income tax returns require a valid Social Security Number?,"Will the Social Security number remain valid beyond September 30, 2019?",Are income taxes being done in the year the number is reported as valid for the first time?
Did the nail capsule have the same substance?,Did the clip feature the same material?,"Did a person who was filmed displaying ""medicine jihad"" wear nail capsules?",Was the nail capsule contained in a package?,Are nail capsules made from ingredients that were common in India?,Have nail capsules been found in a package?
"Did there over 8,871,525 registered voters in Arizona according to FB?","Did the population in Arizona exceed 7,270,000?","Did AZ voters increase by more than 8,871,525 compared to the population in general?","Did the population increase by over 7,270,000 during the statewide election in 2016?"
Does it take a while for the tally to load the ballots?,Did this ballot dump start after 08:00 on Election Day?,Did this ballot dump begin around 11:40 on Election Day?,Did tupps report receiving the ballots at 1:30 am or 3 am on Election Day?
Did Ike cause any injuries in that house?,Did it have any structures that survived Ike?,Was the house razed primarily due to floods?,Was there any flooding in the home immediately after Ike?,Did any structures survive after Ike?,Would this house have remained razed after Ike?
Did Virginia spend $400k on abstinence programs while losing $2.5 million in federal funds?,"Did Virginia spend $400,000 on abstinence programs while losing $2.5 million in federal funds due to Gov. Bob McDonnell's political agenda?",Did Virginia spend more on abstinence programs while losing $2.5 million in federal funds due to Gov. Bob McDonnell's political agenda?
Have all 27 million tests been completed?,Has each of these tests already been completed?,Are any more tests to be completed?,Are any other tests still to be performed?,Are there any studies on how many tests have been completed so far?,Are there any other studies about how many tests have been completed so far?
Is it true that the city of Sacramento is paying gang members $1.5 million to stop killing?,Does it even specifically mention how much the city is paying them for this behavior?,Does the city currently pay those that kill in Sacramento $1.5 million to stop?,Does the city specifically pay any money to gangs for killing in Sacramento?
Did the 17-year-old sued his parents?,Did the 17-year-old make the claim to her parents?,Do the 17-year-old's parents have any legal record?,Is the 17-year-old's parent having legal status with the case?,Is there evidence that the 17-year-old's parents have legal status with the case?
Did the foreign born contribute 80% of the new jobs created in the state of Texas since 2009?,Did the foreign born contribute 80% of the new jobs created in the state of Texas since 2009?,Do foreign-born people make up a substantial percentage of the net new jobs created in the state of Texas since 2009?
Does this photograph have any significant information?,Is this type of person the subject of this photo?,Did this photographer post this photo publicly?,Does this image include captions?,Did this type of person take this photo?,Does this particular person pose in this photograph?,Does this image have any relevant information to help this person further?
Did the school buildings in Lawang Bato and Canumay East begin construction in 2016 before Duterte became President?,Did the school buildings in Lawang Bato and Canumay East begin construction before Duterte became president?,Did Duterte resign from power after the schools were inaugurated?
Can women in STEM fields make up a higher percentage of overall workforce?,Can women in STEM fields make a lower percentage of overall workforce?,Can women in STEM fields contribute in more than half of STEM-related occupations?,Does the percentage of STEM-related workforce comprise an overall percentage of total workforce?,Are women in STEM fields making up a larger proportion of overall workforce than males?
Did the cruise line post a message on one of its ships asking for people to refrain from having sex with their lunches?,Did the cruise line ask for people to refrain from sex with their lunches?,Did the Cruise Line post a message asking people to refrain from sex with their lunches?
Is the Empire State Building Green in celebration of Eid al-Fitr on 11 September 2016?,"Is the Empire State Building Green in celebration of Christmas on December 25th, 2016?","Is the Empire State Building Green in celebration of Thanksgiving on December 23rd, 2016?",Do all of these Thanksgiving holiday are associated with Eid al-Fitr?
Did the image show SP leaders meeting Yogi Adityanath post UP Poll Results 2022?,Did SP leaders meet with Yogi Adityanath after UP Poll Results 2022?,Have SP leaders met with Adityanath before in the last four years?,Was Adityanath speaking before the meeting at any point?
Does the 122nd article of the constitution give the indigenous community the power to create states?,"Are indigenous groups unable to create states, under the current constitution?",Can the new constitution provide Indigenous people the power to create states?,Have there been any cases of this happening?,Do the amendments in the 122nd article of the constitution offer to the Indigenous community the power to create states?
Did Hassan vote against sanctuary cities legislation in 2008?,Did Hassan vote for sanctuary cities legislation in 2008?,Did Hassan vote against legislation to prevent sanctuary cities in New Hampshire?,Did Hassan vote against legislation to prevent sanctuary cities in 2008?,Did Hassan vote in favor of a bill requiring sanctuary cities?,Did Hassan vote in favor of any other legislation relating to sanctuary cities?
Is there any evidence that the majority of Indian people trust their government?,Is the country in the middle between autocracies and a majority of those who want a strong leader?,Is there any evidence of the average percentage of Indians favoring autocracy?,Is the percentage of Indians favouring an autocracy higher than the percentage of those who want a strong leader?,Is there any evidence of India favoring autocracy in the percentage of those who want a strong leader?
Is this prediction accurate?,Will 90% of the world's coral reefs be lost?,Will bleaching increase in the next 35 years?,Is this a true prediction?,Do researchers have any evidence for this scenario?,Will all coral reefs disappear in the coming 35 years?,Will 90% of coral reefs be destroyed?
Have any prior plans been in place in Oregon?,Has Oregon tried to create a land use plan for this time period?,Is it possible that any land use plan will result in this type of plan?,Is it probable that any land use plan has been established in Oregon prior to this time?,Will all these planning efforts be in this period?
Is there evidence of a decline in income between 1979 and 2007?,Did incomes of the top 1 percent quadruple from 1979 to 2007?,Is the average income of a family still higher than that of the top 1 percent?,Is there evidence of a lower income for the top 1 percent from 1979 to 2007?
Did all the billionaires in America have a net worth increase of more than $800 billion during the pandemic?,Has this information been verified by data sources?,Have the billionaires' net worth increased significantly during the pandemic?,Have all the billionaires in America experienced a decrease in their net worth as a result of this situation?
Did the Kashmiri Pandit say the same thing as Gandhi?,Is the video from a videoconferencing session with Gandhi?,Does this video show any disagreement between Gandhi and Pandit?,Does the video have any negative comments about Gandhi?,Are these negative comments based on facts or opinions?,Is this particular video part of an ongoing political discourse?
"In 2022, would Britain need to give up its currency under the Treaty?",Are there other things that will mean that Britain would have to give up its currency under the Treaty?,Would the change in British currency result in a devaluation of the UK currency?,Are there any other things that could be the reason why it would be desirable to give up the British currency under the Treaty?
Did McDonald's make this announcement in 2020?,Did McDonald's change their locations for this reason?,Are there any additional restaurants?,Did McDonald's actually make this announcement in 2020?,Will McDonald's still make these changes?,Does McDonald's now own most of these restaurants?,Does this situation affect the McDonald's chain?
Do you need a special account to use the vouchers?,Is there a maximum number of people who can use these vouchers?,Will sharing a Facebook post get you a voucher?,Is there a minimum number of people that can use the vouchers?,Do the vouchers expire within a certain time of the post posting?
Does Gorsuch have to meet the voting standard of 60 votes on the Supreme Court?,Is Gorsuch in the process of confirming a court in the future?,Have all Supreme Court nominees been forced to have 60 votes on the court?,Does this statement provide any evidence that Gorsuch needs to meet the voting standards?
Does the video date from at least 2020?,Was this video released during the invasion of Ukraine?,Did this video originate prior to the invasion of Ukraine?,Did these planes fly in formation for this video?,Do we know if this video originates prior to the invasion of Ukraine?,Has this video been released after this invasion?
Did people boo Kwara governor on stage in August 2022?,Did this event happen on the same day that Kwara governor resigned?,Did this event occur with or without Kwara governor in general?,Was Kwara governor resigning before the video was shown?,Was this event on a public stage?
Did Perry use $3.2 billion in stimulus dollars for schools to fill holes in his budget?,"Was Perry's ""topping other holes in his budget"" a budgetary goal?","Did Perry have ""topping other holes in his budget"" a budgetary goal?",Did Perry make a decision to use $3.2 billion in stimulus money for schools in 2008?
Did homework get its name in 1905?,Did Neville even own a school?,Did Neville ever try to teach the concept of homework?,Did Neville start teaching homework himself?,Were there any other teachers that used homework in the 1905-era?,Did Neville use homework in the 1905-era?
Has a Republican won presidential office in New Jersey since 1988?,Does any previous Democrat have won a presidential office in New Jersey since 1988?,Has any current Republican hold a presidencies in any state during the 20th century?,Has any state experienced a Democratic presidency in the 18th century?
Did the author of 'Alice in Wonderland' prankishly send an admiring Queen Victoria a copy of one of his mathematics texts?,Is the author of 'Alice in Wonderland' likely to have sent a copy of his mathematics texts to Queen Victoria?
"Did Gov. Perry's administration end immunizations for 113,000 kids?",Has the federal government in general ended vaccinations?,"Has the administration in general abolished vaccinations for 113,000 kids?",Does each state have a mandate for immunizations?,Has the FDA banned any new vaccines in the state?,Has any state pushed out any new vaccines in the country?,Has any state halted new vaccinations in the state?
Are these photographs of a man who may have lived to 146 years old?,Does the Indonesian man in the photographs appear to have lived to that age?,Is the Indonesian man able to speak English?,Is the Indonesian man able to communicate English?,Has the Indonesian man in the photographs achieved an age of 146 years old?
Has the federal health care law been upheld by the Supreme Court?,Did the Supreme Court rule in favor of the federal health care law?,"Has the federal health care law caused the life of more than 4,000 people in Texas with pre-existing conditions?","Is the federal health care law responsible for the life of 4,000 people in Texas without pre-existing conditions?"
"Did all of the COVID-19 cases linked to the events in June 2021 in Provincetown, Massachusetts occur in fully vaccinated individuals?","Is there evidence the entire COVID-19 outbreak in Provincetown, MA occurred in fully vaccinated individuals?","Is there evidence a significant minority of the COVID-19 outbreak in Provincetown, MA happened in fully vaccinated individuals?"
Did she get paid to make up stories about her?,Did all of these women get paid to write these stories?,Were these stories true?,Do these women have any legal status?,Was the article accurate in its depiction of the crimes?,Did these women do this for a lot of money?,Did these women try to get an unauthorized transcript of the article?
Was the photo taken in 1960?,Was Ivey a protester in Louisiana?,Did Ivey participate in any protests in Louisiana?,Was this photograph taken in 1960?,Did this photograph feature Ivey protesting any in Louisiana?,Did Ivey participate in any protests in Louisiana?,Did the photograph contain black people?
Did 190 countries have pre booked the COVID-19 vaccine that India developed?,Did the COVID vaccine have a certain market share?,Did India develop the COVID vaccine at a specific time and place?,Approximately how many countries did the Bharat Biotech COVID vaccine have a market share in?
Is raising Cane’s planning on closing all restaurants by the end of 2019?,Will all restaurants be shut down?,Will they be sold to private investors?,Is this move in jeopardy?,Do other stricken franchises in New York state have similar plans?,Did this restaurant plan on closing all restaurants?
"Is there a ratio of 187 policemen for every 100,000 Nigerians?","Is it true that the UN recommends a ratio of 300 police officers per 100,000 Nigerians?","Is it true that Nigeria has a current ratio of 187 policemen for every 100,000 Nigerians?"
Did the government invest more than R50 billion in loans to the poor?,Did the government use the National Student Financial Aid Scheme to provide loans to the poor?,Did the government also invest in bursaries to provide funding to the poor?,Did the government increase the funding for the poor in the NSFAS?
Did Obama personally pay for this rioting to occur in Ukraine?,Did Obama pay to dismantle their democratically elected government?,Do these actions reflect Obama’s policy on Ukraine?,Did this rioting occur in Ukraine?,Did Obama ever pay for this rioting?,Did Obama fund this rioting?,Was there an amount of money paid to Ukrainians to riot during this rioting?
"Did the Michigan farmer destroy 40,000 cherries to make room for cherries imported from outside the US?",Did the Michigan farmer destroy the cherries while the cherries were still edible?,Did the Michigan farmer destroy the cherries before the cherries were imported from outside the U.S?,Did any of the cherries the Michigan farmer destroyed have become edible?
Did the attacks kill at least 150 people?,Did the attacks cause any damages to the city?,Did the attacks cause any damage to the city as a whole?,Did the attacks cause any injuries in the city as a whole?,Was the city safe from the attacks?,Did the attacks affect the cities health in any way?
Is it true that Trump has put on a child protection force and found over 300 missing kids in less than 30 days?,Is it true that this force only found 300 missing kids?,Is it true that he only found over 300 missing children in less than 30 days?,Is there evidence that Trump's child protection force only found 300 missing kids in less than 30 days?
Did Tull say this in public?,Was Tull a Democratic politician in New York state?,Does Tull support euthanasia for old people?,Are there any questions about Tull's position?,Can Tull be considered a pro-euthanizing political figure in New York?
Did Trump participate in KKK riot in 1927?,Was Trump arrested for participating in KKK riot in 1927?,Was Trump arrested for participating in KKK riot in 1927?,Did Trump appear at riot during 1927?,Did Trump attend riot during 1927?,Did Trump attend riot during 1927?
Did the United States unemployment rate in the 3rd quarter of 2020 exceed the 1st quarter of 2020?,Did there in the 3rd quarter of 2020 more people job creating than the 1st quarter of 2020?,Does unemployment stand at 30.8%?,Would the unemployment rate increase over the next year?
In 2022 what part of the Treaty does eu have to give up its nationality?,Can eu have its nationality for up to five years after 2022?,If eu can take our nationality out in 2022 will this eu have to give up their nationality?
Does the FDA approve this product?,Does this product resolve patients' respiratory issues?,Does the product make a long lasting recovery in 5 weeks?,Does this product have a longer than 7 days effective duration?,Does this product cure all respiratory problems?,Does this product cause nausea and vomiting?,"Is this product able to help patients with asthma, pneumonia, and bronchitis?"
Did Lin Wood call the 2020 U.S. election rigged?,Did Lin Wood call the 2020 U.S. election rigged by the Chinese?,Did Lin Wood ever claim the 2020 U.S. election was rigged by the Chinese?,Did Lin Wood claim that the 2020 U.S. election was rigged by the Chinese?
Are six million young people without jobs?,Will these young people be forced out of their families' homes?,Will these young people face long term structural barriers to working in their communities?,-Which policies will guarantee these young people's futures?,-Were the policies made to provide jobs to young people at a young age?,-Which policies will ensure the well being of these young people?
Did she go to a hospital after her death?,Did she go to school?,Was she gang raped or tortured?,Was her death linked to anything else?,Is the girl mentioned in the article the first female victim of gang rape in India?,Can you link this girl to the earlier case?
Has BJP led-Central government sold Indian Railways to Adani Wilmar?,Is BJP a party in this transaction?,Have any of the parties in this transaction been announced?,Has this transaction taken place through a private-sector company?,Does Adani Wilmar have more than 230 employees in this transaction?
Is 20% of single adults ages 21 to 25 with no kids working or trying to find a job?,Is 20% of single adults 21 to 25 with no kids in school trying to find a job?,Is 20% of single adults 21 to 25 with no kids in school attempting to find a job?
Did the Taliban announce a nation-founding ceremony to humiliate the United States?,Did Taliban announce the ceremony to humiliate the United States?,Did any U.S. officials participate in the ceremony?,Did the Taliban announce the ceremony to humiliate the United States?,Was the ceremony held in a country other than Pakistan?,Was this ceremony not publicly aired in the United States?
Is one out of two Americans currently in or near poverty?,Do 150 million Americans constitute half of the U.S. population?,Is 50% of Americans in or near poverty?,Is one out of two Americans living in or near poverty?,Are 150 million Americans with a serious disability?,Did Cohn claim he's made information based on statistics from the Census?
Is it true that Russia doctors performing autopsies on COVID-19 patients violate a World Health Organization law?,Is it true that Russia doctors performing autopsies on deceased COVID patients violate a World Health Organization law?,Is it true that Russian doctors performing autopsies on deceased COVID patients violate a World Health Organization law?
Did these companies have multiple holdings?,Did all of these companies have multiple holdings?,Did Amazon have multiple holdings and/or ownerships?,Did Amazon and Coke have multiple ownerships?,Did these companies have multiple holdings?,Did these companies have multiple ownerships?,Added these companies to your shopping list?,Did this company take advantage of this situation to expand in the United States?
Did Ratan Tata agree with the quote?,Was the Prime Minister’s popularity increased due to the death of 65 soldiers?,Did the Prime Minister’s popularity increase due to the death of 65 soldiers?,Was the PM’s popularity increased as a result of the death of 65 soldiers?,Was it in the best interest of the country to save itself from destruction?
Did Pelosi recently purchase 10 million shares in a cannabis company?,Did Pelosi invest in any other companies related to cannabis?,Was there a correlation between Pelosi's purchase of shares in a cannabis company and her previous purchases of other investments?,Did Pelosi purchase shares in a cannabis company prior to the announcement of her purchase?,Did Pelosi purchase any other companies related to cannabis?
Did Schiff receive taxpayer money to reach a sexual harassment settlement with a 19-year-old male?,Did Schiff make the settlement himself?,Was there any record of Schiff using taxpayer money to reach a sexual harassment settlement with a 19-year-old male?,Did Schiff formally acknowledge the sexual harassment settlement?
Did Governor Evers give $2.4 million in COVID relief to Planned Parenthood affiliates in Wisconsin?,Did Gov. Tony Evers give COVID relief money to Planned Parenthood affiliates in Wisconsin in order to fund abortions?,Did Gov. Tony Evers ever give money to Planned Parenthood affiliates in Wisconsin for COVID relief?,Does Evers donate money directly to Planned Parenthood affiliates?,Did Gov. Tony Evers fund abortions using COVID relief money?
Did President Trump announce a nationwide quarantine for all citizens?,Did the Department of Homeland Security evacuate all US nationals from the region?,Was the national guard dispatched in a nation-wide fashion?,Is there proof that the national guard has deployed in the country?,Have any reports been published in regards to the national guard operation?
Did O’Rourke rallies have 300 people?,Is there a quote stating this?,Is there proof of this?,Was there a positive statement in this quote?,Has the quote attributed this information to a person?,Was the quote directly on the video?,Were there other quotes from the video?
"Would this be a legal abortion after five months in China, North Korea, Canada and the U.S?",Is China legal abortion after 5 months or not?,"Would this be a legal abortion after five months in China, North Korea, Canada and the U.S.?","Are the United States, Canada and China illegal abortion countries?"
* *?
Does the 2nd Marine Division to begin recalling IRR Marines - Channel 45 News?,Was this information first reported on the website?,Is this information currently in fact current?,Was this information last reported on the website?,Was this information published in the news media?,Did this information come from the news media?
Did Pope Francis express his opposition to priests exposing pedophiles?,Did Francis respond to Priests using pedophile tactics in September 2018?,Did Pope Francis publicly deny the priests' sexual activity?,Did Francis explain any of the priests exposing pedophiles were Satan's work?
Did Simone invade Seattle?,Did Simone attack locals?,Did Simone walk away without a questioning?,Has Simone been arrested?,Was Simone questioned by the authorities?,Can Simone's statements be relied upon?,Was Simone arrested for a crime?,Was Simone charged?
Did women of the Burkha Community cast fake votes in favour of Samajwadi Party in the UP Assembly elections?,Does this video of Burkha women cast fake votes in favour of Samajwadi Party indicate other instances of this type of behavior?,Was this video distributed in the context of general election?,Has this person been identified in this video?
Did the Democrats use these 47 million ballots to steal every election?,Did the Democrats use these 47 million ballots to steal every election in the country?,Has the total number of ballots used by Democrats violated any election laws?,Are there other cases where this strategy has been used?,Is this evidence contradictory to the other reports?
Did the Robredo-Pangilinan Grand People's Rally have more than 70 million people at it?,Did a more inclusive event have less attendance?,Did some other organizers attend the rally?,Did the organizers claim to have met with a larger attendance?,Did other organizers claim to have met with a larger attendance?
Was a tweet about an employee fired by Twitter due to the satire account?,Was the account deleted?,Was the tweet directed towards the employee who was fired?,Is Twitter not involved in satire?,Are there any other companies involved in satire?,Is the Twitter employee fired after 6.5 years due to the satire account?
Did Obama want to increase government size by 23 percent?,Was the amount of government increase a reflection of the size of Obama's government?,Did the president's response to the response to the report accurately reflect how long Obama plans to expand the government?,Did Obama's response to the report accurately reflect his response to the report?
Did these veterans qualify for health insurance?,Are these veterans currently unable to buy health insurance?,Does this list exclude all veterans in the state?,Are all veterans able to purchase health insurance?,Does this list exclude all veterans in the state?,Is there any evidence for this claim to be accurate?,Is this information accurate?
Did Congress contribute $700 billion to the Troubled Assets Relief Program?,Is there evidence that Congress has spent money in this program without purchasing toxic assets?,Did Congress spent any money in this program without purchasing toxic assets?,Did Congress spend any money in this program without purchasing toxic assets?,Can we assume that these funds may be used to buy toxic assets?
"Did the Indian Railways implement the new tickets by July 1st, 2021?",Was the new code of conduct for rail transit enforced by law?,"Did the new rule for railway transit enforced by law start on July 1st, 2021?",Did the new rules change what kinds of trains the new rules were being enforced on?
Does this statement hold true?,Does the sentence reflect actual data?,Did the statement claim 300 American workers would make as much money as one top CEO?,. How would most Americans make the same amount of money in a year?,Was the number of people working for a year similar to those of a CEO?
Is it true that police in Spain are rounding up people aged 50 and above to transfer them to quarantine centres?,Is it true that there are quarantine centres located in Spain?,Can these quarantine centres be accessed outside of Spain?,Are there other countries that round up people of this age group?
Was this statement made by Rana Ayyub or was it written by a Muslim?,Was this statement an attack on Muslims?,"Did Ayyub say that Muslims ""can not hate all Muslims for just two beheadings""?",Did this statement come from a Muslim?,Are there any other Islamist extremists besides Ayyub?
Did the Canadian government approve the use of psilocybin therapy to ease anxiety and depression associated with a terminal diagnosis in 2020?,Is psilocybin therapy based on the hallucinogenic chemicals found in psychedelic mushrooms?,Was psilocybin therapy approved by the Canadian government in November 2020?
Has South Africa's unemployment growth increased in the last 5 years?,Has the unemployment percentage in the Western Cape shrunk or increased since the end of 2012?,Is the unemployment percentage for the Eastern Cape lower than the rest of the country?,Is it true that South Africa's unemployment percentage has increased since the end of 2012?
Are the lobbyists for the Formula 1 racetrack located outside of Austin?,Are these lobbyists for the Formula 1 racetrack affiliated with Shade?,Has Shade been a contributor to Formula 1 racetracks?,Are these racetracks near to Shade's home?,Was Shade a contributor to any Formula 1 racetracks?
Did Biontech make a loss in 2019?,Did ahin and his wife receive tax expenses from the IMF?,Does ahin have a significant stake in the company?,Were ahin and his wife paid as compensation for the IMFs efforts?,Did ahin and his wife lose any time or money?
Is Clinton’s 2002 claim that al-Qaida were involved in a government conspiracy valid?,Is Clinton’s 2002 claim that there was an Iraqi connection valid?,Is Clinton’s 2002 claim that there was an Iraqi connection valid?,Did Clinton claim that there was an Iraqi connection in his 2001 statement regarding terrorism?
Is the yearly cost of the police contracts higher than a similar study the same year?,Are more transit police required to respond to non-transit calls?,Are more transit police required to respond to non-transit calls?,Is the yearly average police budget at least double the research studies?
Did the 2012 State of the Union address mention the deficit or debt?,Did Obama say anything about it during the 2012 State of the Union address?,Did Obama raise concern about these issues during the 2012 State of the Union address?,Did Obama even mention these issues in the 2012 State of the Union address?,Does this say that this was the most significant issue for the Democratic Party?
Will this cut the time it takes to start a mine to under 300 days?,Will this cut the time it takes to start a mine from application to final approval?,Will this cut the time it takes to start a mine to over 300 days?,Will this cut the time it takes to start a mine from application to final approval?
How many cases of severe vaccine reactions are reported to the CDR annually?,Did any vaccines cause death or permanent injuries for the people involved?,Has the CDR prevented a lot of people from getting vaccines?,Have the U.S. statistics on vaccine reactions been used in any way besides summing up?
Is Romney’s plan estimated to cost 6000 a year to average seniors?,Was it estimated that Romney’s Medicare plan would cost the average senior $6000 a year?,Was the projected cost of Romney’s Medicare plan included in a 2015 Wall Street Journal editorial?,Was Romney’s Medicare plan estimated to cost the average senior $6000 a year?
Did an NYPD arrest a 9-year-old girl on this day?,Did the NYPD arrest a 9-year-old girl on this day?,Did a 9-year-old girl go to the hospital after this incident?,Did the nine-year-old girl receive the vaccination?
What is the location of the all star game in Georgia?,Did Marco Rubio write a letter about the move of the game?,Did Rubio write this letter to MLB Commissioner Rob Manfred?,Did Rubio write this letter to Manfred because he believes it was against the rules to move the game out of Georgia?
Is this the first time Pastor Burden has told his congregation to keep their weapons “loaded”?,Is the Jan 20th inauguration still years away?,Does this Pastor have a previous history of using controversial religious arguments?,Can this Pastor explain why some in his congregation did not want their guns loaded?
Are 13 nations commit to abolish farming?,Was the statement made by a certain national government?,Is the statement true or false?,Was the statement made in any other country?,Is the statement true or false on a specific issue?,Is the statement true or false on a wide topic?,Was the statement true or false in a general context?
What has happened to the business rankings?,Was the state ranking in the top 10?,Did the state have high job growth rates?,Did the state have significant financial gains?,Does this data support this claim?,Are there more than four million jobs in North Carolina?,Are North Carolina's job numbers rising rapidly?,Does this data support this claim?
Did Reagan attend a fundraiser eight times for reelection in 1984?,Did Obama attend a fundraiser 228 times for reelection in 2012?,Did Obama spend more than 8 hours at a fundraiser in 2012?,Did Republicans spend the most time at a fundraiser in 2012?,Is Obama a popular candidate for reelection?
"Did Gates claim 700,000 people will be killed or permanently disabled by the Covid-19 vaccine?","Will Gates say that 700,000 people will be killed or permanently disabled by the Covid-19 vaccine?","Will Gates say that 700,000 people will be killed by the Covid-19 vaccine?",Was Gates making an endorsement of vaccines?
Did USA Today publish an infographic that shows a cartoon sun gripping a thermometer in July 2011?,Is the cartoon sun holding a phallic thermometer?,Do any other media outlets use cartoon images in their stories?,Do other media outlets use cartoon images in their stories?,Is the illustration of an phallic thermometer a true depiction of excessively hot weather?
Did Wisconsin pay the lowest per hour salary for criminal defense lawyers for the poor?,Are these lawyers paid the lowest salary in the country?,Are any attorneys employed by this state paid $40 per hour?,Is the salary for criminal defense lawyers paid at this state a lower than other states?,Is Wisconsin a well established society for legal professionals?
Did Melania Trump make a statement in November 2020 saying this would be her final Christmas in the White House?,Did Melania Trump state in this statement that this would be her final Christmas in the White House?,Was this statement published prior to the 2020 election?,Has Melania Trump stated this statement in any other statement?
Are meth lab incidents down by more than 96% since Oregon's prescription-only law came into effect?,Are meth lab arrests down by more than 32% since Oregon's prescription-only law came into effect?,Did the drop in meth lab incidents and arrests come from a state that has passed a prescription-only law?
Did 3000 people die in hurricanes that hit Puerto Rico?,Did there are anywhere from 6 to 18 deaths in the storms after the hurricane hit Puerto Rico?,Did Puerto Rico experience an increase in the number of people dying after hurricanes hit in the aftermath?,Are hurricanes that hit Puerto Rico considered Category 3 or Category 4 storms?
Did Trump fund a Veterans Day parade 26 years ago in NYC?,Did Trump fund a Veterans Day parade 26 years ago in New York City?,Did Trump fund the Veterans Day parade on Veteran's Day in 2017?,Did Trump fund the Veterans Day parade on Veteran's Day in 2017?,Did Trump fund the Veterans Day parade in 2017?
Did the UK report a 99.2% mortality rate for Covid-19 in April?,Did the UK government not report the 99.2% death rate?,Does the British government believe vaccinating for Covid-19 would prevent more deaths?,Did the British government take any action regarding the safety of the vaccinated vaccine?
Did cars become melted because of the heat wave?,Did cars melt due to the heat wave?,Did car owners report being melted?,Did this photo imply heatwaves?,Was the heat wave in July 2023 an anomaly?,Did any other car owners report their cars burning down?,Did any other people in the photo also burn down their cars?
Was Paulson the first governor to reduce Minnesota's tax burden?,Did Paulson reintroduce any tax breaks?,Did Paulson make any efforts to reduce taxes for Minnesota during this period?,Did Paulson make any additional effort to reduce taxes for Minnesota during this period?,Did Paulson move Minnesota's tax burden down during this period?
Has there been any announcement of an Atombomb test or meeting between Ukrainian forces and Putin?,Does any U.S. television series offer a link between Ukrainian forces and Russian troops?,"Has the episode ""The Simpsons"" been aired in the United States?",Did any events in the series have any significant connections to the United States or Russia?
Did the party have 500 notes?,Did the notes have to be circulated?,Was there a party in Mumbai?,Did the party take place at the Ambani family's residence?,Did a photo exist showing the Rs 500 notes being circulated?,Did the photos have any information about the party's setting?
Does the department operate schools?,Will they establish mud schools in the Eastern Cape?,Will this department keep on opening new schools?,Will this department keep in place mud schools?,Is there a minimum time frame of this school move?,:) ) ) ) ) )?
"Did the Indian media, politics, and the public fail to properly honor Singh Sr.?",Did Singh Sr receive proper homage by the public?,Did Singh Sr receive adequate homage from societal expectations and the media?,Does Singh Sr receive a good deal of adoration from political and media leaders?
Is the AGP scheme only for post 2019 OBCs?,Is post 2019 OBCs kept under the AGP scheme?,Is the AGP Scheme only for post 2019 OBCs?,Is AGP Scheme only for post 2019 post UOCs?,Is the AGP Scheme only for post 2019 post UOCs?
Did the Biden Administration provide a $21M grant for the program?,Will the adolescent addicts receiving grants will be able to smoke?,Will the grants be used to provide tobacco products to addicts who can't afford the tobacco?,Will the program help provide access to smoking devices to addicts?
Did Hamlin's doctor confirm cardiac arrest?,Did the doctor confirm the 4th booster vaccine was responsible?,Did Hamlin have heart surgery before his arrest?,Did CNN publish a Jan. 11 headline stating that Hamlin had heart surgery?,Did CNN publish a Jan. 11 headline saying Hamlin had heart surgery and that this was due to the 4th booster vaccine?
Was the COVID-19 vaccine dangerous in Norway?,Did the WHO report any deaths following the vaccine?,Is the COVID-19 vaccine associated with significant risks?,Has the FDA approved other vaccines to reduce the risk of COVID-19?,Is COVID-19 vaccine in the US approved for use in the UK?
Is it true that Republicans supported early voting in 2005?,Is it true that early voting in 2005 was supported by Republicans?,Did Republicans support early voting in 2005?,Is this evidence consistent with the Republicans supporting this issue in general?,Has the Republicans supported these issues in any other countries besides the United States?
Did the CNBC report that 44% of the pregnant women in the Pfizer trial had miscarriages?,Did the CNBC report that any pregnant women who participated in the trial had miscarriages?,Did the CNBC report that any pregnant women who participated in the trial had miscarriages?
Did the missing plane have no human skeletons?,Was there evidence that the missing plane had human skeletons?,Has the missing plane ever been found?,Did the missing plane have human skeletons on board?,Has this flight ever flown again?,Have any other missing planes been found?
Did an award winning literary client list promotional booklet identify Barack Obama as being born in Kenya?,Was the 1990 literary client list promotional booklet written for a larger audience or the client list specifically?,Was the 1991 literary client list promotional booklet printed as well?,Did the 1991 literary client list promotional booklet identify Obama as having been born in Kenya?
Did any of Nancy Pelosi's daughters report drug trafficking to the police?,Did Nancy Pelosi and two of her daughters have anything to do with the case?,Did all of Pelosi's daughters turn in evidence against their mother?,Did this event take place prior to Pelosi's being elected in the 2016 election?
Can groups claiming to be social welfare organizations be involved in political combat?,Is there a time limit for violating this time limit?,"Is the term ""social welfare organizations"" a valid term to use to describe groups like this?",Does this term referred to organizations whose political goals have been obscured in the past?
Are some people liable for a summary offense in their workplace?,Are some people liable for an alleged inadvertent infraction in their workplace?,Do some employers require employers to wear a face mask?,Could you be held personally liable for a summary offense for a failed indignation claim?,Are there specific examples of infractions in this section?
Was Davis threatening to raise taxes up to $35 billion?,Was Davis actively campaigning against raising taxes?,Was Davis actively engaging in political activities?,Was Davis actively supporting or opposing raising taxes?,Were the tax rises in 2017 considered reasonable?,Does the report indicate that Davis is likely to raise taxes by more than $35 billion?
Does a petition in support of the LeBleu family request prayers?,Was the home fire a deliberate attempt to kill four girls?,Does a petition request prayer requests for four girls who died in a house fire?,Did the LeBleu family survive the house fire?,Did the LeBleu family lose money for a house fire?
Will the deficit reduction be at the lowest level since Dwight Eisenhower was president?,Does the deficit reduction amount equal $400 billion over the next decade?,Does the deficit reduction plan include any provisions for lowering the deficit?,Do the cuts proposed in this budget have any political undertone?,Are these reductions in the deficit the lowest since Eisenhower was president?
Is Detroit the largest city to have more people than qualified voters in the 2020 election?,Was Detroit more likely to have qualified voters compared to people living in the city?,Is Detroit a historically Republican city?,Did the city of Detroit have more voters with a higher education?,Can this be determined based on voter qualifications or a census?
Did Pakistan bomb Pakistan on India's loss?,Was Pakistan a part of the United States in the bomb blast?,Was the bomb in Pakistan a pyrotechnic of a celebration?,Did 10 people die?,Are those injured listed in the photo?,Was Pakistan involved in the bombing?,Are Pakistan officials a part of these events?
Was the siddhar yogi who went to jeeva samadhi 300 years ago found alive?,"Was the siddhar yogi found alive while digging up in Valliyur, Tamilnadu?",Did the siddhar yogi go into jeeva samadhi when the yogi was digging up?
"Is Obama creating over 500,000 new jobs?",Is gender employment a major part of the job growth?,Was the economy stable this month?,Was female employment higher than other months?,Is this increase likely because of the recent drop in new jobs?,Is Obama proving he is a reliable economic leader?
"Did the Red Sox wait ""87 long years"" to win the World Series?","Is there evidence of the Red Sox waiting ""87 long years"" to win the World Series?","Is there any evidence that the Red Sox waited ""87 long years"" to win the World Series?","Did the Red Sox wait for ""87 long years"" to win the World Series?"
Can you find the university in the state that studied the health of JUUL users?,Is it clear in the article what the JUUL use is associated with?,Was there any evidence that this use is related to cancer?,Is it true that some JUUL users suffered from cancer?,Are there any other common uses for the JUUL?
Is the 3% increase in taxes per household in the 2017 budget an issue?,Would any household benefit from a 3% increase in taxes next year?,"Is any household projected to pay about $28,000 in taxes next year?",Is there evidence to suggest that 3% increase in taxes next year would benefit an average family?
Did 76% of the people support the DREAM Act?,Did more Republicans support the DREAM Act?,Did 61% of the people support the DREAM Act?,Did 66% of the people support the DREAM Act?,Does 61% of the people support the DREAM Act?,Did more Republicans support the DREAM Act?
"Have there been any 4,000 variation in the virus that causes Covid-19?",Has there been evidence to support this claim?,"Have there been any 4,000 variants in the virus that causes Covid-19?","Have there been any 4,000 variants of the virus that causes Covid-19?","Have there been any 4,000 variants of the virus that causes Covid-19?","Have there been any 4,000 variants of the virus that causes Covid-19?"
Did the polls predict that the AAP could win 98 out of 182 seats in 2022 Gujarat Assembly elections?,Did the polls predict AAP could win more seats than other parties in 2022?,Will the AAP receive a majority in the election?,Does this poll assume that AAP can win enough seats to pass AAP in 2022?
Have any of Scott Maddox's campaigns been a loss?,Has any of Maddox's campaigns been a total loss?,Was any of Maddox's campaigns a total loss?,Has any of Maddox's campaigns ever lost in any election?,Has Maddox lost any Cabinet positions in any election?
Did the German gas storage capacity exceed 250 Terawatts from October 2020 to March 2021?,Is there evidence that the deutsche gas storage capacity has been reduced due to a reduction in output?,Is the amount of energy produced from the German gas storage in line with the original capacity?,Did a 90-pronounceable amount of fuel originate from the German gas storage?
"Are all Muslims killed by police firing in Bengaluru on December 30, 2014?",Does there appear to be more protesters killed than protesters?,Did all protesters protest Nupur Sharmas statements about Muhammad?,"Was a Muslim killed by police firing in Bengaluru on December 30, 2014?",Did protesters are killed by shooting at Bengaluru police?
Did AAP support women in Himachal Pradesh in receiving money?,Have women of the state received a 1000 rs sum in the past?,Did AAP call on the central government to provide funds for women?,Will the women of the state be given the Rs 1000?,Can women receive funds in exchange for these Rs 1000 grants?
Did Fauci not know Hydroxychloroquine is effective?,Did Fauci not make the announcement to everyone?,Is Fauci lying about hydroxychloroquine?,Did Fauci inform the public of the effectiveness of hydroxychloroquine?,Is Fauci telling the public of Hydroxychloroquine's effectiveness?
Did Benson say that voting for the lesser of two evils is still voting for evil?,Has Benson ever said that if voting for the lesser of two evils is still voting for evil one will be judged for it?,Has Benson ever said that voting for the lesser of two evils is still voting for evil one will be judged for it?
Did the country achieve a peak of power production that surpassed the nation's peaks in December 2017?,Did the country achieve a high peak of power generation that surpassed the nation's peaks in December 2017?,Has the country achieved a high peak of power production since 2000?,Is there a record for the high peak of power generated since 2000?
Is it true that a gallon of diesel was $1.69 when Biden took office?,Did Biden raise a minimum wage for GM employees?,Is there evidence that GM employees paid less money in the late Biden years than in the rest of the 20th century?,Are there examples in the Post of GM employees paying less money in the late Biden years than during this time?,Did Biden raise the minimum wage in the last 20 years before Biden took office?,Did Biden raise the minimum wage when Biden took office?,Do these statements about Biden imply that Biden?
Does this AI software tool process the expected high volume of Covid-19 vaccine adverse drugs reactions?,Is this tool specifically for Covid-19 vaccine adverse drugs reactions?,Does this AI tool process all adverse drugs reactions?,Is the contract provided by the UK government?,Is this government contract a part of the government's efforts to combat CVE.?
Did the video contain the ISRO Chairman dancing with his colleagues post the successful Chandrayaan-3?,Is the video filmed at an indoor venue?,Does the video have a significant date associated with it?,Has the video been shared across social networking sites?,Is this video an example of the social media post?
"Are students in higher education more than 500,000 in 1994?",Did the increase in numbers be directly due to an increased population?,Is there an increase in the number of students enrolling in higher education?,Is an increase in the number of students enrolling in higher education an accurate depiction of the population?
Has any attempt to get this bill passed been made since this statement?,Has any bill he has not tried to get passed been introduced by?,Have any attempts been made to pass legislation made by this person over the past three years?,Has this person actively opposed any legislation he made?,Have any attempts been made to have this legislation made?
Is there any video of a terrorist killed at the Temple in Mount Abu?,Does the video show one captive being caputed alive?,Did a large amount of people have been injured in the Temple attack?,Did there anyone survive the attack?,Does this attack seem to indicate a larger threat against Mount Abu?
Did Trump land in New York in March 2021?,Did the video show Trump landing in NY in March 2021?,Did Trump travel in the US on the same flight that was shot at Fort Hood?,Is it true that he used an FAA approved flight?,Would an FAA approved flight be acceptable under New York law?
Did the World Economic Forum say all babies must be lab grown in 2030?,Did the World Economic Forum believe that all babies must be lab grown in 2030?,Did the World Economic Forum discuss the use of incubators in fetal care?,Was the World Economic Forum aware that all babies must be lab grown in 2030?
Did the burglar claim that he was raped by the dogs in the pet door?,Did the dogs in the pet door end up raped by the burglar in the house?,Did a burglar sue the homeowner for his claims?,Did the burglar ever hire the dogs for other misdemeanors?
Was the protest filmed in 2019 or 2022?,Did the protest happen in 2019?,Was this protest filmed prior to 2022?,Did the protest happen in 2019?,Did protests occur in 2022?,Would protests be in 2022 if this protest happened?,Did the protest in 2019 occur in Germany?
Has a FL insurance plan reduced health care costs?,Does a FL insurance plan cost $900 a month per year?,Is the FL insurance plan cheaper than other programs?,Has the FL insurance plan decreased the cost of health care?,Are the other FL programs cheaper?,Have FL programs reduced the cost of health care?
Did 30 PLA soldiers die in the Galwan clashes with Indian troops?,Was there no news of any PLA soldiers killed in the Galwan clashes?,Was the death toll on the Indian troop by the PLA soldiers based on the news report?,Are there any other reasons for the deaths?,Did the resulting massacre cause serious injuries?
"Did the Roosevelt administration close the post office in Indianola, Mississippi?",Did the rerouted mail cause by Cox's removal result in new mail?,Was the Post Office rerouted to a different postmaster?,Did Cox get more money because of the relocation of mail?
Has Sonu Sood asked people to vote for Tejashwi Yadav in Bihar Polls 2020?,Has Sonu Sood asked people to vote for Tejashwi Yadav in Bihar Polls 2020?,Has a decision been made about whether or not to allow Sonu Sood to enter Bihar polls?
Did Obama's approval ratings increase in the last couple months?,Does Obama have a favorable approval rating?,Are there any negative ratings?,Are ratings high for Obama?,Does Obama have a positive rating?,Are ratings high for Obama?,Did Obama receive praise in the last couple months?,Did Obama receive praise for the economy?
Does this legislation prevent Walt Disney from operating theme parks in Florida?,Has a Disney theme park operated in Florida since 2006?,Will any Disney theme park operations continue after these exemptions?,Did Gov. DeSantis sign this law in the last minute?,Will this exemption be effective to any Walt Disney theme park in Florida?
"Did the sanctions the US has imposed hit Russia in the ""crimea annexation and meddling in Ukraine"" category?","Did the alleged sanctions crush Russian currency, ruble, and GDP from 2014 to 2016?",Did the sanctions imposed by US hit Russia more severely than other countries?,Did the US impact Russia negatively?
Has the House select committee investigated the attack on the U.S. Capitol?,Is the House select committee investigating the January 6 attack an actual member of the House?,Has a House select committee investigated a single federal agency?,Is this a real House select committee?,Is this a real House select committee?
Was the election in North Carolina rigged?,Was rigging in North Carolina related to the Great State?,Is the election in North Carolina rigged?,Is there rigging in North Carolina?,No Answer>»/No Answer>>/No Answer>>/No Answer>>?
Did tanner indicate these people were from states designated as state sponsors of terrorism at the Southwest border during the first 19 months of Obama's term?,Did tanner state that these people were arrested in the first 19 months of this administration?,Did tanner state this number is not accurate?
Was Trump right to lift 3.5 million people off food stamps?,Is Trump saying that people are lifted off food stamps when there has been no increase in poverty levels?,Is Trump actually saying that people have lifted off food stamps?,Is Trump saying that people have lifted off food stamps when there has been no increase in poverty levels?
"Would ""99.9% of the pennies the State would spend"" to turn an I-70 into a toll road be spent outside Missouri?",Would 89.5% of the money be spent on I-70 by I-70 residents outside Missouri?,Would 9 out of a 10 pennies that would be spent on turning I-70 into a toll road be spent by someone outside Missouri?
Did the Supreme Court rule against the health care law?,Did opponents of the health care law win a case to the Supreme Court?,Did the Supreme Court rule against the health care law in this case?,Do the Supreme Court rulings in health care law cases always go into lower courts?,Are there any other reasons for Justices to reverse this decision?
Did Trump tweet on 14 February 2017 that Betsy DeVos was correct in suggesting disabled students were disruptive in the classroom?,Did Trump tweet before or after this suggestion?,Is there evidence that Betsy DeVos has said something similar to this statement before?,Does this claim have strong evidence to support this claim?
"Did Camden County claim that a total of 12,000 ballots have been found?",Do Camden County officials believe the claims are true?,Are the claims against Camden County unsubstantiated?,Do Camden County officials believe that the claims are valid?,Did Camden County officials claim that the claims are true?
Was Nord Stream 1 expected to start operating in the summer of 2015?,Was Nord Stream 2 available to deliver gas to Germany?,Did Russia make an offer for Nord Stream 2 to deliver gas to Germany through Nord Stream 2?,Did Germany reject Russia's offer to deliver gas to Germany through Nord Stream 2?
Did the FBI confirm Goerge Soros was funding a migrant caravan?,Did the FBI confirm Goerge Soros was funding a migrant caravan during the election of President Trump?,Did Trump order Soros to end funding?,Did Trump order Soros to end funding to a migrant caravan?
Is Mayawati’s statement true?,Does Mayawati support the BJP in the 2022 assembly elections?,Did Mayawati support the BJP before?,Did Mayawati accept the BJP's support in the 2022 elections?,Did the BJP's support in the 2022 elections prove necessary?
Did Foxconn contribute $3 billion to Wisconsin taxpayers in tax giveaways?,"Did Foxconn provide 3,000 jobs that cost Wisconsin taxpayers more than $1 million per job?",Is the Foxconn deal worth $3 billion in taxpayer giveaways?,Did Foxconn donate more than $1 million to WI taxpayers in tax giveaways?
Does Buhari's administration continue to raise the unemployment rate?,Does it have a jobless rate that has increased due to the government's economic policies?,Does the rate increase due to the government's economic policies contribute to these woes?,Does Buhari's budget have a large amount of money in it for programs?
Did the CBO tell those looking for a plan to change their plans that they would see the deductible go down in at least 10%?,Did the CBO give those that were looking for a plan to change their plans that they would see the deductible go down in at least 10%?,Did the CBO give those that were looking for a plan to change their plans that they would see the deductible go down in at least 10%?
Is the COVID-19 vaccine safe?,Are any of the vaccines that the FDA has approved safe?,Is any of the FDA's vaccines safe?,Is the vaccine labeled as safe?,Is the FDA's test mandate based on an actual experience with vaccine safety?
Does Trump support the apprehension of illegal meth entering the United States?,Did Trump claim that the meth has almost entirely been coming through the southern border in the past six months?,Does Trump support the apprehension of illegal meth entering the United States?,Have the statistics regarding illegal meth from the South matched those of the North?
"Does Joe Biden have all the strength, energy, and mental capacity to lead the country?",Does the article include Biden's age in relation to other US leaders?,Has Biden had a history of defeat?,Has Biden had a history of success?,Is there any evidence that Biden is weakened as a result of age?
Is there a statewide voting record for Moderates in Rhode Island?,Was there a statewide voting record for a statewide party?,Are there any other voting records for the Moderates?,Did the majority of voters in Rhode Island vote for the statewide party?
Did North Carolina use stimulus money to hire a state worker?,Did that state worker apply for more stimulus funds from the taxpayers?,Did the state worker apply for funds from the federal government?,Did the state worker apply for more stimulus funds from the taxpayers?,Would North Carolina's state worker have had to wait for stimulus funds?
Did Biden's family see him sniff cocaine in front of the White House?,Did Biden's family witness Biden sniffing cocaine in front of the White House?,Did Biden testify in testimony regarding Biden's cocaine use in the White House?,Did Biden show evidence during his campaign for president?
"Does the carbon dioxide level in the atmosphere reached a previous point in time, more than 3 million years ago?",Is the time period that preceded humans on the Earth in question the time period in question that preceded mankind on the earth?,Is the global carbon dioxide level in the atmosphere above the 3 million year mark in any way?
Did the US soldiers return their medal protesting the war in Iraq and Afghanistan?,"Do all 40,000 US soldiers return medal protesting the war in Iraq and Afghanistan?",Did the US soldiers return their medal protesting the war in Iraq and Afghanistan?,Did the US soldiers return their medal protesting the war in Iraq and Afghanistan?
Was the announcement of the US military planes on the Galápagos Islands for refueling confirmed by Ecuador's government?,Did the announcement come in June 2019?,Did the announcement of the US military planes on the Galápagos Islands for refueling come prior to that date?
Would Kohl's be offering coupons for sharing a link?,Would any Kohl's coupons be given out for sharing a link?,Is there any evidence this campaign is a pyramid scheme?,Could Kohl's coupons be generated through a third party?,Is Kohl's granting coupons to anyone in order to boost sales?
Did Trump rescue all the children who were born in tunnels under Central Park?,Was Trump responsible for rescue of all the children that are born in tunnels under Central Park?,Was Donald Trump the first person to rescue these children?,Is Trump involved in many of these cases?,Will Trump do it again?,Is Trump currently still the current President of the United States?
Did Khazatsin have any children or pets?,Is Khazatsin an official?,Were Khazatsin's children or pets related to his medical practice?,Was Khazatsin's residence in Indonesia unheard of?,Is Khazatsin's pregnancy associated with his medical practice?
Did the report include information about all Chinese soldiers killed in the incident?,Does Global times cite any information about any individual Chinese soldiers who were killed?,Did Global times report details about the individual Chinese soldiers killed by the attack?,Does the report identify any Chinese Soldiers killed in the incident?,Has Global times reported any other reports regarding the incident?
"Did this campaign receive more than 7,000 contributions?",Did Donald Trump raise a larger total donation of this number than that of any other presidential candidate?,Is there evidence that swayed this statement to this degree?,Was the total amount of dollars raised in this election related to donations to Donald Trump's campaign?
How many inches of snow did the Steelers play in in a game against the Rams?,How many inches of snow did the Rams play in a game against the Pittsburgh Steelers?,Did the Rams play a game in the snow?,Did this game result in the Rams getting at least 15 inches of snow?
Is it true that people who hold their breath for 15 seconds have no Covid-19?,Is holding your breath for 15 seconds a way to get rid of the virus?,Is holding your breath for 15 seconds part of the vaccination process?,Is there an alternative to holding your breath for 15 seconds?
Did Ahmed Rushiddeen score a century off just 37 balls in T20-l of Kerala?,Is the claim about the cricketer’s sex profile a result of Islamophobia?,Is the article about an individual’s religion a result of Islamophobia?
Did the Spanish flu pandemic last for more than 100 years?,Did the Spanish flu pandemic last for a lot longer than this?,Are there any photographs that would show the spanish flu pandemic over 100 years ago?,Do any of these posts claim to show historic photographs from the spanish flu pandemic?
Has Face masks been used to help limit disease spread prior to 2020?,Is the image used to illustrate the fact that face masks have not been used to help limit disease spread prior to 2020?,Has this image posed a question on any particular face mask?,Is the image clear on the intent of this post?
Are immigrants 60% less likely to claim benefits than a British-born person?,Are immigrants 60% less likely to claim benefits than a British-born person?,Is this a general statement about benefits among immigrants?,Is this a general statement about immigrants?,Do the statistics used in this article suggest this?
Did Sensenbrenner lead on the Patriot Act?,Did Sensenbrenner lead on the Patriot Act while in office?,Has Sensenbrenner ever had conflict with any government agency?,Did Sensenbrenner previously lead on any government issue?,Is there evidence of any conflicts regarding his stance on the Patriot Act?
Did the video show protesting against Hazara killings?,Did the protesters originate from Pakistan Occupied Kashmir?,Does the video show protesting against Hazara killings?,Was the video produced in India?,Did people protest against Hazara killings in Pakistan Occupied Kashmir?
"Has Waters, Pelosi and Sanders passed six bills in the same time period?",Has Pelosi and Sanders passed six bill in the same time period?,"Does Sanders have any more bills than Waters, Pelosi and Waters?","Does Wasserman Schultz, Sanders and Pelosi have any more bills than Wasserman Schultz?"
Is UP MLA Mukesh Verma willing to resign from BJP?,Did Verma say that 20 MLAs have expressed willingness to join the Samajwadi Party?,Is Verma in favor of the Samajwadi Party or not?
Did this happen at the time of the interview?,Is there any evidence this occurred prior to this month's interview?,Are any other countries involved in buying nuclear materials in Russia?,Do any other countries use the same financing patterns as the United States?,Are there any other countries who use these types of financing?
Was there a reduction in immigration numbers?,Is there any proof of Conservative homelessness?,"Did Conservatives find homes for 8,8 million immigrants?","Have conservatives found homes for 8,8 million immigrants?","Have Conservatives found homes for 8,8 million illegal immigrants?","Have any Conservatives found homes for the 8.8 million immigrants, illegal immigrants, and asylum seekers living here?"
"Did the CM take loans for 1,500 KG of gold from Tirupati Temple?",Does the CM have an average income?,Is the loan amount sufficient?,Is the CM able to repay the loan?,Did the CM take any other types of loan in this manner?,Did the CM borrow a large amount for other reasons?,Was this transaction done in a timely manner?
Is it true that 81% of Houston's babies are born of women who are not here legally?,Is it true that LBJ Hospital's babies are born of women who are not here legally?,Is this claim correct?,Has the hospital been criticized for having a low number of immigrant babies?
Was the asteroid deemed dangerous?,Would this asteroid stop us from living?,Could it also stop us from driving to work?,Could this be a threat that would end human civilisation?,Would this end us from living in this world?,Could we live in this world if an asteroid had come close to Earth?
Did Texas create more jobs than all states combined in the past five years?,Did the majority of jobs in Texas come from manufacturing?,Did Texas create more jobs than any other state in the past 5 years?,Is this information accurate?,Are the numbers presented in the article from sources that are not official?,Did the statistics presented in the article contain inaccurate information?
Are black-owned companies allocated 2% of SAA procurement?,Have black companies been the sole supplier of SAA procurement?,Do black businesses receive a larger proportion of procurement from SAA than their white counterparts?,Do black companies benefit financially from this sourcing?,Does it make sense for black companies to receive more procurement compared to white ones?
Has Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez mentioned 70% of people support that tax on the wealthy?,Do a Fox News poll reveal 70% of Americans support a top marginal tax on the rich?,Does a Fox News Poll prove 70% of Americans support a top marginal tax on the wealthy?
Was a judge forced to overturn an election?,Did a judge throw out hundreds of ballots?,Will this election result in another election?,Will this election result in another election?,Is this election for a judge?,Did this election include a ballot that was discarded?,Was this election for a judge?
Was Bhawant Mann arrested for stealing a bike in 2011?,Was this bike stolen within 12 years?,Was this incident documented on a photograph?,Did the person arrested do this in real life?,Was this person responsible for this bike theft?,Was this person arrested in real life?,Is this person's bicycle ever reported to police?
Did this interview take place in 1965?,Did this interview talk about the moon?,Has this interview been viewed by many people?,Is this the only interview this man has talked about?,Was this interview in the TV station's history?,Did he speak in this interview?,Is this interview part of the larger research about the moon?
Does Melania Trump plagiarize from a speech delivered by Michelle Obama in 2014?,Is there proof that Trump plagiarized the speeches of Obama?,Has this information changed since Trump's tweet about the 2014 speech?,Was the 2014 speech actually delivered in 2017?,Was the 2017 speech a reworking of the 2014 speech?
Are there thousands of Iraq children who could benefit from healthcare insurance?,Is there an estimated cost to cover children in Iraq compared to other countries?,Is there an estimate of the amount that the United States spends in Iraq for one week?,Have the costs to Iraq in one week influenced other countries to do so in an equal amount?
Did Biden propose a $2 Trillion bill to study the cause of inflation?,Did Biden propose a $2 Trillion bill to study the cause of inflation?,Did Biden propose the $2 Trillion bill to study the cause of inflation?,Did Biden propose the $2 Trillion bill to study the cause of inflation?
"Did the FL state lose 300,000 people from health insurance because of Obamacare?",Does Obamacare's mandate have an impact on individual coverage?,Do many people who lose health coverage due to Obamacare have health insurance?,Was there any health care shortage in FL?,Is there a high death rate in Florida because of the loss of health insurance?
Did this phrase become an internet term in 2021?,"Did the term ""Let's go Brandon"" identify pedophiles online?","Did the phrase ""Let's go Brandon"" identify pedophiles in the year 2021?","Does the phrase ""Let's go Brandon"" imply sexual contact?"
Did a military train that came from Western Europe get sent to help Ukraine?,Do West Europe nations help Ukraine?,Was the video recorded during the 2022 Russian invasion?,Did the military train have weapons to fire?,Did the train have weapons to fire?,Did the military train have any weapons that were insufficient?
Did anyone spend more than $3 million for DNA of bears in Montana?,Does this information suggest the bear population is declining in Montana?,Was any negative genetic link between these two species present at this time?,Whether these genetic links were caused by the bear population destroying the native habitat remains unconfirmed.?
"Did the Hong Kong police fine 4,000 restaurant diners for not wearing masks?","Did the Hong Kong police fine restaurant diners HKD$2,000 for not wearing masks?",Did any of the restaurant diners wear masks at the time of the fine?,Did any of the restaurant diners know that the fine was due to people wearing masks at the time of the fine?,Did the restaurant diners know that the fine was due to people wearing masks at the time of the fine?
Does potassium chloride cause cardiac arrest?,Is the potassium chloride in Dasani water real?,Does the potassium chloride in Dasani water cause cardiac arrest?,Is there evidence this claim is true?,Is the claim made by the author in- context with the evidence?,Does the claim relate to any other medical conditions?
Did vehicles get vandalised on the Jan 26?,Do all vehicles get vandalised on Jan 26?,Did the Jan 26 violence take place in Delhi?,Did all the vehicles get vandalised in Jan 26?,Did this violence involve any type of group?,Did a policeman attack another vehicle during the Jan 26 violence?,Did any vehicles get vandalised during the Jan 26 violence?
Did Minnesota have more registered voters or less votes?,Was Minnesota less voting?,Is there an average voter turnout in Minnesota?,Do state data differ between 2010 and 2012?,Are more voters in 2010 in Minnesota?,Are more registered voters in Minnesota?,Does Minnesota currently have more voter turnout than in 2012?,Do more registered voters in 2010 than 2012?
Did many cities in the South have guaranteed paid sick days one year ago?,Is the law still in effect?,Did cities in the South not have guaranteed paid sick days one year ago?,Is there evidence that this is the case?,Did these benefits not exist in any cities in the South in the past?
Is there evidence to suggest that around 17.2 million people in the UK had an autumn booster?,Can this be proven by the statistics?,Has this stat been documented in any reliable way?,Were there more people who did not choose an autumn booster in the UK?,Are there any other reliable sources to support this information?
Do Suffragists typically eat pizza?,Was this event a trend?,Are other suffragists likely in this picture?,Was this event in 1921?,Did the Suffragists eat pizza in bathing suits?,Are many of these suffragists in this image?
Did Obama choose 45 czars to replace elected officials in his office?,Are all of the czars named by Obama?,Was this presidency the first to appoint 45 czars?,Does any of the czars work for the administration?,Would any of the czars be of a political nature?
Has Dallet taken money from attorneys with over 100 cases before her?,Has Dallet taken money from attorneys with over 100 cases before her?,Has Dallet been convicted of any crime?,Is it true that Dallet has taken money from attorneys with over 100 cases before her?,Is it true that Dallet has taken money from attorneys with over 100 cases before her?,Is it true that Dallet took money from attorneys with over 100 cases before her?
Did EU exports to South Korea increase by over 36% in July?,Did the percentage increase stem from our market share in South Korea?,Did our farmers and service providers suffer due to the increase?,Did South Korea experience a spike in exports to the EU?,Did the increase in exports in South Korea come primarily from the Chinese market?
Did the CDC find that there was a 236% increased risk of autism in African-American boys?,Has there been any studies that have tested for these increases in the rates of autism in African-American boys with the MMR vaccine?,Did any studies in the field of African-American studies have these same findings?
Can any person be buried on Monday 19 September in the UK?,Has the Queen ever been cremated?,Can any person be cremated on Monday 19 September in the UK?,Is there any information about the Queen that can be used to determine if they can be cremated?,Are all of the other states in the UK that require this method of death to be performed by the Queen?
"Did the US flu epidemic last year result in 75,000 deaths in America?",Were the flu deaths that occurred in America attributed to the flu season?,Does it seem clear that some government officials are trying to manipulate the truth?,Did the flu virus have a significant effect on the American population?,Did the Flu season have a significant impact on the American economy?,Does the United States flu season have an impact on the population in general?,Does this issue influence whether or not the US flu season is a good one?,Does the flu season have a direct effect on health care costs in America?
Did Obama have full control of Washington before this statement was made?,Has the percentage of jobs that have been lost from the government in this period risen since Obama took office?,"Is the number of jobs lost per day greater than 1,500?",Did the government lose jobs in any particular period?,"Was the total number of jobs lost per day greater than 1,500?"
Did Kubrick's letter warn Aubrey not to make a sequel to 2001: A Space Odyssey?,Was there anything in this letter that is explicit?,Did the letter contain any explicit information?,Was the letter written by Kubrick or someone who was working for MGM?,Did this letter contain any explicit information?
Was there any photograph of Sarah Huckabee Sanders wearing KKK robes?,Was the photograph taken before 1993?,Was Sarah Huckabee Sanders aware of KKK robes?,Did Sarah Huckabee Sanders wear KKK robes for Halloween in 1993?,Was the photograph taken after 1993?
Is there a 50% of the adults who are actually working these days because of addiction or conviction?,Is West Virginia a place where people are trying to do so well?,Is the percentage a sign of how bad the job market is?,Would there be a decrease in jobs if fewer addicts and convicts were involved?
Was the photograph of a mysterious and large sea creature?,Did the sea creature wash ashore in Mexico in June 2016?,Was the sea creature found despite it being a mystery?,Would people have reported the sea creature to authorities?,Did this sea creature resemble a whale?,Would people have reported the sea creature to the police?
Did Helen dance at age 84 to Mera Naam Chin Chin Chu?,Is it true that the video features Helen dancing at the age of 84?,Was the video produced by a studio?,Are there any other interesting aspects about the video?,Is this video the only video featuring Helen?
Has the photo shown all the men who killed police officers this year?,Is the photo depicting police officers killed by multiple men?,Are all the men in the photo associated with the police?,Is the photo depicting multiple police killings?,Is the photo showing multiple police killings in a single year?,Is this photo depicting multiple police killings in the year 2020?
Did the United Nations say that 2 million people die per year due to extreme weather?,Did the United Nations say that extreme weather killed around 2 million people yearly?,Have there been no reports of people dying in extreme weather due to climate change?,Was a United Nations report out before the year 2012 about the climate change?
Did Bourla speak on reducing population by 50% by 2023?,Will reducing population by 50% by 2023 involve a transition towards less people?,Is there no precedent for this goal?,Did Bourla do this in any other context?,Is this goal unconvincing?,Do there governmental regulations on this type of action?
Did India have 60% vaccine coverage in 2014?,Did India manage to take vaccine coverage past 90% during our term?,Did India have 60% vaccine coverage in 2014?,Did India manage to take vaccine coverage past 90% during our term?,Did India manage to take vaccine coverage past 90% during our term?,Did India achieve 90 % vaccine coverage in 2014?
"Has the purchase of produce through the Mandis reached 41,591 crore rupees?",Is there any record of any transactions through Mandis in terms of total rupees involved in buying and selling of produce?,Did mandis make this purchase?,Did any deals occur through Mandis relating to buy and sell of produce?
Has it been confirmed that 6 skeletons have been found in Wales?,Did Wales Police confirm that the skeletons were from the same location?,Has the skeletons been buried?,Has there been any restitution for the victims?,Does a DNA test have confirmed forensic link between the skeletons and the crime?
Will Americans see their paycheck grow a lot in February of 2018?,"Will the average earnings increase by $1,000 every year?",Will the average earnings increase by $200 every year?,Would the average salary rise a lot by February of 2018?,Will the average income increase a lot by February of 2018?,Would the average earnings increase a lot by February of 2018?
Did Eric Schmitt pass legislation to spend $480 million on airline hubs?,Did Eric Schmitt support the expansion of Missouri farmland?,Did Eric Schmitt back a measure that allows China to buy up farmland in Missouri?,Was the proposed expansion of Missouri farm land approved by the Senate?
Does this legal professional claim to be one of the most respected lawyers in the country?,Did the individual state that he is one of America's leading consumer lawyers?,Does this individual make any claims about his legal competence?,Does this individual possess any other notable legal skills?,Has this individual worked in the legal field for any significant period?
Did a family’s name get added to the list of Prime Minister's housing scheme?,Did a family's name get included in the list of Prime Minister's housing scheme?,Are there other restrictions on adding families to the list of Prime Minister's housing scheme?,Are there restrictions on people being able to add families to the list of Prime Minister's housing scheme?,Are there restrictions on the people who can add families to the list of Prime Minister's housing scheme?
Did any Texas State GOP candidate draw over 43 percent of the vote in a GOP primary?,Did any of the top 10 Republican runoff candidates win?,Did any top 10 Republican candidates win their upcoming runoffs in Texas?,Do any of the top 10 Republican runsoff candidates win any of their upcoming runoffs?
Did electric cars make driving 100 miles cost more than an internal combustion engine car?,Was there a cost difference between a vehicle driving 100 miles in an electric vehicle and driving 100 miles in an iC car?,Was there a cost difference between an iC car and driving 100 miles in an iC vehicle?
Is the Koyna dam overflowing?,Are there other dams with this size?,"Is this a ""worst"" video ever?",Is the Koyna dam in Maharashtra?,"Is this a ""worst"" video?","Are other dams with this size in this state, or in general?"
Was Arizona the top state in COVID-19 cases per capita in early January 2021?,Did Arizona lead the world in COVID-19 cases per capita in early January 2021?,Was Arizona the top state in COVID-19 cases per capita in early January 2021?,Did Arizona led in COVID-19 cases per capita in early January 2021?
Did Luc Montagnier say he believes all vaccines would kill?,Did Montagnier say all vaccines would kill within 2 years?,Did Montagnier say all vaccines would kill in 2 years?,Did Montagnier claim vaccinated people will die within 2 years?,Did Montagnier claim all vaccines would kill in 2 years?,Did Montagnier claim all vaccines would kill within 2 years?
Did the image depict any bombing?,Did the bombing take place in 1999?,Was the image taken in 1999?,Did a bombing occur in 1999?,Did the images show the bombing of Yugoslavia?,Did any bombing occur in Yugoslavia in 1999?,Do the image of burning building in this photograph reflect the bombing of Yugoslavia in 1999?
Did Obama make contradictory statements regarding efforts to kill Osama bin Laden in 2008 and 2011?,Did Obama say he was not ready for the raid?,Did Obama claim Osama bin Laden was in the process of being killed?,Did Obama say this in response to bin Laden's defection?
"Are Chinese farmers doing their share of the world's largest order of corn, soybeans and beef?",Is Trump's trade deal a deal worth pursuing?,Does China know Trump is angry about his actions?,Did China make the largest corn order in history?,Did Trump have anything to say about China's beef order?,Did Trump say China was undermining the USA's soybean orders?
Is it true that SBI is conducting an online survey to improve quality of services?,Does it say they are transferring 5 lakh rupees to the children of beneficiaries?,Is the survey being conducted online?,Is the SBI's offer attractive to anyone who fills the survey?,Is SBI conducting an online survey?
Did most surveying of climate scientists say that about 57 percent didn’t agree with the idea that 95 percent of the change in the climate is caused by CO2?,Did the majority of respondents from the survey say that 95 percent of the change in the climate is caused by CO2?,Did the majority of respondents from the survey say that 95 percent of the change in the climate is caused by CO2?
"Did Gowdy say he was ""madder than hell"" at remarks made by Pelosi about COVID-19 relief funding?",Did Gowdy have any thoughts on the remarks made by Pelosi?,Did Gowdy support the aid Pelosi provided?,Was Gowdy aware of Pelosi's remarks?
Is the CDC’s sequencing efforts focused on the genetic makeup of the virus and not on people?,Is the CDC’s sequencing efforts focused on the genetic makeup of the virus and not on people?,Were the CDC’s sequencing efforts done using human samples?,Is the CDC’s sequencing efforts in SARS-CoV-2 focused on the genetic makeup of the virus?
Did the agreement with Iran expire in seven years?,Is Iran free to start nuclear weapons?,Is the Iranian nuclear deal in the last year?,Is there a risk of Iran using nuclear weapons in the next seven years?,Do these statements contradict each other?,Have these statements caused conflicts in the relationship between Iran and the United States?
"Did the sales drop after ""He went woke""?","Is there a record of sales after ""He went woke""?","Is there any records of sales after ""He went woke""?","Is there an average of sales after ""He went woke""?","Is there any record of sales after ""He went woke""?"
Was Aronberg the first to demand that BP created a billion-dollar fund to pay for the devastation?,Did Aronberg demand any other compensation from BP?,Did Aronberg deem it a reasonable request that BP should create a billion-dollar fund to pay for the devastation?,Did Aronberg cite evidence in support of his demand?
Did Damond make this claim on social media?,"Is it true that Damond died on a day in which ""Big Pharma"" allegedly used the same dietary suppository as some of the mainstream doctors?",Is it true that Damond has lived close proximity to the pharma company that created this suppository?,Was it not true that Damond died in a car crash with a friend?
Did a single registered civilian intervene in a mass shooting?,Was the only registered civilian involved in a mass shooting?,Is there evidence that the CDC reported a disproportionate share of mass shootings by concealed carriers in 2005?,Did there occur less mass shootings by concealed carriers than a non-concealed carryr?
Does Canadian data show vaccinated people are more likely to die from COVID-19?,Do COVID-19 vaccines alter our DNA?,Are hydroxychloroquine and ivermectin effective in preventing COVID-19?,Do these two drugs cure COVID-19?
Did rioters enter the capitol?,Did rioters use the gates to enter the Capitol?,Did the gates allow rioters to enter the capitol?,Did the rioters open the gates on the north side of the capitol?,Did the rioters use the gates to enter the capitol?,Did the rioters block the entrance to the capitol?,Did the rioters use the gates on the north side of the capitol?
Is it true that the U.S. has to go to plane graveyards to get parts for its 20-year-old jet fighters?,Is it true that the U.S. has to go to plane graveyards and museums to get parts for its 20-year-old jet fighters while it sells new jets to other countries?
Did the Supreme Court in 2013 rule that people with COVID-19 vaccines are no longer legally human?,Have the laws governing the use of COVID vaccines been followed by the US Supreme Court?,Can people who have a COVID-19 vaccine patent it?,Can people with a COVID vaccine patent it?
Is it true that U.S. dollar notes issued before 2021 will be recalled?,Are these dollar notes accompanied by a bill?,Are this dollar notes part of a larger program?,Will these dollar notes be replaced by dollars in circulation?,Does this plan include this dollar bill with an ATM?
Did the Modi government spend this much money to build the Statue of Equality?,Did the Statue of Equality have any other costs besides its building price?,"Did the Statue of Equality cost Rs 1,000 crore?",Did the Statue of Equality come after an announcement by the Modi government?
Did few states receive more votes than registered voters in the 2019 election?,Is there any research that indicates this is true?,Are the numbers of projected votes from certain states higher than the numbers registered voters?,Are all states with more voters projected to receive votes than registered voters in the 2019 election?,Has the number of projected votes from some states in the 2019 election been increased?
Did China feel alarm over Japan transferring weapons to the Philippines?,Are the people of China worried about Japan transferring weapons to the Philippines?,Do Japan's security concerns involving the Philippines have exacerbated China's concerns over the weapons transfer to the Philippines?,Would this move impede China's efforts to defend itself against any Chinese-based forces?
Did Uhuru Kenyatta win the 2013 elections?,"Did Uhuru Kenyatta receive 800,000 votes in the 2013 election?","Did Uhuru Kenyatta claim 800,000 votes in the 2013 election?","Did the difference in votes between Uhuru Kenyatta and his predecessors in the 2013 election exceed 800,000?","Did the differences between Uhuru Kenyatta and Uhuru Kenyatta's predecessors in the 2013 election come down to less than 800,000 votes?","Did Uhuru Kenyatta receive less than 800,000 votes?"
Was this state a leader in COVID-19 prevention?,Does New Zealand have a COVID case?,Has this state produced zero cases of COVID?,Has New Zealand had COVID cases as of this date?,Have states in this state produced zero cases of COVID?,Have there been zero COVID cases as of this date?
Did Dan McCready cut $716 billion from Medicare to fund Obamacare?,Did Dan McCready back Obamacare?,Did Dan McCready support Obamacare?,Did Dan McCready support Trump's healthcare plans?,Does Dan McCready support Romney's health care plans?,Does Dan McCready support Obamacare?,"Do ""Liberals"" support McCready?"
Did Academy Awards start using closed captioning in 1982?,Was closed captioning used in Academy Awards from 1982 to 1983?,Is closing captioning used in Academy Awards since 1982?,Was closed captioning used in Academy Awards from 1982 to 1983?,Would you say closed captioning was used in Academy Awards if all of them were 1980s?
Would making legal age of consent 4 years old change anything?,Does this move affect anyone?,Are parents unsure of the age of consent they expect?,Are there any questions about this issue?,Are there any other laws preventing the age of consent?,Would a 4 year old be the legal age for consent?
Are mass graves being dug in New York to bury victims of the COVID-19 coronavirus disease pandemic in 2020?,Are mass graves being dug in New York to bury victims of the COVID-19 coronavirus disease pandemic in 2020?,Are mass graves being dug in New York to bury victims of the COVID-19 coronavirus disease pandemic in 2020?
Have house prices quadrupled since 1990?,Has average income only risen by half?,Have house prices quadrupled since 1990?,Did the average income increase by half?,Do any of the facts have the same effect on households?,Do any of the figures used in the cites do not align with the figures in the cited literature?
Did NASA capture this video?,Is this video of Chandrayaan landing on the south pole of the moon?,Did NASA shoot this video for publication?,Does this video have a description of the landing?,Has this video previously been posted on YouTube?,Did this video have a description of the landing?
Last year what percentage leaped for 6 district schools in the entire state?,Did the state report that the combined graduation rate for all 6 district schools in the entire state has increased?,Has any school in the state increased in graduation rate since the 2006-07 year?,Are any school districts in the state increasing their graduation rates?
Did Americans experience a 64 percent increase in illegal robocalls since 2016?,Did robocalls increase this year?,Are illegal robocalls more popular than legal robocalls?,Is there evidence these robocalls are illegal?,Is it true there are thousands of legal robocalls?
Did Hurd co-sponsor a bill which would militarize our border and allow 200 miles of new roads to be built in the Big Bend region?,Is this bill similar to the one from which Hurd co-sponsored?,Is the park protected by this bill?,Does this bill have any effect on the national parks?
Did any other school boys die in China in the same year that two school boys died suddenly after wearing face masks in exercise?,Does any other school in China die suddenly after wearing face masks in exercise?,'' Was there a correlation between students wearing face masks and death?,''?
Did Gaga's dog walker become the target of the theft?,Did Gaga's dog walker receive any damages to her dog?,Did Gaga's dog walker receive any injuries at all to herself?,Did Gaga's dog walker receive any injuries outside of the dog walker theft?
"Does the Flu vaccine contain 25,000 times more mercury than drinking water is legally allowed?",Is the Flu vaccine safe to ingest?,Can the Flu vaccine contain less mercury than drinking water?,Does the flu vaccine have any other contaminants?,Is the Flu vaccine safe to ingest in drinking water?,Has the flu vaccine been banned from use in the US due to the harmful effects of mercury?
"In September 2021, how did Texas Roadhouse offer the voucher?","Did Texas Roadhouse offer vouchers for liked, shared or comment on Facebook promotions?","In September 2021, did Texas Roadhouse offer vouchers for liked, shared or comment on Facebook promotions?","Did Texas Roadhouse offer vouchers for liked, shared or comment on Facebook promotions?"
Are all these universities recognized?,Is any of this infrastructure already existing?,Do these institutions belong to any institute of higher education?,Does these institutions have any affiliations with any other institutions or institutions in other states?,Approximately how many colleges have these institutions?,Is there a correlation between number of colleges and the number of Navodaya Vidyalayas?
"Has the Supreme Court taken away rights and opportunities from 220,000 New Yorkers?",Are any of these New Yorkers hurting?,Were a quarter million of these New Yorkers taken away by the Supreme Court?,"Would 220,000 New Yorkers have immediately benefitted from the Obama executive action?",Would any of these New Yorkers have been hurt?
Was a COVID-19 surge hit India before the Kumbh Mela festival?,Is there any evidence establishing this event was preceded by a COVID-19 surge?,Are there any records establishing this event was prior to a COVID-19 surge?,Does this festival have any other traditions?
Did Jacques Attali endorse a pandemic-driven mass killing in his 1981 book Verbatim?,Did Attali oppose a pandemic-driven mass killing in his 1981 book Verbatim?,Have Attali's views on mass violence influenced political developments after the 1980s?
Is it true that farmers owe Rs. 294.98 crores to Punjab government?,Is there any evidence that the Punjab government has received such amounts?,Is the Punjab government responsible for the amount of loans received by the farmers?,Is it true that the Punjab government has received a total of Rs. 294.98 crores from farmers?
Have the photos been recirculating since November 2018?,Has the police image in this case been used to identify people on the protests?,Is this image known in the Indian media?,Was this photograph taken in this country?,Are there reports in the media that this image is associated with political unrest in the country?
Did Abbott lose in court?,Has Abbott lost in court since his election?,Did Abbott lose in court during his election?,Does Abbott currently have an upcoming election coming up?,Are any other events happening in the near future that would likely re-affirm Abbott's defeat in court?,Are any other events in the near future that would re-affirm Abbott's defeat in court?
Did CNN stage a protest in support of a Muslim attack in London?,Did CNN stage a protest in support of a Muslim attack in London?,Was CNN responsible for the event?,Did CNN stage a protest in support of the Muslim attack in London?,Did the demonstrations take place by the organizers of the protests?
Did France reduce internet access in this month?,Is this month known for protests?,Did France restrict internet access in this month?,Do any protests happen after this date?,Have any protests since this date in France been successful?,Did the protests result in the suspension of internet access in this month?
Are the Muslim refugee centers in Sweden destroyed or destroyed recently?,Did this conflict end suddenly?,Does this conflict mainly affect people in Sweden?,Did the protesters make it to Sweden?,Was the civil war in Sweden exacerbated by the actions of the Swedes?,Did this conflict in Sweden include an Islamic nation or was it focused only on people from Turkey?
Are there any similar images?,Are they related to the Delaware shooter incident?,Was a student present when the shooter entered the high school?,Is the student the school armed teacher?,Do all images in this series have identical content?,Is there any information about the school from the article?,Is the Delaware shooting an incident of mass shooting?
Is there a specific number of sex offenders that are unaccounted for. Was the department tracking these sex offenders under Walker?,Was the department reporting these sex offenders under Walker?,Did it take the Department of Corrections more than 18 a year to tracking these sex offenders?,Are there any other factors behind these statistics.?
Does taxing death costs cause any damage to an economy?,Does the death tax in 29 states cost their economy economically?,Does the death tax have any other effects?,Does death tax negatively affect economic competitiveness?,Is there a correlation between death tax and economic competitiveness?,Is death tax in any other state?
Did this deceased voter vote in the 2020 election?,Did this deceased voter vote in the 2020 election?,Was this dead man born in 1902?,Did this deceased voter vote in the 2020 election?,Did this dead voter die before the 2020 election?,Are there any known records that this deceased voter voted in the 2020 election?
Did CNN use a photo of a vaccine recipient back in October?,Have other public organizations used photo's of vaccine recipients?,Was the photo used in an article?,Was the photo posted on a social media site?,Did CNN post a photo of a vaccine recipient in October?,Did CNN post any other photos of the vaccine recipients?
Did the president state that American citizens pay $150 billion annually to help illegal immigrants?,Did the president explain that illegal immigrants receive better treatment than American citizens?,Is there any evidence that illegal immigrants are paid much less by American citizens?,Was there evidence that the immigration program actually pays more for illegal immigrants?,Does the president claim that the majority of the $1.5 billion spent on illegal immigrants is used to help take care of illegal immigrants?
What year does the process to impeach President Trump begin?,Is the process to impeach President Trump on an ongoing basis?,"Remember, the House of Representatives, as a whole, has consistently focused on reducing the size of government in the United States. This is a logical outcome for the House of Representatives if they are considering reducing the government?"
Does paraben in cosmetics cause 90 % of cancers?,Does paraben cause cancer for 90 % of women?,Has there been research linking parabens with cancer?,Are there any studies to support these claims?,Has there been any research to support these claims?,No Paraben in Cosmetics Causes Cancer?
Was this person known to have stayed at a gym connected to the Covid-19 cluster in Hong Kong in 2021?,Was the gym employee also the one involved in the Covid-19 cluster?,Was this person a member of the gym?,Has Covid been found in this place before?,Has this person worked at the gym for a few years?
Do the slums cover the g20 summit?,Will the slums cover the summit?,Does the g20 summit require the slums to be covered?,Does New Delhi plan on using sheets at the summit?,Did any slums cover the g20 summit?
Is there any evidence that SARS-CoV-2 research is being carried out at the Wuhan Institute of Virology?,Do any other academic institutions have similar research protocols involving SARS-CoV-2?,Is Wuhan Institute of Virology a research institution?,Is the Wuhan Institute of Virology responsible for conducting SARS-CoV-2 research?
Did Harris have an affair with Sanders?,Is Harris a political figure?,Did Sanders win the 1988 election?,Was Harris the VP of a political party?,Is Harris a political leader?,Is Harris a former political commentator?,Did Harris claim to have an affair with Sanders?,Are these two people related?
Did Kamala Harris say that the protests were not gonna stop before election day in November?,Did Harris say that the protests were not gonna stop after election day?,Did Harris say that the protests were not gonna stop before election day?,Did Harris say that the protests were not gonna stop after election day?
Did Gates call for forced vaccination during this campaign?,Did Gates make a statement about the need for forced vaccination during this campaign?,Was Gates referring to the need for forced vaccinations mainly in the US?,Did Gates suggest making a statement about forced vaccinations during this campaign?,Are there any other statements regarding forced vaccination in this statement?
Did Volvo ever plant its productions in Georgia?,Did South Carolina get these jobs?,Did Volvo choose South Carolina as their location?,Did these jobs generate more than $800 million in investment?,Did Volvo have this job in South Carolina before they came to Georgia?,Is the increase in job numbers attributable to South Carolina's decision?
Did the video show Azerbaijani police arresting residents during the 2020 military conflict?,Are the residents arrested in this video?,Did the videos show police arresting citizens during this conflict?,Did all of the people arrested in these video have identification?,Was this video created by Azerbaijan?,Did any of the video shows the Azerbaijani people?
Did California's legislature increase in congressional representation due to illegal immigration?,Did Congress allow for the additional congressional representation due to illegal immigration?,Did this legislation prevent a reduction in the number of congressional representation in California?,Do California's lawmakers have the additional congressional representation as a result of illegal immigrants?,Are these six extra congressional representatives based solely on illegal immigration?
Has McCain not led on nonproliferation issues when he had the chance in the Senate?,Is McCain's retweet merely about the nonproliferation issues he has not led on as a senator?,Was McCain unable to get to the bottom of nonproliferation issues when he had the chance?,Was McCain unable to pass a bill in the Senate that would have provided money to the Iran nuclear program?
Do eleven states finish their legislative sessions within three calendar months?,Are there five states that meet biennially?,Do all states have three calendar months?,Is there one state that is always running from one calendar month to the next?,Is there a state that only meets annually?,Does the average legislature meet once a year?
Did Evers help change the law in regards to the teacher view of pornography at schools?,Was it legal to fire a teacher who viewed pornography at schools?,Did Evers agree with the decision of judges that viewed pornography at schools?,Did Evers work with Republicans and Democrats to change the law?,Did Evers work with Republican and Democrats to pass the legislation?
"Has every president tried to cancel federal spending 1,200 times?","Has each president tried to cancel federal spending 1,200 times?",Has each president ever attempted to cancel federal spending more than once?,Has each president attempted to cancel federal spending more than once?,Has each president attempted to cancel federal spending more than once?,Has each president attempted to cancel federal spending more than once?
Do African Americans constitute a minority in the United States by 2040?,Will African Americans ultimately continue to live in the United States?,Will U.S. white Europeans replace African American white Americans by 2040?,"Are African Americans, white Europeans and white people the majority race in the United States by 2040?"
Do covid vaccines get to phase 3 trials in 2023?,Will the vaccines get to phase 3 trials in 2023?,Is the vaccines available for those individuals unable to take the vaccines?,Does the vaccines have the benefit of preventing virus transmission?,Do the vaccines use a protein-based vaccine?,Does the vaccines have the potential to cure disease?
Did Thomas and Meadows talk about Venmo payments?,"Did Meadows and Thomas talk about “coup buses""?",Did Virginia Thomas and Mark Meadows discuss the Venmo payments on Jan. 6?,Did anyone else call Meadows?,Did the texts show up on CNN?,Are the texts linked to events that happened in 2019?
Was there a Ukrainian pilot who shot down six Russian aircraft?,Was there any proof that the Ukrainian pilot shot down the six Russian aircraft?,Was the Ukrainian pilot praised on social media?,Was the Ukrainian pilot also shown in pictures?,Has the Ukrainian pilot posed for any photographs?,Did anyone else show any pictures of the Ukrainian pilot?
Do 50% of children who acquire myocarditis caused by Covid-19 vaccines die within 5 years of diagnosis?,Can this vaccine cause children to die within 5 years of diagnosis?,Are there any other forms of vaccines that cause myocarditis in children?,Did researchers discover any other vaccines in children that cause myocarditis?
Did Guess discontinue sales of a bag from Telfar at some point in March 2021?,Was the Telfar bag look similar to the Guess bag?,Did many criticize Guess's decision to discontinue the Telfar bag at some point in the past year?,Did these critics not know that the Telfar bag was an identical version of a Guess bag?
Did Biden say that $30 billion would be directed to climate change?,Does Biden plan on redirecting another 30 billion dollars to climate change?,Did Biden say that this 30 billion dollars would be directed to climate change?,Did Biden say he would redirect another 30 billion dollars to climate change?,Did Biden say that $30 billion was directed to climate change?
Was there a video showing a C-17 Globemaster flying through a city's skyline?,Is this C-17 Globemaster part of a large United States fleet?,Is this C-17 Globemaster in a combat zone?,Is this C-17 Globemaster flying in a desert?
Did Sutton and Democrats gut Medicare because of Obamacare?,Did Sutton and Democrats gut Medicare to pay for Obamacare?,Has Sutton or her Democratic colleagues gut Medicare to pay for Obamacare?,Has Sutton worked for the House?,Is Sutton working for the House Democrats?,Does Sutton formally support Obamacare?
Did Meek support the tax?,Did Meek take tobacco cash before he opposed the tax?,Did Meek oppose the tax in Florida?,Was Meek a supporter of children's health care?,Did Meek oppose tobacco taxes?,Did Meek oppose a tax on cigarettes?
Is Hazrat Ayesha nine years old and in the process of emigration?,Was the banner for Aurat March criticizing Hazrat Ayesha's marriage?,Did the banner at Aurat March explicitly make the comment?,Did the banner specifically condemn Hazrat Ayesha?
Was this damaged building shot?,Did this video depict a damaged building?,Did this video have any visible effect on the construction of the damaged building?,Did this video include any sound from the destroyed building?,Did this footage cover a damaged building?,Does this video include any visual images from the damaged building?,Is there any evidence of a damaged building being seen in this video?
Was the family of 11 in Shahdara attacked or attacked by themselves?,Did the family of 11 have any children?,Did the family of 11 include a single person?,Did the family of 11 live in this house?,Did the family of 11 have anyone with whom they was attacked?,Did the family of 11 assault or abuse a single person?
"Did Azar call family separations at the border and detention of children in cages ""one of the great acts of American generosity and charity""?",Has Azar been in office for at least one year?,Did Azar report to HHS?,Does Azar have a place of authority in this Department?
Did the expulsions of three lawmakers and eleven senators result from a support for slavery and an unrecognised Lincoln election?,Did the expulsions take place in Congress or the senate?,Did any of the expelled lawmakers agree with Lincoln's election?,Did any expelled legislator support slavery and the Confederacy?
Is the article true?,Did Saad donate a large sum to the PM relief fund?,Did Saad donate to the PM relief fund in the aftermath of the coronavirus pandemic?,Is this article true?,Is this newspaper clipping taken to mean that Saad donated money to the PM relief fund?
Are vaccines against COVID 19 to be halted?,Are vaccines against COVID 19 to be ceased?,Are vaccines against COVID 19 currently being produced in the U.K.?,Are vaccines against COVID 19 currently being manufactured in the U.K.?
Is there a CBS news poll which found 85% of Americans approved of Biden’s address to Congress?,Did people at large in large numbers approve of Biden’s address to Congress?,Did the results of this CBS news poll show that only 18% of Americans approved of Biden’s address to Congress?
Did Perry of Texas rely the most on stimulus funds to close his state’s budget deficit in 2010?,Did Perry of Texas depend on these funds to close his state’s budget deficit in 2010?,Was Perry of Texas the governor who relied most on stimulus funds to close his state’s budget deficit in 2010?
Did the COVID-19 pandemic and international response have an explicit plan 10 years ago?,Were there any specific events that the response outlined were to be planned 10 years in advance of that specific event?,Did the response outlined in the Rockefeller report involve only the most critical issues at the time of the COVID-19 pandemic?
Did this vaccine no longer protect against severe disease?,Are more than 88% of ICU patients in Germany vaccinated?,Are COVID-19 vaccines no longer effective against severe disease?,Are there other diseases that vaccines no longer protect against?,Have vaccines in Germany stopped providing protection against severe disease?
Did Hamilton survive the third attempt at the lethal injection?,Did Hamilton testify against himself?,Was Hamilton found guilty of the third attempt at lethal injection?,Was Hamilton's status on death row made official?,Did Hamilton live until the end of his sentence?,Did the death row prisoner receive the restitution he was due?
Did this image contain survivors of the 2021 bombing?,Did this image contain an image of survivors of the 2021 bombing?,Did these survivors embrace each other after the bombing?,Are these survivors all male?,Did these survivors embrace each other after the bombing?,Was this image taken after the suicide bombing of these survivors?
Was the temple in Pakistan destroyed?,Did the temple in Pakistan have a long history?,Was the temple destroyed by a fire?,Have a number of shoddy practices destroyed the temple before it was demolished?,Was there a fire in Pakistan before the temple was demolished?,Is the Shiva temple in Pakistan a cultural landmark?
"Did the US still import energy products, including oil, from Russia after the invasion of Ukraine?","Did the US still import energy products, including oil, from Russia before the invasion of Ukraine?","Are US importing energy products, including oil, from Russia since the invasion of Ukraine in early 2022?","Was the US still importing energy products, including oil from Russia after the invasion of Ukraine in early 2022?"
Has the rate of cuts in higher education in the state increased by 35% or 40 percent since 2001?,Has the rate of cuts in higher education in the state increased by more than 30% since 2001?,Has the rate of cuts in higher education in the state increased by over 35% or 40% since 2001?,Does this statement support the claim that higher education in the state decreased by 35-40% since 2001?
Has the number of banks or credit unions disappearing each day since the end of the financial crisis reached a all time high?,Do the banks or credit unions all disappear every day?,Are there any community banks or credit unions that are currently not in existence?,Are there any community banks or credit unions that are not in existence?
Did Texas pass a bill banning drag performances in front of children?,Did Texas pass a bill banning drag performances in front of children?,Is it true that Texas passed a bill banning drag performances in front of children?,Did the Texas legislature pass any bill banning drag performances in front of children?
"Will a family with a income of $67,000 receive this payment?",Does this increase make sense for these families?,Is there a single example of this happening?,Does this mean there was income interruption that this family will receive payment?,Has this family had any income interruption?,Does this family deserve this payment?
Did two of Pelosi's daughters get arrested for smuggling drugs?,"Did a majority of the country's drug enforcement agencies do a ""sting operation"" on Pelosi's daughters?",Did any of the countries where Pelosi's daughters were arrested for smuggling drugs carry weapons or other illegal drugs?,Did any of the countries where Pelosi's daughters were arrested for smuggling drugs carry weapons or other illegal drugs?
Is DMX giving DMX masters to his kids for free?,Did DMX receive a free master from Jay-Z?,Has DMX ever used a master?,Are there other rappers to whom Jay-Z and Beyonce are buying masters?,Is DMX currently using a master?,Is the deal between Jay-Z and Beyonce a rumor?
Did Trump bankrupt a golf course in Puerto Rico?,Are Puerto Rican taxpayers on the hook for the debt?,Did Trump file for bankruptcy before the golf course collapsed?,Are there any records showing a golf course's debt to the U.S. government?,Has Trump filed for bankruptcy since his election?,Is the golf course in Puerto Rico fully depreciated?
Did Sawa stop the Milwaukee lead program?,Was the Milwaukee lead program audited for three years?,Was the Milwaukee lead program audited for three years?,Was the Milwaukee lead program investigated for potential violations?,Was there a criminal investigation or investigation in general with the Milwaukee lead program?,Did the Milwaukee lead program audit cause harm to children?
Does this device reduce fuel consumption by at least 35%?,Does this device convert a car into a hybrid?,Does using this device reduce fuel consumption by at least 75%?,Does plugging this device into a car’s fuse box reduce fuel consumption by at least 35%?,Does plugging this device into a car’s fuse box reduce fuel consumption by at least 75%?
Did he say he has a plan for tax relief for Illinois?,Does he have a plan for tax relief?,Does he say he has a plan for tax relief for Illinois?,Did he say he was trying to cut taxes in Illinois?,Did this plan have tax relief for Illinois?
Does this video show protests in Bangladesh in 2022 or 2013?,Did the video date to 2013?,Was the video of protests in Bangladesh from 2013?,Do the protests in Bangladesh originate from the year 2013?,Have protests in Bangladesh in 2013 been seen from 2022?,Did the video take place in 2018?
Can you use Public Law 92-313 to collect Federal Rent Checks?,Are Federal Rent Checks administered by the federal government?,Can you use Public Law 92-313 to collect Federal Rent Checks?,Can you use Public Law 92-313 to collect Federal Rent Checks?,Did you find this article helpful?
Did the county governments receive KSh1.25 trillion shillings in equitable share up to the 2017/18 financial year?,Have all county governments been receiving this amount up to the 2017/18 financial year?,Does KSh1.25 trillion shillings amount to any other revenue?,Is KSh1.25 trillion shillings an estimate of state revenue?
"Has the testing done on monkeys killed more than 3,000?",Is the report based on a study?,Was the test carried out on human monkeys?,Is it true that the testing on monkeys lasted longer than expected?,Can the report from USA Today be used to prove that the test was unavoidable?
Was Tate found guilty of the charges he faces?,Did Tate's release date occur after this incident?,Was Tate's sentence final?,Was Tate's jail time for the charges he faced complete?,Did Tate receive any punitive sanctions?,Is Tate currently in jail?
Has the infrastructure government invested over the last ten years increased or decreased?,Has the infrastructure government restructured the school system?,Is there more infrastructure going to be built?,"Are the schools, clinics and roads expanding as well?",Is there a significant expansion of the freight logistics network?,Is this a significant amount of development?
Did Kellogg's remove its logo from Pop Tarts packaging for 2021?,Was it a response to a labor dispute?,Did Kellogg's respond to a labor dispute by removing its logo?,Did Kellogg's withdraw from a labor dispute related to Pop Tarts?
Did the six richest people in the world have as much wealth as the bottom half of the world’s population?,Was the wealth of the bottom half of the world equal to the wealth of the six richest people in the world?,Could the six richest people have the wealth that the bottom half of the world has?
Did Clyde shake the hand of Michael Fanone?,Did Clyde do not accept Fanone's hand offer when offered?,Did Fanone shake Clyde's hand during this incident?,Did Clyde make an apology for Fanone's hand offer?,Is Clyde not an elected official?
Have the US never built a refinery?,Are there any documented refining plants in the US?,Was any major refinery built in the United States in the past 30 years?,Has the US actually been building refining plants for most of these years?,Is there any record of any refineries in the US in the past 30 years?
Are five helicopters going to spray the air with disinfectant overnight?,Will any aircraft get involved?,Is there a timetable to spray?,Will all incoming aircraft be inspected by inspectors?,Will all aircraft be fully or partially deployed?,Is there any other information for this announcement?,Do you plan on having more helicopters involved in this deployment?
Has it been banned?,Has there ever been any bans on films warning children about the dangers of playing near live wires?,Has this movie ever been shown in full?,Can this movie be said to be unnatural in any way?,Has there ever been any restrictions on the use of this video?,Has anyone been prosecuted for this crime?
Do people who are more than 10% body fat get sick from COVID-19?,Are obese people the ones most prone to getting sick from COVID-19?,Are less than 10% body fat people susceptible to COVID-19?,Are obese people the ones most prone to getting sick from COVID-19?
Did the political leader arrange the buses in Uttar Pradesh?,Did the buses bring back migrants?,Did the buses bring people home?,Does the author think the buses were used to bring home migrants?,Does the author think the buses were used to bring in migrants?,Does the author think there are more buses than the number on the picture?
Has the INC increased the standards of education for nurses?,Does B.Sc nursing consider equal to MBBS?,Have nurses in India been required to get MBBS?,Would there be a shortage in MBBS at the end of the year?,Did the INC increase the standards of education for nurses?
Was there an executive with a salary of $50k/month from this energy firm?,Are there any other details on the amount of money that the executive had?,Did Hunter bring Biden a top executive from this energy company?,Did Biden receive a salary of $50k/month from this energy company?
"Did either Donald Trump, Muhammad Ali or Rosa Parks receive the Ellis Island Medal of Honor in 1986?","Is there any evidence that Trump, Ali, or Parks received the Medal of Honor in 1986?",Is there evidence that these were people who received the Medal of Honor in 1986?,"Is there any evidence that Trump, Ali, or Parks received the Medal of Honor in 1986?"
Is there an increase in numbers of lions since when I was born?,Did populations increase in the 70s and beyond?,Does the number of lions in America decline today?,Does the decrease in number result from human activity?,Did the number of lions increase in the mid 70s and beyond?
Did the U.S. lose 3.5 million jobs during the last six months of the Bush administration?,"Did the U.S. lose 760,000 jobs in January of 2009 alone?",Did the U.S. lose 3.5 million jobs throughout the last 6 months of the Bush administration?,"Did the U.S. lose 760,000 jobs in January of 2009 alone?"
Did Dubey say that there were no farmer suicides in India since the past eight years?,Did Dubey state that the number of farmer suicides decreased in the past eight years?,Did Dubey agree with the assertion that there were no farmer suicides in India since the past eight years?,Did Dubey say that there was no change in the number of farmer suicides in India since the past eight years?
Did Odinga have any problems after the protest?,Did Odinga receive treatment for his injuries?,Did Odinga claim he was hospitalized?,Will there be more protests in the future?,Are there other areas in Nigeria where Odinga protests?,Was this protest connected with Odinga's alleged alleged involvement in the US drone attack?,Did Odinga win a congressional vote against the US drone attack?,Are there any other protests in Nigeria that have inspired Odinga to protest?
Was Marcos there at the arrival ceremonies for the troopers killed in 2015?,Does Marcos attend the arrival ceremonies for the troopers killed in 2015?,Did Marcos attend the 2015 arrival ceremonies for Special Action Force troopers killed in 2015?,Did Marcos attend the 2017 arrival ceremonies for Special Action Force troopers killed in 2015?
Will the IRS double in size?,Will the armed agents increase their numbers?,Will the armed agents increase their overall number of armed agents?,Will the extra $80 billion add to the IRS?,"Will the $87,000 increase in numbers increase the armed agents' number of agents?",Would the extra money add to the IRS?
Is it true there are over a million people under emergency travel restrictions due to poison exposure?,Has the poison released in the air caused significant health problems?,Does the author support the travel restrictions?,Are there other sources of health problems besides the poison?,Is there an alternative source of health problems besides the poison?
Was it true that Lopez urinated on Trump's star?,Was Lopez actually urinating on Trump's star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame?,Is Lopez known to be a prostitute?,Did Lopez use illegal drugs in the near future?,Did Lopez have a serious health incident?
Did he have an 8% pay decrease in each of the nine years he has been in office?,Is there any other detail about his pay decline in his brief tenure in office?,Did the increase occur at the same time as the pay decrease?,Is 8% a very large pay decrease?
"Did Italy send more than 14,000 patients home after treating them with Aspirin and Apronax?","Did Italy send more than 14,000 patients home after treating them with Aspirin and Apronax?","Did Italy send more than 14,000 patients home after treating them with Aspirin and Apronax?"
Did total out-of-pocket healthcare expense amount to 76% of total healthcare expenditure?,Was out-of-pocket healthcare expenditure percentage of total healthcare expenditure the lowest reported in the aforementioned study?,Are out-of-pocket healthcare expenditures the largest health care expense?,Are out-of-pocket healthcare expenditures in the United States higher than in any other country?
Was there any evidence that the impeachment ruling could have prevented Trump from running two more times?,Did this ruling cause Trump to have to reappear two more times?,Did this ruling also allow Trump to run for re-election?,"Do the votes of those two Senate Republicans support Trump's policies on ""free market"" policy?",Would this ruling negatively impact Trump's performance as president?
"Is it accurate to say that by 2030, the majority of Americans will use Spanish as their first language?",Is there any data to suggest this to be accurate?,Is there any data to support this claim?,Is this survey conducted at a time of year compared to a time period prior?
Did this fire have the name of a specific person?,Did this fire start in California?,Did the fire originate in California?,Did this fire have any cause or cause to be investigated by the public?,Would the image of this fire make any changes to California's fires in 2020?,Does this image have any other characteristics?
Does the Irish government offer financial assistance for moving to one of its offshore islands?,Is there a tax or other fee associated with moving to one of its offshore islands?,Does the Irish government offer tax or fees associated with moving to one of its offshore islands?,Is there any mention of taxes or fees associated with moving to one of its offshore islands?
Did Biden stand in front of a Nazi flag during this speech?,Was Biden addressing farmworkers in this speech?,Did Biden address farmworkers in this speech at a protest rally?,"Was Biden's speech before the Farmworker demonstration on March 31, 2021?",Is there any record of Biden using this rally flag in the past?
"Would E-Verify have prevented the death of 3,000 Americans had it been in place when 9/11 terrorists walked thru Florida?","Did Osborne claim that the life of 3,000 Americans would have been saved with E-Verify in place during the 9/11 terrorist attacks?",Was it necessary to have E-Verify in place in Florida when 9/11 terrorists lived there?
Did Michelle Obama hire an All-Star team to run her 2020 campaign?,Did Obama hire an All-Star team to run her 2020 campaign?,Did Obama hire any All-Star team members to run her 2020 campaign?,Did Obama hire an All-Star team to run her 2020 campaign?,Did Michelle Obama hire any all-star team members to run her 2020 campaign?
Is yousuf Muslim?,Did you save 70 people in the Orlando nightclub shooting?,Did you save 70 people in the 2016 gun attack?,Did you save 70 people during the nightclub shooting?,Did you save more than 70 people in the shooting?,Did you save 70 people in the shooting?,Did you save more than 70 people in the shooting?,Did the shooting incident take place in a Christian denomination?
"Did the DA build three brand new hospitals in Khayelitsha, Mitchells Plain and George in its first term in office?",Are there currently 75 health care projects valued at R4.5 billion underway?,Are any of these projects scheduled to complete during the 2019 election cycle?,Are these hospitals brand new?
Did Biden pose in front of White House in March of 2022?,Was the scene edited to make it seem like Biden was in front of the White House?,Was the scene edited to add trees in the photo?,Is Biden in the picture depicted in a normal setting?,Is Biden's head portrayed in this image?
Did Puerto Rico receive the most money for this hurricane?,Does the 91 billion dollar hurricane relief funding match previous hurricanes?,Were the hurricane relief funding grants ever shared between any two entities?,"Currently, how much of Hurricane Katrina funding has been shared between multiple entities?",Do these sources indicate this amount of funding was intended to help Puerto Rico and the Hurricane?
Did the EU experience a larger proportion of unused drugs than that used in the USA?,Does the amount of unused drugs increase as it increases?,Will the EU reduce the amount of unused drugs from 2019 onward?,Are the effectiveness of unused drugs lower than those claimed in the EU?,Does the EU anticipate a higher percentage of patients remaining in the intensive hospitals in the spring of 2020?
Is there no law that gives any rights for people to leave U.S. detention centers?,Has the U.S. law made it easier for refugees to leave detention centers?,Does the law have any direct link to how migrant detainees are transported to their countries of origin?
Did Shah break any social distancing rules while attending the rally?,Was the rally held under any political or social restrictions?,Is the rally a demonstration against the government?,Did Shah attend the rally in April?,Is the majority of the population from Pakistan Pakistan?,Would Shah be barred from participating in other rallies?
Did the Berlin State allow refugees from Ukraine to stay in the Reinickendorf train station?,Did the Berlin State provide spaces for refugees?,Did the refugees go away within 24 hours?,Has the Berlin State ever denied asylum for refugees?,Have any international laws required asylum seekers to return in advance?,Do any international laws require refugees to return in advance?
Will Hurricane Irma be considered Category 6?,Will Category 6 hurricane status be reclassified for Hurricane Irma?,Will Category 6 hurricane status be reclassified for Hurricane Irma?,Will Category 6 hurricane status be reclassified specifically for Hurricane Irma?
Did Chauvin's left palm show a symbol for three percenters?,Did Chauvin's left hand have a Three Percenters symbol?,Did Chauvin's right hand have a Three Percenters symbol?,Did Chauvin's left hand have a Three Percenters symbol?
Did CEOs earn 431 times what their workers earn in 2011?,How much do CEOs earn in relation to wages?,Do CEOs earn more in proportion to their workforce than workers?,Did CEOs earn 431 times more than their workers?,Did CEOs earn more than their workers in 2014?,Does this mean that CEOs are making more in comparison to their workers in 2014?
Did Hurd vote Republican and Republican?,Did Hurd vote straight Democratic as well?,Was Hurd straight Republican as a result of his voting record?,Was Hurd straight Republican as a result of his voting record?,Did Hurd vote for Republicans or Democrats in each of his campaigns?,Was Hurd straight Republican as a result of his voting record?
Did Bush come in fifth in New Hampshire?,Did Bush spend all or part of his campaign fund on New Hampshire?,Did Bush spend all or part of his campaign fund on other states?,Did Bush spend all or part of his campaign fund on any other states?,Did the spender of all or part of this campaign fund make all of these election decisions?
Did Mysore earn the prestige of setting-up the first youth hostel in South Asia in 1949?,Has Mysore developed the first youth hostel in South Asia?,Was Mysore the first place for setting-up a youth hostel in South Asia?,Did Mysore develop the first youth hostel in South Asia?
Did the South Korean president announce procurement of 45 million Chinese-made coronavirus vaccines after the Chinese foreign minister’s visit?,Did the president of South Korea announce procurement of 45 million Chinese-made coronavirus vaccines after the Chinese foreign minister’s visit?,Did the South Korean president announce procurement of 45 million China-made coronavirus vaccines after the Chinese foreign minister’s visit?
Are there any other known logos for the Democratic Party in Alabama besides the official logo of the Democratic Party in Alabama in 1904?,Was the logo of the Democratic Party in Alabama in 1904 replaced with an illustration of a crowing rooster?,Is the Alabama Democratic Party logo recognizable to some people?,Is the logo of the Alabama Democratic Party adopted in 1904 and replaced with an illustration of a crowing rooster?
Did Trump make a statement on the Ukraine strategy?,Was this an interview on a topic related to the Ukraine strategy?,Did Trump think the strategy was savvy?,Was Trump's statement true?,Was Trump's statement true?,"Was Trump's statement true when he called Putin's strategy a ""wunderkind"" and a ""savvy""?"
How many households did Obama bring in close to 3.5 million over the 7 years he was in office?,Do we now have close to 8 million households connected?,Were there a larger number of households connected prior to Obama's presidency vs following?,Are there more households connected in all parts of the country vs. prior to Obama's presidency?
Did all employees in India who retired during the 2018-19 financial year apply for leave encashment?,Are Indian employees who retired during the 2018-19 financial year eligible for leave encashment?,Did all employees in India who retired during the 2018-19 financial year receive any leave encashment?
Did George die from injury?,Did George save children?,Did George save children from two Pit bulls?,Did George save children from two Pit Bulls?,Did George save children from the Pit Bulls?,Did George do anything other than save children?,Did George save any children?,Did George save a single child from a dog?,Did George ever rescue any children from the Pit Bull?
Did the World Health Organization ban alcohol for all women aged 18-50?,Were any women who are under 18 in the U.S. banned from drinking alcohol for the same reason?,Is alcoholic beverages banned for all age groups by the World Health Organization?,Is the prohibition on alcohol drinking against women aged 18-50?
Is HIV transmission of mothers to children declining sharply and has the number of people receiving HIV treatment quadrupled to 2.4 million?,"Is the increase in people receiving HIV treatment in 2013, from 1 million to 2.4 million, likely caused by people living in underserved communities?","Are all the people receiving HIV treatment in 2013, from one million to 2.4 million, likely due to people living in underserved communities?"
Could Obamacare force 20 million people to lose their current insurance?,Does the law require individual insurance with this bill?,Could Obamacare affect the number of people who lose insurance under this bill?,. Does it need to be reaffirmed that Obamacare has caused 20 million people to lose their coverage?,.?
Is Marcos responsible for this agreement between the European Union and Marcos?,Did Marcos secure this agreement with the European Commission?,Was Marcos in charge of this agreement?,Does Marcos own a Boeing or Boeing 747?,Did Marcos secure this agreement with the European Commission prior to his appointment?
Is it true that BBC Children in Need has given £10 million to Black Lives Matter?,Is it true that black lives matter has received at least £10 million?,Is BBC Children in Need not donating money to Black Lives Matter?,Is Black Lives Matter a non-profit organization?
Did the plaintiffs live in father absent families?,Was the percentage of father absent households high?,Did this result in most of these felony cases being committed by defendants that were not father absent?,Was the percentage of defendants with a father absent households high?,Did the plaintiffs have an equal share of these criminals?
Did the Pennsylvania Supreme Court rule that the 2020 presidential election was rigged?,Did any of the judges involved in this case have ties to the Trump campaign?,Were there any other cases that are related to this investigation?,Is this article about how the 2020 presidential election was rigged true?,Is there any evidence that the 2020 election was rigged?
Did Obama implement any rules to take $3000 from every American before he left?,"Was $3,000 a rule created before Obama left?",Did Obama make sure money was distributed evenly after he was elected?,Was Obama's promise to take $3000 a day from every American made after he left office?
Was this number of women from Kerala?,Has this number of women from Kerala converted to Islam and sent to Syria?,Was this number of women from Kerala from Kerala or the whole country?,Did the number of women from Kerala convert to Islam and send to Syria?,Has this total of women from Kerala converted to Islam and sent to Syria?
Did Jack Kingston vote to raise his pay seven times?,Did Jack Kingston vote to raise his pay seven times?,Did Jack Kingston vote to raise his pay seven times?,Were Kingston's statements accurate?,Was Jack Kingston in favor of raising his pay seven times?,Is Jack Kingston also in favor of raising his pay seven times?
Was this after the 2019 El Paso shooting?,Was Trump's response to this tweet deleted?,Was Trump's response to this tweet deleted before or after the 2019 El Paso shooting?,"During the 2019 El Paso shooting, were Trump and others referring to immigrants as invaders?",Did Trump delete the referred to tweets after the shooting?
Did the dollar fall more than 44% since Bernanke began pumping money into the system in 2002?,Did Bernanke begin pumping money into the system before any other financial officials?,Did Bernanke begin pumping money into the system when all other financial administrations had already started pumping money into the system?
Was Salman Khan sentenced to jail after the death of Sushant Singh Rajput?,Does Salman Khan have previous convictions?,Was Salman Khan convicted after the death of Sushant Singh Rajput?,Did Salman Khan plead guilty to homicide prior to the death of Sushant Singh Rajput?
Did TriMet spend any money on public transportation?,Did the funds have any effect on how TriMet would save money?,Did the funds spent for TriMet include any savings over any other years?,Were the amounts of the money used for public transportation funded by federal funds?,Did TriMet spend any federal funds for any projects?
Does an American making 50 million per year pay higher taxes than an American making 50 million per year?,Does taxing a single American $5 million per year reduce the incomes of American workers as a whole?,Has the U.S. lowered the top income taxes per person from 50 million to 50 million?
Does Ohio lead the country with unemployment?,Does Ohio provide jobs of any quality?,Has Ohio created jobs of any quality?,Did Ohio have job growth in 2015?,Are Ohio job creation numbers decreasing?,Are Ohio jobs losing their jobs?,Are the unemployment rates in Ohio lower than national average?,Is Ohio in the middle of a job creation trend in a state like Texas?
Does the money from every Bang Energy purchase go toward Donald Trump's 2020 re-election efforts?,Was money from every Bang Energy purchase used to pay for Trump's 2020 re-election effort?,Was Donald Trump's 2020 re-election effort funded with money from Bang Energy purchase?
Did Rahul Gandhi claim women from Uttar Pradesh gave birth to 52 children per year?,Did Rahul Gandhi claim women from Uttar Pradesh gave birth to 52 children per year?,Did Rahul Gandhi say women from Uttar Pradesh gave birth to 52 children per year?,Was Rahul Gandhi the one making the claim in the video?
Did Beyonce wear high heel shoes designed to look like her lower body?,Did the shoes come in sizes that were smaller than those made for the singer?,Did Beyonce wear high heel shoes designed to look like her lower body?,Did Beyonce post an image of the shoes in which she showed off her new fashion sense?
Did a gallon of gasoline in Afghanistan cost more than $400?,Was the gasoline delivered to Afghan troops in a specific quantity?,Is there evidence that the gasoline was delivered more than 400 miles away from the front lines?,"Did fuel used in Afghanistan cost more than $400,000 as reported in this article?","Is the amount of the gasoline purchased by American troops in Afghanistan in $400,000?"
Did Barrow vote with Obama 85 percent of the time?,Did Barrow vote with Obama 85 percent of the time?,Did Barrow vote with Obama 85 percent of the time?,Did Barrow vote with Obama 85 percent of the time?,Did Barrow vote with Obama 85 percent of the time?,Did Barrow vote with Obama 85 percent of the time?
Did Aquino and his administration steal 3.500 metric tons of Marcos gold?,Is this gold worth that much to Aquino?,Are there any additional gold items considered to have been stolen?,Is this gold still being held by Aquino and his administration?,Is this gold a rare item?
Did the Act 10 collective bargaining law help in the ACT score gains in Wisconsin?,How many children took the ACT in Wisconsin in the year analyzed?,Do the scores of Wisconsin children on the ACT increase for the year?,Did the number of the states taking the ACT increase due to the Act 10 Collective bargaining Law?,Is there any evidence in support of the claim that the ACT scores in Wisconsin are higher than those of most of the states?
Did the Congressional Budget Office confirm that families would see their health care premiums reduced by up to 10 percent?,Did the Republican bill not include repeal of medicaid?,Is this bill the same as the previous Republican bill?,Is the Congressional Budget Office a non-partisan government agency?,Is this bill only for health care?
Do the projections made by successive governments not have been met?,"Was the projections made by successive governments to grow the supply of electricity to Nigerians to either 6,000MW, 10,000MW or 20,000MW met?",Did any of the projections fail?,Did any of the projections not meet?,Do any of the projections made by successive governments fail?
Did Trump return to Washington in a blaze of glory?,Did Trump take a picture with Air Force 1 before returning to Washington?,Did Trump take this picture before returning to Washington?,Do Trump use Air Force 1 as a mode of transportation in his speech?,Has Trump been accused of using Air Force 1 for his speech?
Did Trump voters say they would support another presidential candidate after the 2012 election?,Are there only two candidates in the field that Trump voters would support?,Do more than 20% of Trump voters support Donald Trump?,Would there be other candidates that Trump voters would support in the general election?,Are there other presidential candidates who have similar demographics to Trump's?
Did the State of Tamil Nadu implement this policy during the previous budget?,Did the Pregnant Women in Tamil Nadu benefit from this initiative?,Did more than 50 lakh pregnant women receive this money?,Did this measure affect the population that did not participate in the program?,Does this measure currently include women living in Tier 2?
What year did Hanako die?,Was the record in 1977?,Has the record been broken?,Was Hanako the oldest fish to live?,Did Hanako die in Japan?,Has the record been broken before?,Did Hanako make a comeback during the 1970's?,Was Hanako a male?
Did BJP improve cleanliness and the environment in UP in the first decade of its power cycle?,Did BJP improve toilets in UP by the year 2014?,Did BJP improve air quality in UP?,Did BJP build toilets in UP?,Did BJP install electricity for the first time since independence?,Did BJP increase sanitation and hygiene levels in UP?
Did Heard borrow from the movie The Talented Mr. Ripley during the defamation trial?,Did Heard borrow from this movie in the defamation trial?,Did Depp have this person involved in the defamation trial?,Did Depp have this person involved in the defamation trial?
Was the Guardian's 2021 People of the Year poll deactivated?,Did Rowling take the lead in this poll?,Did other people take the lead in this poll?,Did the Guardian have an active ballot to choose the leader of the 2021 poll?,Did the People of the Year poll be deactivated?
Did the two college students have to remove their penisence to protest the planned border wall?,Has the barrier been built prior to the Trump administration being sworn in as secretary of state?,Is the plan for the wall intended to reduce violence aimed at illegal immigrants at the border?,Has the plan for the border wall been implemented by the U.S. government?
"Did Trump receive a ""orderly"" transition when he took office in 2017?","Was Trump granted an ""orderly"" transition as a result of his election?","Did Trump receive an ""orderly"" transition as a result of his election?",Was Trump's victory in 2017 caused by a lack of preparation?
Was the Governor's Property Tax Cuts supported by the majority of Democrats?,Did Tammy Baldwin vote against the property tax cut while she was Governor?,Are most Democratic voters in Missouri against property tax cuts?,Are there any other Democratic voters that have been opposed to property tax cuts?,Is this argument based on a true story?
Did local planning agencies report estimates of homelessness to Rhode Island?,Was Rhode Island home to 107 veterans?,Did Rhode Island state planning agencies report the estimates of homelessness to state and local planning agencies?,Did Rhode Island state planning agencies report estimates of homelessness to state and local planning agencies?,Was Rhode Island home to 107 veterans on a single night in January 2015?
Did the woman activate a prayer request account?,Will the woman need to donate $24.99 a month if she wants to receive more prayer?,Did the woman complete the donation steps?,Were there any other comments on this matter?,Did the woman donate on the website?,Was the woman forced to activate a prayer request account?
Did 83 vote-in ballots from the same polling station go to this Los Angeles apartment?,Does this balloting have a link to any vote-in ballots?,Does the ballot received in this apartment belong to one voter?,Did this balloting campaign involve multiple voter's?,Was this election the result of voter's votes?
Did Mack write a letter to the Department of Transportation to receive funds from the stimulus?,Did Mack receive funds from the stimulus?,Was the letter received by the department?,Was Mack involved in any decisions about the transportation sector?,Did Mack give his congressional district anything in return for the funds?,Did Mack appoint the department to be the first to receive the funding?
Did vaccines increase COVID-19 deaths?,Did COVID-19 vaccines increase COVID-19 deaths?,Did vaccines increase COVID-19 deaths?,Does life insurance companies determine rates of death from COVID-19?,Is there a difference between the number of deaths caused by vaccines and the total deaths caused by COVID-19 vaccines?
Does the government provide food for the children?,Is it the government's responsibility to provide ration and employment for the children?,Do I believe differently-abled man has eight children?,Is it a government responsibility to provide employment for the children?,Does this government have to provide ration and employment for the children?
Was Chutkan the only judge in D.C. who has sentenced Jan 6 defendants to sentences longer than the government had requested?,Did the government request longer sentences than Chutkan?,Was Chutkan the only judge in D.C. who has sentenced Jan 6 defendants to sentences longer than the government had requested?
Did Samsung pay a $1 billion fine to Apple in pennies?,Did the fine come from the revenue the company generated?,Did Samsung pay any of the fine directly to Apple?,Did Samsung pay the entire fine to Apple in pennies?,Are there any other ways to pay a fine to Apple?
Did Trump believe in a 2016 election?,Did Trump write that the 2020 presidential election was “rigged and stollen”?,Did Trump write that the 2020 presidential election was “rigged and stollen”?,Did Trump claim that the 2020 election was rigged and stollen?,Have these statements been verified in any official court?
Was Greene referring to a Jewish laser beam from space?,Was Greene suggesting Jewish laser beams were the culprits behind California wildfires?,Did Greene claim that this was the actual cause of fires?,Did Greene claim that there were multiple triggers in California?,Did Greene claim this to be the real cause of the California wildfires?
Has the legislature taken nearly 300 days to act on a COVID-19 bill?,Have the Legislature passed a COVID-19 bill within the last year?,Did all the bills pass?,Did this bill come before the legislature?,Does this bill come before the legislature?,Does the COVID-19 bill currently have a name?
Did the NDA government recover Rs. 4 lakh crore NPAs?,Is NPA recovery estimated in crores?,Does NPA recovery rate include any additional costs?,Does NPA recovery rate account for a total of additional costs?,Are additional costs for additional costs not reported in these estimates?,Is there any other information about NPA recovery?
Did the deficit prior to Obama be significantly larger than today?,Were deficits higher when Obama took office?,Was the deficit in the 1980s less than 10%?,Is today's deficit near three percent?,Is the deficit the lowest now?,Is the deficit approaching zero today?,Does the current deficit represent a percentage of GDP?
"Did Melville say, 'A Thousand Fibers Connect Us With Our Fellow Men'?",Does Melville write poetry?,Did Melville cite his poetry in any of his novels?,Was Melville married in 1922?,Was Melville a famous poet?,Did Melville write any of his books with a female main character?
Did Sanders mention race or gender during the 2016 speech?,Did Sanders mention race or gender in his 2016 speech?,Did Sanders use an alternate words in his 2016 speech to describe race or gender?,Was Sanders' 2020 announcement speech announcing race or gender?,Has Sanders used alternative words in his 2016 speech?,Did Sanders mention race or gender during his 2016 announcement speech?
Do vaccines not prevent infection or transmission of COVID-19?,Do vaccines not prevent infection or transmission of COVID-19?,Are most of us with a 0.05% chance of dying from COVID-19?,Did vaccines prevent all COVID-19-related deaths?,Did COVID-19 vaccines prevent all COVID-19-related death?
Did Kennedy vote against Strauss' role as Secretary of Commerce in 1959?,Did Kennedy vote against Strauss' role?,Did Kennedy vote against Strauss' role as Secretary of Commerce?,Is there any evidence Kennedy voted against Strauss' role in 1959?,Do any other records support Kennedy's vote in 1959?
Did DeSantis receive $2 Million from a bank owned by Dominion Voting Systems?,Did Dominion Voting Systems pay the bank?,Did Dominion Voting Systems use the money to reimburse people for services?,Is the bank that was involved in this transaction openly involved in Politics?
Is this vaccine a syncytin-1 vaccine?,Does syncytin-1 make a protein that forms human placenta?,Are these vaccines marketed for use by people who are pregnant?,Is the Pfizer vaccine dangerous?,Is the Pfizer vaccine safe?
Does Trudeau pay mainstream media $600 million to report on himself?,Have some newspapers reported Trudeau's favorably on Trudeau's behalf?,Was it ever reported that Trudeau paid the media for his favor?,Do other newspapers have a similar opinion on Trudeau's favorability?,Did Trudeau pay mainstream media $600 million to report on himself?
Was the man crushed and killed by a truck in Deoband?,Was the truck carrying Kanwariya pilgrims a part of the attack?,Are police investigating whether the man was killed intentionally?,Did the truck carrying Kanwariya pilgrims drive by the Deoband area on July 20?
Did Seema Samridhi Kushwaha join this list?,Is Seema Samridhi Kushwaha listed as one of World's 6 talented Women?,Is this list of talented women by the magazine a fake list?,Is this list true or fake?
Is it true that tens of thousands of victims of the coronavirus are buried in mass burial grounds?,Are cremations only run 24 hours a day?,Does the cremation furnace run every day?,Is there a way to bury the victims of the coronavirus?
Did Mr. Obama authorize Zero access to the White House for a book author?,Did he grant access to the White House to an author of a phony book?,Did Mr. Obama authorize zero access to the White House for a book author?,Did Mr. Obama give a book author any access to the White House?
"Will Obama's proposed $1,000 emergency energy rebate offset the increase in gas prices?",Will Obama's proposed $1000 emergency energy rebate cover all gas prices over the next four months?,Has Obama's proposed $1000 emergency energy rebate ever offset any gas prices?,Has Obama's proposed $1000 emergency energy rebate ever funded any gas costs during the next four months?
Did the state legislature vote to spend virtually all of the Rainy Day Fund four times since the creation of this fund?,Did state lawmakers vote to spend virtually all of the Rainy Day Fund four times since the creation of this fund?,Did state lawmakers vote to spend virtually all of the Rainy Day Fund four times since the creation of this fund?
Does Vaseline protect from PM2.5?,Is this method safe to use for PM2.5?,Is the concentration of PM2.5 in the air dangerous to breathe?,Would Vaseline effectively fight PM2.5?,Does this method have risk of contact with other people?,Is Vaseline safe to use for other purposes than avoiding PM2.5?
Is drinking water right after eating likely to reduce one’s skin glow?,Does it matter when drinking water right after eating?,Would having water right after eating be bad for skin?,Does drinking water right after eating increase one’s risk for skin cancer?,Is drinking water right after eating safe for people with poor skin?
Did the program employ more than half a million young people as EAs?,Has the program created a substantial number of jobs to augment economic recovery?,Are young people employed in EAs from age 20-30?,Is the president of the United States responsible for creating this employment stimulus?,Can the President use the EA to directly subsidize young people working as TAs?
"Did Oregon expand its upper bracket to include any individual making more than $125,000 in 2012?","Did anyone in Oregon's highest bracket with income greater than $250,000 in 2012 pay income taxes?",Did anyone who was in Oregon's highest income bracket pay income taxes in 2012 pay income taxes in 2012?,Was there an increase in the state's highest bracket compared to 2012?
Did Target suit the man for saving a girl from getting stabbed in one of their stores?,Did Target file a lawsuit against the man?,Did the man file a claim after he saved the girl from getting stabbed?,Did Target sue the man after he saved the girl from getting stabbed?
Did Welcome to Sex become a Top Seller on Amazon?,Was Welcome to Sex a top seller on Amazon?,Has Welcome to Sex ever been no. 1 on Amazon?,Does Welcome to Sex have an estimated net worth of at least $1 million?,Was Welcome to Sex published in the year 2023?
Did Epps claim to have orchestrated the attack on Capitol?,Did Epps give testimony for the Jan 6 panel?,Was Epps arrested for alleged involvement in the attack?,Was Epps indicted?,Was Epps charged for alleged involvement in the attack on Capitol?,Are there other evidence Epps may be guilty of?
Does the Atlanta Braves' plan to build a stadium on this land generate zero SPLOST money for parks and recreation?,Has the stadium development benefited from Zero education funds?,Has the stadium development benefited from zero education funds?,No Answer> No Answer> No Answer>?
Did the Idaho suspect get caught using cell phone data?,Is the theory of 2000 Mules proven?,Was the Idaho suspect caught using cell phone data?,Has this theory been proven?,Is this theory based on an actual actual statement?,Is this theory established as a real thing?,Does this theory accept that 2000 Mules did the majority of the work?
Is pension income more common for people who work and pay for rent than for people who take out pension payments?,Did people who work and pay for rent receive lower benefits?,Did people who work and pay for rent pay a higher percentage of their pay?,Does pension pay out a greater percentage of benefits for those who do not take out money from retirement savings plans?
Did this patient have 20 types of sex?,Did the patient travel from Iraq?,Did this patient pass away before his death?,Does this patient have an unusual STI?,Were other patients with this illness?,Is this patient from Iran?,Can the sex in this patient be traced back to Iran?
Did these males want to take an air ambulance helicopter?,Did they do this without permission of the Air Ambulance?,Was this air ambulance helicopter a part of an illegal activity?,Are these males in Bootle?,Has there been any violence in this area?,Did this individual make it through this situation?
Was Marco Rubio supportive of the idea of reducing visual track inspections?,Did Rubio sign this letter during this period?,Did the letter propose any changes to existing tracking ordinances?,Did Rubio support eliminating the physical barriers to inspecting a public transportation system?,Did Rubio support any modifications to existing tracking ordinances?
Did Governor Reynolds claim $210 million for Iowa broadband?,Did Reynolds use a false name on these funds?,Did Reynolds say these funds were approved by Republican Rep. Cindy Axne?,Are these funds Federal funds approved by the federal government?,Did Axne and Biden have anything to do with these funds?
Did PepsiCo donate $100 million in 2020 to Black Lives Matter projects?,Did PepsiCo donate $100 million for Black Lives Matter projects in 2020?,Does PepsiCo give to Black Lives Matter?,Does PepsiCo make donations to Black Lives Matter organizations?
Did the Budget for Health increase from 3% to 15% after the Abuja Summit?,Has the final budget for health increased from 3% to 15%?,Is it clear that there is no deal in Abuja to raise health budgets?,Will the final budget for health increase from 3% to 15%?,Is there anything in Abuja that should have been included in the final budget for health?
Did Obama want to double the capital gains tax on mutual funds?,Did Obama propose any other benefits for certain employees?,Did Obama want to increase income taxes on police and firemen?,Did Obama propose any other benefits for other employees?,Was Obama currently planning to increase the capital gains tax for firefighters?,Did Obama propose any other benefits for certain employees?
Did the U.S. increase the number of troops at the US/Mexico border?,Did illegal crossings fall by about 80 percent from their peak in 2000?,Is this decrease a factor in the overall illegal crossing numbers?,Has the number of troops been increasing at the US/Mexico border since 2000?
"Does this exclude those who earn between R1 000 – R 9,000 a month?",Is there sufficient evidence to support this claim?,"Is there sufficient evidence to demonstrate that there is sufficient evidence to demonstrate that a plethora of South Africans have to make ends meet with less than R 1,000 a month?"
What is the image of?,Did this picture include a smiling sun?,Did this photo include a smiling sun?,Is the sun smiling with the birds?,Is this bird flying in a smiling formation?,Is this bird flying in a saddio formation?,Is this bird flying in a smiley formation?
Have chloroform kidnappings involving ice cream trucks been reported?,Do chloroform kidnappings typically involve ice cream trucks?,Do chloroform kidnappings typically include ice cream trucks?,Do ice cream truck brands have similar names?,Do reports of chloroform kidnappings by Mr. Softee cars specifically refer to those branded by Mr. Softee?
"Does the Congressional Budget Office say 90% of the revenue generated from the new IRS agents will come from people making less than $200,000?",Did the CBO report say that the revenue generated will be $300-plus billion?,"Did the CBO report say that 90% of the revenue generated from the new IRS agents will come from people making less than $200,000?","Is the CBO report based on a statement made by a person who makes less than $200,000?"
Did Trump authorize over 700 miles of the border wall?,Did the border wall include 150 miles?,Was the border wall surpassed in length?,Has Trump approved a wall containing 700 miles?,Did the border wall entice Trump to raise the border barrier?,Is the border wall constructed?,Does Trump say it will eventually have 300 miles of border wall?
"Did ASEAN countries stop using the US dollar from November 1, 2022?","Did all ASEAN countries stop using the US dollar from November 1, 2022?","Did all ASEAN countries stop using the US dollar from November 1, 2022?",Is there any data that supports this information?,". Are all ASEAN countries going to stop using the US dollar from November 1, 2022?"
Did the government introduce the coronavirus relief bill three years earlier?,Did the coronavirus relief bill have the correct intent?,Did the government plan for this pandemic?,Do certain policies for the coronavirus pandemic require legislative approval?,Was the coronavirus relief bill introduced and passed before the coronavirus pandemic?
Did Scott Fisher try to expand Obamacare in Texas?,Did Fisher vote for an official resolution forcing 1 million Texans into Obamacare?,Did Fisher support expanding Obamacare in Texas?,Does Fisher agree with the premise that Obamacare is required in most states?,Was Fisher supportive of any other measures in Texas?
Did Thomas get his nomination from a president from the same party?,Did the Senate confirm Thomas by a president from that same party?,Do all of the current Supreme Court Justices have this status?,Did Thomas ever serve on any other US courts?,Are these justices generally ruled by one party?,Are current justices appointed by any different parties than former justices?
Is there evidence that 82% of Republicans think universal background checks should be the norm?,Do those Republicans support universal background checks?,Is it reasonable to expect Republicans to support universal background checks?,Are there any credible numbers supporting universal background checks?,Is it reasonable to expect Republicans to support universal background checks?,Do any researchers believe this is an accurate statement?
Did Boris Johnson ban a traditional Burmese gong for the people of Myanmar after the military coup?,Did Johnson support Myanmar's people in Burma after the coup?,Did Johnson perform a ceremony in support of the people of Myanmar?,Did Johnson's ban indicate support for Myanmar's people?
Are sex sessions 21 times a month recommended for people to prevent prostate cancer?,What are some good reasons for using sex?,Does having sex regularly help prevent prostate cancer?,Is there any evidence of men using sex more than 21 times a month to avoid prostate cancer?
Do any government agencies have a system that audits employee credentials?,Does the number of instances of errors in the federal system of verification per year range from 50 percent to in excess of 80 percent?,Does the federal system of verification use a federal method of credential verification?,Is the number of instances of errors in the federal system of verification high?
Did 45% of CDC and FDA employees refuse to take the COVID-19 vaccine?,Did the FDA have employees refuse to take the COVID-19 vaccine?,Did Anthony Fauci say 40-50% of CDC and FDA employees refuse to take the COVID-19 vaccine?,Is the COVID-19 vaccine given to unvaccinated recipients?
Did the leader of the protests organize 2023 protests?,Was the leader of the protests arrested?,Was the leader arrested by police?,Was the protest leader taken away by police?,Do protests often result in arrests of protest leaders?,Was there any proof of arrest of protest leaders?,Was this incident related to an election?
Is there evidence that the Republicans have had all of the good ideas since 1992?,Did Obama ever cite any proof of this claim?,Did Obama mention the Republicans have all the good ideas since 1992?,Is there evidence that the Republicans have all the good ideas since 1992?,Did Obama ever have these statements?
Does this photo have a title of FIFA 2022?,Did this image come before the 2014 FIFA 2022 opening ceremony?,Did this image of fireworks follow the 2014 FIFA 2022 opening ceremony?,Does this image of fireworks coincide with the 2014 FIFA 2022 opening ceremony?,Does this image of fireworks coincide with the 2014 FIFA 2022 opening ceremony?
Did Danish researchers find protection against Omicron turned negative after the second dose?,Was there no evidence that protection against Omicron turned negative after the second dose?,Does Omicron turn negative after the second dose?,Is there some evidence that protection against Omicron turned negative after the second dose?
Did the new document reveal that Pfizer's Covid-19 vaccine has just 12% efficacy?,Can you name other vaccines with 12% efficacy?,Does the new document say the vaccine is more reliable than the other vaccines?,Does the vaccine have good health effects?,Does the vaccine have some side effects?
Do two men have defacing mosque with a poppy?,Did two of them receive prison time?,Did two men get fines for defacing memorials with poppies?,Does the amount of time each person spent in prison differ by any of these other events?,Does each event in question constitute a violation of the First Amendment?
Did a Russian astronaut have a space suit for Russia's astronauts to wear to the International Space Station?,Did one of the Russian astronauts wear a yellow suit with blue details while they arrived at the International Space Station?,Did any of the Russian astronauts wear suits with blue details while they arrived at the International Space Station?
Was there a mayor’s race in Austin 1973?,Did more Austinites vote in the 1973 election than in the most recent election?,Was there a mayor’s race in Austin 1973?,Are there any more Austinites who voted in the 1973 election than in the most recent election?,Did the most recent election of mayor in Austin have a higher turnout than the 1973 election?
"Did this photo show a joint rally organized by the Congress and left parties in Kolkata on February 28, 2021?",Did this photo include other political parties in Kolkata?,Is there any evidence to suggest the two parties endorsed each other?,"Was this photo released prior to the February 28, 2021 election?"
"Did more than 100,000 people wait for public housing in Houston?",Did people who are in the country illegally take their spaces?,Was there any data about people arriving illegally in Houston?,Was there any data about people arriving illegally in Houston?,Did most people cited in this story arrive in the United States legally?
Was the amount of the anonymous donor's contribution for the protesters an amount greater than $2.5 million?,Did the amount of the anonymous donor's contribution exceed the maximum allowed by law?,Did protesters have a chance to appeal the funding decision?,Did protesters request that the money be used for a legal purpose?
Did Trump sign the 1952 McCarthy law?,Did Trump resign the 1952 McCarthy-era law?,Is Trump considered to have signed the 1952 McCarthy law?,Has Trump rescinded the 1952 McCarthy law?,Did Trump sign the 1952 McCarthy-era law before the 2018 election?,Did Trump resign the 1952 McCarthy-era law before the 2019 election?
Did Walker give Wisconsin job creation money to his cronies?,Did Walker get $570 million in job development incentives for his campaign?,"Did Walker give 570,000 dollars to corporations?",Are there any other things Walker gave in order to get the money?,Did Walker give these cronies any bonuses or other forms of payment?
Did there double the number of Border Patrol agents in 2004?,Is there more Border Patrol agent than in 2004?,Did Border Patrol agents decrease from 2004 to 2010?,Does Border patrol now have more agents than in 2004?,Are there more agents currently than in 2004?,Is there a shortage of Border Patrol agents?
Did this footage show the last moments of the flight?,Was this flight on an over-capacity Boeing 737?,Was this flight scheduled to land on a runway?,Was this flight fully booked?,Have this data planes been involved in any incidents?,Did this flight have any significant delays?,Did this flight crash at all?
Did 200 policemen resign?,Did the protest result in violence?,Was there an arrest of farmers?,Is this a protest of police?,Is the protest of the police?,Are policemen on strike in Delhi?,Does the police union have a spokesperson?,Has the protest started in a foreign country?
Was this a true image of a man whose wife and children were killed?,Was this the entire car involved in the car accident?,Was the car insured?,Did this man have any pets?,Was this family's home in good shape?,Did this car model have an engine built for a car?
"Did Burisma admit to paying Biden $900,000. Did this sum make its way into Biden's wallet?",Is the sum known for the alleged pay?,Did this figure increase during Biden's term?,Has Biden rescinded this payment?,Has Biden ever said this payment was made despite his being fired as president?
Is this amount of power the country produced?,Did the country achieve a peak power?,Does this amount of power equal a peak level power?,Was this power generated in December 2017?,Is this power produced for a high peak energy consumption level?,Are there any other statistics regarding this data?,Are the numbers for this data accurate?
Does the tech sector contribute to more than one quarter of Austin's economy?,Are there any other sources of the tech sector contributing to the Austin economy?,Did this report claim that the tech sector now controls 50% of the economy?,Did this report have any data on the number of people employed in this sector?,Does the tech sector dominate the jobs in Austin?
Did Crist's tuition increases make it harder for Florida residents to afford college?,Were tuition increases similar in other states?,Were student debt costs significantly higher than normal costs due to tuition increases?,Are there any other factors contributing to tuition increases?,Is there any evidence Crist enacted tuition increases to help Florida students?
Do the provisions of HB 194 address the issue of incorrect precincts?,Are these issues included in the HB 194 final bill?,Are these problems not resolved by the provisions of HB 194?,Are HB 194 provisions in the final bill effective for providing a solution to incorrect precinct issues?
Was this the first test of the Trump administration?,Is it the first time the U.S. has done these tests?,Is this the first time South Korea has done this kind of test?,Did Trump say that the US has done more tests in eight days than South Korea in eight weeks?,Was this the first time the U.S. conducted these tests?
Can chloroquine be used to treat a current case of coronavirus?,Has Dr Fauci been known for 15 years that hydroxy chloroquine will not only treat a current case of coronavirus but prevent future cases?,Did Fauci develop chloroquine or hydroxy chloroquine to treat a recent coronavirus case?
Did Senate Bill 5 impact nursing?,Was it made easier for nurses to provide quality care?,Is the proposed bill intended to affect the level of care delivered by nurses?,Has the intent of the proposal been determined by the governor?,Is there any evidence to suggest that Senate Bill 5 is making it harder for nurses to deliver the quality care?
Did the woman auction her virginity to the highest bidder?,Was the woman bidding for her virginity?,Is the woman currently receiving sex change?,Was the woman still in Georgia?,Did the woman sell her virginity?,Was the man the highest bidder?,Did the woman receive sex change?
Did any children die in custody of the Border Patrol in the Obama administration?,Are there any other documented instances of children death in custody of the Border Patrol?,Does the report mention the year that 18 children died while in custody of the Border Patrol?,Is there any other documentary evidence that supports the report that some children died in custody of the Border Patrol in the Obama Administration?
"Have 5,000 Americans or civilians died in Iraq or Afghanistan?",Has any country in the world lost 5000?,Are any nations making any effort to do a comprehensive report on how the people's wars in Iraq and Afghanistan have impacted them?,Are there any statistics on the number of civilian deaths in these countries?
Did John F. Kennedy assassinate an American president?,Was John F. Kennedy the assassin that killed Americans?,Did any of this make American servicemen and women more deadly than servicemen and women who were killed in all wars?,Did any Americans die from gunfire within their own country?,Did any Americans die in all wars?,Did any US servicemen and women die in all wars?,Did any US servicemen and women die in all wars?
Are Tesla cars being used for transporting delegates to the COP26?,Is there an incentive for Tesla to use these cars?,Does COP26 have enough charging points for Tesla vehicles?,Does COP26 need any further charging points for Tesla vehicles?,Is a diesel generator being used for charging Tesla vehicles?
Did Ted Cruz earn $4.5 Million during his tenure as Senator?,Did Ted Cruz make more money on average compared to all of his other colleagues?,Did Ted Cruz earn more money than his other colleagues in total during his tenure in the Senate?,Was Ted Cruz paid less than his other colleagues for his tenure in the Senate?
Did Jeff Vanderbeek freeze monies during the toughest years?,Did Jeff Vanderbeek refuse to give the charitable dollars that he was required to?,Did Jeff Vanderbeek not refuse to give the charitable dollars that he was required to give by the contract?,. Does Vanderbeek still have a contract with the Devils?
Did the DEA classify kratom as a Schedule I substance as of 30 September 2016?,Are kratoms also classified as Schedule I?,Is there any confirmation that kratom has been classed as Schedule I substance as of 30 September 2016?,Does the DEA have an overall classification of kratom?
Are these photos of Chinese soldiers killed in the Galwan clash with India?,Have these photographs been viewed by others in public?,Have these photos been published?,Has this footage been publicly released?,Was this footage distributed publicly?,Are there any other photos of this content?,Has this information been shared to all on social media?
Did he win 900+ cases in the AFP?,Are there any other records about Marcos' record in AFP?,Did Marcos win 900+ cases in the AFP?,Are any statistics about Marcos' record in AFP publicized?,Did Marcos win over 90+ cases for the AFP?
Did Boebert and Gaetz appear in the Standing ovation for Ukrainian President Volodymyr Zelenskyy at the US Capitol?,Was Zelenskyy's speech at the U.S. Capitol a historic speech?,Was the United States's Capitol a standing ovation?
Has Lebanon ever borrowed on food security?,Does Lebanon have any food security funding to date?,Are the lebanon loans to food security a regular activity?,Has Lebanon taken any food security loans?,Have the lebanons repaid any food security loan?,Do the lebanons owe a lone loan to a U.S. based food security fund?,Has Lebanon repaid any food security loan?
Is the Biden-Harris administration proposing any illegal immigration money?,Is this money available for illegal immigrants?,Does this money include money to other immigrants?,Is there an estimated cost of this money?,Has the Biden-Harris administration attempted to pass legislation with this amount of money for illegal immigrants?
Did Closed Captioning become available to the Oscars in 2021?,Did Closed Captioning exist at the Academy Award ceremony until 2020?,Did Closed Captioning start to be available in the Oscars in 2021?,Was Closed Captioning available before 2021?,Was Closed Captioning available in the Oscars in 2021?
How would this bill affect their family budget?,Will they see their tax bill increase as a result of this bill?,Will 90% of Americans receive an increase in taxes due to the bill?,Will 98% of people see their income tax rates go down as a result of the bill?,Will 90% of American taxpayers experience an increase in taxes due to this bill?
Was there a million people apprehended at the border in 2014?,Does this estimate imply another 3 million people entered illegally this year?,Has this number changed?,Does this estimate include all individuals caught at the border?,Is this estimate accurate?,Can we say for certain that 3 million people entered illegally in 2014?
Did the drug prices decline in 2018?,Did Americans save $26 Billion on prescription drugs in 2018?,Can you give us the information about what drugs had the lowest prices?,Did the drugs that had the lowest prices last a long time?,Did the drug prices drop in 2018 for the first time in nearly half a century?
Are more countries unequal than the United States?,Do any countries have a greater percentage of wealth distribution?,Are all countries more unequal than the United States?,Has any country experienced a reduction in inequality that is equal to the United States?,Is there any country that has a greater percentage of wealth distribution than the United States?
Did the COVID vaccines develop quickly?,Was the COVID vaccine developed by a quick development time?,Did the COVID vaccines not receive sufficient time to develop in a relatively short amount of time?,Were the COVID vaccines produced quickly?,Are COVID vaccines more effective for preventing HIV infection than other vaccines?
Do these payments by Trump entail the termination of a sexual partner?,Did Trump pay for abortions or to sign non disclosure agreements between his sexual partners?,Does Trump have any past sexual partners that he has paid to obtain abortions?,Did Trump pay for sexual partners to obtain abortions?,Did Trump pay sexual partners to obtain abortions?
Was it true Donald Trump is getting over 600.000 sign ups in one day for American Party?,Is there any evidence Trump is getting over 600.000 sign ups in one day?,Is there any evidence Donald Trump has getting over 600.000 sign ups in one day?,Did Donald Trump ever raise funds for the American Party?
Did Luxembourg receive the most benefit from joining the EU?,Has Luxembourg regained any benefits from joining the EU?,Are Luxembourg's benefits from joining the EU the most significant?,Is Luxembourg's benefit from membership the most significant?,Is Luxembourg's benefit from membership the most significant?,Have Luxembourg's benefits from membership been increased over time?
Does part of the Permian Basin have enough oil to fuel America for 200 years?,Is there a total supply of oil in the Permian Basin?,Is there a certain amount of oil in the Permian Basin?,Is the amount of oil in the Permian Basin sufficient for America for 200 years?
Did the poll run through 1 / 12 of the vote count?,Did the poll take into account the percentage of voting from females?,Was the poll conducted using a consolidated data system?,Was the poll conducted on both genders?,Did a poll by News 24 imply that the BSP would win the election?
Do the claims of the meme have any substantiation?,Is the meme a reliable source for evidence about police shooting?,Is the meme used in a malicious context to reinforce the narrative of police shooting?,Did the meme have a significant effect on the narrative in general?,Do all of the claims presented in this meme come from credible sources?
Was this a photograph of the parade in Russia in 2007?,Did this take place in the summer of 2007?,Did this photo capture a human walking?,Did this picture take place in a foreign country?,Did this photo capture a man walking with some others in a group of children?,Did this photo capture the life or death of this person?
Did Musk back out of this $44B deal?,Does this suspension mean that Musk backed out of the deal?,Does this suspension mean that Tesla was in bankruptcy?,Is this suspension related to the Tesla filing for bankruptcy?,Can this suspension be used as evidence for any bankruptcy claims?,Can this suspension be used as evidence for any bankruptcy claims?
Did this show actually prove WHO's work with COVID-19?,Did this show support this concept?,Was the show based on conspiracy theories?,Are these two subjects the most reliable sources of evidence in regards to this project?,Was the purpose of this conspiracy theory show intended to support the vaccine as a cure?
Did Feingold support judges who voted to deny individual Second Amendment rights?,"Did Feingold promise to protect those rights, but that is not what his record shows?",Did Feingold support judges who voted to deny individual Second Amendment rights?,Did Feingold support judges who voted to deny individual Second Amendment rights in his Senate career?,Did Feingold support judges who voted to deny individual Second Amendment rights?
Did a survey find 38% of Americans won't drink Corona beer over Coronavirus concerns?,Was there anything confirming these statistics?,Does any person have a preference on which beer to drink?,Do people who drink more Corona drink it more often?,Did Corona beer cause the deaths of 4 people?,Have studies found any evidence linking alcohol to Coronavirus?
Did the officer assist the woman down stairs afterward?,Did the riot event take place at the U.S. Capitol?,Did this incident occur prior to 2021?,Did the video contain a live video of this event?,Was the video from this event produced by a third party?,Can you provide more info about this incident?
Did Mexican authorities torture U.S. Marine?,Did U.S. Marine cross the border without his permission?,Did Mexican authorities tie U.S. Marine to a bed for nine months in 2014?,Did Mexican authorities torture U.S. Marine in 2014?,Does U.S. Marine believe Mexican authorities tortured U.S. Marine?
Did the 4255 ballots go to Biden?,"Did 3,390 votes go to Biden?",Were those voting in Fulton County more likely to have been scanned multiple times?,Did this vote go to Biden?,Was the amount of ballots scanned multiple times equal to the number of ballots in the entire county?
Did the pipeline only get 8% of its funding secured?,Did the pipeline secure most of its funding?,Was the pipeline on track to complete?,Did the pipeline receive the funding requested for in all?,Are there other pipelines with funding for larger projects?,Are there any pipelines in the pipeline's route that received the remaining funds?
Was the image printed in 1915?,Is the image of the 1915 pamphlet an authentic pamphlet?,Is the 1915 pamphlet a real pamphlet?,Is the image a fake?,"Considering this is a 1915 pamphlet, is this an authentic pamphlet or something fabricated?"
Did Democrats spend 4 years refusing to acknowledge Trump’s 2016 victory?,Did Democrats refuse to acknowledge Trump’s 2016 victory during this time frame?,Did Democrats spend 4 years refusing to acknowledge Trump’s 2016 victory?,Did the Democrats ever attempt to accept Trump’s 2016 victory?,Did the Democrats ever try to accept Trump’s 2016 victory?
Was the public debt in Nigeria at a little over $60 billion when President Buhari took over?,Was it at a significant level?,Was there any unforeseen effects to this debt?,br>br>Obama racked up $61 billion in debt after he took over government.?
Does the U.S. not have sufficient funds to pull out of Iraq immediately?,Does the U.S. lack enough money to remove troops from Iraq currently?,"Would starting today give the U.S. enough time to get 160,000 troops physically out of Iraq?",Would this time be needed to finish off the U.S.?
Do people in India eat cucumbers daily?,Is there evidence cucumber can reduce lung cancer risk?,Are people who eat cucumber on a daily basis prone to lung cancer?,Does consuming cucumber on a daily basis help with lung cancer?,Does having a cucumber on a daily basis contribute to lung cancer risk?
Did Blake ever rape a child?,Is Blake considered to be a suspect in this murder?,Is Blake charged with sexual assault?,Was Blake killed?,Is Blake considered to be a suspect in this murder?,Is Blake charged with rape?,Is Blake believed to be a suspect in this murder?
Did McCain win more votes for president in Cuyahoga County in the 2008 general election than he did in seven states?,Did McCain win more votes for president in Cuyahoga County than he did in seven states in the 2008 general election?,Does McCain have higher approval ratings in Cuyahoga County than most other states?
Was Monbiot able to catch COVID-19 after he was given boosters?,Did Monbiot imply he caught COVID-19 23 times?,Did Monbiot appear in a TV documentary in promoting COVID-19?,Did Monbiot claim to have caught COVID-19 23 times?,Was Monbiot able to catch COVID-19 23 times?
Is there evidence this art installation is authentic?,Was the artwork associated with any event in May 2023?,Did the art installation have any associated controversy?,"Is this artwork a part of the ""Flag for Art and Culture""?",Is this artwork re-visited or updated?,Does this art installation exist in any other cities?
Is there evidence that this list of Communist Rules For Revolution was written in 1919?,Is this list of Communist Rules For Revolution known?,Is there evidence that this list of Communist Rules For Revolution was written after the First World War?,Is there evidence that this list of Communist Rules For Revolution was written between 1916 and 1919?
Did Malia Obama have 24 classmates expelled for praying on campus?,Did Malia Obama have any students expelled for praying on campus?,Did all of these students pray on campus?,Does Malia Obama have any kids in school?,Did Malia Obama participate in prayer services on campus?,Did the school allow Malia Obama to pray on campus?
Did car washing at home use 80% more water?,Is washing cars at home more convenient than a car wash?,Is washing cars at home an environmentally friendly option?,Is the water used at a car wash comparable to the water used in a car wash?,Is there research to show that car wash use does not compare to water used at home?,Is there any evidence that car wash water use is cheaper than water used at a car wash?
Did the ceremony on April 19 have media coverage?,Did the ceremony focus on the birth of Christ?,Did the ceremony take place in San Jose del Monte?,"Did the ceremony follow the tradition of bringing parents and children to the hospital in rural San Jose del Monte, Bulacan?",Did the ceremony take place in a large venue?,Did Marcos personally attend the ceremony?
Did pirates use an eye patch to improve night vision?,Was the eye patch worn by the pirates on a consistent basis?,Was it common for pirates to cover one eye with an eye patch?,Does it make any sense for someone to wear an eye patch?,Is there a reason for an eye patch not being worn by the pirates?
Did the GAO estimate that Obamacare would add to the deficit?,Will the deficit continue to increase over time?,Will the GAO estimate that Obamacare will reduce revenue?,Are the projected revenues already financed by other sources?,Will the GAO estimate that Obamacare will cut government spending?,Will the GAO estimate that Obamacare will reduce spending?
Can anyone add a person to a group?,Is this change required by any app?,Does this change impact privacy settings by default on WhatsApp?,Is this change permanent?,Do this changes affect all apps?,Has anyone claimed this change is a security infringement?,Have previous versions of WhatsApp changed privacy settings this way?
"Do the students of Orange County, Florida have to have a grade below 50?",Is this change unconstitutional?,Has it caused an increase in the number of students failing this grade?,Has any change made by this school board improved student grades?,"Did the Orange County, Florida school board make this grade unconstitutional?"
Did the Senate vote on impeachment?,Is the first term nullified if impeachment fails?,Is Trump eligible for a second term?,Is Trump's potential second term less than two?,Is impeachment required to run a second term?,Do lawmakers plan to vote on impeachment?
Is there an amnesty measure involving the survey?,Were the people surveyed promised amnesty?,Is there any information to suggest that these were people attempting to illegally cross the border?,Is there any evidence that this is the case?,Is there evidence that these people are a significant portion of the illegal immigration wave?
Does McAuliffe have a record of going to an economic growth?,Did McAuliffe change his position on unemployment?,Did McAuliffe increase taxes on the middle class?,Did McAuliffe take action to reduce unemployment in rural areas?,Would McAuliffe continue to reduce unemployment?
Is this leader a representative of Assam?,Is this leader involved in any political activity in Assam?,Are these arms intended to kill non believers?,Are these weapons in place to attack non believers?,Is this leader involved in any criminal activity in Assam?,Is this leader currently receiving treatment at the ICU?,Is this leader under supervision?
Would the CBO say that health care reform will cost $11.8 trillion?,"Will the CBO say that the CBO originally projected the cost at $1,900 billion?",Would the CBO have predicted the projected cost of health care reform to be far greater than the projected amount?,Would the CBO say that the cost of health care reform would be far greater than the projected amount?
"Did Russian troops enter Izium, Ukraine during March 9?",Did Russian forces enter the city in early April?,Did Russian troops enter the city at this time?,Did Russian forces enter Izium until a week later?,Did Russian forces enter Izium before or after these markers?,Did these markers have Russian identifying information?
Did McCain say he stood with George Bush 95 percent of the time?,Did McCain say he stood with Bush 95 percent of the time?,Did McCain say that Bush had supported McCain 95 percent of the time?,Was McCain supportive of the policies of Bush based on these factors?,Did McCain say he has supported the policies of Bush based on these factors?
Did the millers receive over KSh1.7 billion?,Did the millers receive any other funds?,Did the millers receive funds to begin with?,Did the millers receive funding in the early part of this year?,Did the millers receive funding in the early part of this year?,Did the millers receive funding to begin with?,Did the millers receive funding in the early part of this year?
"Has Gillum presided over ""the highest crime in Florida four years running?",""" Has Gillum presided over ""the highest crime in Florida four years running?",""" What do we know about Gillum's record on crime?",Has Gillum presided over crimes four years running?,Is Gillum being criticized for crimes?
Did the Times of India publication in 2016 report about 5G spectrum auctions suffering a record loss of 2.8 crore?,Was there any alleged revenue loss due to the 5G spectrum auctions?,Did this article focus on specific 5G spectrum auctions?,Did this article have a specific title?
Is there a specific place where these refugees traveled from?,Did they travel in a car?,Did the refugees travel in an RV?,Did they travel by train?,. Did the refugees travel by bus?,Did any refugees visit the United States on a bus?,Would the caravan have stopped at airports in the US?
Did more inmates on death row die of natural causes in 2000 vs. inmates executed?,Did the death penalty increase the number of natural causes death inmates on death row in 2000 vs. inmates executed in 2000?,Is there evidence that the increase in natural cause death inmates on death row has surpassed the increase in inmates executed in 2000 vs. inmates executed in 2000?
"Is there evidence that families with employer-based insurance rates increased their premiums by more than $4,300?",Is this a general statement?,Can you provide a specific example?,Is this a general statement?,Do you know whether or not the individual cost of a personal policy has increased with employer-based insurance?
Did Fifa sportmen die in diesem Jahr plötzlich zusammenbrechen 183 times?,Did all the sudden deaths occur in a single year?,Did most deaths occur in a single year?,Was the number of sudden deaths for Fifa sportmen per year the same as the rate for the general population?
Did this refugee arrive by way of Obama-era asylum programs?,Is there new information about this person?,Have we found that this person will not leave the US or return to Syria?,Will this person return to Syria?,Did this person travel abroad?,Would this person likely want asylum?,Have we found any other information that this person is likely arriving via Obama-era asylum programs?
Did Trump send more troops to the Middle East than any other President?,Will Trump send troops to countries that haven't already been invaded by the US military?,Are Trump's troops in the Middle East on a par with any other military?,Is this US military trying to sway congressional support for Trump by sending large numbers of troops to these countries?,Does this administration have military advisors from outside the White House?
Is Brown a member of a Democratic party?,Was Brown involved in a lawsuit on the issue of his pay?,Was the claim that Brown was part of a lawsuit about his pay accurate?,Did Brown vote for this pay raise a minimum of six times in recent years?,Has Brown ever sued anyone?
Are we currently sending $1 billion to Russia per day?,Are we currently sending this money to Canada?,Are there any other energy-related issues that would be exacerbated by this?,Would any other countries be better off being more energy-efficient?,Is this energy-saving measure regressive?,Did Clinton agree with this assertion?,Is there any evidence to suggest that Russia's energy-intensive policy is unaffordable?
Did the 13 year-old have a Covid-19 vaccination?,Did the 13 year-old have a Covid-19 vaccination at a hospital?,Did the 13 year-old receive treatment at the hospital?,Was the 13 year-old's hospitalization in Halifax during the Covid-19 vaccination?
Is it accurate to say that North Carolina would save tens of millions if it stopped prosecuting 16 year olds as adults?,Is there evidence that it would save tens of millions if North Carolina stopped prosecuting 16 year olds as adults?,Does this estimate support the report's claim that NC would save tens of millions if it stopped prosecuting 16 year olds as adults?
Is Trump proposing tax cuts for millionaires and corporations?,Will Trump's tax cut cuts actually reduce the tax burden on wealthy individuals?,Is Trump proposing tax cuts for both wealthy individuals and corporations?,Does Trump plan tax cuts for both wealthy individuals and corporations?,Does Trump plan tax cuts for both wealthy individuals and corporations?
Did the clip of puppies under the rubble date after 2023 Turkey earthquake?,Did the clip of puppies under the rubble date after the 2023 Turkey earthquake?,Did the clip of puppies under the rubble date before the 2023 Turkey earthquake?,Was there more than one clip of puppies under the rubble?
Was Kaleem jailed and fined by UP government?,Did the rickshaw-puller bring anti-CAA protesters to rally?,Did the government arrest or detain Kaleem?,Were the rally participants protesting a different law?,Was a police officer involved in the arrest or detainment of Kaleem?
Did 1.5 million people move into Georgia during the past censuses?,"Is the total amount of people that moved into Georgia between the previous censuses a majority of which are white, African-American, Latino, or Asian-American?","Does the amount of the population in Georgia represent a majority of people that are African-American, Latino, or Asian-American?","Did the majority of the population in Georgia consider themselves, African-American, Latino, or Asian-American?"
Did the two teenagers shoot and kill a white infant for the fun of it?,Did they shoot and kill the baby for their own amusement?,Did the murder of the baby result in any negative effects on the society?,Is there evidence that these two teenagers are racist?,Would it be considered 'racist' to shoot a baby for the fun of it?
Was the video of monster fish exchanging an eel meal?,Is the monster fish food edible?,Does the video show the monster fish squirming at the eel?,Does the video show a large number of monster fish?,Is the video in a dark area?,Is there any other disturbing information about the video?
Is the right to get Rs 1.20 lakhs in total from the Ministry of Labour and Employment?,Is there a limit on the maximum payout of Rs 1.20 lakh from the Ministry of Labour and Employment?,Does every worker receive this amount from the Ministry of Labour and Employment?,Is the maximum amount that workers may receive from the Ministry of Labour and Employment?
"Are there 20,000 bikers in the video?",Is the six year old cancer patient being cheered up?,Did the bikers in the video have any other objectives?,Has the video been distributed on any social media site?,Is there evidence that this is the reason for the rally?,Is this an isolated incident?
Would a 150 dollar coupon be given per family?,Will the coupon be available for a period of time?,Are Costco products eligible for this promotion?,Will coupons be given to customers?,Do Costco products have any restrictions?,Are the coupons limited to Costco products?,Will the coupons be available in the store?
Did this pandemic involve the 1918 Spanish flu pandemic?,Did this family have a cat?,Was this family wearing masks?,Did this family and cat have any other family members?,Do we know that this family has children?,Are there any other health risks associated with the pandemic?,Did this family and cat have other pets?
Will the government collect over 300 data elements of my child's child's personal data?,Will the government collect data elements of my personal information?,Is this data collection in a government - run setting?,Will the government collect a variety of data elements from a child's personal information?
Is this video showing a temple in flood-hit Bangladesh in June 2022?,Is this video showing a temple in flood-hit Bangladesh in June 2022?,Was there a temple in flood-hit Bangladesh in June 2022?,"if so, did flood-hit Bangladesh experience flooding?"
Would any of Clinton's campaign proposals pay for this new spending amount?,Would any of Clinton's proposals pay for this new spending amount after this election?,Is there any evidence in this situation that the new spending will come from Clinton's campaign proposals?,Is there sufficient evidence to suggest that this is the case in this scenario?
Did Lee Majors die and donate $6 million to Donald Trump?,Did Lee Majors die and leave $6 million to Donald Trump?,Did Lee Majors give this amount to Donald Trump?,. Was there any other individuals who made these statements?,. Were any of these individuals involved in Donald Trump's campaign?
Does this quote from Trump explicitly say the president can run 2 more times if he is impeached in the House?,Can Trump run 2 more times under this statement?,Does Trump's claim that he can run 2 more times if he is impeached in the House only say when he can run 2 more times.?
Did Nitish Kumar's party terminate ties with BJP after resigning?,Did the poster say 'Nitish belongs to all'?,Did the poster say 'Nitish belongs to all' before Nitish Kumar's resignation?,Did the poster say 'Nitish belongs to all' after Nitish Kumar's resignation?
Would a National Football League lockout cost Atlanta jobs and revenue?,Would Atlanta lose millions of dollars in revenue because of a lockout?,Is it probable that a lockout will cost Atlanta more than $160 million?,Is Atlanta in the process of determining if a lockout is a good idea?
Does Sudha Murthy sell vegetables in front of Venkateshwara temple annually?,Is Sudha Murthy in the Infosys Foundation?,Is this way of selling vegetables a symbol of vanishment?,Is this method of selling vegetables used to vanish the ahankar?
Does West Virginia have the lowest workforce participation rate in the nation?,Is the national average for the national average higher than 52%?,Is 52% of the workforce in West Virginia lower than the national average?,Do all the states have the lowest workforce participation rate?,Are there any other states that have the lowest workforce participation rate?
Was this illegal prior to the law?,Did this new law prevent this from happening?,Did this new law make this illegal?,Is this law still in effect in the present state of New Zealand?,Is this law still in effect in the current state of New Zealand?,Is this law still in effect in this state of New Zealand?
Did Walker turn a $1 billion surplus into a $2.2 billion budget deficit?,Did Walker turn a $1 billion surplus into a $2.2 billion budget deficit?,Did the $2 billion deficit happen in a state that had a surplus?,Did Scott Walker turn the $2 billion deficit into a $2.2 billion budget deficit?,Did Walker's campaign say he made a $2 billion budget deficit for the state?
Was the 14-year-old Muslim boy beaten up?,Did he commit acts in this area?,Was this boy shot at?,Did he have his identity provided on this article?,Did any other children commit acts in this area?,Was this boy attacked?,Did this victim receive any injuries?,Were any witnesses available to help support this article?
Did Sabina Bano take a photo of herself posing topless?,Was Bano's picture taken after protests?,Did Bano pose topless during protests?,Was this the image that Bano took?,Was Bano posing topless?,Have there been any protests since these protests?
Is there a video that shows alleged treasure trove found at the residence of Congress Minister DK Shivakumars aide?,Did DK Shivakumars aide have access to the trove?,Does this trove belong to a national treasure trove?,Does DK Shivakumar's aide have access to the trove?
Did California store owner price all of his items at 961.51?,Did shop owner order all his items at that price?,Did shop owner order all items at this price to prosecute thieves?,Did shop owner recoup all of the money of his store?,Did shop owner file a report with the state in regards to the theft?
Did the BBC report Quaden Bayles' suicide in February 2020?,Did any of the homicide suspects commit suicide in the first week of the decade?,Did this suicide occur in the 4th year of the century?,Did this suicide happen after being incarcerated in the UK?,Did this suicide occur in the 18th century?
Are Thai children allowed to clap for Thai PM Prayut?,Did the Thai children give Prayut a salute?,Is it clear that this gesture is a protest?,Is it clear that the gesture is protesting?,Does this salute look like a gesture or a protest?
Has the majority of Austin City Council meetings since January 2015 lasted past 10 p.m.?,Have many of these meetings gone past midnight?,Does the majority of these meetings remain until midnight?,Have these meetings had a positive impact on the city?,Have these meetings resulted in large numbers of city staff cutting their hours?
Did Trump say hundreds' of governors are calling him?,Did Trump cite any figures in relation to the number of governors calling him?,Did Trump claim hundreds' of governors are calling him?,Does Trump seem to indicate a large number of governors have called Trump?
Do 920 women lose their unborn babies after getting vaccinated?,What vaccine caused this disease?,Have vaccines caused 920 deaths of unborn babies?,Was this study conducted in US?,Did the authors study vaccines to reduce maternity risks?,Were vaccines associated with mortality for mothers with a healthy baby?
Would paying for Romney's tax cuts requier large tax increases?,"Would paying for Romney's tax cuts require large tax increases on families making $100,000 to $200,000. Is it true that Feldstein and Rosen say this?","Would this increase be disproportionate to families making between $100,000 and $200,000. Is this the total impact of these two economists?"
Was Julian Assange kidnapped from the Ecuadorean Embassy in London?,Did the Ecuadorian Embassy in London host Julian Assange?,Did Julian Assange be murdered?,Is it true that Julian Assange was kidnapped from the Ecuadorian Embassy in London?
Did a person die during this protest?,Did the attack happen in the Portland area?,Did this person die in the assault?,Does this person claim the alleged assault in public?,Was this person attacked in the Portland city limits?,Did this person claim this event occurred in the Portland area?,Did this person die from injuries?
"Did King Elizabeth II say President Trump is an ""amazing person"" with a ""good heart"" during a June 2019 interview?",Did the interview in question take place in the same country where Trump was living?,Is there evidence that Trump was on the same plane as Queen Elizabeth in the interview?
Would the vaccination that increases mortality by 33% reduce the death rate of the virus by 0.06?,Is the vaccine that increases mortality by 33% safe?,Are vaccines with high mortality rates more safe than vaccines with low mortality rates?,Are there other vaccines that increase mortality rates?,Was the vaccine with a 33% death rate approved by the FDA?
Did a NBC producer say that 60% of people in this stadium will be dead within 10 days?,Did the NBC producer know who it was talking to?,Were there witnesses to this incident?,Was the NBC producer arrested?,Did the NBC producer say that in public?,Was the NBC producer convicted of the offence?
Did Time magazine issue the front cover of Time magazine about five-time Kenyan presidential candidate Raila Odinga?,"Did the front cover of Time magazine reveal that Odinga's hopes for a presidency were ""done""?",Does Odinga have the option of submitting a new presidential bid if elected?,"Did Time magazine release a front cover about Odinga on June 8, 2017?"
Is it true that the video features a woman and grandson?,Is the man in the video in a public place?,Are there any other videos showing performers with their grandchildren?,Is this woman in a public place?,Is there another video showing this woman and grandson performing with others?
Did the Department of Social Welfare distribute this amount of aid to Filipinos?,Did the Department of Social Welfare distribute this amount of aid to Filipinos?,Was this number distributed to specific groups?,Will this amount of aid be distributed to individuals based on the population of their residence?,Are these recipients unable to afford this amount of aid?
"Was Austin City Council's small homestead property tax exemption of $5,000 applied equally to everyone?",Were the elderly and disabled included in the exemption?,Was the Austin City Council's small homestead property tax exemption equal to all of the community?,Were the elderly and disabled included in the exemption?,Were there a number of exemptions included in the Austin City Council's small homestead property tax exemption?
Has Hutchison voted to raise the national debt ceiling?,Has Hutchison voted to raise the national debt ceiling?,Is Hutchison a Republican senator?,Is Hutchison a Republican senator?,Does Hutchison support raising the national debt ceiling?
Do these functions not exist in other cell phones?,Is the information on this list new to cell phones?,Is the information on this list helpful or not?,Does this list not list anything specific about cell phones?,Will this list be updated?,Will this list include the five most useful functions on cell phones?
Did the volcano on La Palma emit as much CO2 as Germany in the next 100 years?,Is the Volcano on La Palma part of a broader global warming problem?,Did the volcano on La Palma emit more CO2 than Germany in the next 100 years?,Was the increase in CO2 in the volcanic region due to the CO2 emissions?,Did the volcano on La Palma produce an increased amount of CO2 over 100 years?
Did Trump release JFK’s autopsy report?,Has Trump made clear that the report did not prove that there was one gunman who shot JFK?,Is there evidence that the report only said one gunman was behind the shooting of JFK?,Is there evidence that Trump released JFK’s autopsy report?
Did Obama become the most successful food stamp president in American history?,Did Obama get enough food stamps to support a larger number of Americans?,Did Obama accomplish any significant amount of his goals?,Did Obama's goals impact how many people on food stamps?,Are these people not all on food stamps?
Did Bill Clinton tell then-Attorney General Loretta Lynch that he killed Vince Foster in 2016?,Was Clinton related to Foster at this time?,"Did Lynch actually respond to Clinton's ""basic"" comments in 2016?",Did Clinton specifically admit to killing Foster?,Has any other alleged Clinton ties resulted in Foster's death?
Did Trump say he trusted the Taliban when he was elected president?,Did Trump's words set in motion an even earlier exit from Afghanistan?,Is it likely that Trump would be willing to leave Afghanistan sooner than 2020?,Did Trump make a statement to support a move away from Afghanistan by 2020?
Does this news release say any further details about Warners' plans for DVD and Blu-ray?,Does this news release also say Warner Bros. plans to reduce the quantity of Blu-ray sales in the future?,Was this information released by Warner Bros.?,Did Warner Bros. plan to phase out DVD sales?,Does this announcement suggest Warner Bros. plans to reduce number of Blu-ray disc sales?
Did the woman force her husband to eat his own genitals?,Did the woman force her husband to eat his own genitals?,Were the genitals of the alleged victim fresh or were they dried out and not stored in a fridge?,Was there any evidence of the incident pointing to the woman's guilt about the act?
Has this figure been documented in any other studies?,Have any other studies found this to be true?,Are more than a quarter of high school learner suicide attempts a result of self harm?,Does this increase only apply to those who are high school learners?,Is the study in question limited to students in high school?
"Did Tekashi 6IX9INE make the following statements: ""f-ck Brittney Griner""?",Did Tekashi 6IX9INE visit Russia in 2018?,Is the sentence attributed to him accurately?,"Did Tekashi 6IX9INE use the sentence ""f-ck Brittney Griner"" when making this statement?"
"Is Thompson saying that he wants to give $265,000 tax cut to millionaires and raise taxes on the middle class?","Is Thompson describing himself as being ""sponsor of a $265,000 tax cut""?","Is Thompson saying he wants to give a $265,000 tax cut to millionaires and raise taxes on the middle class?"
Is Nordstrom giving $200 gift cards to Facebook users for complete 3 short steps?,Is Nordstrom giving $100 gift cards to Facebook users for complete 3 short steps?,Are the gift cards restricted to any specific countries?,Are there any other conditions related to this offer?,Has any news about Nordstrom's offering in the past been reported outside of the article?
Do images posted by various accounts depict the date that Sony plans on publishing PlayStation group chats?,Are Sony and the PlayStation Group Chats a true and accurate depiction of this date?,Do these groups chats support the new feature?,Are these chats not based off of gaming?,Are these chats based upon entertainment?,Have PS group chats ever been published?
"Is it true that the number of children at the border will increase from 150,000 to 200,000?","Does the Obama administration estimate the number of children at the border will go from 150,000 to 200,000 next year?","Is the Obama administration predicting that the number of children at the border is going to increase from 150,000 to 200,000 next year?"
"By 2026, is 96% of the projected population growth in Northern Ireland to be represented by people over 65?",Is 96% of the projected population growth in Northern Ireland represented by people under 65?,Is 96% of the projected population growth in Northern Ireland represented by people under 65?,Is there any evidence of the projected population growth in Northern Ireland being disproportionately represented by people over 65?
Did there follow-up footage after the match?,Did any fans clash with each other after the match?,Did the Pakistan beat Afghanistan in the Asia Cup final?,Has there been any controversy following the fights?,Did Pakistan win any matches after this clash?,Is there any controversy surrounding the incident?,Was this match played on a Saturday?
Did Chipman pose before the ruins of the branch Davidian compound in 1993?,Did Chipman pose outside of the branch Davidian compound in 1993?,Did Chipman pose at the branch Davidian compound in 1993?,Was Chipman the U.S. President's ATF nominee for the branch Davidian compound in 1993?
Did Barack Obama take office in 2011?,Did Obama take office less than 5 years prior to 2011?,Did Obama take office five years after 2011?,Are there more than 5 million people out of work?,Is there evidence of this fact?,Did Obama take office less than five years before 2011?,Is this estimate accurate?
Has Senator Obama talked about running for president in the last 15 years?,Has Obama's family talked about a run for president?,Has a political spokesman in the Clinton campaign said Senator Obama has talked about running for President in the last 15 years?,Do relatives or friends in the Clinton administration support Obama's candidacy?
Did 300 children on this video have their lives frozen alive and used for organ harvesting?,Are these children the same children who were frozen alive for the purposes of organ harvesting?,Did these children die in prison?,Did these children participate in these illegal organ harvesting practices?,Did this group do this without ever telling the media?
Did GDP increase from 2013 to 2014?,Is GDP now close to KSH 13 trillion?,Are the ss's GDP numbers comparable to the GDP of other nations?,Is the GDP averaged across all nations and continents?,Is there any other indicator that reflects this data?,Did GDP increase from 2014 to 2015?
Was the data compiled by the EWB between 22nd and 30th April 2008?,Is there evidence of these events in the data compiled by the EWB after 30th April 2008?,Was there any evidence of these events in the data compiled by the EWB after 30th April 2008?
Does anyone in this population need to be on medication for long-term bowel and urinary incontinence?,Does this group represent a majority of people who use ivermectin?,Is this person likely to have bowel and urinary incontinence?,Did this person report this news and confirm it?,Is this person a credible source?
How long does it take for DNA to processed by the State run Crime Lab?,Is the information true?,Does the delay at the crime lab come in any particular time period?,Is the state run crime lab able to process DNA evidence as quickly as they possibly can?,Is there any information about how long this process takes?
"Is it true that Indian military men attested after January 1, 2019 who are below the rank of Naik on July 1, 2022 will have to undergo fresh selection under the Agnipath scheme?","Do Indian military service men attested after January 1, 2019 who are below the rank of Naik on July 1, 2022 have to undergo fresh selection under the Agnipath scheme?"
Did Colorado rig the 2018 midterm elections?,Did Colorado send non citizens a mailer in the 2016 midterm elections?,Did Colorado send non citizens a mailer in the 2017 midterm elections?,Has Colorado rigged the 2018 midterm elections?,Would Colorado have an effective election system in the 2020 midterm elections?
Would ending the direct payment farm subsidy program save money in 10 years?,How much do the savings outweigh the costs?,Does ending the direct payment farm subsidy program save money?,Does ending the direct payment farm subsidy program net a savings?,Has ending the direct payment farm subsidy program cost less than $28 billion?
Was Pope Francis referring to priests' right to marry?,Was it the right to marry for priests referred to in a November 2017 letter?,Did Francis actually call for priests to be able to get married?,Did Francis refer to priests' right to marry?,Are there any other aspects regarding priests that this letter was referring to?
Is Buffett attempting to cut the deficit?,Did Buffett say he'd pass a law that makes all congressional members ineligible for re-election?,Are current elected members still eligible to serve?,Do Buffett's comments support the end of the deficit?,Do Buffett's recommendations rely on the premise that Congress is failing?
Does every extra year of school help with income?,Does more school years benefit income?,Does getting a education make income more expensive?,Is any of these numbers true?,Have all incomes increased in this year because of the increased education?,Are these numbers true for all women?,Is this statistic true for all women?
Did kids in the ninth grade in the city of Newark make it to graduation in four years?,Were the kids in the ninth grade at a high school in September this year?,Did the kids graduate in one of the nine quarters this year?,Did the kids graduating in the ninth quarter make it to graduation in four years?
Does it typically take 90 seconds to pass a background check through the NICS database?,Did the NICS database make this database available to all gun owners?,Would you be able to perform a background check through the NICS database?,Do gun owners need to submit fingerprints for background checks?,Are fingerprints required for background checks?
Did the average Small Business Owner lose their insurance coverage in 2017?,Will small business owners lose their current health plans due to new regulations?,Would many small business owners have to give up their plans due to new regulations?,Was the average occurrence of small business loss of their health coverage in 2017?,Did the average Small Business Owner gain insurance coverage in 2017?
Did the post claim to have a vaccine with no vaccine on it?,Were the vaccinated foods safe to eat and are there a number of potential health threats?,Would the vaccinated foods have any harmful effects if stored in a high temp?,Did this post claim to have the vaccine with no vaccine on it?
Do estimates vary on the percentage of women being raped?,Are there any reports of men being raped?,Are there estimates for the number of women being raped?,Have there been many reports of men being raped?,Are there any reports of raped women in South African?
Did the woman who hadn't had sex in 120 days crash her car?,Did the woman's husband die from alcohol poisoning?,Was there physical abuse that caused the car crash?,Did the driver cause damage to her vehicle as a result of the crash?,Was any of the injuries as a result of the crash?
Is Rodrigo Duterte’s monthly salary between $186 to $200?,Was Rodrigo Duterte paid for the entire period of his first term?,"Is the maximum salary of Rodrigo Duterte P200,000?","Is the salary of Rodrigo Duterte P200,000?"
Did the U.S. legislators wearing swastika dresses pose for a picture in January 2021?,Did the U.S. legislators wearing swastika dresses pose for a picture in January 2021?,Have these U.S. legislators ever made statements like this?
Did the court grant an alimony of $10 million?,"Did they fight for a minimum obnoxiously ten years to get a alimony of $500,000?","Has any evidence that the court will grant a alimony of $500,000 in this case been produced?",Would this be the first time any alimony has been awarded in this case?
Does the COVID-19 vaccine have long-term safety or is there some evidence to suggest it isn’t safe?,Is it even true the vaccine has potential to result in long-term adverse reactions?,Is there evidence to support the claim that children don’t need to get a COVID-19 vaccine?
Would this cost 900M?,Is this an accurate estimation?,Do immigrants receive this benefit?,Did Johnson claim that this would cost 900M?,Will this policy actually cost 900M?,Is this correct?,Does Johnson agree with this position?,Is this statement correct?,Would the money needed to fund this policy be from the NHS?
Does China use 7 to 8 times the amount of coal used by the United States?,Does China’s coal consumption exceed that of the United States?,Are there any current estimates of China’s coal use?,Did China use more coal in 2013 than the United States?,Are the statistics reported in this article accurate?
"Did Omar say ""My people did something"" in relation to the 9/11 terror attacks?",Has Omar made statements regarding his own people in the past that have effected public relations in the United States?,"Did Omar say ""My people did something"" in relation to 9/11 terrorist attacks?",Did Omar make statements regarding the 9/11 terrorist attacks?
Did he work with the Democratic legislature to balance spending with revenues?,Did he set aside $2 billion for the rainy day fund by the end of his four year term?,Did the rainy day fund last at least $2 billion?,Did the rainy day fund amount to more than $2 billion after his four year term?
Did more than 23% of mail-in ballots have signatures missing?,Did some ballots go back in and have fewer signatures listed?,Was there an official count of missed signatures?,Did the results from the polls have any change on what happened?,Did the polls not include ballots with missing signatures?
Is it true that Gwen Graham owns a $14 million stake in her family's company behind the American Dream Mall?,Is it true that in Florida the economy is centered around poverty wages and massive traffic congestion?,Has the economic situation in Florida been worsening in recent years?,Does Gwen Graham have close ties to a company behind the American Dream Mall?
Is there a question that the voting records of this election are less than accurate?,Has this election had enough voter turnout?,Are there more fake election ballots than ever?,Do this election have more people voting?,Do people overwhelmingly favor Clinton over Trump in 2022?,Is there an issue that this election is more than Trump is in 2020?
Does the EU praise Nigerian President for rescue of kidnapped children?,Was the US part of the rescue?,Do we have other sources with information on the kidnapped children?,Have there been similar kidnappings in Nigeria?,Are kidnapped children still in Nigeria?
"Did 2,500 left-handed people die every year using equipment made for right-handed people?",Did all equipment that left-handed people used make the left-handed dead?,Did the left-handed dead receive the same treatment as the right-handed dead?,Did left-handed people die due to the misuse of equipment?
Did Cuomo carry beer bottles in March 2021?,Was Cuomo drunk while he was governor?,Is Cuomo a beer drinker?,"if so, who was Cuomo drinking with?","if so, were any of Cuomo's photos taken in early March?"
Did Saudi Arabia publicly declare International straight pride month in June of 2022?,Was Saudi Arabia previously hosting international straight pride month in the past?,Was the BBC a proponent of international straight pride month in Saudi Arabia?,Did Saudi Arabia host International Straight Pride month in 2017?,Has Saudi Arabia ever hosted an international straight pride month before in their history?
Did Russia start the war?,Did Zakharova claim Ukraine did start the war?,Did Zakharova say Ukraine had plans for the extermination of the Donbas people?,Was Zakharova referring to the armed conflict since 2014?,Was Zakharova not accusing Ukraine of starting the war?
Did Senator Joe Manchin say seniors and the disabled did not need $1000 relief?,Was Senator Manchin quoted on Fox News stating seniors and the disabled did not need $1000 relief?,Was Senator Manchin quoted on Fox News stating that seniors and the disabled did not need $1000 relief?,Did Senator Manchin claim seniors and the disabled did not need the $1000 relief package?
Did Biden raise his campaign income more than 10%?,Did Biden raise his campaign income above 10%?,Did Biden get more than 10% of his campaign money in a primary election?,Did Biden ever run for president?,Was Biden in the polls a strong Republican when running for president?,Was Biden re-elected?
Did Gecker vote to double vehicle registration fees for Chesterfield county residents?,Did the voting on the vote result in a cost to Chesterfield county of over $6 million annually?,Did Gecker vote to double vehicle registration fees?,Was the amount of the extra money incurred the Chesterfield county residents?,Did Gecker vote to double vehicle registration fees for Chesterfield county residents?
Will all flight to and from Metro Manila be suspended?,"Will there be no flight to and from Metro Manila after March 15, 2021?",Will all flights to and from Metro Manila be affected by the suspension?,Will all flights to and from Metro Manila be affected by the suspension?,Is there any other reason the suspension has been put on hold?
Was the accuse responsible for the rape of an eight year old girl in Rajasthan today?,Was the girl raped by Naseer Khan in a specific area?,Did this crime take place in an area containing multiple small villages?,Would this crime be recorded in local media?,Would this crime be reported in the media?,Would Naseer Khan be at this location to prevent such crimes?
Was this article searched 163 million times on Google in 2020?,Did this article have any hits in 2020?,Was the author of this article known at the time?,Was there any research to support this claim?,Was the author of this article in the news?,Did this article lead to negative reviews?,Did this article inspire many women to hit on women?
Did the administration balance budgets with over $13 billion in deficits without raising taxes?,Did this administration balance these budgets with no increase in revenue?,Did these budgets achieve significant deficit reductions?,Did these budgets contain deficit reductions in general?,Are these budgets identical in fiscal year to year?
"Do any of the 98 top oxycodone-dispensing doctors who used to live in Florida ""today"" have any oxycodone in stock?",Are there any of the 98 top oxycodone-dispensing doctors who used to live in Florida?
Does Biden plan to move Social Security eligibility age to 75?,Is Biden's proposal for a change in eligibility age solely in terms of the change in age?,Does Biden plan to move eligibility age for Social Security to 75?,Is Biden planning to move eligibility age to 75 as a part of a broader shift in social security eligibility?
Is this photo being used by a medical researcher in India?,Is this photograph showing dogs sitting on hospital beds in India?,Do any dogs lie on hospital beds in India?,Is the author a medical researcher?,- Was the photo taken by a medical researcher?,- Is the author's photograph of dogs lying on hospital beds in India?
Did Obama increase state debt or have the government paid it down?,Does it make sense for Obama to do this?,Has this state debt increased or decreased since he became governor?,Is this state debt higher or lower than Obama's debt?,Is this state debt higher or lower than Obama's debt?
Did a Muslim man in France pin two French men down after an attack?,Did the clip share the aftermath of the attack?,Does this clip support the teacher in Paris who was beheaded in response to the cartoon?,Does this clip demonstrate terroristic motivations?,Does this clip show a convicted terrorist?
Did the Ministry of Home Affairs (MHA) issue a message that a lockdown of the country could occur after 15 June 2020?,Did the Ministry of Home Affairs indicate any possibility of a complete lockdown after 15 June 2020?,Was the situation clarified by the MHA in a statement?
Did all poll workers use suitcases?,"Is there evidence to suggest that any voters were involved with the voting on Nov. 3, 2020?",Is this footage in regards to this election?,Is there footage to suggest this election occurred on that date?,Is there evidence to suggest that this election is not happening?,Is this election?
Did Trump 2020 campaign sign display the image in this photo?,"Was Trump 2020 campaign sign titled ""God Bows Down to President Donald J Trump - Declares 'He Is Perfect'""?",Did Trump 2020 campaign sign carry this message?,Was the Trump 2020 campaign sign fake?,"Did Trump 2020 campaign sign have the symbol ""God Bows Down to President Donald J Trump - Declares 'He Is Perfect'""?"
Was the Disney Mickey Mouse Head art installation abandoned by Disney?,Was the Mickey Mouse head art installation abandoned by Disney?,Did the Mickey Mouse head artwork installation become popular?,Is the Mickey Mouse head artwork installation abandoned by Disney?,Is the Mickey Mouse head artwork installation abandoned by Disney?,Is the Mickey Mouse head artwork installation abandoned by Disney?
"Did Obama's order to raise the minimum wage for new Federal contract workers cost the economy 500,000 jobs?",Did Obama's executive order increase the minimum wage for new federal contract workers?,Was the minimum wage hike not directly linked to job losses?,Did the President's executive order specifically raise the minimum wage for federal contract workers?
Are there $16 billion in duplicate programs in the federal government?,Could $16 billion be cut if this is a strategy?,Are the federal government programs over budget?,Does budgeting need to be flexible?,Can there be money from tax cuts that do not increase spending?,Does this strategy require a lot of change in the federal government?
Is there any proof of this incident?,Did the Gorilla swallow N6.8m at zoo?,Is it a true story?,Is it the first gorilla incident in Nigeria?,Is it still a question of when?,Are all those involved in the incident zoo owners?
Is there an exact number of anti-women’s choice bills introduced in the first half of this session?,Is it true that there were more anti-women’s choice bills introduced in the first half of this session compared to the previous three General Assembly's?,Is it true that there have been more anti-women's choice bills introduced in the first half of this session than in the previous three General Assembly's?,Is this number the same amount for women's choice legislation in general in the general assembly?
Is there a 75 percent reduction in opioid usage for medical cannabis users?,Is cannabis used for opiate treatment lower than opioid use?,Are cannabis users less likely to have opioid addiction?,Is cannabis used for opioid treatment lower than opioid use?,Is medical cannabis a better drug for opiate abuse than opioid use?
Did 25 witnesses say that the event never happened?,Are there additional witnesses that we're lacking?,Are the witnesses to the event on the record?,Was the incident unrelated?,Do any of the witnesses appear to have been lied to?,Are there other witnesses who claim to have been lied to?,Have any witnesses to the event provided evidence that is conflicting with the claims of the witnesses?,Are other witnesses who may have been lied to about the incident?
Are children in England vaccinated against COVID-19 13.633% more likely to die from COVID-19 compared to any cause?,Is the increase in COVID-19 death rates in England directly related to the increase in COVID-19 death rates?,Are children who are not vaccinated against COVID-19 at an increased risk of gaining a COVID-19 infection?
Did Democrats charge $1 billion in state budget deficits?,Did Republicans balance the state budget under Bill O'Brien?,Is there evidence of either scenario?,Did Republican budget balances under Bill O'Brien happen in 2008?,Did the Democratic budget balances in 2008 lead to a greater deficit?,Did O'Brien negotiate with his party in order to balance the budget?
Has Lauren Boebert had any abortions?,Have any other people shown interest in watching Lauren Boebert have abortions?,Is this information true?,Do any other individuals claim to have investigated Lauren Boebert?,Did Lauren Boebert conduct an abortion in 2015?,Did Lauren Boebert have any abortions in 2015?
Did the jerky contain human meat at all?,"Did the jerky contain human meat knowingly, intentionally or in a malicious way?",Did the jerky contain human meat in good faith?,Were there any records of this case?,Has the jerky ever been identified?,Was there any information on this jerky before its possible use in 2020?
What occurred during the year 2023?,Did Obama's administration increase Social Security benefits?,Did Trump's administration increase benefits?,Did Biden be a part of Biden's administration?,Would Biden have prevented this increase in benefits if it were not for Biden's administration?,Would Biden's administration have prevented this increase in benefits if it was not for Biden's administration?
"Was the grotto created by people who made a ""snow white"" statue?",Did the statue's face have to be forced to make it look taller than the dwarves?,"Was the grotto used to create a ""snow white"" statue?",Was the grotto located in Disneyland?
"Is the term ""AstraZeneca"" in English or other languages?","Do the words of the word ""AstraZeneca"" have a common definition?","Is the word ""AstraZeneca"" an alternative for the word ""Weapon""?","Is the word ""Weapon"" an alternative to the word ""AstraZeneca""?"
Does the video show a man confronting Biden about an inappropriate relationship with a 13-year-old girl?,Is the man a woman?,Is Biden known for being a woman?,Is Biden a man?,Is the man in the video from an internet camera?
Are there any additional years following 2004-2005 when the increase in education spending was 3.29 per cent?,Are there any additional years following 2004-2005 when the increase in education spending was 3.83 per cent?,Are there any corresponding year changes for the amount of the budget allocation for education?,Is education spending increased from 3.29% in 2004-2005 to 3.43% in 2012-13?
Did the video of Pelosi say the attack on the U.S. Capitol was all planned?,Did it seem clear that the attack was well planned?,Does the video imply that the attack would have happened without Pelosi's authorization?,Did the video portray Pelosi being a victim of the attack?
Did Joe Biden know the Titan submersible had imploded on June 18?,Did Biden withhold the Titan submersible from the public until June 22?,Did Biden delay public disclosure about the Titan submersible until after the implosion occurred?,Was Joe Biden fully aware of the Titan submersible implosion on June 18?
Did 4 people set a 15-year-old Muslim boy on fire because he was not chanting 'Jai Shree Ram'?,Was this incident reported in the press?,Was this person a Muslim?,Did this person hold a political party?,Was this person from India?
Did Oscar Wilde coin this saying about happiness?,Did Oscar Wilde write the sentence about happiness?,Did Oscar Wilde ever write about happiness?,Did Oscar Wilde ever claim that happiness existed?,Did Oscar Wilde live the entire life he lived?,Did Oscar Wilde coin this statement about happiness?,Did Oscar Wilde have anything to do with this statement?
"Did Earnest say that World War II veterans who felt ""embittered"" by diplomatic relations with Japan should ""get over it""?",Did Earnest ever reaffirm those veterans' sentiments about diplomatic relations with Japan on the anniversary of Pearl Harbor?,"Did Earnest say that these veterans should ""get over it"" for their feelings?"
Can Corona can be detected and infected in small children up to the age of 30?,Is there any evidence of Corona being detected in small children?,i have read through the message of the BMC stating there is a higher stage of Corona – does this mean we should be concerned to small children?
Is this list of comments made in 2005?,Does this list contain any comments from people since 1955?,Is this list only from 1955?,Can anyone list commenters born after 1955?,Can there be any list in 1955 - present?,Can an individual claim to have included any comments in 1955?,Is this list specifically from 1955 - present?,Can someone claim to have included comments in 1955?
Did the quote in question have any significant implication in the Planned Parenthood movement?,Did Sanger say that the Black population would be exterminated?,Did Sanger say these remarked comments in full context?,Did the quote directly relate to the Planned Parenthood organization?,Did Sanger say anything about the black population at this point in time?,Did a majority of Sanger's readers agree with these remarked statements?
"Was the alleged bombing of a car on April 26, 2022?",Was the car traveling in Russia on the day of the attack?,Is there any evidence of the bombing of the car?,Was the car blown up prior to the bombing?,Was the car involved in the bombing of the car?
Did more than 500 scientists send the Secretary General of the United Nations a European Climate Declaration?,Did the European Climate Declaration offer a comprehensive response to the UN?,Is this declaration the first climate declaration?,Are there more similar climate declarations?,Do all of these statements address climate change?,..?
Does President Obama give Mexico $75 million to build a wall?,Will Mexico benefit from this money?,Is the wall an all natural monument?,Does the money for the wall go to those who need it?,Would this help those who need help building a wall?,Could other people benefit from this money?,Did Obama provide funds to build the wall in the past?
Has Langevin received almost $20 million from taxpayers?,Has Langevin received special interests grants?,Did Langevin champion Rhode Island's needs?,Did Langevin receive an appropriation from a special interests group?,Did Langevin champion Rhode Island's needs?,Did Langevin personally participate in this campaign?,Did Langevin volunteer for this campaign?
Would the 2020 Democratic Party abolish ICE?,Would the 2020 Democratic Party abolish all immigration detention programs?,Would the 2020 Democratic Party abolish the Homeland Security department?,Would the 2020 Democratic Party abolish DHS?,Are any of the 2020 Democratic Party candidates against limiting the federal government's ability to protect the citizens?
Do U.S. officials estimate that there are 2.4 million people in this country?,Is the number higher than China and Russia?,Does this estimate include people in a prison?,Do other nations have comparable figures?,Have other countries released a similar report?,Is this report accurate?,Have other nations endorsed these policies?
"Did Paul say that he wanted us to pay $2,000 for Medicare?",Was there a vote in this Senate to have an increase in Medicare coverage?,Was there a reversal in these aye-gaga remarks?,"Was Paul able to get the $2,000 figure from a congressional source?"
Has he tripled this number?,Is he referring to the amount of homes that have gotten connected over the past decade?,Is this amount equal to all of these households?,Is this number increased by the number of households that have gotten connected?,Does this number reflect all households that get connected in this period?
Will the new law requiring ultrasounds require an ultrasound if raped?,Would the law require ultrasounds to be performed for all pregnancy cases?,Will the ultrasound law force people to report rapes in the first 30 days?,Would a law that requires ultrasounds force people to report rapes be used?
Did Voepel tweet while on vacation?,Has Voepel been mentioned in any other posts?,Did Voepel post during the attack in Colorado?,Has Voepel called on the police?,Will Voepel contact supporters of the police?,Did Voepel send any other messages?,Did Voepel send any notes?
"In 1789, was being a member of congress considered a civic duty?",Did congress members receive a monetary payment of 50 cents daily in 1789?,Are there any sources that contradict this statement?,Is there evidence to support this claim?,Was it true that Congress members were paid a monetary payment in 1789?
Did health costs for women of childbearing age increase by more than men?,Did health costs for women of childbearing age rise by more than men?,Did women of childbearing age spend more on out of pocket health costs than men?,Were women of childbearing age spending more on health care than men?
Was the US Department of Energy's “Billion Ton Study” based on a study?,Is the Department of Energy's “Billion Ton Study” based on a study of renewable energy sources?,Is a combined 6% of energy use associated with renewable energy?,Is 5% of energy use associated with renewable energy?
"Did British OAs receive total yearly benefit of £6,000 for the amount of working 45 years?",Is there any specific figure for the benefits of OAs who work for 45 years?,Was there any specific number of benefits for OAs who work for 45 years?,Could the number of benefits per year be less than 6000?,Is it true that OAs are entitled to benefits if they work for 45 years?
Did the White House chef quit because Trump has only eaten fast food for 6 months?,Does Trump eat fast food regularly?,Were the White House chefs responsible for Trump dietary restrictions?,Were the White House chef's actions based on Trump's own personal opinion?,Have the White House chef's actions been viewed as discriminatory?
Was McCain a supporter of amnesty before challenging him?,Is McCain now on record as supporter of amnesty after challenging him?,Has McCain changed since challenging him?,Has McCain also changed the tone of his amnesty policies?,Is there any evidence that McCain is now more in support of amnesty than ever?
Is it cost prohibitive to send out community notifications on a Level 3 sex offender?,"Does the cost of notification range between $5,000 to $6,000.?",Does the cost of notification vary depending on the specific sex offender in question?,Is it costly to provide community notification on a Level 3 sex offender?,Is there a specific reason for requiring community notifications for each level of offender?
Did the Nebraska man confess to murdering more than 30 sex offenders?,Did the Nebraska man confess to murdering 30 sex offenders?,Did the Nebraska man confess to murdering all 30 sex offenders?,Have there been recriminations against the Nebraska man?,Was it ever proven that the Nebraska man had committed any recriminations or acts of vigilantism?,Did the Nebraska man confess to killing 30 sex offenders?
Is this county part of a larger state?,Did Republicans vote in this county in 2016?,Did this county be involved in the 2016 presidential recount?,Did the president call this county in 2016?,Was this county part of a larger state?,Was this county involved in any other presidential elections?,Would this county be involved in the 2016 presidential recount?
Has the NIAA put a plan in to parliament?,Did the NIAA put the plan into a Parliament?,Is the NIAA's plan included in the NIAA's proposed bill?,Have the NIAA proposed the proposed bill?,Are the 11 points in the plan part of the NIAA's proposed bill?
Did the fight lead to the death of an army jawan?,Did the killing lead to a significant increase in violence in the area?,Are there no other reports of such violence in the region?,Do any investigations have yet to be conducted?,Does the location or location of the alleged killing have any connection to local tensions?
Did Ginsburg meet requirements to be confirmed 43 days before an election?,Was Ginsburg confirmed 43 days before an election?,Is Ginsburg known for demonstrating a high quality in her work?,Has the report been modified to reflect the accuracy of this statement?,Have any of the facts presented in this article been altered since this statement was made?
Can tax dodge affect many countries?,Does tax dodge affect tax revenue in several countries?,Is there evidence that tax dodging costs developing countries $200 billion every year?,Has the amount of tax dodged increased since 1990?,Did the growth rate increase as a result of tax dodgers?,Do states like New York and Puerto Rico experience tax dodging?
Did Italy field a player that should not have played in the quarterfinal?,Did Italy get a yellow card in the quarterfinal?,Did Italy send a player off during the finals?,Was the player banned due to an officiating issue?,Was the decision about whether the officiating incident was taken into consideration?
Did Elon Musk offer to make $1 million  in 90 days while sleeping in?,Does Elon Musk offer money to people  in 90 days while sleeping in?,Is there any way Elon Musk can make the $1 million  in 90 days while sleeping in?
Do the same bicycle violations have a higher forfeiture as marijuana?,Does Milwaukee reduce its maximum forfeiture for marijuana possession to $50?,Would Milwaukee increase the number of bicycle violations with an increase in the minimum forfeiture?,Would the city have more bicycle violations without an increase in the minimum forfeiture?,Will the city have more bicycle violations with higher forfeiture in the future?
"Did this video show the flight that crashed on Jan 9, 2021?","Did this video show the crash that had actually occured on Jan 9, 2021?",Do any other media outlets claim the same thing?,"Did this video claim to be the video of the flight that landed on Jan 9, 2021?",Was this video released on any other social media platform?
Are there more than 25 million people receiving some form of income from the state?,Does the country have more people receiving income support from the state than in the past?,Did the author cite statistics to support this claim?,Did the author claim that all states provide some form of income support to everyone?,Does this country have more people receiving income support from state than in the past?
Is this image authentic?,Is this image true?,Have any witnesses come forward to support this claim?,Is this image authentic or authentic?,Did any of the four accused enter the scene of this incident?,Is there any record of this meeting?,Is the photo a depiction of the incident?
Is there evidence that squalene is used to produce COVID-19 vaccines?,Is the shark used to make squalene required for COVID-19 vaccine production?,"Does Shark Allies believe that 550,000 sharks could be killed to produce this vaccine?",Are there reports of sharks being killed for squalene?
Did Charlie Bass make eight consecutive requests to raise his pay?,Did Charlie Bass change his position in the year prior to the vote?,Was Charlie Bass on the board for eight of the nine proposals?,Did Charlie Bass raise his pay in any other years?,"Is this a statement claiming to be ""realistic""?"
Did 20 percent of Texas High School graduates go on to acquire national certificates or community college degrees?,Did there appear to be less achievement after graduating high school?,Was the percentage of high school graduates that were successful with these education programs a disproportionately large amount for the state of Texas?,Do any statistics suggest this is the trend among Texas high school graduates?
Did the attorney general secretly visit the prison where Jeffrey Epstein was held?,Did Barr go inside the prison to learn of Epstein's death?,Was Barr charged with the death of Epstein?,Was Barr the attorney general at the prison where Epstein was held?,Did Barr visit the prison where Epstein was held?,Did Barr visit the prison where Epstein was held?,Did Barr publicly support Epstein's murder?
Is it true that Gemma has since changed his stance?,Was this change related to the 2010 election?,Did this change impact his voting for office?,Is this change related to the 2017 election?,Is this change related to the 2017 election?,Does this election show this shift?,Can we see this shift in support for this candidate?
Did Le Pen's ballot papers intentionally been spoiled?,Has the spoiled ballot papers led to the intentional rigging of the 2022 French presidential election?,Did the spoiled ballot papers lead to the intentional rigging of the 2022 French presidential election?,Has the intentional rigging of the 2022 French presidential election led to the intentional rigging of the 2022 French presidential election?
"Did Jio give 99,000 users free recharge of Rs 349 to celebrate Mukesh Ambani becoming the sixth richest man in the world?",Were there any conditions for using Jio free of charge?,Will Jio charge all the users?,Did Jio give any incentives for using Jio free of charge?,Did Jio offer any other benefits?
Does Agnihotri have any assets which are not yet fully disclosed?,Has Agnihotri contributed to other projects in the past?,Is Agnihotri's donation to the PM relief fund limited to Kashmiri people?,Did Agnihotri donate money to a political party?,Did Agnihotri donate money to the party of the PM?
Did the Chandrayaan-3 record a video after landing on the moon?,Did Chandrayaan-3's landing on the moon result in recording the first video in the Chandrayaan's history?,Did Chandrayaan-3 land on the moon directly after landing?
"Is there any implication that U.S. hospitals receive $48,000 for every patient that dies from COVID-19 in their care?",Does the government subsidy pay for all hospital deaths due to COVID-19?,Are there any other estimates about how much this subsidy could cost hospitals?,Are there any estimates about how much the government subsidy would cost hospitals due to COVID-19?
Did China bury the 75 soldiers?,Did China take the remains to a grave site in Ladakh?,Has China blasted India for using force against India in the Ladakh region?,Was China responsible for the death of Indian soldiers?,Has China used force against India?,Did the Indian soldiers fight for their country?
Did Siddhar's body turn up in a place known as Yogasana?,Did Siddhar take a number of Yogasanas before becoming buried alive?,Can Siddhar have been buried alive in any other location in the past 300 years?,Did Siddhar's tomb have any other sacred items that were used during the meditation?
Have the military arrived in Mumbai to enforce complete lockdown on 8 May 2020?,Is the closure being enforced to the entire city?,Has the local authorities taken this decision into account?,Are these measures considered the primary means of stifling crime?,Does the use of all methods of stifling crime increase the incidence of crime?
Was the money given away by the Nigeria central bank?,Was the money given away by the Central bank for free?,Does this make the whole story about the scam completely true?,Does the fraud have any connection to the central bank?,Are people in Nigeria having money stolen in the alleged scam?,Are people in Nigeria having money stolen in the alleged scam?
Are all Americans expected to have access to some form of federal payment and benefits under ObamaCare?,Is it assumed 100% of Americans will be dependent on government assistance under ObamaCare?,Will Americans have access to government assistance following ObamaCare?,Are the health insurance subsidies for eligible Americans already in place?,Will many people in the United States benefit from ObamaCare?
Did Ella Fitzgerald sing to a mixed-race audience?,Did the photo depict police holding Ella Fitzgerald in custody?,Did the photo show Ella being arrested for singing to a mixed-race audience?,Were there multiple policemen who arrested Ella?,Was the photo produced prior to 1954?,Do the photos from 1955 show a similar incident?
Did Marcos accept the resignations of all 18 high-ranking police officers?,Did Marcos accept the resignations of all 18 high-ranking police officers?,Did Marcos accept the resignations of all 18 high-ranking police officers?,Did Marcos accept all 18 high-ranking police officers?,Did Marcos accept the resignations of all 18 high-ranking police officers?
Has VAWA decreased domestic violence rates since 1994?,Is VAWA affecting more women then women?,Can VAWA help reduce violence?,Can VAWA prevent violent offenders from targeting women?,Does VAWA affect sexual harassment?,Is VAWA lowering crime rates?,Are domestic violence rates decreasing?,Will VAWA prevent violence against women?
Was this bill backed by the House of Representatives?,Did the House vote to get rid of country-of-origin labeling?,Did anyone lose their jobs during this vote?,Was this legislation backed by the Senate?,Did any of the Republican senators vote against this bill?,Was this bill backed by many party?
Was Eastwood's editorial written specifically on Trump?,Did Eastwood write the editorial in response to the statements made by Trump?,Did Eastwood write about Trump's views?,Did Eastwood ever argue against Trump's views?,Did Eastwood agree with Trump's views?,Did Eastwood support Trump's policy?
Does the town of the subject have 3 lanes designated for it?,Is the town of the subject a real place to visit?,Is the town of the subject a big place?,Are other attractions to visit in the town?,Would a specific town have 3 lanes reserved for its town?
Does Obama play a round of golf every week in his presidency?,Did Obama play 100 rounds of golf when he took office?,Does Obama play a round of golf on average a week in the President's term?,Does Obama play a round of golf after he takes office?,Has Obama played golf over 100 days in the President's tenure as President?
Is there evidence of an authentic Tesla catching fire?,Did someone intentionally try to show Tesla catching fire on the internet?,Did a verified Tesla vehicle catching fire on the Internet cause the tweet?,Has Tesla been actively involved in this crime?,Does Tesla have any other criminal status?,Have any reports of Tesla crimes ever been made public?
Did Americans claim that Russia is the country's most important issue?,Did this percentage differ by gender?,Did this percentage increase or decrease after Russian President Vladimir Putin's election?,Did these figures differ by race?,Did this percentage change for ethnic groups?,Did this percentage change after Trump declared his resignation?,Are these figures based on a single day?
Are there multiple vetoes by McAuliffe in 2 years?,Can McAuliffe veto fewer bills than previous governors in any years?,Is McAuliffe consistently vetoing bills?,Can McAuliffe veto bills for 4 years or more?
Does ginger oil help in weight loss?,Does ginger oil help in detoxification?,Does ginger oil help in weight loss?,Is ginger oil safe to use on belly button?,Do ginger oil treatments help in weight loss?,Does ginger oil cure diabetes?,Does ginger oil help in digestion?,Does ginger oil help in weight loss?
Did Hillary Clinton announce her plan to double Syria's arrival despite that she previously promised more Syrian refugees to come to the United States?,Did the plan come out in advance of an announcement by Trump about a massive increase in Syrian refugees?,Did Trump announce a plan to double Syrian numbers to a 5% increase?
Was the photographer responsible for the capture of this image?,Has the dolphin been seen or seen in any hurricanes or disasters before?,Does the photo show any waves during the hurricane?,Is it uncertain if the dolphin was captured in the storm?,Is there any damage caused by Hurricane Dorian?,Do any dolphins have a specialized protective suit?
Has this rate of support increased since 2016?,Is this survey conducted by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention?,Is the percentage of Americans who support expanding Medicare for All high?,Is the percentage of people who support expanding Medicare for All very high?,Is this survey conducted by a public opinion poll?
Was there more jobs created than previously deemed possible in SA last year according to Stats SA?,Does it indicate that new jobs are being created to increase job creation?,Has any increase in new jobs been caused by the economy?,Were there fewer new jobs created in 2016 than previously deemed possible?,Is it true that the statistics in stats SA show that there are now 15 million people with jobs in the country?
Did this person experience a placenta malfunction?,Do doctors report this symptoms to them or their patients?,Did a midwife report symptoms of placental malfunction with this vaccine?,Did these doctors report cases of these patients having failed miscarriages?,Were there other women who experienced this adverse event?
"Did a principal back down from making ""All Lives Matter"" the theme for Black History Month?",Did the principal receive a backlash from the remark?,Did the principal receive a remark from an outside source?,Did the principal retract the remark?,Was the principal removed from her job at the school?
Does Walker's proposal include the category of supervisor and management employees?,Is there any data that supports this claim?,Is there any research showing the potential impact of this proposal on the department?,Is there any specific information about the department that supports this assertion?,Is there a sufficient number of employees to support these proposed additions?
Is it true that one of the largest renewable energy programs in the world is under the stewardship of President Zuma?,Are all renewable energy programs in South Africa ranked among the top 10 in the world?,Has South Africa's renewable energy programme always been ranked among the top 10 in the world?
Are the mail-in ballots received after November 3 counted?,Will mail-in ballots from November 3 be counted?,Would there be a cutoff date for mail-in ballots from November 3 - November 26?,Will the mailed ballots be counted?,Are the mail-in ballots returned to the postal box before December 7?
Is a large circle marked on a protester's poster an accurate reflection of the hole created by an AR-15 round?,Is a large circle marked on a protester's poster the same as the hole created by an AR 15 round?,Is the hole created by the AR 15 round a large circle?
Did Biden receive more pre-set votes?,Was the pre-set vote counted?,Was the pre-set vote counted in all of the elections?,Was Biden pre-set in all of the states?,Is Biden a favored vote for the general election?,Can voting machines in Arizona perform pre-set voting for democrats?
Did a female politician run for the presidency for the first time?,Did a female candidate run for the presidential race for the first time?,Did more female candidates run for president in this year?,Did a female candidate run for president in the past month?,Were there any women running for the president for the first time in history?
Do people who receive the COVID-19 vaccine must quarantine for 2-14 days?,Is the duration of quarantine regulated?,Can people who receive the COVID-19 vaccine transmit infection?,Can people who receive the COVID-19 vaccine transmit infection?,Whether people receiving the COVID-19 vaccine must quarantine for 2-14 days?,Is there an exclusion for COVID-19 vaccine patients from transmitting infection?
Would 50 million people lose their health insurance if Obamacare is repealed?,Will a repeal of Obamacare cause 50 million people to lose their health insurance?,Do a repeal of Obamacare decrease the number of people eligible for health insurance?,Would 50 million people lose their health insurance if Obamacare were repealed?
Would these proposals remove deduction for employee discounts?,Would they remove deductions for employee discounts?,Has this proposal been voted on?,Has this proposed tax plan been passed in any other state?,Has the speaker or author of this bill made any additional proposals?,Is there any other fiscal policy in this proposed bill?
Did the CDC remove thousands of deaths linked to COVID-19?,Did the CDC remove nearly a quarter of deaths it had listed in those under 18 years old?,Was the number of deaths listed in COVID 19 higher for those 18 years old compared to 18 year olds?,Did the CDC remove deaths linked to COVID 19 for those under 18 years old compared to 18 year olds?
Does India pay 10 billion rupees pension to Queen Elizabeth?,Does India send 30 billion tonnes of beef to the UK under the Transfer of Power agreement?,Does India pay 10 billion rupees pension to Queen Elizabeth?,Are the India and UK both parties to the Transfer of Power agreement?,Are there any other agreements between India and the UK?
Is the revenue generated by Lagos state low?,Is the budget of Lagos state less than $3 billion?,Are the taxes in Lagos state lower than other states?,Is the budget of Lagos State lower than other states?,Is it true that the revenue generated by Lagos state is low?,Is it true that the budget of Lagos state is less than $3 billion?
Would gasoline price rise by approximately 50 cents a gallon if the McCain-Lieberman bill became law?,Is there evidence the price hike is a result of higher demand?,Is the estimated increase in gasoline price a result of increased demand?,Is the estimate calculated using multiple studies from different studies and the actual estimate of gas prices?
Do the programs require the payment from coal miners in West Virginia and single moms in Detroit?,Do these programs require the payment from those in both groups?,Do these programs need to be funded through federal sources?,Has any federal funding been proposed for these programs?,Is there any evidence that these programs could be funded through federal sources?
Does the photo collage show the leg plastered in October of 2022?,Does the photo collage show the leg plastered in the same year the Narendra Modi visit?,Did Morbi have a stroke?,Did the visit lead to more polio cases?,Has Morbi had a stroke?
Does this video show what women sell for?,Has this video been viewed?,Is the video of this video based on fact or fiction?,Is the video of this video based on information or opinion?,Was this video originally broadcast in 2012?,Does this video currently exist?,Is this video currently available?
"Would increasing the current tax rates result in a tax rate increase of more than $100,000 a year to millionaires and billionaires?",Would the additional tax increase impose a burden on the wealthiest individuals and families in society?,Do millions of these individuals have a lot of money?,Would the additional tax increase increase impact the wealthiest individuals and families?
Did churches in France have many church destroyed over the last 4 years?,Did churches in France destroy many churches over the last 4 years?,Did churches in France destroy many churches over the last 4 years?,Did churches in France destroy many churches over the last 4 years?,Did churches in France destroy many churches in the last 4 years?
Did Denver Broncos general manager John Elway fire 3 players for kneeling during the national anthem?,Did 3 Denver Broncos players kneel during the national anthem?,Did all three Denver Broncos players kneel during the national anthem?,Was there any conflicting data regarding the validity of this story?
"Did Obama give students the right to repay Federal loans as a clear, fixed, low percentage of income for up to 20 years?","Did Obama give students the right to repay Federal loans as a clear, fixed, low percentage of their income for up to 20 years?","Did Obama give students the right to repay Federal loans as a clear, fixed, low percentage of their income for up to 20 years?"
Is it true this photo shows people holding a flag that combines Nazi symbols with an American flag design?,Did this photo come out in the april of 2020?,Did this photo originally circulate in the april of 2020?,Did this photo go viral in any city?,Were people in this photograph holding a flag that combines Nazi symbols with an American flag design?
Is this money part of a larger 1.2 million research budget?,Is this research based on actual people playing World of Warcraft?,Is this research about an effect on the brain that this game might have on them?,Is this funding of these studies based on actual people?,Is this research based on actual people using this game for recreation?
Is forty cents of every dollar spent by the federal government a loan from children?,Does this compare to the current federal government spending on child care?,Is this federal government spending on child care being subsidized by the children?,Does any part of the federal budget make a contribution to a child's education?
Did the percentage of individuals aged 20 years and older who have attained Grade 12 increase from 21.9% in 2002 to 27.7% in 2013?,Is the percentage of individuals aged 20 years and older who have attained Grade 12 increasing statewide?,Has the percentage of individuals aged 20 years and older who have attained Grade 12 increased statewide since 2002?
Did Zuckerberg boast about Facebook's ban on pro-life ads in the post?,Has Zuckerberg publicly acknowledged Facebook's ban on pro-life advertising?,Did Zuckerberg declare that Facebook banned pro-life ads in Ireland's abortion referendum campaign?,Are Facebook's pro-life ads on Google Maps a form of advertising?
Did Lance speak against concealed weapons in the United States during the 2008 election?,Did Lance say that concealed weapons in national parks are legal?,Did Lance support national parks and not carry concealed weapons in them?,Does Lance hold to the original position of not being for concealed weapons in 2008. Was Lance against concealed weapons in 2009?
Did Biden support the 2002 Iraq invasion?,Did Biden support the US invasion of Iraq?,Was there any evidence indicating that Biden supported the US invasion of Iraq?,Did Biden support the war in Iraq or the war in Afghanistan?,Are there any examples of Biden supporting the war in Iraq?,Did Biden support the war in Iraq?
Did FEMA compensate families for funeral costs for COVID-19 deaths?,Can FEMA cover funeral costs for COVID-19 deaths?,Will FEMA pay funeral costs for COVID-19 deaths?,Would FEMA reimburse funeral costs for COVID-19 deaths?,Is COVID-19 considered to be a public health disaster?
Is this the first year in American history that more minorities are being born than people in the majority?,Is this the first year in American history that more minorities are being born than people in the majority?,Does this include women?,Does this include more of a female population?,Is this the first year in American history that more minorities are being born than people in the majority?
Did Harvard University praise Uttar Pradesh's handling of the migrants crisis?,Did Harvard University praise the government of Uttar Pradesh for their handling of the migrants crisis?,Did Harvard University praise the government of Uttar Pradesh for their handling of the migrants crisis?,Was Harvard University involved in any of the actions during the lockdown?,Are the actions of the government in Uttar Pradesh related to the migrant crisis?
Does HR 1 automatically register all welfare recipients to vote?,Does HR 1 require all welfare recipients to vote?,Does HB 1 require welfare recipients to vote?,Is HB 1 intended to automatically register all welfare recipients?,Does HB 1 require all welfare recipients to vote?,Is HB 1 an intentional move to encourage welfare recipients to vote?
Are school buses not allowed to cross parts of I-80 near Joliet due to bridge fragility?,Does the I-80 bridge have a fragile nature?,Is there any evidence to support the claim?,Does it exist outside of the I-80 vicinity?,Is this bridge likely to be unstable?
Has Texas redistricting ever violated Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act?,Does Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act prohibit redistricting by Texas legislators?,Has this law impacted many parts of Texas?,Has this law consistently violated the Voting Rights Act?,Is this claim based on a true story?
Did the majority of the 111th Congress spend more money than the first 100 congresses combined?,Did the Democratic majority have more spending power than the majority of the first 100 Congresses combined?,Is the 111th Congress dominated by Democrats?,Is the 111th Congress dominated by Republicans?
Did the Trump Administration announce that American citizens must be vaccinated before 2022?,Did the Trump Administration announce that individuals who are not vaccinated before 2022 will be put in camp?,Did the Trump Administration announced that individuals who are not vaccinated before 2022 would be put in camp?,Are there any plans currently in place to incentivize individuals to get vaccinated before 2022?
Did hardships faced by the poor in India have not changed from 1947 to 2020?,Do images prove hardships faced by poor people in India?,Is there evidence that the poverty rate in India has not remained the same since the late 20th century?,Does this image show any comparison between the years 1947 to 2020?
Did tax increases cause unemployment to increase in Michigan?,Does Granholm’s economic policies have a direct relationship to the growth of Michigan’s unemployment rate?,Does Granholm’s tax increases result in increased unemployment?,Is unemployment declining in Michigan during Granholm's administration?,Will tax increases in Michigan increase unemployment?
Did Trump formally admit to the coronavirus?,Did Trump hold campaign rallies the day after the CDC issued a warning?,Did Trump declare the coronavirus a threat on the 13th of March?,Did Trump admit to the coronavirus on the 13th of March?
Did any Indian students evacuate from Ukraine?,Was Prakash Javadekar in favor of the Indian students?,Did any Indian students evacuate from Ukraine?,Did any Indian students flee from Ukraine?,Did any Indian students evacuate from Ukraine?,Did any Indian students flee from Ukraine?,Did any Indian students evacuate from Ukraine?
Is there more than one new coal plant planned in the world?,Do Australia plans to shut down its remaining coal plants?,Are there more than one new coal plant planned in the US?,Are all the existing coal plants being built in China?,Are there any coal plants in the US that have been shut down?
Has Obama cancelled all of his campaign appearances for Hillary Clinton in October 2016?,Was Obama’s cancellation a political move?,Did Obama cancel the last two presidential events of 2016?,Did Obama cancel all of the other presidential events of 2016?,Did Obama cancel the last two presidential events in January?,Did Obama cancel all of the other presidential events in January?
"Is there any record of 200,000 ships waiting to dock at Long Beach Port?",Is the footage representative of the ship loading and unloading process?,Is the footage shown in the footage clear and accurate?,Is this photograph not consistent with other IMAX footages?,Was the footage not shot at a designated time?
Did Isir El-Rufai say 80% of registered voters in northern Nigeria don't know who Peter Obi is?,Does El-Rufai claim any data?,Did El-Rufai say he found data to support this claim?,Does he claim there was sufficient evidence to support these claims?
Did people sell sweatshirts?,Was the vendor named Nah?,Did people pay $100 for sweatshirts?,Did the vendor claim to be a Trump supporter?,Did people purchase sweatshirts from Nah?,Was the vendor selling $100 sweatshirts?,Did the vendor sell multiple sweatshirts?,Did the vendor have multiple customers?
"Did Portland, Oregon prohibit urinals in public buildings in 2019?",Did Portland prohibit urinals in public buildings prior to 2019?,Did city officials announce or implemented a prohibition on urinals in public buildings prior to 2019?,Was this ban announced before or after a major election?,"Was the ban announced before or after a major election in Portland, Oregon?"
Does this law prohibit a misrepresentation on a dating website?,Does this law prohibit a misrepresentation in relation to age or gender?,Is this law specifically addressed to the older generation?,Is there a law regarding the age of a person on a dating website?
Did the U.S. Department of Customs arrest the Philippine Airlines flight crew from Dubai and Riyadh?,Was the BOC conducting further investigation for undeclared imports of onion and fruits?,Did the Philippine Airlines flight crew from Dubai and Riyadh travel in general?,Is the U.S. Department of Customs conduct any investigations involving Philippine Airlines from Dubai and Riyadh?
Will the money be taken out of public schools?,Will the money be put into vouchers?,Will any of the money be used at all?,Will any of the money be used at all?,Will any of the money be used at all?,Have any of the funds been used at all in the past?,Will any of the money be used in any other way?
Is this photo taken in 1955?,Do you have the album art on display?,Did this singer buy the bra that she was selling?,Did she advertise this bra as a gift?,Did this singer sell the bra at an event?,Did this singer have any other bras than the bra featured here?,Was the bra mentioned in the album art?
Have black Americans recieved 10 times as much wealth in total wealth than white Americans?,Did black Americans have more wealth in total wealth than white Americans in 2010?,Were white Americans wealthier in 2010 than black Americans in 2010?,Is there any way to gauge how much wealth Black Americans have in total?
Has a home invasion killed more people than a total of gun kills?,Has over a third of gun kills taken place by a gun stolen or wrestled from a person?,Does home invasion murder make up less than one percent of gun murders?,Did the article list specifics about these gun murders?
Was a bird killed by Cyclone Fani in 2019?,Did the bird have a collar that made it difficult to find?,Did the bird have its collar changed?,Did the bird die from exhaustion?,Did Cyclone Fani kill the bird on its own?,Can you name the bird and the state?
"Is a treaty called the ""Red Shirt Convention"" to ban meat, dairy products, and private cars by 2030?",Does the treaty involve cities or only cities?,Is there only one city planning for all car bans?,"Does the treaty include cities that already ban all transportations, but not private cars?"
Has attorney general Stein said nothing about violent summer protests in North Carolina?,Has Stein “said nothing” about violent summer protests in North Carolina?,Does Stein have any responsibility for any violent summer protests in North Carolina?,Has N.C. attorney general Josh Stein endorsed any protest violence?,Is it true that N.C. Attorney general Josh Stein is on leave?
Is this 29 dollars what families on SNAP (food stamps) have to live on for a week?,Are these per week expenses a blip in the middle of the month?,Are these per week expenses a blip in the middle of the month?,Is this specific sum based on the weekly need?
Have all hospitalized COVID-19 patients been vaccinated?,Does Harris say almost all hospitalized COVID-19 patients are vaccinated?,Is Harris referring to all hospitalized COVID-19 patients?,Does Harris claim all hospitalized COVID-19 patients are vaccinated?
Is the estimated subsidy per vehicle estimate based upon estimates for all other subsitutes?,Is the estimated subsidy based upon an estimate for all other subsidized subsitive vehicles?,Is the estimated subsidy based upon an estimate for all other subsitive vehicles?
Did gunfire kill more Americans than any war in history?,Did gunfire kill more Americans than any war in American history?,Is there any way to know the causes of gunfire and war in US history?,Is any data available that supports this point?,Does this claim pertain to any wars or wars prior to 1968?
Did this photo show the Myanmar military hit by a roadside mine?,Did this military hit by a roadside mine get medical attention after the roadside mine incident?,Does this photo show the military hit by a roadside mine following an earthquake?,Does this military hit by a roadside mine have any other injuries?
Did Biden offer a Purple Heart to his uncle?,Did Biden give his uncle a Purple Heart?,Was Biden given the Purple Heart by his uncle?,Did Biden nominate Frank Biden for the Purple Heart?,Did Biden make a statement about Biden's service in World War II?
Did he lose a reelection bid in 1988 because of his gun ban proposals?,Did he receive a D-minus from the NRA because of the ban plans?,Did he pass this bill 30 years ago?,Did this legislation pass in 1988?,Did his opponent change his position on the ban?,Did any other Republicans or Democrats pass similar measures?
Are only about 10 Senate Republicans who have any business experience?,Do all Senate Republicans who have any business experience?,Can all Senator Republicans who have any business experience?,Has the amount of Senate Republicans who have any business experience jumped in the past year?,Is the amount of Senate Republicans who have any business experience currently low?
"Did the Democratic senator receive 1,100 votes in a town with only 700 residents?",Did Hassan receive votes from voters in the town?,Is there evidence of fraud in this town?,Did Hassan receive votes from residents of the town?,Is this town a rural town?,Is this town a town where the majority of voters are residents?
Did O'Rourke support shielding MS-13 gang members from deportation?,Did O'Rourke vote to shield MS-13 gang members from deportation?,Did Beto O'Rourke support shielding MS-13 gang members from deportation?,Did O'Rourke vote to shield MS-13 gang members from deportation?
Was the University of the Philippines placed in the top 10 Asian universities due to continued protests against Duterte?,Did the University of the Philippines participate in the protests in 2018?,Did the University of the Philippines participate in protests in 2017?,Did the University of the Philippines participate in protests in 2018?
Did Ali appear in a TV spot in 1978 that encouraged parents to get their kids vaccinated?,Has Ali made any other TV appearances that have included advising parents to get vaccines for kids?,Did Ali make any other television appearances in 1978 that included encouraging parents to get vaccinated for kids?
Has there been any evidence that a 5 meter skeleton has been discovered in Australia?,Is this a documented case of a human skeleton being found in Australia?,Has this skeleton been described as being unique in terms of size and physis?,Was this particular skeleton discovered in Australia?
Did Trump's policies lead to a 3% unemployment rate in Wisconsin?,Does this unemployment rate include manufacturing jobs?,Has this unemployment rate improved since Trump took office?,Has this unemployment rate increased in any other states?,Has Trump's policies led to a 3% unemployment rate in Wisconsin?,Does this unemployment rate include manufacturing jobs?
Did Sen. Obama get agreements to build a nearly $40-billion natural gas pipeline?,Did Sen. Obama get agreements to build a nearly $40-billion natural gas pipeline at the time of his governorship?,Did Sen. Obama receive a renegotiation to fund the natural gas pipeline project?,Did Sen. Obama get a renegotiation to fund the natural gas pipeline project?
"Was 10% of our youth lost by dropping out of Buffalo, NY in the previous decade?",Is there a 20 percent increase in the coming back to Buffalo young people?,Is there a 10 percent decrease in young people that returning to Buffalo?,Is there a decrease in young people that come back to Buffalo due to a decade of loss?
Does Governor's proposed budget obligate the K-12 School System to increase DHS funding?,Does DHS funding include a total of all K-12 school funds?,Does DHS funding include a total of all schools within K-12 School Systems?,Does the proposed budget obligate the K-12 School System to increase DHS funding?
"Do all Americans earning under $50,000 get a $5,200 subsidy for gas?","Do Americans earning at least $50,000 get a $5,200 subsidy for gas?","Are those making under $50,000 entitled to the subsidy?","Is there evidence that the subsidy is only used by those who make less than $50,000 yearly?"
Was this photo taken prior to a meeting between Congress leaders Rahul and Priyanka Gandhi with the parents of the Hathras victim?,Was the photo taken in front of the Hathras victim or before?,Will any of the Hathras victims in this case have met with these leaders?
Is this video actually real?,Is this video in reality?,Are the people in this video in Pakistan?,Is this video from August 2020?,Are there any other crocodiles in this area?,Are the people in this video wearing clothing?,Is this video a live feed of the real crocodile?,Is this video from August 2020?
Did Paxton actually discard 2.5 million ballots?,Was Paxton ever caught on tape admitting to a theft?,Did Paxton have a crime record?,Did Paxton vote on all of his state's ballots?,Did the police record show Paxton was responsible for his own election fraud?,Has Paxton ever been charged with fraud relating to this election?
Was Iceland's parliament voting to declare that all religions are mental disorders?,Did Iceland vote to declare all religions as mental disorders in 2020?,Was there any amendment in the Icelandic constitution to declare religions mental disorders?,Did Iceland have any restrictions on religions in 2020?,Did Iceland's parliament vote to declare all religions as mental disorders in 2020?
Did the high-res satellite photo contain evidence that Cuba was blacked out?,Is there any evidence that this was the only blackout there?,Can it be proven Cuba blacked out?,Did this cause blackouts in most places?,Can this be proven it caused blackouts in Cuba?,Are the satellite photos being shared widely?
Has Trudeau banned voting rights for seniors over 85 due to climate change?,Does the ban have any affect on the elderly population in general?,Has Trudeau made any change in this area?,Does this ban have any effect on the elderly population?,Has Trudeau ever enacted any reforms regarding voting rights?
Was the DOJ legally allowed to release Epstein’s flight logs?,Was the DOJ legally allowed to release Epstein’s flight logs?,Have the flight logs been completely redacted?,"Did the DOJ released the flight logs on November 17, 2014?",Did the DOJ release the flight logs by June 2013?
Did Obamacare cover 24 million fewer people than it was expected to?,Did Obamacare have a projected cost tag of $2 trillion?,Did Obamacare cover 24 million fewer people than it was expected to?,Did Obamacare cover 24 million more people than it was expected to?,Was Obamacare’s projected cost higher than projected?
"Is ICE required to fill 34,000 beds with detainees every night?",Has this number been increasing since 2009?,Is ICE required to fill more beds with detainees since 2009?,Is the number of beds with detainees growing?,Is there a shortage of beds with detainees?
Did Arlene Foster say that DUP delivered “an extra billion pounds” for Northern Ireland?,"Did Foster actually provide ""an extra billion pounds"" for Northern Ireland?",Did Foster directly deliver the extra billion pounds to Northern Ireland?,Was Foster the leader of DUP?,Can you tell if Foster delivered the extra billion pounds?
Has there been any question about a woman's right to make her own decisions about reproductive health care?,Has there been any question about a woman's right to make her own decisions about reproductive health care?,Was there a question regarding whether women have a right to make their own decisions about reproductive health care?
Did governor Dayton lower his average two-year increase in spending to 1.7 percent per year?,Was the increase in Minnesota state spending when Dayton was governor higher than a two-year period?,"When were the year Dayton became governor, did the average two-year increase in state spending decrease by 2.1 percent?"
"Did over 360,000 Pennsylvanians fight on the side of the Union to defeat the flag, that Confederate flag?",Did more Black soldiers come from Pennsylvania than any other state in the nation?,Did Pennsylvanians have less Black soldiers than any other state in the nation?,Did more Black soldiers come from Pennsylvania than any other state in the nation?
Were the 2008 spending levels sufficient to balance the budget?,Is the national debt expected to be half the size by 2020 based on the 2013 budget?,Is the debt to GDP ratio high enough?,Are the financial policies mentioned in this passage reasonable?,Are a larger portion of the national debts still in public hands?
Did Bush enact a tax cut?,Did this budget enact a tax cut?,Did Bush enact tax cuts that are similar to those enacted in other countries?,Did Bush enact tax cuts that were similar to those enacted in other countries?,Did any of these measures result in a doubling of American income?
Was Goldberg panicking after O'Donnell's negative remarks on her in the summer of 2023?,Did O'Donnell say something negative about Goldberg in the summer of 2023?,Did Goldberg panic after O'Donnell's negative remarks on her?,Would O'Donnell have considered using a negative word in the summer of 2023?
Do I need a bottle of vodka in my pool for this method?,Does the vodka have to last a specific time?,Do I need to throw out a bottle after this method?,Are the instructions clear?,Does the video show the process clearly?,Is vodka a tad corrosive?
"Does the amount of back taxes owed by the 40 aides exceed $333,485?","Does the number of back taxes owed by the 40 aides exceed $333,485?",Is there any evidence that the 40 aides are personally liable for back taxes?,Are these aides currently employed at Obama's administration?,Are these aides making payments to Obama?
Did this information come from the Bureau of Labor statistics?,"Are there 850,000 jobs tied to this industry?",Is this data accurate?,"Does Ohio have 850,000 jobs tied to this industry?","Is Ohio the only state with 850,000 jobs tied to this industry?",Is this industry considered a major contributor to the Ohio economy?
Was the average senior affected by Romney's plan?,Would every senior be expected to pay $460 for Social Security?,Could the average senior pay more per year under Romney's plan?,Is the average senior likely to pay more on a yearly basis?,Does Romney's plan cover the cost of raising seniors' benefits?
Do 100 scientific studies support that cannabis cures cancer?,Is cannabis safe for people to smoke?,Are all medical studies conclusive that cannabis cures cancer?,Have other studies shown that cannabis cures cancer?,Are there any other sources that have validated cannabis cures cancer?,Do the scientific studies that support cannabis cures cancer include peer reviewed literature?
Did Obama wait six months to declare swine flu an emergency?,Did Obama wait more than six months to declare swine flu an emergency after thousands died?,Did Obama call swine flu an emergency following millions of deaths?,Is there evidence for Obama to have called swine flu an emergency in the middle of the disease outbreak?
Are fewer children diagnosed as having malnutrition than are being treated?,Are fewer children diagnosed as having malnutrition than are being treated?,Are fewer children diagnosed as having malnutrition than are being treated?,Are fewer children diagnosed as having malnutrition than are being treated?,Does the prevalence of malnutrition vary greatly based on age?
Did the Dhaka Metro Rail goods theft occur in the city where the theft took place?,Has any person been arrested for stealing Metro Rail goods at this time?,Was the metro rail goods theft attributed to an Indian citizen?,Can there be any indication that Dhaka Metro Rail goods stealing occurred in Bangladesh?
Is there a chance for the moon to appear more than one year later?,Do these events combine for an unusual occurrence?,Do the celestial entities that combine to produce the moon have any overlap in any respect?,Do these celestial events happen on the same date?,Are these celestial events consistent with an unusual occurrence?,Are these celestial events related to one another?
Was $5.1 billion received by Illinois in an elementary school?,Was $5.1 billion of that money used for equity and diversity?,Did Illinois receive $5.1 billion in a elementary school?,Does this state receive any other money in the past?,Was this state's elementary school in operation for many years?,Does Illinois also receive any money from other institutions in the past?
Did Obama throw 32 million people off of health care?,Did Obama have plans to remove health care coverage?,Did Obama push for a reduction in health care coverage?,Does Obama support the individual mandate?,Can Obama regulate health care?,Has Obama enacted an individual mandate?,Does Obama advocate health care reforms?
Did the video show a live performance for the tractor rally?,Was this footage taken prior to the rally?,Does this video exist?,Did the farmers demonstrate at the rally during the rehearsal?,Did this rally take place at a venue?,Did the farmers rehearse on the day of the rally?
Does COVID-19 vaccine have a survival rate of 99.97%?,Can COVID-19 vaccines cause an infection?,Can COVID-19 vaccines cause the death of people?,Have Covid-19 vaccines killed many people?,Does COVID-19 vaccines help prevent COVID-19?
Did Arogya Setu take 10 months to develop?,Was Arogya Setu one of many apps that needed a lot of time to develop?,Were there any other apps that did not take 10 months to develop?,Did other apps take 10 months to develop?,Was Arogya Setu worth the money invested by the developer in development?
Does Article 30(A) specifically exclude schools from teaching Gita?,Is it only applicable in religious schools?,Does article 30(A) have any specific prohibitions that prevent teaching Gita?,Are any other religious schools prohibited from teaching Gita?,Are the policies requiring religious schools to teach Gita still in force?
Did almost nine out of ten jobs that Ohio lost be lost to other states?,Was Fisher responsible for this loss of jobs?,Was Fisher the person responsible for this loss of jobs?,Did Fisher get these jobs?,Did Fisher lose jobs?,Did Fisher lose jobs because of his party?
Will Colorado residents be charged 54 cents more per gallon of gas beginning in 2023?,Is there any guarantee the increase will not be felt by other citizens?,Will people have to pay more on the gas station bill?,Does the hike affect a large number of people?,Has it been extended to other cities?
Are less than 5% of carbon dioxide emissions caused by man?,Can man cause 30% of today's atmospheric carbon dioxide?,Can man cause 20% of today's atmospheric carbon dioxide?,Are most man-made greenhouses created by nature?,Can man affect the emission of fossil fuels?,Can man cause more climate change than other entities?,Can man be a cause of more climate change than any other entities?
Did Villagers protest against BJP workers in Uttar Pradesh?,Did Villagers stop an MLA's two-wheeler?,Are Villagers protesting against BJP workers in Uttar Pradesh?,Are Villagers protesting against BJP workers in Uttar Pradesh?,Did Villagers protest in Uttar Pradesh?
Are there independent analysts who have endorsed Trump?,Is the debt amount that Trump would add in 2020 considered to be an increase in current debt?,Are there any independent experts who claim Trump would add more debt to existing debt than his proposed debt?,"Would this additional debt increase increase overall debt, or specifically the debt amount?"
Did pandemics occur every 100 years from start to end?,Does pandemic occur every 200 years?,Is it true pandemics occur every 200 years?,Does pandemics occur every 100 years?,Is it true pandemics occur every 100 years from start to end?
"Did the Marcos family ""have no chance"" to respond to the P203-billion estate tax case when it was in court?",Did Marcos family have any chance to respond to the estate tax case in court because they are in exile in Hawaii?,Did Marcos family receive justice as a result of the Estate Tax case?
Did the CBO agree with this claim?,Did the CBO report back up this claim?,"Is it true that if the CBO was wrong, there would be 8 million people on Obamacare today compared to there numbers?",Would CBO support or disapprove of this claim if it was true?
Did a 13-year-old girl have a heart stopping vaccine after she received it?,Is a 1 year old girl in critical care right now in a hospital?,Is the girl in critical care?,Are any parents of these 13 year olds or their kids in critical care?,Was the vaccine used by this 13 year old in Halifax?
Did anyone have their name removed from the picture?,Did the photograph reveal that a student is missing?,Is the name of the student still in question?,Are any additional details in the photo made known?,Is the picture part of a larger story?,Is there any confirmation the photos depicted a student who was retaken?,Is the subject of this story believed to have been killed?
Is the electric scooter and air fryer promotion for £3?,Can I find out whether the air fryer is a real deal or a special deal?,Can I buy one of these products in Argos?,Is Argos a premium brand?,Has Argos made a lot of money in promoting electric scooters?
Did Rick Scott plead the Fifth when he got caught for Medicare fraud?,Did Rick Scott plead the Fifth in court as a way to avoid jail time?,Do people who plead the Fifth often get caught for Medicare fraud?,Does Rick Scott plead the Fifth more than many people?,Has the author stated a statement that shows he did not plead the Fifth?
Does the information about the possible negative effects on cancer clinics come from an independent analysis of the findings?,Is the funding for clinics being cut due to the reduction in cancer funding?,Will cancer clinics close?,Will the proposed cuts in cancer funding have major negative effects on care?,Does the 45% cut mean that medical costs are being increased?,Is reducing cancer payment going to cause medical costs to increase?,Is the cost of providing care for cancer patients being increased?
Did Uttar Pradesh Drop COVID Cases To Zero in 71 of 75 districts In 24 hours after Implementing Ivermectin Protocol?,Is this protocol approved for public use by the Department of Health?,Has this protocol been used since the program started in 2000?,Is the Ivermectin protocol effective at reducing COVID cases?
Did Pelosi stayed at a five star hotel on this trip?,"Did the trip cost $10,000 per person?",Was the price of the trip comparable to a high priced hotel?,Was Pelosi's trip a one-time event?,Have Pelosi's trips in the past included any other types of travel?
Did Rhode Island provide pregnant women with this offer?,Did Rhode Island give pregnant women health insurance in addition to this offer?,Did Rhode Island give pregnant women a cash card worth $400 a month?,Did Rhode Island provide pregnant women with a cash card with $275 a month on it?,Was Rhode Island giving pregnant women $135 a month to spend on food?
Did Facebook allow users to get a free pass for Alton Towers?,Would a Facebook post that was shared and commented on receive a free pass?,Have fans of Alton Towers shared and commented on other posts?,Do those user comments indicate that the post has been shared and commented on?,Do all the comments appear on the original post?,Do users who make comments on these posts also get free passes at Alton Towers?
Would raising the minimum wage to $15 per hour destroy 3.7 million jobs?,Are there ways to avoid destroying jobs?,Is this a realistic outcome?,Would the minimum wage increase save any jobs?,Is the current minimum wage based on hourly earnings?,Is this an accurate estimate?,Is the number of minimum wage jobs projected by this survey over the entire year?
Are children under 18 prohibited from buying SIM cards in Nigeria?,Is this ban enforced by any authorities?,Do countries have similar restrictions on this activity?,Is there evidence that these restrictions would be enforced in other states?,Are there any laws that specifically ban this practice in Nigeria?,Is there sufficient evidence that this policy is enforced by any government authority?
Has Election Commission announced the election for Punjab from February 4?,Has this election been held in any other location than Punjab?,Has Punjab had any elections before and after February 4?,Has Punjab held elections since January 20?,Have any elections occurred in the state that started on January 4?,Has Punjab had any elections since November 15?
Did Fernando Marcos Sr. go on to obtain a grade of almost 98% when he took the bar exam in 1939?,Did Marcos Sr. go on to obtain a grade of almost 98% when he took the bar exam in 1939?,Did Marcos Sr. go on to obtain a grade of almost 98% when he took the bar exam in 1939?,Did Marcos Sr. go on to achieve a grade of almost 98% when he took the bar exam in 1939?
Does a gluten-free diet guarantee pregnancy?,Does a gluten-free diet guarantee pregnancy?,Does the Gluten-Free Diet guarantee pregnancy?,Does a Gluten-Free diet guarantee pregnancy?,Does this claim come from an outside source?,Do I need a doctor to believe this?,Does the gluten-free diet guarantee pregnancy?
Is it true that Jim Carrey said a 30 day national media shut down would solve the world's problems?,Is it true that Jim Carrey stated that a 30-day national media shut down would solve the world's problems?,Is it true that Jim Carrey said that a 30-day national media shut down would solve the world's problems?
Do the majority of Americans in prison are drug dealers?,Has the US had the highest incarceration rate in the world?,Are most Americans in prison for drug crimes?,Is it common for Americans to be drug dealers?,Do more Americans have more than one drug conviction?,Is incarceration common in US?
Are there any other details available?,Has Congress won the election?,Was the boy offering namaz on the road?,Immediately after the election was this video posted?,Can we infer that it is the first namaz offering to be posted on the internet?,Will Congress go on to win the election in 2023?
Did the video show people mourning after the earthquake?,Did the earthquake happen in the U.S?,Was the earthquake in Afghanistan?,Does the video explain what people are mourning?,Does the video give clear details on what people are mourning?,Was the earthquake caused by people?,Is this video a recent release?
Did the session end before 9pm?,Did any bills that were pending go before the last day of the General Assembly?,Did the Governor declare a session?,Did any bills go before the last day of the General Assembly?,Did all bills go before the last day of the General Assembly on the last night of the General Assembly?,Did any bills go after the last day of the General Assembly?,Did any bills go before the last day of the general assembly the last day of the General Assembly?
Is JC Penny offering a coupon for every person who shares this link?,Was this link created at some point in the past?,Is JC Penny offering an additional coupon with every link shared?,Did this link generate a positive response from the readers?,Does this discount coupon have a validity period?
Did Biden advocate for blanket amnesty or halting border wall construction?,Did Biden call for blanket amnesty or halting border wall construction?,"Did Biden discuss ""blanket amnesty"" in his first speech?",Did Biden support a border wall or bill that would have targeted illegal immigrants?
Does the NIH now list ivermectin as a COVID-19 therapy?,Does Ivermectin decrease the mortality risk associated with COVID-19?,Are there specific NIH guidelines for COVID-19?,Are the FDA guidelines for ivermectin consistently reviewed?
Has the mean global temperature declined during this past decade?,Has average global temperature decreased?,Have both mean and average global temperatures decreased?,- Have the official figures in this graph indicated a decrease in global temperature over the past decade?,- Have all of these official data been consistent with the study?,- Have the official figures been consistent with the study?
Did the EU demand that the UK pay a £39 billion divorce bill?,Are these divorce payments related to the EU's demand for the UK to pay?,Does the European Union have a right to demand these divorce payments?,Is the amount of money this union requests to be paid per annum calculated?
Did Kyrillos vote against women's health care in his state of residence?,Was Kyrillos not able to vote for women in regards to health care?,Did Kyrillos vote against women's health care in his state of residence?,Did Kyrillos vote against women's health care in any other state?
Was the plane allegedly carrying Wagner chief Yevgeny Prigozhin airworthy when it crashed?,Was Anton Gerashchenko's video of the crash public?,Did the video appear on the Ukraine-based government site?,Was Anton Gerashchenko the official that posted this video?,Did Anton Gerashchenko share this video with any other people?,Did Anton Gerashchenko share this video on his social media account?,Has Anton Gerashchenko attributed this photo to an unknown source?
"Did this teen death caused ""orgasmic shock""?",Did this teen masturbate 46 times in a row?,Did this teen masturbate while drunk?,Did this teen masturbate with intent?,"Did this teen die of ""orgasmic shock""?"
Did Radical Muslims kill a Hindu girl that refused to convert to Islam?,Did Radical Muslims die as a result of killing a Hindu girl?,Has Radical Muslims killed multiple Hindu girls?,Did Radical Muslims kill a Hindu girl when a Hindu girl refused to convert to Islam?,Did Radical Muslims kill the Hindu girl in a public place?
"Has NASA offered $100,000 to stay in bed for 60 days?",Did NASA pay money to people who wanted to stay in bed for 60 days?,Do most people want to stay in bed for 60 days?,Has the offer been rebuffed by the NASA?,Do most people have access to computers and/or other devices to stay in bed for 60 days?
Does the Obama Administration claim that 20 million people do not get access to healthcare?,Does the Trump Administration say that 13 million people still do not receive healthcare?,Does the Trump Administration say that 20 million people do not get access to health care?,Did the Trump Administration claim that there are 23 million people that still do not get access to healthcare?,Did the Trump Administration claim that the majority of Americans receive not enough health care?
Did Hindu population decrease from 60% in 1991 to 51.88% in 2011?,Did the Muslim population in Hyderabad increase from 31% in 1991 to 43.55% in 2011?,Have the Hindu population decreased from 60% in 1991 to 51.88% in 2011?,Is the Muslim population growing or decreasing in Hyderabad?,Did the Hindu population increase or decrease in Hyderabad?
Is this reporter from an NPR publication or a news website?,Has this story ever been published before on CNN?,Does this article have a news article attached to it?,Did this crime occur on a police or a family member's property?,Is this type of behavior a common one?
Have all provisional ballots been counted in Ohio?,Do many provisional ballots go uncounted?,Can any of the provisional ballots be counted?,Is Ohio a common place in the country for provisional ballots?,Is Ohio a country with the most provisional ballots?
Was the Russian air defence system destroyed in attack on Armenia in 2020?,Did the Russian air defence system attack Armenia in an attempt to retaliate against the attack?,Was the Russian air defence system destroyed in attack on Armenia in 2020?,Did the Russian air defence system destroy in attack on Armenia in 2020?
"Did there have 44000 votes counted in a local election with a voting population of less than 7,000?",Did the election outcome result in any legal proceedings?,Did a high court overturn the election results?,Has the electorate for the town in question increased since this election?,Has the local election voting population decreased since the election?
Did the Wisconsin state budget backed by Gov. Scott Walker and Republican lawmakers leave our technical colleges funded at 1989 levels?,Did this budget include any provisions for technical colleges that would increase funding levels to their 1989 levels?,Did the 2013-2015 state budget end up keeping the funding levels of our technical colleges at 1989 levels?
Did Biden propose a Constitution Amendment to overturn Roe v Wade in 1982?,Did Biden propose a Constitution Amendment to overturn Roe v Wade in 1982?,Did Biden 'discuss' a constitutional amendment to overturn Roe v Wade?,Do Biden proposals for overturning Roe v Wade have any ill effects on health care?
Is the Obama administration releasing $160 million to Pennsylvania for health insurance plans that cover legal abortion?,Is Pennsylvania paying the Obama administration for health insurance plans that cover legal abortion?,Has any government funding of health care policies covered legal abortion?,Has Pennsylvania's Medicaid policy ever included the provision of legal abortion?
Does Martin Jones have dementia?,Is Martin Jones in the UK?,Did Martin Jones report missing?,Have criminal charges been laid against him?,Have any other people reported missing the man?,Are there any information from the reports about Martin Jones?,Is there a police officer at the house of Martin Jones?,Is there any information about the other missing people?
Is the Supreme Court able to extend a presidents term up to three years if he's acquitted in an impeachment trial by the Senate?,Is the Senate impeachment trial required for this to happen?,Can the Supreme Court extend President Trump's term by up to three years if he's acquitted in an impeachment trial by the Senate?
Is this a true picture?,Has this a true image?,Is this image an authentic one?,Can people from all around the world have access to this image?,Is this image of a Irish Greyhound authentic?,Have we received this image in the last ten years?,Can these people obtain this picture on their own?
Did Hilal Ahmed Rather flew one of the five Rafale jets which reached India from France on July 29?,Is the name of the plane that made this trip?,Has the Air Commodore returned to India?,Was the aircrew of this plane employed?,Did the pilot of this plane meet his military qualifications?
Did Bill McCollum spend more money than expected on campaign ads in 2014?,Does McCollum spend money on TV ads?,Did McCollum spend money on commercials last year?,Did McCollum spend any money on commercials last year?,Have McCollum's ads been particularly successful?,Are McCollum's ads successful in establishing a positive perception of his brand?
Do Alabama police have evidence pertaining to black alleged crimes?,Has Alabama police uncovered evidence in connection to alleged crimes?,Have Alabama police conducted investigations into alleged black alleged crimes?,Does Alabama police have evidence on black men?,Is there sufficient evidence for white alleged alleged white alleged white alleged white alleged white alleged white alleged black alleged white alleged white alleged black alleged white alleged black alleged white alleged white alleged black alleged black alleged white alleged black alleged white alleged black alleged white alleged black alleged black alleged white?
Do Canada and the United States take a similar approach to reducing the number of migrant visas?,Do Canada and the United States have a more uniform policy towards skill-based migrant visas?,Is Canada set aside 30% of migrant visas for skills-based migrant visas?
Would the government provide cash assistance to families under poverty alleviation measures?,Does cash assistance amount to P3000 monthly?,Can poverty alleviation be provided through a tax credit?,Is there any other income assistance programs available?,Is there any other income support program available in the Philippines?,Is there an estimate on how much the P3000 income credit is going to be?
Did any written transcript accurately transcribe the last words of Elijah McClain in a video recording before he died?,Did any written transcript accurately transcribe the last words of Elijah McClain in a video recording before he died?,Are any written transcripts accurately transcribed of the last words of Elijah McClain in a video recording before he died?
Would the elimination of every automobile be offset by one volcano exploding?,Would the elimination of every automobile be offset by an exploding volcano?,Are there fewer automobiles than there are volcanoes currently?,Are there fewer volcanoes currently active?,Does the existence of volcanoes prevent the elimination of automobiles?
Did Nike pay $35 for its logo but later gave the designer shares and a ring?,Did Nike pay the designer $55 for his logo?,Did Nike pay the designer shares and a ring?,Did Nike pay the designer a ring?,Did Nike pay the designer $50 for his logo?,Did Nike pay the designer $55 for his logo?
Did Fluoridation save any money?,Does Fluoridation save the average city $38 per year?,Did Fluoridation save the average city $9 per year?,Is it worth investing in Fluoridation for city dental costs?,Are there other benefits of Fluoridation besides the estimated savings?
"Did the four states of Rajasthan, Chhattisgarh and Madhya Pradesh win elections?",Did Muslim organisations celebrate the victory of the party after the election?,Did Muslims celebrate by chanting pro-Pak slogans after winning elections in these states?,Did the party win the three states?
"Are there recent laws that prohibit people from self-isolation and/or a £1,000 fine from Serco?",Are laws such as these commonly used?,Are any laws specifically directed at self-isolation?,Is Serco accountable for these laws?,Are there any other laws that prohibit self-isolation/self-detention?
Did Obamacare pass by one vote in the Senate?,Would Warner's vote have prevented Obamacare to pass?,Did Warner make a vote in a vote to pass Obamacare?,Would Warner's vote have prevented Obamacare from passing?,Did Clinton make a vote to support Obamacare?,Is Mark Warner an actual senator?
Was DeKalb County recently recognized as one of the best sheriff’s departments in the nation?,Is there evidence that DeKalb County has one of the best sheriff’s departments in the nation?,Is it true that DeKalb County has one of the best sheriff’s departments in the nation?
Did Kerala request a loan from NABARD to deal with COVID-19?,Did Kerala ask NABARD to provide a loan for dealing with COVID-19?,Did Kerala request a loan from NABARD to deal with COVID-19?,Was there any conflict of interest in this information?
Did Turner ever live in the U.S.?,Does Turner even acknowledge being born in the U.S.?,Did Turner ever use the U.S. a foreign country?,Did Turner lose her citizenship in 2013?,Did Turner ever go to prison?,Have Turner ever violated U.S. laws in Switzerland?,Did Turner ever get away from U.S. law?
Did two Muslim men confess to being a part of Nai Jihad?,Did two Muslim men confess to being a part of Nai Jihad?,Did the two Muslim men confess to being part of Nai Jihad?,Did any police or other official confirm this information to the media?
Do German newspapers guarantee that 75 per cent of their articles are factual?,Is the factual content of a German newspaper guaranteed?,Can a German newspaper call itself a newspaper?,Is there any evidence to support the claim that German newspapers lack the quality to be a newspaper?,Were German newspapers not required to guarantee that their facts are based on established sources?
Did Vice President Sara Duterte steal money from a secret budget fund?,Was the money stolen from the Office of the Vice President?,Are there other allegations against Duterte?,Did Duterte steal more than the sum of P125 million from the secret budget fund?,Does Duterte have a criminal record?
Is it true that $400 million will not be used to add new lanes to congested roadways?,Is this money used for other types of roads?,Will this money be used to reduce congestion?,Will this money be used to help with bus and rideshare?,Will this money be used to assist in reducing congestion?
"Does it cost a total of $20,000 to shelter and serve each immigrant family?","Did it cost a total of $20,000 to infrastruct their house and pay taxes?",Was the immigrant family income comparable to all households in the country?,Did the immigrants receive any aid from the U.S.?
"Did Allen's budget increase the national debt by $16,400 per second in the Senate?",Does the debt amount increase by every second of Allen serving in the Senate?,Was Allen's debt increased by all the seconds he served in the Senate?,Did Allen vote for budgets that increased the debt in general?
"According to the national bureau of statistics, how many registered doctors were there in Lagos?",How many doctors were there according to the national bureau of statistics?,How many people are associated with the doctor in Lagos?,"Is there a total of 2,000 registered doctors in Lagos?",Is the total number of doctors in Lagos based on the national bureau of statistics?
Would the provisions of Texas Senate Bill 17 allow doctors to refuse LGBTQ patients?,Could doctors refuse to take a patient who is LGBTQ if they don't approve of their stances?,Would laws prohibit discrimination against LGBTQ patients if they are not supportive of it?,Would LGBT patients have to choose whether to take a doctor's side of the story?
Has global warming taken place since the Medieval Warming?,Do global temperatures have cooled after the Medieval Warming?,Does global climate change occur at the same time as global warming?,Does global warming occur more pronounced after the Medieval Warming?,Is global warming a part of global weather patterns?
Does the photograph show two guns?,Was Tamir Rice gun-free when he was shot?,Was the photographer in a photoshoot?,Can we assume these shots were taken for a magazine article?,Are the images in this article taken in the last two weeks of October?,Is the photograph accurate?
Did Ginger receive an accurate medical review?,Does ginger kill cancer versus chemotherapy?,Is the FDA's report accurate?,Did the FDA research with respect to this research?,Are the results based on a study?,Did this study focus on ginger specifically?,Do these findings in support of the findings in this report?
Did Perdue mismanage Pillowtex in any way?,Did Pillowtex lose thousands of people?,"Did Pillowtex lay off nearly 8,000 people?",Do any of these facts support the claim that Perdue mismanaged Pillowtex?,"Would Perdue have been sued for lost productivity if a company that laid off 8,000 employees did not fix their mistakes?"
"Did Clinton receive more than 800,000 non-citizen votes in the 2016 presidential election?",Did conservative news organizations and the Trump administration report this data?,Did Trump administration reports this data?,Did conservative news organizations or the Trump administration report this information?,Did Trump administration reports this data?,Was there an academic study that cited this data?
"Did Allen vote to end Pell grants for 84,000 students?",Did Allen vote to end Pell grants for all students?,Did Allen vote to end Pell grants for all students?,Was Allen the one to vote to end Pell grants?,Was Allen's vote to end Pell grants for all students?
Did Democrats comit fraud on elections in 2016?,Did Democrats commit fraud in 2016?,Were Democrats involved in fraud in 2016?,Was any video evidence that this was the case?,Did the video show evidence for a Democratic fraud attack?,Can you tell us what was the reason for the Democratic fraud?,Does this video accurately portray the Democratic fraud attack?
Did Ukraine Sentence a man to 15 Years in Prison For Displaying a Russian Flag?,Is it known if Ukraine Sentenced a man to 15 years in prison for Displaying a Russian Flag?,Is Ukraine known if Ukraine Sentenced a man to 15 years in prison for Displaying a Russian Flag?
Do Californians really need to raise minimum wages?,Is Florida adding one million jobs despite minimum wage raising in California?,Are any of these jobs likely to go to individuals with low incomes?,Are any of these jobs likely to be lost based on minimum wage raising in California?,Is it accurate to say Florida is adding jobs despite minimum wage raising in California?
Are the distribution centers in this location paid up to $12.75 an hour?,Does the employee average that salary?,Does this company pay these positions?,Do the workers who work at these distribution centers make the amount they are paid?,Is this company's work force highly skilled?,Is the Amazon workforce highly skilled?
"Did Hillary Clinton send comedians to India for the “Make Chai, Not War” tour?","Are all comedians in India part of the “Make Chai, Not War” tour?","Did Hillary Clinton send comedians on a tour of India for the “Make Chai, Not War” tour?"
Did the federal authorities deport migrant arrivals?,Did the state deport the migrants within 24 hours?,Is it true that the National Guard deported migrants at the site of the Martha’s Vineyard migrant arrivals?,Is the national guard involved in the deportation of migrants?
"Did UPS leave 15,000 employees’ spouses without health insurance?","Did UPS leave 15,000 employees’ spouses without health insurance?","Did UPS leave 15,000 employees’ spouses without health insurance?","Did UPS leave 15,000 employees’ spouses with health insurance without employer subsidy?","Did UPS leave 15,000 employees’ spouses with health insurance without employer subsidy?"
Did the advertisers pull out their placements in response to Marcos' decision?,Did Marcos decline to participate in the series?,Did advertisers pull out their placements?,Did Marcos cancel his participation in the series?,Was this series of televised interviews cancelled?,Did Marcos cancel his participation?,Was this show's revenue affected?
Is the anticipated relocation of Mercedes-Benz USA based in Atlanta going to create at least 800 jobs?,Will the anticipated relocation of Mercedes-Benz USA based in Atlanta creating employment in general?,Has the anticipated relocation of Mercedes-Benz USA based in Atlanta been funded by any specific source?,Will the projected relocation of Mercedes-Benz USA based in Atlanta creating employment in general be funded by any specific source?
Are 70 to 75 percent of students with remedial math who leave high schools in Texas required to pay to take remedial math at community college?,Are remedial math students in Texas required to pay to take remedial math at community college?,Is it considered normal to have students with remedial math who leave high schools in Texas required to pay to take remedial math at community college?
Did the AstraZeneca / Oxford vaccine contain MRC-5 cells originally taken from an aborted human foetus?,Did the MRC-5 cells originate from an aborted human foetus?,Did the MRC-5 cells originate from a previously aborted human foetus?
Did Ronaldo donate his golden shoes to the children of Palestine?,Did Ronaldo donate his golden shoes to the children of Palestine?,Does Ronaldo donate his golden shoes to the children of Palestine?,Did Ronaldo donate his golden shoes to the children of Palestine in 2011?,Do any of the children of Palestine receive his donation?
"Did the majority of voters in the 2014 elections say "" we don't want Obamacare""?","Did the majority of voters in the 2014 elections say "" we don't want amnesty ""?",Did Obamacare and amnesty receive votes in the 2014 elections?,Did the majority of voters in the 2014 elections vote in favor of any of these policies?
Is there evidence that he mentioned Fannie/Freddie as a serious problem a few years ago?,Has he mentioned the same thing two years prior?,Is it a recurrent issue involving Fannie/Freddie?,Are there records of the recurrent issue?,Is there evidence that he previously talked about Fannie/Freddie as a serious problem a few years ago?
Has the map shown that a majority of the United States will be submerged in 30 years?,Will the majority of the United States be underwater in 30 years?,Are any states on this map predicted to be submerged in 30 years?,Are any regions predicted to be submerged in 30 years?,Are all US states in the map projected to be submerged in 30 years?
Do the ghosts of the murdered teens return to kill and skin the parents of the narrator?,Did the parents of the missing teens tell their son of their presence?,Did the ghosts of the murdered teens return to kill and skin the parents of the subsequent victim?,Did the victim's parents fail to tell them of their presence?,Is this story the origin of the ghosts of the murdered teens?
Did BJP candidate promise quality beef to be in government if elected in 2021?,Did BJP candidate promise quality beef in 2021 assembly polls?,Is BJP candidate a tainted candidate for the 2021 assembly polls?,Does the BJP politician promise quality beef in 2021?
Did Ryan's opponent attack Romney on Medicare?,Did Ryan's opponent attack Romney on Medicare Advantage?,Did the opponent charge that Medicare Advantage is safe?,Was Obama's opponent true about Medicare Advantage in the original poll?,Was Obama's opponent true about Medicare Advantage in the second poll?,Was Obama's opponent true about Medicare Advantage?
Is this claim false?,Is this claim valid?,Was this claim made by Myanmar authorities?,Is this claim true?,Has any evidence been provided of the claim?,Is this claim true?,Is this claim untrue?,Is it a current practice for Myanmar to require the vaccination of all patients of a health professional prior to this date?
Was Hillary Clinton's body double replaced during the investigation?,"Was Hillary Clinton's body double identified after being reported dead on September 11, 2016?",Did Hillary Clinton receive compensation from the body double?,Did Hillary Clinton receive compensation from the body double after the investigation into her death?,Are there other cases where rumors about the death of Hillary Clinton's body double were spread?
Did an infant die after receiving a Covid-19 vaccine shot?,Did this vaccine prevent or reverse the outbreak of SV4 in the United States?,Did the vaccine increase the chances of child deaths?,Did this vaccine create a resurgence of SV4 in the United States?,Do vaccines kill children?
Did images from May 2022 after the Russian-Ukraine war of the destroyed bridge in Kiev?,Was the destroyed bridge repaired in Ukraine during the same period?,Was there any image of the destroyed bridge?,Can anyone identify it?,Are the pictures of the destroyed bridge from May 2022 from the Ukraine war?
Did Obama not include citizenship-type questions during the previous administration?,Was Obama not the first presidential to exclude citizenship-type questions from the 2010 presidential election?,Was Obama the first to remove citizenship-type questions from the 2010 presidential election?,Did Obama not remove citizenship-type questions from the 2010 presidential election?,Are these questions no longer a requirement for the current presidential race?
Did AZT die of the actual AIDS virus during the 80s-90s?,Has Fauci ever raised concerns about the death of people from AZT?,Describe Fauci's work with AIDS?,Is there evidence to support the claim that AZT caused death from the actual AIDS virus?
Is the photograph in Florida?,Was the alligator captured in Florida?,Does the alligator belong to the government?,Is the photograph in Florida?,Was there any other alligators in Florida?,Does the photograph feature any other animals?,Is it true alligators are large?
Did the UK have ZERO school shootings since its change in gun laws?,Did the US have any school shootings since it changed gun laws?,Have the UK had any school shootings since its change in gun laws?,Did the US have any school shootings after it changed gun laws?,Has any school shooting occurred in the UK since it changed gun laws?
Did Kennedy ever say this alleged plot before he was shot down?,Did Kennedy say this plan before he was shot down?,Were any of Kennedy's actions planned before he was shot down?,"Are all the individuals in this ""plot"" known?",Did Kennedy try to hide the plot?
Did this wasp have the dreaded busty appearance?,Was this wasp photographed in the year 2021?,Did this wasp have any known phobias?,Did this wasp have a unique name?,Did this wasp have an interesting sting?,Did this wasp have any other unique characteristics?
Did the funeral director say 95% the vaccine is causing mass death?,Did the death rate increase with the vaccine?,Was the vaccine used to cause mass death?,Did the death rate drop for the virus that caused the vaccine?,Did the vaccine cause the deaths?,Were the vaccine safety claims accurate?,Did the vaccine cause mass deaths?,Were the vaccine safety claims based on actual evidence?
Did Clinton want China to do well?,Is it true that China has had the worst year in 57 years?,Has China had higher GDP?,Is Clinton advising China on their economy in China?,Do these statements support this suggestion?,Do the comments reflect that the Chinese are in recession and are facing a severe challenge?
Are the number of people killed annually by rifles equal to the number of people killed annually by illegals?,Does the number of people killed annually by illegals exceed the number killed by all rifles combined?,Do these numbers reflect a total year?,Do the number of people killed each year by firearms equal the number of people killed by all guns combined?
Did the bridge collapse during this stunt?,Was the person in the bathtub being pulled by geese alone or with a group?,Was this stunt part of a circus?,Was the number of people who died in this accident calculated?,Was the disaster triggered by a circus stunt?,Did this stunt take place at the Yarmouth circus?
"Did 175,689 ballots need investigating in Maricopa County?",Did there exist more than a hundred ballots in need of investigating?,Did voter turn to the Internet to file a ballot?,Are there any types of ballots needing investigating?,Does Maricopa County have a specific count of those ballots that have been deemed not to be eligible?
"Did 14,000 abandon wind turbines litter the US?",How many wind turbines are in the United States?,Did wind turbines in the United States have any environmental impact?,Would a landowner have to erect another wind turbine if that would increase the cost of the project?,Do wind turbines in the United States cause the majority of the ecological damage and storm damage?
Did the government intentionally inject a vaccine into epidurals between 2010 and 2014 to hurt Black women?,Do the epidurals have a negative effect on a pregnant black woman?,Was the injection of the vaccine a deliberate strategy to hurt black women?,Can epidural injections be used to infect and harm people?
"Are the University of Texas students ""signing a petition seeking the legal right to abort newborn babies up to five-years-old?","Are the University of Texas students ""signing a petition seeking the legal right to abort newborn babies up to five-years-old?","""?"
Did Thailand claim to be the top nation reversing COVID-19?,Did Thailand do a comprehensive review of its COVID-19 fighting capability?,Did Thailand rank 1st in COVID-19?,Do any other states rank better than Thailand?,Did Thailand cite an individual data source to support the claim of national reversal?
"Did this rally take place on November 14th, 2020?",Was this rally pro-Trump?,Is there any evidence to indicate that the attendees of this rally were protesting the Trump Administration?,Did this rally occur during the day of this election?,Were this group's attendance a significant proportion of the overall attendance?
Did the locomotive sink after slipping on wet rails?,Was the locomotive ever recovered after being buried?,Has the locomotive always been buried by the bridge?,Has any part of the locomotive been recovered from the bridge's foundations?,Have any parts been recovered from the bridge's foundation?,Is any concrete on the foundation still in place today?
Does this bill apply to traffic in the Portland-area?,Would any drivers not pay toll charges if they return in 12 hours?,Is this bill in any way related to the California-bound highway system?,Would anyone pay toll fees if they return in 12 hours?,Do any of the above regulations apply in the Portland-area?
Was Georgia's rejection of an expansion of Medicaid in violation of the new law?,Is Georgia's rejection of an expansion of Medicaid in violation of the new law considered discriminatory by the military?,Is Georgia's refusal of an expansion of Medicaid in violation of the new law considered discriminatory by the military?
Is this statement based on information from any media?,Is it clear if Obama stated this claim in his speech?,Did Obama promise that unemployment would never go above 8 percent with this stimulus plan?,Are these estimates consistent with this stance?,Does this stance make this statement true?,Does this stance contradict the stance of a majority of media on Obama's assertions?,Is Obama's claim based on data from various media outlets?
Was a minimum of 12 years old needed for consent?,Does Harris believe consent should be lowered to a minimum of 12 years old?,Was there a reason for lowering the age of consent to a minimum of 12 years old?,Did Harris call for this increase for the age of consent in this speech?
"Did the Minister of Roads, Housing and Urban Development report say: "" With 1,950 km of new roads completed, and another 7,000 km in different phases of construction, we have kept the promise [to undertake the most aggressive road construction programme ever seen in Kenya]""?","Did the Minister of Roads, Housing and Urban Development report: "" With 1,950 km of new roads completed, and another 7,000 km in different phases of construction, we have kept the promise [to undertake the most aggressive road construction programme ever seen in Kenya]""?","Did the Minister of Roads, Housing and Urban Development report: "" With 1,?"
Is it possible that cows and pigs will start being injected with mRNA vaccines in April 2023?,Is it the first time that mRNA vaccines have been injected into animals?,Has mRNA vaccines actually been approved by a veterinarian?,Are there any legal issues with vaccines used in veterinary procedures?
Did North Carolina spend $855 less per student before the Great Recession?,Does North Carolina have the lowest per pupil spending in the nation?,Did North Carolina spend $855 less per student after the Great Recession?,Did North Carolina spend $855 less than before the Great Recession?,.. Has North Carolina spent any money on salaries during the Great Recession?,..?
Did Wisconsin employers say litigation climate is one of the most important factors affecting their expansion decisions?,Did this survey show that Wisconsin employers have told of litigation climate as one of the most important factors affecting their expansion decisions?,Does this survey indicate any data regarding how Wisconsin employers have responded to the litigation climate?,Are some types of litigation being contested in this survey?
Has President Trump signed a bill lowering the age of sexual consent?,Has President Trump signed any bills lowering the age of sexual consent?,Has President Trump signed any bills lowering the age of sexual consent?,Is the age of sexual consent under Trump legislation lower than that of the average age of consent?
Does this photograph depict a biplane buzzing a Los Angeles beach in 1911?,Did this biplane fly over a Los Angeles beach in 1911?,Can you describe what the aircraft was flying over?,Can you describe its color?,Did the biplane have two engines?,Can you provide a timeline for the airplane's duration?
Did Duterte stage an election campaign in Marawi for 2022?,Did Duterte have a war-torn city?,Is the election in Marawi the only election in the state of Siam?,Does this election squander this area’s remaining reserves?
Has the bill given immigrants a right to vote?,Does H.R. 1 give illegal immigrants the right to vote?,Does H.R. 1 authorize illegal immigrants to vote?,Are the immigrants considered illegal under H.R. 1?,Is the bill approved by a federal governmental entity?,Would the bill violate governmental requirements to qualify for a voter registration?
Did the train operating companies in the UK are a part of countries outside of these federations?,Is the majority of these countries’ train operating companies owned by one of these countries?,Is the smallest country in the world that has these kinds of trains operated a part of a nation?
Did the study states that more than 70 percent of the traffic on the Sellwood Bridge is to/from Clackamas County?,Does this study substantiate the claims made in the study?,Did The Oregonian thoroughly debunked the study in a recent article?,Did the study support the statement in The Oregonian's article?
Is there sufficient evidence to indicate that a little less than 50 percent of people in this country depend on some form of federal payment?,Is there sufficient evidence to indicate that a little less than 50 percent of the people in this country depend on some form of government benefit?,Is there sufficient evidence to indicate that a little less than 50 percent of people in this country depend on some form of federal payment?
Did Biden advise people to get vaccinated in preparation for hurricane season?,Did Biden advise anyone to get vaccinated?,Did Biden advise anyone to get vaccinated?,Did Biden advise anyone to get vaccinated in preparation for hurricane season?,Are hurricanes most likely to hit the United States on Sept. 27?
Is there any reason to massage big toe and not get rid of sinuses?,Is there any reason to see doctor if you have sinusitis?,Is it necessary to have sinus infection to massage big toe?,Is it necessary to see doctor if you have sinusitis?
Is it true that children are more likely to die following COVID-19 vaccination than unvaccinated children?,Are children 12 and under more likely to die following COVID-19 vaccination than non-vaccinated children in England?,Is the percentage of children who die following COVID-19 vaccination higher than the percentage of children who die?
Did Noor Mohammad travel to Nizamuddin despite being ill with COVID-19?,Did Noor Mohammad die from COVID-19?,Did Noor Mohammad hide his travel history in Nizamuddin?,Did Noor Mohammad die of COVID-19?
Did this trip include family relatives of Congress members?,Did the Congressional delegation to these places include all members of Congress?,Did all of these countries require approval from Congress to visit these countries?,Are these countries in the United States?,Is this trip expected to generate a big amount of revenue?,Can we trust the Congress to support these trips?
Is the person who shot three people during a protest in South Austin true to be a police officer?,Did three people die as a result of the police shooting of Jacob Blake?,Is it true that the person shot three people during a protest in South Austin true to be a police officer?
Does Toby Carvery offer free carvery for two offers to those who comment on their Facebook post?,Is there any specific way to obtain this offer?,Does Toby Carvery send carvery for two offers to those who comment on their Facebook post?,Does Toby Carvery offer free carving for two offers to those who comment on their Facebook post?
Was the decision based on proof or a guess?,Does Barrett hold a record of justice for a guilty verdict?,Did Barrett overturn the decision on who is alleged to have sexually assaulted a 19-year-old inmate?,Did Barrett specifically state this specific claim for a $6.7M verdict?
Did the state pay the ACO fewer dollars to these providers than the previous year?,Did this increase result in fewer dollars spent on healthcare services?,Did the ACO reduce the amount of money spent on health services?,Did the reduction result in fewer health services cost?,Have all health care expenses decreased for the ACO since this year?
Could the House-passed budget propose cutting funding for local programs in Ohio?,Could Ohio be negatively affected by the House-passed budget proposal?,Can the House-passed budget proposal potentially cut anti-terror funding?,Will the House-passed budget proposal increase the amount of anti-terror funding in Ohio?
Has Walker turned down any Medicaid money during this time?,Does the president have a history of declining Medicaid money?,Has Walker refused Medicaid money?,Is there evidence Walker turned down Medicaid money for a short time?,Is the president's record of declining Medicaid money clear?,Is Scott Walker's record of declining Medicaid money unclear?
Is President Rodrigo Duterte aware that Sen. Manny Pacquiao has a billion pesos debt?,Is President Rodrigo Duterte aware that Sen. Manny Pacquiao has a debt of a billion pesos?
Has Obama requested all Americans celebrate gay sex for the month of June 2016?,Has Obama asked American LGBT individuals to celebrate gay sex in other areas?,Is there evidence that Obama has requested all LGBT individuals to celebrate gay sex in other areas?,Do Obama's demands call on LGBT individuals to celebrate LGBT sex?
Did the American women's soccer team turn their back to protest before a veterans performance?,Was the U.S. women's soccer team asked to turn their back to protest at the performance?,Did the U.S. women's soccer team conduct interviews about the performance prior to the match?,Are the participants from the U.S. women's soccer team currently protesting?
Was Pacquiao an openly gay individual?,Is Pacquiao committed to supporting LGBT rights?,Does Pacquiao not condemn LGBT people?,Has Pacquiao endorsed LGBT rights in his official biography?,Does Pacquiao support LGBT people pursuing medical treatments?,Are the LGBT groups supported by a majority in the Senate?
Do NEET UG exam dates change with each year?,Are NEET UG exam dates similar to other UG exam dates?,Are NEET UG exam dates any closer than other UG exam dates?,Are the NEET UG exam dates associated with any major festivals or events in the country?,Does a specific NEET UG exam date change with each year?
Did Biden and Warnock support raising taxes on under $200k income?,Did Biden and Warnock say they are spending $1.5 billion on urban forestry '?,Does $1.05 billion support a $220k raise on income in 2019?,Does $1.5 billion support a $320k raise on income in 2019?,Is an average income level of $200k sufficient for a $320k increase in 2019?
Did the murder rate go up 34% compared to a previous governor during McAuliffe's tenure?,Did the murder rate go up every year?,Was the rape rate up every year?,Did McAuliffe's tenure in office have a rape rate higher than the pre-1991 average?
"Was das hospital zur Verfügung, eines der Drohes rzte, die nur einen Wochen später vorgezogen hatten?","Was die hospital rzte rzte, nur einen Wochen später vorgelegt hatten?","Was das hospital rzte rzte, nur eines Wochen später vorgelegt hatte?"
Do California politicians propose new legislation regarding abortions?,Has California introduced any new bills into law regarding abortions?,Did California introduce bills into law permitting abortions?,Is California introducing a bill proposing new legislation that allows women to kill their babies up to 7 days after birth?,Would California introduce a bill that allow women to kill their babies up to 7 days after birth?,Is California introducing a bill that allow women to kill their babies up to 7 days after birth?
Do videos with these blasts date back to May 2023?,Do these videos show the Crimean bridge attack?,Did these videos have access to the Crimean bridge?,Was this video linked to a video from this crime scene?,Does this video exist anywhere else?,Has this video been made public?,Will any evidence exist of the Crimean bridge attack?
Did the owner of the boat own the vessel that allegedly contained 90 pounds of cocaine?,Was the vessel owned by the owner of the vessel?,Have any other companies or individuals profited from the shipment of cocaine?,Was it made on any vessel of any type?,Is there evidence that the boat was used to transport cocaine?
Did black voters in Birmingham participate in voting multiple times during the special election?,Did black voters in Birmingham vote multiple times?,Was the voter turn out higher than other voters in Birmingham?,Is there evidence that Alabama's special election was rigged?,"If so, were the votes cast multiple times?",Was a recount for voting rigged?
Does the average resident spend more than $924 in gas?,Does the average resident spend less than $924 in wasted time?,Is the average resident using less than 90% of their commute time?,Is the average resident in Atlanta wasting less than 20% of their commute time?,Is there evidence of Atlanta residents paying more for gas and wasted time than the overall average?
Was the Time magazine Oct 2022 cover fabricated?,Did Biden and Harris receive more votes in the last election than the prior?,Did the cover list Biden and Harris as the'most unpopular duo in U.S. political history'?,Have the comments in the article narrated a perception of bias or bias regarding Hillary Clinton?
Did the Suez Canal close during March of 2021?,Did the Canal close during any of March of 2021?,Does the video include any footage of the canal?,Is there anything to suggest that the Canal closes temporarily in March of 2021?,Is there anything to suggest that the Canal closes temporarily in March of 2021?
Are people who have been vaccinated against the flu in the past 10 years more likely to test positive for COVID-19?,Are people who have been vaccinated against the flu in the last 10 years more likely to test positive for COVID-19?,Has anyone been found to have tested positive for COVID-19?
Does repealing Obamacare have a negative effect on the health care coverage for 10.3 million Americans?,Will the repeal of Obamacare affect the health coverage of 10.3 million Americans?,Will the repeal of Obamacare impact the health coverage of 10.3 million Americans?,Will this repeal affect the health coverage of 10.3 million Americans in any way?
Is the temporary road constructed within 24 hours after Typhoon Hagibis hit Japan in October 2019?,Did the temporary road require any major construction to be completed?,During what time period was this temporary road constructed?,Did the temporary road take place in any other locations in Japan?,Was there any repercussions from this temporary road?
Are people who die within 28 days of a positive Covid-19 test automatically put on their death certificate?,Is there a difference in Covid19 in the way that the death certificate is filled out?,Do people who die within 28 days of a positive Covid-19 test have Covid put on their death certificate automatically?
Are at least 23 countries that refuse to take people back after they have been ordered to leave the United States?,Does at least one country in the 21 states that refuse to take people back have violent criminals?,Has the number of countries that refuse to take people back from the United States increased from 1 to 23?
Did Scott veto funding for 30 rape crisis centers?,Is the funding necessary?,Did Scott say rape crisis centers aren't needed?,Did Scott say rape crisis centers were not needed?,Did Scott say rape crisis centers were not needed?,Did Scott state that rape crisis centers did not need funding?
Do all of the images from the Chandrayaan-3 show the moon?,Have all of the images shown on this video pictured the moon?,Is this video available in another format besides video?,Has any of the images shown in this video been used as a sample for comparison?,Is there a lot of overlap between these images and Chandrayaan-3 photographs of the moon?
Has Austin’s tax burden increased more than 40 percent since 2000?,Has the state's median family income increased more than 20 percent since 2000?,Has the average family income per child increased over 40 percent since 2000?,Does average tax burden increase over 40 percent?,Has average tax burden increased over 20 percent from 2000?
"Did an image file entitled ""Mexico did it"" spread malware during the spring of 2021?","Was the image file containing the file ""Mexico did it"" a virus?","Was it well known for the file name ""Mexico did it""?",Is it possible for an image file to be considered a virus?
"Did CNN report ""no evidence"" that the plane crashed into Pentagon on 9/11?",Was there evidence the plane crashed in the city of Baltimore?,Did CNN report that there were no survivors of the plane crash in the city of Baltimore?,Did CNN report that there were no survivors of the plane crash in the city of Baltimore?
Did Foxx drop charges against Smullett because of his phone records showing over 200 calls and texts from Harris and DNC operatives?,Does Foxx have a defender?,Are there any legal problems related to Foxx lowering the charges against Smullett?,Are there any legal challenges related to Foxx dropping the charges against Smullett?
Was the teen sentenced to prison for raping his sister?,Did the teen kill a Muslim refugee?,Were any of his family members in the killing?,Has it been proven that the teen killed the refugee with an assault rifle?,Has the teen been charged with rape?
Did this tigress have 4 cubs?,Was this tigress spotted in Madhya Pradesh?,Did this tigress have any cubs in this area?,Did this tigress have any cubs in this area?,Did this tigress have any cubs in this region?
Does the new law only apply to individuals under the age of 16?,Is it illegal for a person under 16 to ride a hoverboard?,Is the new law the only law on hoverboards?,Is the new law applicable to people under the age of 16?,Do other laws restrict the age of 14?
Did the Finnish researchers begin human trials of a diabetes vaccine in 2017?,Is the vaccine approved by the FDA to treat Type 1 diabetes?,Are the plans currently in the works for the vaccine?,Has the Type 1 diabetes vaccine already been approved by the FDA?,Do the vaccine plans currently exist for testing in adults?
Was Ellie Kemper the Queen of Love and Beauty at the Veiled Prophet Ball?,Did the Veiled Prophet Ball have racist ties to the Ku Klux Klan?,Was the venue affiliated with an organization that has racist history?,Did the organizers of the Veiled Prophet Ball work for the KKK?,Did the venue's host have ties to the KKK?
Did China punish these women for witchcraft?,Did these women escape the punishment?,Did these women continue to go to prison?,Was there a punishment for these women after their witchcraft conviction?,Was the punishment for these women known to have occurred?,Did these women ever receive a conviction for witchcraft?,Was this photo taken in China?
Did the polls close on Friday or will some ballots be tossed?,Is there enough time between when votes are due and when they will be tossed?,Does the list contain any votes that will be tossed?,Does this list include all ballots that were rejected?,Is this list accurate?
Was Clinton admitting that Marco Rubio scared her?,Was Clinton admitting that Marco Rubio scared her?,Was Clinton admitting that the GOP didn't care a bit about Marco Rubio?,Are there any other candidates with a less negative outcome than Hillary Clinton?,Are any of these candidates favored by other Democrats?
Did Thomas have affirmative action before he spoke in 1983?,"Did Thomas say, ""God only knows where I would be"" without affirmative action?",Was Thomas referring to affirmative action in his speech in 1983?,Have affirmative action programs been established in the US since 1983?,Whether these programs are the same in America after the Civil Rights Movement.?
Was the teen arrested because of a gym intrusion?,Was it a violation of the rules of police to shoot a teenager at a gym?,Was the teen arrested because of a gym intrusion?,Was there a gun nearby during the incident?,Did anyone say anything about the incident in any media?
Did President Obama create 38.5 percent of jobs from women?,Did 31.5 percent of jobs created from men also go to women?,Has this percentage remained stable?,Have all jobs created by Obama been open to women?,Did the jobs created by Obama change gender?,Has Obama created jobs more specifically for men?,Has any information been released regarding these trends?
Did California spend less than $220 billion?,Did California spend twice as much as New York?,Did New York spend less than California?,Did California spend less than California?,Did California spend more money than New York in all areas?,Does New York spend less money than California?,Does California spend less than New York in all areas?
Did Australia introduce a gun buy-back program in 1997?,Did gun buy-back program result in a decrease in crime?,Did firearms buy-back program reduce crime?,Did the gun buy-back program decrease gun crime?,Did gun buy-back program reduce crime?,Do gun buy-back programs decrease crime in Australia?
Did the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention reverse its policy on wearing masks indoors in places with high COVID-19 transmission rates?,Did the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention reverse its policy on wearing masks indoors in places with high COVID-19 transmission rates in July of 2021?
"Is it true that there were 1,762 COVID-19 deaths in Florida this year?",Is it true that there was 5185 pneumonia deaths in Florida in the same period?,Is it true that in 2013-2018 Florida had 918 pneumonia deaths?,Is it true that in 2013-2018 Florida had 5185 pneumonia deaths in the same period?
Did the League of Conservation Voters score zero against Bush?,Did the League of Conservation Voters score zero against Bush?,Would they have considered this as a negative result?,Has the League of Conservation Voters ever scored any negative ratings against Bush?,Has any of the members of the League of Conservation Voters ever scored any negative ratings against Bush?
Did Eisenhower propose a $500 billion highway system?,Are they spending $30 billion on roads and bridges?,Did Eisenhower propose an interstate highway system?,Is Eisenhower considered a leading architect of the highway system?,Did Eisenhower propose an interstate highway system?,Are the Eisenhower highways being built in parallel to the stimulus programs?
"Will 300,000 Floridians lose their current health plans because of Obamacare?",Would the Affordable Care Act increase the costs of health care?,Will the Affordable Care Act reduce the prices of health care?,Would the Affordable Care Act decrease the cost of health care?,Would the Affordable Care Act cause a shift in health care?
Was the footage of a shark bringing down a helicopter available?,Did National Geographic pay for this footage?,Was the footage on a helicopter commercial?,Did this footage show that sharks are retaliating?,Are shark attacks a regular issue in New Zealand?,Will shark attacks a commercial helicopter in New Zealand?
Did Gowdy praise the film after attending its premiere?,Did Gowdy endorse the film?,Did Gowdy attend the premiere of the film?,Did Gowdy praise the movie?,Did Gowdy recommend the movie to other 'people with disabilities '?,Did Gowdy approve of the film?
Does Sanders support sanctions against Russia in all of his career?,Does Sanders support sanctions against Russia in his entire career?,Did Sanders vote yes on sanctions against Russia in all of his career?,Has Sanders ever voted no on sanctions against Russia in his entire career?,Has Sanders ever voted no on sanctions against Russia in all of his career?
Did the photo shows farmers protesting in support of Indian farmers?,Did the photo show German farmers protesting in support of Indian farmers?,Did the photo show German farmers protesting in support of Indian farmers in general?,Did this photo show German farmers protesting in support of Indian farmers specifically?,Have these German farmers protested in support of Indian farmers in the past?
Did the hair dryer drying the field in the IPL 2023 finals?,Did the hair dryer in the IPL 2023 finals dry a field?,Did the hair dryer dryer dry the field in the IPL 2023 finals?,Did the hair dryer dryer dry a field in the IPL 2023 finals?
Are a non-medical face mask ineffective to reduce transmission and infectivity of COVID-19?,Do long-term health consequences of wearing a face mask result in hypoxemia and hypercapnia?,Are there medical or non-medical face masks ineffective in reducing transmission and infectivity of COVID-19?
Did the video in Spring 2022 show cocaine on the desk of the Ukrainian President?,Did the video also show Cocaine on the desk of the President of the Ukrainian Republic?,Did this video ever surface?,Are there other videos showing this type of illegal drug use?,Would the video have included any other drug use?
Did Michelle Obama Lose $350k speaking Gig?,Was Obama's speech affected by the hate speech?,Did Obama's speech help end race polarization?,Did Obama speak in public during the attack?,Did Obama's speech go beyond racist attacks?,Was the speech a response to anti-white racism?
Is James Comey charged with 50 counts of Terrorism?,Does James Comey have 48 counts of Terrorism?,Are both James Comey and John Brennan guilty of Terrorism?,Have each of these individuals been charged with multiple Terrorism  counts?,Have either of these individuals been found to be guilty of Terrorism  counts?
Did the media on 9/11 claim that World Trade Center Building collapses were a controlled demolition?,Is the media’s claim true?,Was the media reporting of the World Trade Center buildings collapses correct at all times?,Is the media reporting of the World Trade Center buildings collapses an accurate record at all times?
Is the 20 year old fatally jabbed at the doctor's office?,Is the 20 year old's death related to a tweet about the doctor's office?,Is the 20 year old's death related to a tweet about the doctor's office?,Did the doctor's office have any injuries from the jab?
Is it known if an avalanche hit Himachal Pradesh on April 25?,Is there any indication that people under the snow were trapped?,Is it known how much snow people were buried under by this avalanche?,- Do any other avalanches have hit in India this year?
Did the BOC earlier say that the flight attendants exhibited unruly behavior by stomping/stepping on the imported agricultural products?,Is the incident connected to PAL plane crew?,Is there an incident related to PAL plane crew?,Did the BOC say that the plane crew exhibited unruly behavior by stomping on the imported agricultural products?
Did all of the families that entered the U.S. this year exceed the total in 2015?,Has terrorism increased the number of illegal immigrant families that enter the U.S. this year?,Does the current overall immigration count not include families that came here illegally as of 2015?,Would there be more illegal immigrants entering the U.S. this year?
"Are there more than 3,000 jobs being created by the plant?",Are there more jobs being created in the region than the plant was projected to create?,Is the plant project based in Georgia?,Have the benefits been projected or estimated?,Is the plant project expected to create more jobs in the region than the state and country as a whole?
Was this a military action?,Is this a general statement about the Islamic regiment?,Is this a general statement about the military action?,Is this a general statement about the military action?,Was this an attack on India during the 1965 war?,Is this a general statement about the military action?
Does Austin charge the same fees for building apartment complexes as Dallas do?,Have other cities charged similar fees for apartment complexes?,Are city building fees comparable to Dallas?,Is the city in Austin charging higher building fees than Dallas?,Do any other cities charge building fees like Austin?,Are there records to show that Austin charges higher building fees than Dallas?
Was the death of Donald Trump reported by CNN?,Was this information accurate?,Did CNN report this death?,Was this information accurate?,Was the information accurate?,Was the information accurate?,Did Trump receive a large amount of grief after his death?,Did this incident help to change the focus of some people in America?
Are there any restrictions in this plan?,Will there be a cap on the loans?,Will there be a cap on the loans?,Does this plan apply to all types of loans?,Is this plan good for farmers?,Will these loans be waived off?,Is this plan good for all farms?
What should be developed if someone doesn't return land?,What is the law on this subject?,Does the law tell you what to do if you don't develop land?,Did this law state this law was in place for 20 years?,Are there ways around these laws?,Are these laws legal?
"Did the Home Office pay over £77,000 to a business in March 2020?",Is the company that dissolved in 2018 still active?,Was the payment in March 2020 made within the budget range for the Home Office?,Was the payments paid before or after the establishment closed?,Does this information appear on the UK government website?
Did President Obama's budget reduce the deficit by 3 trillion?,Did the deficit in the budget reduce by this amount?,Did this budget reduce the deficit by any other amount than the $3 trillion used in the budget?,Did this budget also reduce the debt?,". Did this budget cut the deficit in any way, either by reducing some or all of the debt?"
Did people not hear about the protests from a media blackout?,How did the blackout affect the protesters?,Did the media blackout prevent people from talking about the protests?,Was there a media blackout during the protests?,Did the media blackout prevent people from talking about the protests?
Is there a difference between the numbers of Americans killed by terrorism and the number of Americans killed by guns in the last decade?,Is there a difference between the number of Americans killed by terrorism and the number of Americans killed by guns in the last decade?,Is there any correlation between the number of Americans killed by terrorism and the number of Americans killed by guns in the last decade?
Is +91140 the number of a particular number?,Is the incoming call from this number a telemarketing call?,Is the number of calls from this number consistent?,Do the incoming calls to this number originate from?,Is there any other information about this telemarketing call that should be considered a telemarketing call?
Are people being placed in jail for 10 hours?,Are police putting mask wearing people in jail?,Did police put people wearing masks in jail?,Did these people wear masks on their faces?,Did the government order these people to wear masks while in jail?,Are mask wearing people prohibited from attending school in Delhi?
Are there budgets in excess of $750 billion per year per the Pentagon?,Does the Defense Department pay $350 billion annually in a cost of $350 billion per year?,Is the Defense Department budget doubled as a direct result of the Build Back Better Act?,Does the Defense Department budget double as a direct result of the Build Back Better Act?
Did the Florida governor conduct a deeply flawed purge of voters before the 2000 election?,Did a 2004 plan to purge even more voters in Florida in 2004?,Did state authorities conduct a deeply flawed purge of voters prior to the 2004 election?,Was there any plan to purge even more voters in 2004?
Do ExxonMobil plans to invest $20 billion in the Gulf Coast?,Is it true that this investment was based on policies of the Obama administration?,Is this investment because of the upcoming new administration?,Was the move funded by the upcoming new administration?,Is there any evidence of ExxonMobil funding this new administration?
Did Barack Obama's official portrait contain secretly-placed images of sperm cells?,Did any of the images contain images of sperm cells?,Was the portrait dated to the time the photograph was created?,Was there a secret placement in the portrait of Barack Obama of images of sperm cells?
Did Ohio homeowners sign mineral rights agreements this year?,Do Ohio residents have over a billion dollars worth of mineral rights agreements to date?,Was Ohio's mineral rights sector growing over the past decade?,Did Ohio residents rely on mineral rights to support their income?,Did Ohio homeowners increase the number of mineral rights leases to date?
Does this video portray Elon Musk saying Trump won the 2020 election?,Does the video depict Trump's victory in the 2020 election?,Was this video produced prior to the 2020 election?,Is this video explicit about Trump's success?,Is there evidence that Trump won the 2020 election?,Is the video directed towards educating people on Trump's campaign?
Did the senate vote on repealing the Affordable Care Act?,Did all of the members vote against repealing the Affordable Care Act?,Did any senator vote against repealing the Affordable Care Act?,Did any members of the senate vote against repealing the Affordable Care Act?,Did any members of the senate vote against repealing the Affordable Care Act?
Are common cold antibodies responsible for the false-positive results from COVID-19 antibody testing?,Are COVID-19 antibody testing cases behind COVID-19 cases reported in the U.S?,Are there any COVID-19 vaccines currently approved by the FDA?,Are COVID-19 vaccines approved by other governments besides the FDA?
Was Gowdy placed in protective custody after two people involved in the investigation went missing?,Did Gowdy do anything during this period?,Did Gowdy make any decisions regarding this period?,Was Gowdy involved in any of these events?,Was Gowdy involved in any of these events?
Did the BBC publish a graphic showing Ukrainian political leaders earning a profit in 2022?,Was the BBC aware of the graphic when it was produced?,Did the BBC post the graphic to their website?,Is the article based on the BBC investigation?,Was the BBC aware of the graphic when the graphic was produced?
"Did women provide 66% of the work, produce 50% of the food, but earn only 10% of the income?",Can women change these statistics by allowing them to earn more?,Can women reduce their income by allowing them to own more?,Are these changes positive?,Can women contribute more to the economy overall?
Did Kavanaugh begin to practice law at this time?,Did Bush nominate Kavanaugh to the DC Circuit when he started to practice law?,Did Bush nominate Kavanaugh by himself at this time?,Did Brett Kavanaugh begin working in this job prior to his nominating for the DC Circuit?
Does the Secure Fence Act have any effect on securing the border?,Does funding the Secure Fence Act of 2006 have any effect on securing the border?,Can funding the Secure Fence Act of 2006 guarantee securing the border?,Is the Secure Fence Act of 2006 the first time this legislation has been approved?
Did Noynoy Aquino stage his death as an attempt to boost Leni Robredo's presidential candidacy?,Did Noynoy Aquino's death raise the presidential candidacy of Leni Robredo?,Did Noynoy Aquino have close ties to the drug cartels?
"Was this video taken in Jaipur, Rajasthan?",Does the video have any violent content?,Are the women members of the video armed?,Do they wear bright colors or have any skin showing?,Was the video shot on video and on video?,Was this video taken under any circumstances?,Does the video feature violence?
Is idiopathic encephalopathy the cause of ICD-10 codes used to track unvaccinated individuals?,Does idiopathic encephalopathy appear in people deemed unvaccinated?,Is there evidence of idiopathic encephalopathy and ICD-10 codes being used to track unvaccinated individuals?
Did the photo show the Erbil earthquake or the earthquake in Iraq?,Did this photo depict Erbil being surrounded by flames?,Did this photo include Erbil?,Was this photo related to the earthquake?,Did this photo include Erbil?,Did the photo include Erbil's heliport?,Did this photo portray Erbil's heliport?
Does Forever 21 have rings or jewelry with Swastikas?,Does Forever 21 sell jewelry with Swastikas?,Does Forever 21 sell jewelry with Swastikas?,Is Swastika jewelry sold on the Forever 21 website?,Is Swastika jewelry sold on Forever 21.com?
How old is the average bridge in Missouri?,How old are most bridges in Missouri?,Did all bridges in Missouri have similar designs?,Is there any data to prove that the average bridge is a bit over fifty years old?,Are all bridges in Missouri rated for longevity?,Did most bridges have to be designed to last a few more years than the expected lifespan?
Did Biden's tax and spending spree cause a six-month long spike in inflation?,Is the inflation in this month a record high?,Are there negative economic consequences of Biden's spending spree?,Is this inflation an insurmountable obstacle?,Is this inflation a result of Obama's spending spree?
Did some of these doctors allegedly perform fake surgery?,Does this claim include all of the fake doctors in Kolkata?,Did this claim come from a video?,Was any hospital arrested for this claim?,Was this video released after this alleged claim?,Has any video claimed a alleged conspiracy in Kolkata?,Have any police charged these fake doctors in Kolkata before?
"Did 85% of Rhode Island tax returns filed for 2010 come from individuals earning $30,000 or less?","Is it true that tax returns from individuals earning $30,000 or less were filed in 2010?",Is the % of tax returns filed for 2010 more accurate that than the 1% of the total number of filings?
Is the image showing a goalie that stayed on the field for 15 minutes not knowing that a soccer match had been canceled due to heavy fog?,Is the image showing a goalie who stayed on the field for 15 minutes not knowing that a soccer match had been canceled due to heavy fog?
Was a VC at the University who signed PM Modi's certificate dead in 1981?,Did a VC at this University die in 1981?,Did PM Modi's Certificate have a signature from a VC at this University?,Did the VC at the University sign PM Modi's certificate?,Did the VC at this University die in 1981?
Did Biden's war on America's energy cause the crisis?,Has Biden's war on energy made the US have an atrocious energy crisis?,Does Biden's war on energy have resulted in a trough in the strategic petroleum reserve?,Has Biden's war on energy caused the US to lose an atrocious energy crisis?
"Was there a ban on ""Black Lives Matter"" attire at the 2020 Olympic Games?","Did the IOC ban ""Black Lives Matter"" apparel at a specific time?","Did the IOC determine ""Black Lives Matter"" apparel has not been banned?","Did the IOC determine ""Black Lives Matter"" apparel has not been banned at a specific time?","Did IOC have a decision to ban ""Black Lives Matter"" attire at a specific time?"
Was this video filmed in 2019?,Was this video in 2015?,Did this video come from the beginning of the election?,Was the presidential candidate of Philippines Bongbong Marcos considered for presidential election in 2021?,Was Marcos given the option to run again in 2020?,Did the campaign support Marcos?
Does this video show Muslims destroying a 40 year old naga temple?,Do some video records reveal that Muslims are demolishing this temple?,Is this temple a part of a national temple?,"Is this temple in Guntur, Andra Pradesh, part of a national temple chain?"
Is the man William DeLisle killed for?,Was the attack in San Diego terrorism related?,Was the man that DeLisle shot dead in California?,Was the incident a terrorism incident?,Was the person delinquent in any way?,Has DeLisle ever appealed for a retrial?
Did people without permanent homes whose homes could not be sold qualify for stimulus payments?,Are stimulus payments based on income?,Did the COVID-19 relief bill include a requirement that people should submit information to the IRS?,Does the stimulus funding for the COVID-19 relief plan include the IRS in these payments?
Is it true that women earn 82 cents for every dollar earned by men in Georgia?,Is the percentage of women earning 82 cents for every dollar equal to the percentage of men earning the same?,Is the percentage of women earning 82 cents for every dollar equal to the percentage of men earning the same?,Is it true that men earn 82 cents for every dollar earned in Georgia?
Was the suspension related to the police killing of a 17 year old girl?,Was the suspension related to the police killing of a 17 year old girl?,Does France suspend internet services following the police killing of a 17 year old girl?,Does this statement reflect the national views of France on civil rights?,Is this statement the first report stating that French law has suspended internet services following the police killing of a 17 year old girl?
Is this a live video?,"Did Trump call for Twitter users to be banned on Nov 19, 2017?",Was Donald Trump referring to Twitter as his first stop on Twitter?,Did Trump not mention Twitter on his first post in his first tweet?,Is this a live video?,Has Donald Trump been on Twitter since his first tweet?
Is the bonus expected to be for winning the 2020 AFF Suzuki Cup?,Will the bonus have a limit on how much the bonus is?,Is Jokowi to give bonus for winning the 2020 AFF Suzuki Cup?,Will he give a bonus bonus if the team wins the 2020 AFF Suzuki Cup?
"Did Bass support the Ryan plan that forces seniors to pay $6,400 a year more for health care?",Was this an intentional move on the part of Ryan?,Has Bass personally endorsed the Ryan plan?,Did Bass endorse Ryan's plan?,Did Bass support Ryan's plan by the margin of 3 percentage points?
Did Mardini ever travel to Greece to get back to Syria?,Is Mardini the only Olympic swimmer to ever leave Syria?,Are there other Olympic swimmers that leave Syria?,Did Mardini have to swim through a large body of water?,Is there any other information about Mardini's travel to Greece?
Is there a video of a crash of Ethiopian Airlines?,Is there anything besides an Ethiopian Airlines plane crashing?,"Is the plane from the US, or one from Ethiopia?",Is the Ethiopian Airlines plane crashing in the airport?,Is it a small Ethiopian Airlines plane?
Did the fencing that had torn down in September 2021 exist during this protest?,Did this fence in the park contain graffiti on it?,Did this fence include graffiti on it when this protest occurred?,Did this fence occur in August of 2019?,Are any of these protests known to have taken place in the late 20th century?
Was Trump 2016 graffiti written on campus?,Was the chalk graffiti on campus a threat to terrorism?,Was any person who threw chalk graffiti away for no reason?,Was the chalk graffiti on campus a threat to safety?,Are there any instances where chalk graffiti has been written on campus?,Was any person harassing students at the time?,Was there any sort of criminal mistreatment of students in this incident?
Will Arabic subtitles be added to EastEnders?,Will Arabic subtitles be added to EastEnders?,Does EastEnders need Arabic subtitles?,Will Arabic subtitles be used on EastEnders in all episodes?,Will Arabic subtitles be used during EastEnders episodes?,Will the BBC introduce Arabic subtitles to WestEnders?
"Does Elizabeth II, the Pope and pharmaceutical CEOs have any convictions associated with Covid-19 or vaccines?",Can pharmaceutical CEOs be found guilty of the same crimes?,Have any convictions concerning vaccines been incurred by pharmaceutical executives?,Have the CEOs of pharmaceutical companies been found guilty of the same crimes?
Did Sanders make this pledge publicly?,Did Sanders renege on this pledge?,Was Sanders expected to reveal info on aliens if he won the 2020 election?,Did Sanders promise to disclose info on aliens if he won the 2020 election?,Does Sanders have a prior history of talking about aliens?
Does this video of Bill Clinton raping a 13-year-old girl include a recording of Clinton raping a girl?,Is this video recording based on a report made by Israeli intelligence authorities?,Is this video recorded in the course of the day after a reported meeting between Hillary Clinton and the Israeli Intelligence agencies?
Are more households connected to the electricity mains in 2015 than in 2011?,Did the percentage of households connected to the electricity mains increase from 82% to 85% in 2015?,Is the increase in electricity access greater than 85%?,Is the increase in power access greater than 82%?,Was there a larger increase in electricity access between 2011 and 2015?
Is it true there is three times as much oil in the United States as in Saudi Arabia?,Is this a definite estimation of what amount of oil there is?,Are there any other estimates of crude oil production?,Is this calculation reliable?,Did someone verify this claim?,No Answer>?
Did 14 economists say this would reduce inflation?,Did at least one economist say this was going to reduce inflation?,Is this economist quoted as saying a lot about inflation?,Is this economist mentioned in any interviews?,Is this economist quoted as saying that the inflation is going to go down?,Is this economist quoted as saying that the inflation is going to go down?
Did the U.S. facilitate the sending of nearly 17.8 tons of donated medical supplies to China to combat the spread of the novel coronavirus in early 2020?,Did the U.S. facilitate the sending of nearly 17.8 tons of donated medical supplies to China in early 2020?,Did any of the donations come from the U.S.?
Is it true that Uganda's A-level results will not be released on 14 February?,Is it true that the date yet to be confirmed for release of the Uganda A-level results?,Were the actual results released in February?,Was this date confirmed or is it a faked date?
Did Merkel get her name on the ballot without covering her face?,Did Merkel appear without an eye mask in the Bundestag debate on 9 December?,"Did she sit down with the Bundeswehr head minister, Heiko Maas?","Did she sit down with the Bundesjustiz minister, Christine Lambrecht?",Did the Democrats win the election?
"Did Buffett ask people to pass the ""Congressional Reform Act of 2019""?",Was the email a direct message?,Did Buffett ask people to make the initial changes to this email?,Did Buffett make changes to the email after a vote?,Were the proposed changes approved or not before the vote?
Did Trump make a surprise visit to Switzerland?,Did Trump make a surprise visit to Switzerland in March 2021?,Did Trump make a surprise visit to Switzerland?,Did Trump make a surprise visit to Switzerland in March 2021?,Did Trump make a surprise visit to Switzerland in March 2021?,Is this video authentic?
Did people wear face coverings in retail settings in Northern Ireland?,Is it true that people in Northern Ireland have been fully complying with the requirement to wear face coverings?,Was there sufficient enforcement of face covering in Northern Ireland?,Has there been sufficient enforcement of face covering in Northern Ireland?,Does Northern Ireland have a clear policy on face covering?
Did police arrest a man who confessed to killing and eating almost 40 people?,Did police arrest a man who confessed to killing and eating almost 40 people?,Did police arrest a man who confessed to killing and eating almost 40 people?,Was the man arrested in Houston?,Was there any evidence of a motive for the murder?,Did Houston police arrest the man who confessed?
Has the Western Peripheral Expressway been constructed in 5 years?,Have any other government agencies and private firms undertaken to complete the Western Peripheral Expressway in the same period?,Are any construction projects with the Indian government under construction in this period?,Do any other government agencies construct highways in the same period?
Did a car in Minneapolis burn during protests after Floyd's death?,Did a car burn in Minneapolis after Floyd died?,Are protesters able to walk to downtown Minneapolis?,Is the car burning in Minneapolis after Floyd's death?,Would protesters walk to downtown Minneapolis for help?,Is there a car in Minneapolis after Floyd's death?
"Did Haiti, Tanzania and Madagascar refuse the COVID-19 vaccine?",Have all of these Presidents died unexpectedly?,Did each of these countries receive the vaccine?,Does this incident suggest that most countries will not take the vaccine?,Did these countries refuse the COVID-19 vaccine?,Is this incident the first time in history that this has happened?
Did India achieve this record?,Did the country's quota of vaccines be surpassed?,Did India administer vaccines at a high rate?,Has India also achieved this record?,Does this number exclude the number of vaccine doses given in addition to the total doses?,Has this number been surpassed?
Are there any statements by Hillary Clinton and Bernie Sanders that support an abortion cutoff date of 36 weeks?,Do the two candidates share a common understanding of abortion rights and law?,Will late-stage fetuses feel no pain and no rights in late pregnancy?,Do both Sanders and Clinton share a common understanding of abortion law?
Does the lock button allow access to emergency services on iPhones?,Does tap the lock button help unlock the phone?,Does this feature only work when in the unlock mode?,Does the unlock feature work when in the unlock mode?,Would users have to use the unlock feature in the unlock mode if it was available in the lock mode?
Was the original design flaw that led to this bridge collapse?,Did this bridge collapse in 2007 due to this design flaw?,Is this bridge considered an example of how a new bridge should be built?,Did the new bridge design cause this bridge to collapse?,Did this bridge fall on the side of the road as it was being built?
Are uncompensated health care costs absorbed by Texas hospitals a significant contributor to private insurance rates in Texas?,Do public hospital costs contribute to Texas private insurance rates?,Does uncompensated health care cost absorbed by Texas hospitals impact rate aversion in the state?,Is a disproportionate amount of absorbed health care costs in the state a cause of rate aversion for Texas private insurance rates?
Is the salary increase Jessica King voted for 63 percent?,Is the salary increase for Jessica King 63 percent of the original bill price?,Is the pay increase for Jessica King 63 percent of the original bill price?,Is it accurate that the cost of the pay increase for Jessica King was 63% of the original bill price?
Did the paper that clipped the newspaper cover mentions that former Indian Prime Minister Singh's son was arrested in 2001?,Is the report accurate in the sense that the news item was taken from the newspaper that clipped it?,Is there any documentation to indicate a reason for the arrests?,Is this information consistent with the paper that did the clipping?
Did the Ukrainian government agree to this idea?,Are these countries aligned in their actions?,Is Ukraine's role in exposing child pornography significant?,Does Ukraine contribute to this issue by exposing child pornography?,Do these countries have more ties with Ukraine that would prevent this problem?
Did the billboard fall on two motorcyclists in Hyderabad?,Did the billboard fall during rush hour in Hyderabad?,Did the billboard fall in a hurry on the road?,Is there an alternative explanation for a billboard falling on two motorcyclists in Hyderabad?,Was there a second alternative explanation for the billboard falling on a motorcyclist?
"Did Trump tweet the following in 2016: ""Obama Should Wait Until He Leaves Office To Pick Another Justice?","Did Trump tweet the following the same year on June 20, 2016: ""Obama Should Wait Until He Leaves Office To Pick Another Justice""?","Did Trump tweet the following prior to the election: ""Obama Should Wait Until He Leaves Office To Pick Another Justice""?",Did Trump post this tweet after the election?
Is 'Back to the Future IV' still under development?,Was Michael J. Fox officially announced to be making 'Back to the Future IV'?,Did the show originally have John Dez directing?,Did Fox announce 'Back to the Future IV' in June 2018?,Did Fox have another film role besides 'Back to the Future IV'?
Did Miss USA cancel a participation in the Miss Universe?,Did Miss Netherlands 2023 participate in the Miss Universe contest?,Did Miss USA boycott the Miss Universe?,Did Miss Netherlands 2023 represent a transgender person?,Did Miss USA boycott the Miss Universe in July 2023?,Have transgender people ever competed in the Miss Universe?,Did Miss Netherlands 2023 have a transgender opponent in the Miss Universe?
Was the Manila City Mayor Isko Moreno also disqualified from running in the 2022 elections?,Did the Manila City Mayor resign from his post as mayor?,Are other high profile people also disqualified from running in the 2022 elections?,Are all other high profile people disqualified from running in the 2022 elections?
Is it based on the information in this paragraph?,Did the author give an estimate?,Was this figure based on the information gathered in this paragraph?,Is this graph based on data from a 2009 study?,Was this data taken from the US?,Does the data show that cap-and-trade reduce CO2 more than 1 percent?
Is there more than 2.8 million people that still wait for coverage?,Can some of those patients continue to wait to receive coverage?,Does the majority of the affected patients have health insurance under Obamacare?,Is there more than 28.2 million Americans that still are waiting for coverage under Obamacare?,Has the coverage for these patients remained stable?
"Does ""The Simpsons"" predict future campaigns to censor and cover up replicas of Michelangelo's ""David"" statue?","Are there any other episodes of ""The Simpsons"" related to Michelangelo's ""David"" statue?","Did the ""The Simpsons"" predict future campaigns to censor and cover up replicas of Michelangelo's ""David"" statue?"
Has the number of attacks on Muslims jumped in the past year?,Has the number of hate crimes been higher in the last few years than in the last decade?,Is this list based on data from 2016?,Does the data support the assertion?,Does the data confirm or falsify the statement?,Was this data provided by an outside source?
Did America lose lives?,Did this country surrender military equipment to terrorists?,Does this country have the best military equipment?,Has the United States made major gains in the last decade?,Are Americas economic gains being attributed to the slayings?,Is it clear that this country lost their military capabilities?,Did this country commit any major acts of war?
Did 11.6 million people watch Biden’s first presidential address to Congress?,Did far more people watch Trump’s speeches than Biden’s?,Did Donald Trump have a higher total audience for his speeches?,Did any of the participants in either speech livestream?,Was any of the topics discussed in one of the speeches different than Biden’s address?
Did soldiers have better weapons to fight Boko Haram?,Did Somalians not execute soldiers?,Were soldiers sentenced to death in Somalia in 2016?,Were Nigerian soldiers sentenced to death in 2016 for fighting Boko Haram?,Is this photo a recent execution?,Did this event occur in a foreign country?
Did 6 people in Florida die as a result of not expanding Medicaid every day?,Can you state the exact number of Florida residents that died as a result of not expanding Medicaid?,Is there data that shows more Florida residents died as a result of not expanding Medicaid in the past year?,Can I assume there is more data to show Florida residents died as a result of not expanding Medicaid in the past year?
Did Deepwater have statements from their own testimony?,Was Deepwater able to provide enough jobs to attract investors?,Have Deepwater had the ability to secure adequate investor capital?,Did Deepwater have the capacity to create jobs?,Will Deepwater have this capacity at all?,Was Deepwater willing to provide enough jobs to attract investors?
Did the US increase heroin apprehension from border during March 2018 compared with 2017. Did the US increase people apprehended in March 2018 compared to 2017?,Were apprehension numbers greater in March 2018 than 2017?,Is there evidence to support this claim?,Do other states have similar results?
Do the number of al Qaeda members vary?,Is it common for experts to say the number of al Qaeda members in Afghanistan is between 25 and 30 members?,Is there any evidence of al Qaeda members in Afghanistan?,Are there any evidence of terrorism in Afghanistan?,Have military experts confirmed that there are at least 30 members of al Qaeda in Afghanistan?
Did the employee murder 71 coworkers over a 17 year period?,Did the employee who killed the 71 workers claim immunity?,Does the employee now have a defense in court?,Are the 71 coworkers all incarcerated?,Are there any other possible explanations as to why the accused employee was charged?
Do teens more likely to be hospitalized with myocarditis with COVID-19 vaccines than they are with COVID?,Do teens more likely to be hospitalized with myocarditis from COVID-19 vaccines than they are with COVID?,Is it true that COVID-19 vaccines are more effective than COVID?
"Has the transit tax been used to create or support over 200,000 jobs?",Is the transportation tax a one time fee or a long term fee?,Do the job numbers for the transportation tax account for the job gains and losses?,Does the report include details on the expected gains and losses?,Does the proposal offer incentives to increase job growth in metro Atlanta?
Do the depictions in the images date back to 2018?,Is the image in question from Ukraine?,Did a Ukrainian woman die in the Kharkiv airstrike?,Is the Ukrainian woman's body in a graveyard?,Would the event take place in 2017?,Is the Ukrainian woman in this picture now?
Did Thailand get two months to amend its lèse majesté law?,Does the UN want Thai law to be modified?,Does the UN want Thailand's law to be modified?,Does Thailand plan to amend the law on its own?,Does the UN want Thailand's law to be amended?
Did this article about Kellogg's making one of its mascots a trans woman ever air?,Did CNN publish this article about Kellogg's making one of its mascots a trans woman?,Did this article about Kellogg's making one of its mascots a trans woman ever air?
Did the Democratic party spend more money in the last two years than the country spent in the last 200 years combined?,Did Democrats use more money than the country's average for spending in the last two years?,Did Democrats spend more money than this country has averaged over the last 200 years combined?,Does this percentage compare to the Democratic party's average for spending in the last two years?
Did Rubio's constituents support a universal background check?,Can Rubio's constituents who approved of a background check reject it?,Does Rubio's constituent support a universal background check?,Does Rubio's constituent support a universal background check?,Does Rubio's constituent support a universal background check?
Has Biden received a letter from Trump in the past that was an outgoing president's letter containing just one line?,Has Trump received a letter from Biden in the past that contained only one line?,Did Biden send his letter by email?,Has Trump responded in the past with a letter that did not contain just one line?,Is Biden expected to receive a letter from Trump in the upcoming year?
Did people aged 25-44 experienced a 84% increase in excess mortality due to the COVID vaccine rollout?,Did people aged 25-44 experience a 84% increase in excess mortality due to the COVID vaccine rollout?,Did the COVID vaccine rollout increase COVID mortality?
Can couples not have two children beginning in January 2022?,Does the State-run newspaper say anything on the requirements of China for couples?,Are spousal alimony and child support required if Chinese couples choose the plan?,Does the government require couples to have 2 children by 2022?,Does the state-run newspaper say anything pertaining to this plan?
What percentage of Republicans voted for the immigration bill?,Did senators pass the immigration bill with a majority of 54 votes?,Does a filibuster have a significant impact on what passes the Senate?,Was this bill passed with a majority of 54 votes?,Does this bill passed the full Senate after being in the Senate?
Was this satire site responsible for the screen shot?,Did this satire arose out of any real event?,Did this satire reverberate through the industry?,Did this image originate from the satire website?,Did this image have any connection with Bud Light?,Are Bud Light prices below $11/dl?
Has DeSantis been releasing documents on his financial records?,Is DeSantis known to have a history of disclosures?,Is DeSantis known to have a history of reporting on his financial records?,Is DeSantis known to have a history of showing revenue?,Is DeSantis known to be hiding revenue?
Does the novel coronavirus remain viable on fruits and vegetables for 12 hours?,Does the novel coronavirus affect the health of people?,Does the novel coronavirus affect the population?,Does the novel coronavirus have the ability to spread through food?,Does the novel coronavirus affect all types of fruit and vegetables?
Is it estimated that it takes up to 25 years to obtain U.S. citizenship legally?,Would Senate bill change the timeframe of how long it takes to obtain citizenship?,Is this bill a proposal that could apply to immigrants who came to the U.S. illegally?,Has this proposal ever been used to legalize immigration?
Did Kejriwal accuse Amit Shah and Akbarudding owaisi of striking a secret deal ahead of the 2020 Bihar assembly elections?,Did any government officials or officials from Amit Shah or Akbarudding owaisi have ties to krish?
Are 7 million more people employed today than were employed in 1994?,Are 7 million more people employed today than were employed in 1994?,Are 7 million more people employed today than were employed in 1994?,Are more people employed today than were employed in 1994?,Is there evidence that these numbers are based on statistical error?
Does the video show the astronaut making it from space to the surface of the earth?,Did the video show the astronaut jumping in four minutes?,Did the astronaut reach the surface of the earth in four minutes?,Did the astronaut live in Australia?,Did the astronaut come back to Earth from space?,Did the astronaut's spacecraft end in the ISS?
Did Texas experience three ISIS-related incidents?,Did Texas conduct an investigation of the cases of ISIS-related incidents?,Are all the incidents related to ISIS confined to specific areas of Texas?,Are any of the incidents related to ISIS confined to specific areas of Texas?,Does the NBC report mention any other areas in Texas that have been the subject of ISIS-related incidents?
Did PM Modi inaugurate the bridge three months ago?,Did the bridge collapse?,Was the bridge reopened with construction under way?,Was the bridge designed to be able to carry vehicles?,Did the bridge have an exit on the upper side?,Did the bridge collapse during construction?,Did the bridge collapse during construction?,Did the bridge belonged to the Jamnagar-Junagarh highway?
Is there any way to increase the amount the cost increases to cover for people with pre-existing conditions under Obamacare?,Is the $63 charge all those with pre-existing conditions will need to pay in 2013?,Does the $63 charge cover all of the increased cost for people with pre-existing conditions under Obamacare?
Are there more people in the world today than there were in 2000?,Are there more people living in the world today?,Is the goal of reducing people in the world by 50% achievable?,Is Pfizer working towards this goal?,Is there any evidence to indicate that reducing the number of people in the world will achieve this goal?
"Did Trump ""predict"" gas prices in Trump's prediction?",Was Trump right about gas prices with Biden?,Did Biden receive any of Trump's predictions?,Did a Big Boy restaurant sign make Trump right about gas prices in Biden's prediction?,Did Biden receive any of Trump's predictions?
Is Brown the primary responsible for Ohio jobs leaving China?,Does Brown have any knowledge of the reason for Ohio jobs leaving China?,Was this information given to Brown by a journalist?,Do a number of Ohio jobs left China as a result of Brown's stances?,Do you think Brown's influence in this country is primarily based on him?
Was Obama not authorized to authorize immigration reform by executive order?,Did Obama agree on the exact timing of executive order approval?,Did Obama disagree on how long this order could take?,"Did Obama specifically call for the passage of the immigration reform executive order on October 13, 2012?",Did Obama say he was unable to authorize immigration reform by executive order?
Did Jones reveal that chemotherapy does not work 97% of the time?,Did Jones inform the public that chemo does not work all the time?,Was Jones quoting an author in regards to why chemotherapy doesn't work 97% of the time?,Did Jones give out an example of how chemotherapy can help save lives?
Is there evidence of police arresting three in the video?,Has the video been reported for publication in the media?,Do these arrests take place within Pakistan?,Is this an Associated Press article?,Has this video been reported for publication in the media?,Is this an Associated Press article?,Is this an Associated Press article?
Did Marcos receive an interview in 2016?,Did Marcos receive an interview from Jessica Soho?,Did Marcos receive an interview from Jessica Soho?,Did Marcos receive an interview from Jessica Soho?,Did Marcos receive an interview from Jessica Soho in 2016?,Have any responses since that interview been posted on Twitter?
Did Australia discover the detached coral reef?,Is this the first detached coral reef discovered in the Great Barrier Reef in over a century?,Did this coral reef resemble a similar reef to the one found in the Great Barrier Reef?,Did scientists observe coral from this one location?,Did researchers study the reef?
Are there monkey flowers in the Himalayas?,Are monkey flowers in the Himalayas rare in the photo?,Have the monkey flowers in the Himalayas ever bloomed?,Are monkey flowers in the Himalayas common in the photo?,Have any monkey flowers ever bloomed?,Are any monkey flowers in the Himalayas rare in the photo?
Did the list include more than a dozen mass shootings using the AR-15?,Did any of the mass shootings use the AR-15?,Was there a total of 12 mass shootings in the U.S. with a used AR-15 gun?,Are there any a-lists detailing mass shootings with AR-15 guns?
Is the list based on a comparison to other coalition nations?,Is this list only a snapshot?,"Is the current list only ""actively"" involved in fighting the IS?",Is this group a true coalition?,Has any other coalition states actively participated in combating this group?,Is the current list exclusive of these nations?
Is McCain and Bush trying to spend 1 trillion dollars in Iraq over 10 years?,Is this amount a true estimate of how much the country will spend?,Are there more expenses associated with going to Iraq than the estimated spending?,Does this amount represent a precise estimate of the estimated Iraq spending?,Are there other assumptions regarding the anticipated Iraq spending?
Has this president been prosecuted at every military court?,Have two people tried and convicted in these courts in the last 4 years?,Has anyone in this administration been tried and convicted in these courts?,Has the president ever been prosecuted in these military courts?,Are there any other current cases of this presidency prosecuted?
Was Ice-T arrested at a gas station?,Did Ice-T admit to being robbed at a gas station?,Did Ice-T report that he had been robbed at the gas station?,Did Ice-T make reference to any crimes?,Does Ice-T have any criminal record?
Was this sentence cut because the child had 'asked to be raped'?,Did this judge believe that the child had 'asked to be raped'?,Was the judge able to find reasonable defense in these cases?,Did the judge approve this plea?,Did this person have a prior conviction for lewd acts?
Did the grandmother track down the testicle of the men?,Did the 81-year-old woman kill the two men?,Did the woman take home any testicle?,Is the woman under 85 years old?,Did the grandmother shoot the testicles of the men?,Is this woman's son a doctor?
Is it true that the recidivism rate in prisoners released from Guantanamo has risen since they started returning to the country?,Is it true that recidivism is nearly 29% and has been climbing steadily since detainees began being released from Guantanamo?,Has it been since the recidivism rate has risen?
Does driving in Texas cost you an ID?,Does driving a total of 200 miles in total have to be accompanied by identification?,Can you drive a total of 140 miles in total if you do not have a valid ID?,Do a traveler in Texas have to travel more than 200 miles to get an ID?
Is it true that store owners fought with looters during Hurricane Matthew?,Did a large shootout take place?,Did these gunfire victims become survivors?,Did the victims of this shootout die in the shootout?,Did this shootout occur in an area that lacked safe areas?,Did any other victims of this shootout survive?
Did all Australians get fully vaccinated?,Do all COVID-19 deaths involve fully vaccinated people?,Was Australia the only country in the world to get fully vaccinated against COVID?,Do these figures reflect a real-world experience?,Would this increase be caused by an increased rate of infection?
Did the average health care premium increase under Obama?,Was the average increase in health care premiums under Obama a % increase?,Has the average health care premium increase under Obama been significantly higher than prior years?,Does Obama specifically increase health insurance premiums?,Is Obama's response to this change consistent with his stated stance on health care?
Did Obama's secretary of energy support paying European levels for gasoline?,Was Chu referring to American levels for gasoline?,Was Chu's suggestion on paying European levels for gasoline a resounding resounding yes?,Does Chu support the proposed American gas tax?,Did Chu support the proposed American gas tax?
Was the woman of 6 year old when she competed in the Olympics?,Did the woman compete in a round of 80?,Is India proud on girls like her?,Is it true that there is talent in Indian kids?,Are there any other aspects about this story that would be helpful in understanding how talented they are?
Did these figures come from Congressional Budget Office's calculations?,Did this report claim that a total of 20 million Americans might lose their employer-based insurance under Obamacare?,Is the estimated number of people losing their employer based insurance in this report likely to have fluctuated?,Does the report reflect the actual loss of their employer based insurance?
Did 57 people die because of COVID-19?,Did 57 people die because of COVID-19?,Are there any figures that are available to suggest that this report is incorrect?,Is the COMEDK UGET 2020 exam the only one that showed COVID-19 positivity?,Is there any data for the CDC indicating that COVID is a major cause of death in 2019?
Was an image of an officer wielding a baton taken during the clearance of a homeless encampment in July 2021?,Was the officer pointing to the camera?,Was there a large amount of noise being produced when the police officer aimed the camera?,Does this police officer have a helmet or mask?
Did the QR code change votes?,Did French electoral cards use the QR code for this election?,Did the QR code change votes in the previous election?,Are there other election related QR code data?,Did the QR code change votes in the election in 2018?,Does the QR code change the voting process in the current election?,Does the QR code change voting process in the 2020 election?
Did India improve in Global EoDB rankings in the last 4 years?,Did India improve in Global EoDB rankings in the last 4 years?,Has India improved in Global EoDB rankings in the last 4 years?,Have there been any studies to confirm the fact that India has improved in Global EoDB rankings in the last 4 years?
Does it matter to Americans that illegal immigrants will have access to healthcare?,Would it be easier to vote in 2022 for illegal immigrants?,Can illegal immigrants be expected to receive more welfare benefits in 2022?,Are illegal immigrants expected to receive better healthcare in 2022 than in their current years?,Does illegal immigration contribute to the overall health care cost of the US?
Did the bill pass in the Senate?,Did it pass the House?,Did all of those votes result in immigration legislation being put on the table?,Did the House Republicans reject the bill when they did?,Was it true that the bill was found in the Senate?,Was there a Republican in the House that rejected the bill?
Did James Woods report on four suspicious men attempting to hijack a flight before the attacks?,Did the actor witness any such activity?,Was it clear whether James Woods witnessed the attack?,Did Woods not directly witness any of these hijackings?,Was the actor also recorded stating that four suspicious men had attempted to hijack a flight before the attacks?,Did the actor report the hijackings to the airline?
Did President Zuma say that there are 1.6 million more South Africans without jobs than when he took office in 2009?,Did President Zuma do this before stating that there were 1.6 million more South Africans without jobs than when he took office in 2009?,Did Zuma tell the media after his statement of this information that South Africans had 1.6 million more jobs than when he took office in 2009?,"Did President Zuma say that ""the number of jobs that have been created is expected to increase""?"
Did the United States invade South Africa?,Would that be an invasion?,Do 50 American soldiers currently in the country for a joint exercise?,Did this exercise occur in South Africa?,Did the United States invade South Africa?,Did this exercise occur in South Africa?,Are there any other names for this exercise?,Do any US troops currently in South Africa?
Did riots occur at the U.S. Capitol following the 2020 election?,Did the U.S. Capitol use a flagpole to break into?,Are there any other incidents associated with riots?,Is a flagpole the only means of entry into the US Capitol?,Was the riots involving riots involving Trump related?
Did this pattern take place in the United States or elsewhere?,Was there any evidence to suggest any one of these acts were intentional?,Did this type of activity typically take place in this region?,Did this activity occur at any locations in the United States?,Was it in Arizona?,Was this activity associated with any other type of activity?
Can surgical masks prevent the airborne transmission of respiratory viruses?,Do surgical masks prevent airborne transmission of respiratory viruses?,Can surgical masks prevent the airborne transmission of respiratory viruses?,Can surgical masks prevent airborne transmission of respiratory viruses?,Does this data support the claims of those who say that surgical masks do not protect against respiratory viruses?
Is there any estimate of how many Twitter accounts Nigeria has?,Is there a reliable estimation of how many people are using Twitter in Nigeria?,Is there a reliable estimate of how many Twitter accounts there are in Nigeria?,Is Twitter in Nigeria a reliable estimate of what number of Twitter accounts are in Nigeria?
Is Feingold saying that he broke his promise of getting the majority of funding from Wisconsin residents?,Is Feingold saying that he broke his promise of getting the majority of funding from Wisconsin residents?,Did Feingold make this claim during the 1992 elections?,Would Feingold have said that he broke his promise of getting the majority of funding from Wisconsin residents prior to his election as governor?
Has a circular been issued by the AICTE about scrapping the 75% attendance rule for the engineering course?,Has the circular been written by the AICTE itself?,Is the 75% attendance rule still being followed?,Did this circular come out under the name of AICTE?,Is this circular the first one that talks about scrapping this rule?,Is this circular the first AICTE circular to do this?
Will the new national flag be a green symbol?,Will the new national flag be a red symbol?,Are there other flags for the Philippines?,Is this new national flag in place of the current national flag?,Have any other nations joined the Philippines in adopting this new national flag?,Is the Philippines considering using a red national flag?
Did McCain propose banning politicians from paying lobbyists?,Was McCain's bill passed?,Was McCain a Democrat?,Would McCain ban candidates from paying lobbyists?,Did John McCain do an interview ten years ago?,Did McCain publicly support this bill?,Did McCain have any supporters?,Was McCain a Democrat at the time?
Did the Election Commission of India say that Rs. 350 would be deducted from the bank accounts of people who would not cast their vote?,Did the Election Commission of India claim that 350 would be deducted from the bank accounts of people who would not cast their vote?,Did the Election Commission of India claim that Rs. 350 would be deducted from the bank accounts of people who would not cast their vote?
Did the US economic growth slow during this period?,Did trade deficits hurt the economy due to this slowdown?,Did this slowdown affect the economy in any way?,Was the GDP up only by 1.6%?,Would the U.S. economic growth slow down in 2018?,Is the U.S. current economic situation causing any problems?
Did top Nigerian air force officers retire due to bombing refugee camps?,Did top Nigerian air force officers retire due to bombing refugee camps?,Did top Nigerian air force officers retire for the bombing of refugee camps?,Did top Nigerian air force officers retire due to bombing refugee camps?
Did the ABP News poll predict 185 seats for the BSP in December 2021?,Did the poll predict 185 seats for the BSP in December 2021?,Did the poll predict 185 seats for the BSP in December 2021?,Has ABP News taken any action?,Did the poll predict 185 seats for the BSP in December 2021?
Did the media refuse to acknowledge that a number of holistic health practitioners died suspiciously?,Has there been any evidence of a link between these deaths and others in this country?,Is there evidence that the media has a connection to these deaths?,Has the media acknowledged this link in general?,Did any of these cases involve homicides?
Does an eagle shed the same feather on the same wing every time it loses one?,Is this behavior normal?,Is this behavior a common feature in eagles?,Does this behavior occur by chance or in an individual wing?,Is this behavior normal for eagles?
Did this hospital building construction process take 16 hours?,Did this hospital building construction process occur in Wuhan?,Was this hospital building construction process done outside of Wuhan?,Does this hospital building construction process involve any other cities in China?,Is this hospital building construction process considered to be legal?,Does the hospital building construction process involve any international organizations?
Did the shoot occur in the filming of the prank video?,Did the shooter know the brothers?,Was this incident the first time this has happened?,. Was the video on the prank video?,. Whether or not the Jalal Brothers were killed in this filming?,.?
Is the school closure announcement on June 15 made by the Bihar Education Department?,Does the notification cover the entire state of Bihar?,Has there been an official announcement of school closures in other states?,Has the notification been signed by multiple state education departments?,Has Bihar Education imposed the closure of school for public holidays?
Did Johnson and Johnson issue a voluntary recall of five sunscreen products?,Did Johnson and Johnson release any information about the benzene level in these products?,Has Johnson and Johnson recalled any other sunscreen products besides these five?,Is benzene found in these sunscreen products?,Was there any other information related to these five sunscreen products in regard to these sunscreen products.?
Is the Medicaid waiver proposal pending?,Is the Medicaid waiver proposal awaiting approval at the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services?,Have the proposed Medicaid waiver proposals at the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services been on hold for more than two years?,Is the proposed Medicaid waiver proposal being reviewed at the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services?
Did this vaccine kill the children in Senegal?,Do all children in Senegal die from this vaccine?,Does the COVID vaccine actually cure COVID-19?,Was this vaccine administered by a doctor?,Does this vaccine still exist?,Are a number of children in Senegal still being administered this vaccine?
Does the World Economic Forum support the idea of 15 minute cities?,Do the WEF and the UN both support this proposal?,Has the UN been working on a 15 minute city before?,Does the WEF and UN actually endorse 15 minute cities?,Has this proposal been pursued by the world economic forum and UN?
Is the word 'Swayamsevak' inscribed on a medal given to volunteers for the Tokyo Olympics?,Is the medal given to volunteers written in Devanagari?,Did the words 'Swayamsevak' not appear in the medal?,Is the word 'Swayamsevak' inscribed on more than one medal?
Was Pelosi in Wuhan the month before the COVID-19 outbreak there?,Was Pelosi the only representative there to visit the city?,Was the outbreak in Wuhan during Pelosi's trip to China?,Was the outbreak in Wuhan within one month of her visit to China?,Is there no evidence Pelosi was involved in the outbreak in Wuhan?
Are 179 million Latin Americans wanting to migrate to the U.S.?,Do Latin Americans want to stay in the U.S.?,Are there other factors than age and fertility that may affect their desire to migrate to the U.S.?,Can the U.S. immigration policies make it difficult to enter the Latin American community in the future?
Does Jeff Greene only live in Florida for two years?,Has Greene lived in California long enough to meet the residency requirement?,Is Jeff Greene unlikely to run for a statewide office in the state of Florida?,Has Jeff Greene met the residency requirement?,Does Jeff Greene have any experience in running for office?
Did ABC order Barr to pay $208 million?,Did ABC's actions lead to Barr's payout?,Did ABC ask Barr to pay $208 million?,Is there evidence that ABC asked Barr to pay $208 million?,Do other broadcasters have reported a similar pay out?,Has ABC paid Barr $208 million?
Did organizers for this protest offer $300 to participants in this protest?,Did these ads appear on Craigslist?,Did these ads have a high volume of hits?,Did this protest take place in a state with a high percentage of Black people?,Did some of these protesters receive financial compensation?,Did these protesters receive financial compensation?,Did these protesters receive financial compensation?
Has Trump's company been bankrupt four times?,Has Trump's company been bankrupt multiple times?,Has Trump's company been bankrupt multiple times?,Has Trump's company been bankrupt four times?,Do Trump's companies rely on banks?,Is Trump an actual bankrupt?,Does Trump have a history of bankruptcies?
Was this postman arrested for eating 1.3 tons of mail?,Was the postman charged with eating 1.3 tons of mail?,Was the postman in possession of an eating disorder?,Did the postman have food on the postman's body?,Was the postman with a psychiatric disorder in custody?
Did rapper Tekashi 69 take a LIGMA overdose?,Was Tekashi 69 born before 1982?,Did Tekashi 69 die at age 22?,Did Tekashi 69 take a LIGMA overdose?,Did Tekashi 69 die after being interviewed?
Does the unemployment rate in Boone County exceed the 2% avg?,Is it currently estimated how many jobs are available in Boone County?,Is there a shortage of job applicants in Boone County?,Are the job openings at or above 2% of normal demand?,Is the average hourly wage of someone employed in Boone County below minimum wage?
"Is it true that we have over 100,000 children in serious condition and many on ventilators?",Is it true that we have children that have never been in serious condition and many on ventilators?,Is it true that children who have had serious conditions in the past have never been in serious condition?
"Is New Jersey down nearly 200,000 jobs since its pre-recession peak?",Has New Jersey trailed the rest of America in unemployment?,Is it true that New Jersey has trailed the rest of America in unemployment for 12 consecutive months?,Is it true that New Jersey has trailed the rest of America in unemployment?
Was this number cited in the text of the sentence?,Is this number listed in the text of the sentence?,Does this text contain information about the stimulus check in question?,Is this text listed in the text of the statement?,Was the amount claimed by the caller refunded?,Is the amount being claimed in question refunded?
Was this movie a blockbuster in February 2021?,Did this film have other superstars on it?,Were other popular films in February 2021?,Would this film have more success in February 2021 if they aired on Netflix?,Did this film do well in February 2021 on Netflix?
Would Penny's budget be balanced by 2019?,Would Penny's budget continue to gain support?,Does Penny's budget plan have all the same ingredients that would balance a budget by 2019?,Have there been many changes to Penny's budget plan since his original release?,Was Penny's budget plan released for public comment or debate?
Can banks benefit from foreclosure on homes that exceed 30% of their value?,Does a bank that forecloses on a home typically suffer losses that exceed 30% of its value?,Are there other facts that can benefit lenders from foreclosures that the general public does not know?,Does any research point to a significant decrease in homeowners owing after a foreclosure?
"Did the Boeing 737 crash in southern China, and how many passengers and crew were on board?",Did the Boeing 737 crash with a total of 133 passengers and crew on board?,Was there a record of final moments on the Boeing 737?,Was there anything other relevant that relates to the final moments of the Boeing 737?
Did Mandel declare bank fraud in June 2010?,Did Mandel campaign for the Senate when he first claimed bank fraud?,Did Mandel raise money for his Senate campaign?,Did he have any donations from banks when he claims bank fraud?,Does this statement contradict other data?,Is the statement accurate?,Do Ohio Treasurer's words support any information?
Does 77 percent of Portland students finish elementary school without taking one art class?,Does 77% of Portland students finish elementary school without taking one art class?,Was 57% of Portland students ineligible to take art class?,Was 77 percent of students ineligible to take art class in the previous grade?
Did this photo show a fuel depot near Lviv that is on fire?,Is this photo being deemed fake?,"Does this photo have the word ""Edmonton"" on it?",Do viewers think this photo is accurate?,Would this post be accurate to say the fuel depot is on fire after a Russian missile attack?
Does China's plan require that we find 2 billion gallons?,Will China have to come up with 2 billion gallons of water for a year between now and 2025?,Will China continue to develop renewable water sources?,Is there a precedent of not developing renewable water sources in China?,Is there a legal obligation to protect water from any sources?
Is the Rs. 5 lakh reward a reward for female entrapment?,Will this reward be used in creating new marriages?,Does the reward involve male entrapment?,Is the money a reward or a reward for female entrapment?,Has this reward been announced for male entrapment?
Did the couple kiss amidst the May Day protests?,Was the photograph taken in the United States?,Did this photograph come during a public event in the United States?,Are there other photos of the couple kissing in this photo?,Did this photograph come during the May Day protests in the United States?
Was it true that more than $40 billion was spent on highways in 2012?,Did this compare to Amtrak in its entire 40 year history?,Has Amtrak faced a major economic crisis in the last 40 years?,Did this exceed the amount spent on highways during this period?,Does this equate to much of the funding Amtrak received from other forms of transportation?
Are rich people paying a less rate of tax than during this period?,Is this tax rate similar to the rate paid by all Americans during this period?,Is this a trend that has continued during this period?,Does any information mentioned in the article support this claim?,Do I need to get tax information from every individual during this period?
"Is the world's third largest economy, in 2011?","Is India's GDP the 4th largest economy, in 2012?","Is India's GDP the 16th fastest growing economy in the world, in 2010?","Is India's GDP the highest in the world, in 2011?","Is India's GDP the lowest in the world, in 2012?"
Did the CM of Telangana give the boxer 50k?,Did the CM of Telangana award the boxer?,Did the CM of Telangana award any other prizes to the boxer?,Did the boxer win the Gold Medal at the Womens World Boxing Championship?
Is the figure accurate?,Is it an accurate figure?,Is it accurate for all hospital admissions?,Does the rate of deaths from hospital admissions increase over time?,Does this estimate make sense for general population hospital admissions?,Are hospital admissions for all kinds of illnesses lower than general population hospital admissions?
Did the US CDC claim smoking cigarettes do not cause lung cancer?,Did smoking cigarettes cause lung cancer in 1958?,Did the CDC conclude smoking cigarettes do not cause lung cancer in 1958?,Are smoking cigarettes linked to lung cancer?,Did the US CDC make a statement in 1958 regarding smoking cigarettes?,Did the US CDC state smoking cigarettes does not cause lung cancer in 1958?
Did The Telegraph cover a man who received $500k from his uncle?,Did The Telegraph cover an individual who received $500k from a family?,Did The Telegraph cover the specifics of the individual's case in detail?,Was the individual convicted of a crime?,Did The Telegraph cover any other crime alleged to have occurred at this time?
Is a majority of prisoners re-convicted within 3 years?,Is re-incarceration rate based on average length of prison time?,Is re-incarceration rate based on number of prison visits?,Is re-incarceration rate based on type of prison visits?
How many students left before HOPE to attend college?,Are more students in Georgia returning after receiving the scholarship?,Do more students stay in Georgia than go home?,. Are higher SAT scores reversible?,. Do higher scores increase in the second year?,. Is there an increase in the second year?
Did Obama receive a student ID from Columbia University in 1981?,Did Obama attend Columbia University and receive a student ID from Columbia University in 1981?,Did Obama receive an student ID from Columbia University in 1981?,Did Obama receive an international student ID from Columbia University in 1981?,Are the two students who receive the student IDs from Columbia University the same people?
Has the health care in Guinea-Bissau reached levels that are 5% below the international average?,Is there any evidence to support the estimates?,Do we have data indicating the rate of malnutrition in Guinea-Bissau?,Does the government estimate that 7% of women in Guinea-Bissau are in poor health?,Does the government estimate that 7% of women in Guinea-Bissau are in poor health?
"Did Austin ever have a ranking of ""one of the most, if not the most, economically segregated cities in the country""?",Was there a long history of this status?,Are some parts of Austin more economically segregated than others?,Did other cities have longer histories of this status?
Did this image have the name of this monk?,Did this image contain the name of the mummy?,Does this image contain any clothing in the picture?,Does this image have any facial expressions?,Was this image of the mummy clean?,Is the image in the picture of a smiling monk?
Has Russia required male citizens to have more than one wife?,Have Russian women been required to have more than one wife?,Does Russia force males to have more than one wife?,Is Russia a country that allows single males to marry?,Does Russia enforce a requirement that males have more than one wife?
Did Stalin tell all Hindi speakers in Tamil Nadu to leave the state by March 20?,Was the official statement on this matter accurate?,Did the official statement include any other details regarding the petition?,Was this action taken in the context of the entire affluent of Tamil Nadu?,Was it based on the fact that there were a large number of Hindi speakers living in this particular region?
Did Biden seek reelection when Trump released this statement?,Did Biden's diagnosis result in any negative reactions from Trump?,Did Biden make any additional statements in his statement?,Are there any reports that Biden made statements in regards to Trump's statement about Biden?,Does Trump say everyone does not want Biden to be president?
Did this number have an actual amount of missing children a year?,Is the current number of missing children an estimate or a factual number?,Are there multiple years of data which supports this number?,Are any of the missing children reported in any specific year?,Are any of the missing children reported for an actual period?
Did 20% of men who said that the victim asked for it say that the victim asked for it?,Are the statistics in this study taken directly from CIET?,Does this research represent an accurate statistic regarding these trends?,Are the statistics in this study specific to men?,Is the claim that 20% of men said the victim asked for it accurate?
Did the population increase by 10 percent in the U.S. under Bush?,Did the number of jobs grow by 1 percent in the United States under Bush?,Is the population rate of the United States higher under Bush?,Did the number of jobs increase by 1 percent under Bush?,Is the population rate of the United States higher than under Bush?
"Is the 25% of GDP spent on the federal government ""almost all-time high""?","Is the 15% of GDP spent on the federal government ""almost all-time low""?",Is there any evidence to suggest this is the case?,Does this amount of spending not have a correlation to the GDP growth rate?
Did Raguram Rajan warn Rahul Gandhi and P Chidambaram about Nirav Modi?,Did Raguram Rajan and Chidambaram not allow him to keep silent about Nirav Modi?,Did Raguram Rajan keep approving loan to Nirav Modi until May 2014?
Is 85% of government running or 85% shut down?,Is there anything further I can look into?,Have this rates remained largely flat or even increasing this year?,Is there a difference between these rates based on a comparison between two sources?,Is this a significant metric?
Was Biden tested positive for COVID-19 after receiving a two-dose initial vaccination series and two additional booster shots?,Was Biden vaccinated against COVID-19 prior to testing positive?,Did Biden receive one additional booster vaccination after testing positive for COVID-19?,Did Biden receive any additional booster vaccinations?
"Does the video of the 2021 Koran burning happen in Denmark, not Sweden?",Are the words of the Koran in Danish written in a specific language?,Is the Turkish name for the Koran in English?,Was the Turkish name of the Koran in English shortened in the video?,Is the term for the Turkish Koran in English shortened in the video?
Has the Obama administration been constrained by the Oil Pollution Act of 1990?,Does the Oil Pollution Act of 1990 give the responsible party the lead role in trying to fix the problem?,Does the Oil Pollution Act of 1990 limit the Obama administration from attempting to fix the problem?,Has the Obama administration been able to fix the problem?
"Did the ""Get-Rich-Quick"" platform provide a ""get-rich-quick"" income?","Did the platform provide ""a ""get-rich-quick"" income?",""" Did the platform provide any ""investment earnings""?",Has Nilekani publicly given any prior investment earnings?
"Is there currently any more time to apply for the EHIC card,after Brexit?",Can an EHIC card allow one to see doctors in EU countries for free for five years after Brexit?,Can the card qualify me for free state medical care in EU countries after Brexit?,"Does the current time to apply for the EHIC card,after Brexit,entail the same conditions as when it is available before Brexit?"
Did property taxes increase in the city of Austin?,Did income in Austin increase 4 percent since 2012?,Were Austin's income rates higher in 2012?,Was the city's property taxes higher in 2012?,Is it true that property taxes have increased?,Has this city experienced an increase in wealth in the past 10 years?
"Did the photo allegedly show Susan B Anthony being ""beaten and arrested for trying to vote"" in 1872?",Does the photo show Anthony having taken a vote?,Is the image used in this article not attributed to anyone?,Are any other alleged images used in this article?,Is the alleged image by anyone based in a state?
Did Erdogan request to sit with Macron at the event in 2020?,"Did Erdogan say to Macron that he was ""retiring"" from the event?","Did Erdogan say to Macron that he was ""retiring"" from the event?",Are there any other sources that could support this claim?,Are any other events in 2020 being staged in response to this assertion?
"Does this Canadian Partnership project offer $15,000 to registered individuals?",Is this Canadian Partnership project open to individuals of any age and gender?,Do this individuals qualify for this Canadian Partnership project?,Is this Canadian Partnership project open to men and women of any age and gender?,Is the Canadian Partnership project open to the general public?,Is this Canadian Partnership project open to females of any age and gender?
Did Arizona jump 11 places since this year in terms of job-friendly?,Are there numbers that show this positive change?,Is it true that there was a change in the way America was described?,Is it true that there was a decrease in the unemployment rate?,Was this change directly related to the state's job growth?
Did Obama reduce gas prices?,Has Obama's administration caused the price of gas to rise from 3.07 per gallon to $2.30 today?,Does the decrease mean that gas prices have actually gone down?,Would Obama have reduced gas prices if he hadn't sworn in?,Would Obama's policies have caused the price of gas to go down if he hadn't sworn in?
Is there over one million children in early child development facilities today?,Do all early childhood development facilities employ staff?,Is the average children spend per month in early child development facility?,Do all early childhood development facilities offer a full day of child care?,Can the average hours of daycare in early child development facility be expected to be less than five hours?
"Did Trump's website remove ""pro-life"" mentions from it's campaign website?","Did Trump's campaign delete ""pro-life"" mentions?",Did Trump delete pro-life mentions from his campaign website?,Was Trump's campaign website wiped from the internet before he was elected President?
Did the photos show the same person in the shots?,Has this particular person ever been identified in these photos?,Is this particular person the same person as the other shots of the same person?,Is this person's name consistent with who the shooter was?,Has this person had any prior police involvement?
Did Gore 'predict' ice caps melting by 2013?,Did Gore misrepresent data?,Did Gore make an unwarranted claim about ice caps melting by 2013?,Are there other disputed data from previous interviews with Gore?,Is it true that Gore predicted ice caps melting by 2013?
Is there a video from August 2023 that has been officially aired?,"Was this kid actually saying ""Shut the fuck up""?",Did this kid actually say this verbal slur?,Was this specific video from August 2023 filmed?,Was this person in the school?,Did this person go to the school to argue?,Is this person in the school legally?
Can algae ponds capture all of the carbon dioxide from coal-fired power stations?,Can algae ponds capture all the CO2 from coal-fired power stations?,Are there any significant differences between algae ponds and coal-fired power stations?,Can algae ponds capture all of the CO2 from coal-fired power stations?,Is there any evidence for the claim that algae ponds can capture all of the CO2 from coal-fired power stations?
Did Ed Gillespie's firm lobby for five foreign governments?,Did the dictator awaiting trial for war crimes use Ed Gillespie's firm to campaign for him?,Did the dictator awaiting trial use Ed Gillespie's firm to campaign for him?,Has this dictator spent his time trying to prosecute him for war crimes?
Did this bill include an estimate of 2 million jobs lost?,Did this bill include an estimate of a number of benefits?,Did the cap-and-trade bill increase consumer protections?,Does this bill include a requirement for an increase in consumer protections?,Are there more reasons for these reductions?,Does this bill include an estimate of benefits in addition to loss of jobs?
Does video show 80 million year old frilled shark in Japan?,Was it in the video shot in Japan?,Is it possible that the video shows an 80 million year old frilled shark in Japan?,Do we know the video has this shark's skull?,Was the video shot in Japan?,Did we know the shark's jaws had these in them?
Did Marcos will 70% of his wealth to Filipinos and 30% to the world?,Did Marcos' wealth benefit the philippines?,Did Marcos' wealth benefit the world?,Have the philippines suffered in Marcos's death?,Has Marcos' wealth been administered to the philippines?
Did parking lot carjackers place flyers or $100 bills on cars' windows?,Did parking lot carjackers take cars when drivers remove the flies?,Did parking lot carjackers attempt to steal flies or $100 bills?,Did parking lot carjackers steal cars in a specific area?,Did parking lot carjackers rape drivers in specific places?
Is there an estimated amount of Intensive beds in the pandemic?,Is there a projected amount of Intensive beds in the pandemic?,Has the amount of Intensive beds in the pandemic ever been reported?,Has Ganzke said that Intensive beds have been reduced during the pandemic?
Did the ads received four Pinocchios for lying on preexisting conditions?,Was the lie consistent with the election?,Was it part of the election strategy to lie about preexisting conditions?,Is the fact that all of the voters were lying true to the election strategy?,Does this poll show that voters are being tricked by the advertising campaigns?
Are 40 percent of illegal immigrants legally arriving and then overstaying their visas?,Is 40% of illegal immigrants illegally arriving?,Can you say that in general?,Was any portion of this figure reported by another sources?,Is there one particular way in which we can think of illegal immigrants coming to the U.S. illegally?
Did three 12-year-olds survive?,Was there another attack on the same day?,Did anyone other than the three 12 year olds survive?,Did anyone die from a bullet wound?,Did anyone receive treatment for a bullet wound?,Did any other injuries occur on the same day?,Was there more than one attack?
Did this bill come from a Democrat?,Did McClossoff introduce the bill?,Did McClossoff introduce the bill in 2019?,Was McClossoff's bill successful in being passed?,Are older people barred from voting under this bill?,/Can older people vote in Texas?
Was Stewart diagnosed with PTSD?,Has Stewart had PTSD ever since?,Has Stewart had PTSD since the beginning of 2019?,Did Stewart have PTSD in the 1940s?,Did Stewart suffer PTSD when he was a WW2 pilot?,Is it an accurate assumption that Stewart was diagnosed with PTSD due to his WWII experience?
Did Kashmiri students assault another student for celebrating the success of Chandrayaan-3?,Did this student get arrested?,Did this student get arrested?,Does this video have any other captions?,Do these video clips contain any swearing or vulgar language?,Were these video clips of this student assaulting the other student for celebrating Chandrayaan-3?
Was Stromae alive at this time?,Did Stromae die from an accident?,Did Stromae die after an accident?,Was Stromae alive during this time period?,Did Stromae die after an accident?,Was Stromae alive when this happened?,Did Stromae die after an accident?
Did ten hours in jail for not wearing a mask exist in Delhi?,Was a person arrested for not wearing a mask?,Describe the circumstances of the arrest. Did people stay in the jail to meet with the police?,Describe the circumstances of the arrest. Finished the question. Publish your answers on your official website.?
Did the 1986 Vaccine Protection Act increase children's vaccines?,Did the 1986 Vaccine Protection Act increase vaccine coverage?,Did the 1986 Vaccine Protection Act reduce the percentage of vaccines given to children?,Did the 1986 Vaccine Protection Act have a negative effect on children's vaccine coverage?
"Did Biden claim that 308,000 military people died because he could not provide them proper medical care in the military?",Did Biden actually state that there was a shortage of medical care in the military?,Was Biden's claim for a shortage of medical care in the military true?,Did Biden claim that military veterans suffered from medical shortages in the military?,Did Biden state that he made a claim for a shortage of medical care in the military?
Did Democrats estimate the death toll in the hurricanes that hit Puerto Rico?,Did Democrats' death toll estimates come out accurate?,Has this estimated death toll been validated?,Is there any evidence this would be true?,Is the death toll estimate based on a pre-existing data set?
Do you need police assistance if you can't speak?,Does pressing 55 with 999 allow you to get help without speaking?,Does pressing 55 with 999 allow you to request police help without speaking?,Does pressing 55 with 999 allow police to get to you without speaking?,Will pressing 55 make 999 send police to you?
Did Romney say the uniforms for the 2002 Winter Olympic games were made in Burma?,Did Romney say the uniforms for the 2002 Winter Olympic games were made in Burma?,Did Romney say that the uniforms for the 2002 Winter Olympic games were made in Burma?,Did Romney claim that the uniforms for the 2002 Winter Olympic games were made in Burma?
Did Biden’s American Relief Plan have a lot of money in it for schools?,Did Biden’s American Relief Plan have funds going out to schools until 2028?,Did Biden’s American Relief Plan include money for schools outside the federal budget?,Has Biden’s American Relief Plan done anything other than fund schools?
Does one of these clinical trial volunteers develop Bell's Palsy?,Has one of these clinical trial volunteers developed Bell's Palsy?,Has the Covid-19 vaccine made any claims for serious side effects?,Is this vaccine effective against Coronavirus?,Is this vaccine a safe medication?,Is this vaccine currently available for anyone?
"Did 2 million COVID tests take place in the country during May 18, 2021?",Did the number of COVID tests on this day be the highest worldwide?,Does this claim make the United States the highest nation to have COVID testing?,Is there any documentation that supports this claim?,Can a reasonable estimate of the number of COVID test results for this day be made?
Was the video filmed on location in Balochistan?,Is the video related to natural disasters?,Did the dam burst in a city?,Are the dams in the country still under construction?,Did this video provide an opportunity to comment on the situation?,Would this be an appropriate use of this video in the aftermath of a natural disaster?
Is it true Rihanna was paid $2.5 million to tweet about farmers' protests?,Was Rihanna paid more money to tweet about farmers' protests than the total amount?,Is it true the estimated payout was more than 3.5 million dollars?,Is it true that Rihanna is well known for donating money to nonprofits?
Did voters in five Oregon counties vote in favor of separation?,Did Oregon counties vote to secede from the state?,Did Oregon counties vote to secede from the state?,Did Oregon counties vote to secede from the state?,Will the Oregon counties that voted to secede from the state be part of Idaho?
Did a majority of veterans die while waiting for health care?,Was there more veterans dying than being treated for health care?,Did veterans die because of health care waiting?,Was there any other reason for veterans dying?,Did the VA provide healthcare in this country?,Did biden use money to deal with veterans' deaths?
Did the guidelines contain nine codes for injury by turkeys?,Were the nine codes specifically related to injury by turkeys?,Did the guidelines address injury by turkeys?,Did the guidelines provide a means for insurance companies to bill turkeys?,Is the new Medicare guidelines currently used by insurance companies?,Did the guidelines include a means for the general public to bill turkeys?
Did Obama vote to support Bush between 40- 50 percent of the time over the last two years?,Does Obama have a history of supporting Bush more than other presidential candidates?,Was Bush's support between 40-50 percent of the time in 2010?,Are there data to support these numbers?,Did Obama vote in favor of Bush at the time of this quote?
"Was there evidence that Sean Jackson was trying to be tried ""as a white man"" in a court in Tampa, Florida?","Was there any evidence that Jackson was requesting to be tried as a white man in a court in Tampa, Florida?","Did Jackson receive a defamation penalty under Florida's ""Free Speech"" laws?",Did Jackson get a defamation penalty for the Florida speech laws?,Did Jackson have any legal representation during the Florida speech laws process?
Was the 60 second segment removed?,Was the segment removed from the show after the show was aired?,Did all of the segments be aired on the show or aired in limited quantities?,Was the segment removed after the show?,Was the segment aired on air or released after the show?
Did Sajid sexually assault a nine year old girl?,Did Sajid physically assault the girl?,Was Sajid at any point able to take the girl away from the girl?,Was Sajid alone at the time of the girl's rescue?,Was Sajid or one of his friends in the video talking with the girl?
Did Obama's administration have 5 environmental impact assessments on the Keystone XL pipeline?,Did any of those environmental impact assessments support a minimal impact on the environment?,Would a minimum impact on the environment be expected with the pipeline?,Did Obama's administration do 5 environmental impact assessments before the implementation of the pipeline?
Did Kasich spend 177 days out of state?,"Does Kasich use 350,000 in taxpayer money on his campaign?",Is Kasich in charge of a state campaign?,Have any other Republican candidates spent money on their campaigns?,"Have any Republicans spent more than $100,000 in taxpayer funds?","Do any Republicans have more than $100,000 in a state campaign?"
Did Samsung pay off a $1.05 billion judgment awarded to Apple entirely in nickels?,Did Samsung pay off a $1.05 billion judgment awarded to Apple entirely in nickels?,Was the $1.05 billion judgment paid in nickels?,Were there any payments made in nickels for this judgment?
Did the video show bikers riding in a larger group?,Did anyone participate in the bike ride?,Did any bike riders ride in a smaller group?,Did anyone participate in any other bike rides?,Did any bikers take a ride in the larger group?,Did anyone walk in the larger group?
Are 20% of young adults using phones during sex?,Do young adults spend significant time on their phones during sex?,Does the use of a cellphone during sexual activity seem related to the age and gender of the users?,Has this claim been supported by data?,Do statistics regarding the use of devices during sexual activity always report a positive outcome?
Are all of the flags in this image at least partially visible?,Are all the flags on this photo in full color?,Has this photo been made available to any other sources?,Are all of the people in this image members of the Labour party?,Are any of these people visible on this photo?,Are any other photos of these people visible?
Did Macron say that the UK should adopt all EU rules and regulations within six months of stopping Brexit?,Did Macron say that the UK would only stay in the EU if they fully adopted all EU rules and regulations?,Have most UK governments not fully adopted the euro and EU rules and regulations?,Did Macron say the UK would only be able to stay in the EU if they fully adopted EU rules and regulations within six months of stopping Brexit?
Is Gandhi focusing on UP Assembly election in 2022?,Does her campaign team say she will run for the 2022 election?,Have UP state ts elections been called for this time?,Will Priyanka Gandhi enter the 2019 election?,Is Gandhi making this announcement publicly?,Does Priyanka Gandhi believe that these elections will not be held in 2019?
Could marijuana tax revenue in 2022 be more than $165M?,Would this revenue be a disproportionate benefit to the state budget?,Does this increase increase marijuana taxes based on a prior estimate of a projected revenue?,Is this tax based on a previous estimate of estimated revenue?
"Do single mothers make $50,000 on the public dole?",Are there any benefits related to working with children?,Is there anything else about public dole that the authors didn't mention?,Does it cover the costs associated with having two children?,Is there any specific information about taxes related to public dole that they mention in this article?
Does the Italian President have anything to do with the U.S. presidential elections?,Has the Italian President publicly questioned U.S. elections?,Has any other U.S. election officials in recent years been arrested for meddling?,Has any other U.S. election officials been arrested for meddling in U.S. elections?
Would 98% of small businesses see a tax increase under Obama's plan?,Could Obama's plan impact more small business owners than planned?,Is there sufficient evidence that small businesses will not see an increase under Obama's plan?,"Lastly, what percentage of small businesses would see a tax increase under Obama's plan?"
"Is there any evidence that free lunches cause children to have a ""full stomach"" and an ""empty soul""?",Does Ryan make specific comparisons between free lunches and their monetary value?,Does Ryan offer direct comparisons between free lunches and their monetary value?,Has Ryan responded to any specific criticism of free lunches?
Did all three congresswomen refuse to take office?,Are all Congresswomen Muslim?,Did any Congresswomen who declined to take office refuse to take their oath of office?,Did the congresswomen who refused to take their oath of office have their oath of office changed after their oath of office?
Has Alter used a campaign finance loophole to fund her campaign?,Did Alter receive public money to fund her campaign?,Was Alter able to obtain public money to fund her campaign?,Can Alter claim public funds from any state?,Has Alter disclosed any information regarding the state funds used?,Do I need to submit a completed disclosure form?
Did the E.P. shooter have a baby orphaned?,Is it a baby that was shot in August 2019?,Is the baby orphaned in the E.P. Shooter?,Are there any other details about the baby?,"Has the baby was orphaned since the August, 2019 mass shooting in El Paso, Texas?"
Did Obama's Supreme Court nominations require 60 votes?,Did Obama's Supreme Court nominations require a majority?,Did Obama's Supreme Court nominations require 60 votes?,Is it accurate to say that Obama's Supreme Court nominations required 60 votes?,Is this accurate to say that Obama's Supreme Court nominations required 60 votes?
Are there two girls wearing Trump shirts?,Does this shirt resemble Trump?,Is Trump wearing a shirt similar to this?,Is there any other evidence in this photograph?,Is this photo being circulated anywhere?,Is this particular photographer using this photograph?,Is this photograph the only documented shot of this photograph?
Did the research found that less than 20% of teenage mothers access the childcare grant?,Is there a survey that found that 20% of teenage mothers access the childcare grant?,Is there a survey that found that 20% of teenage mothers access the childcare grant?,Were the research studies conducted by the research groups that are most reliable?
Do the Gates Foundation spend billions to ensure that all injections and procedures include tracking microchips?,Are there a large number of people who will reject the COVID-19 vaccine?,Do the Gates Foundation's efforts to ensure all medical procedures include tracking microchips?,Does the Gates Foundation spend billions to ensure all medical procedures include tracking microchips?
Was Baldwin voting for the $1 trillion stimulus bill?,Did Baldwin vote for a $1 trillion stimulus bill to replace light bulbs?,Did Baldwin vote for a $1 trillion stimulus bill to replace light bulbs?,Did Baldwin vote for a $1 trillion stimulus bill to replace light bulbs?,Did Baldwin vote for a $1 trillion stimulus bill to replace light bulbs?
"Has flooded roads been found in Bengaluru, Karnataka due to heavy rains in May 2022?",Has any flooded roads been found in other locations in / outside of Bengaluru?,Does the picture in question show vehicles driving on flooded roads?,Have any roads in Karnataka flooded due to heavy rains in May 2022?
Did the DRPC raise tax revenue to pay for Medicare and Medicaid?,Did the DRPC raise tax revenue to pay for Social Security and Medicare?,Did the DRPC raise tax revenue to pay for the Medicare and Medicaid program?,Did the DRPC raise tax revenue to pay for Medicare and Medicaid?
Did McDonald's announce they are bringing back snack wraps?,Did McDonald's announce they are bringing back snack wraps after they've had it out for several years?,Was this announcement made before the original release of Snack Wraps in 2014?,Does McDonald's sell this food product globally?
Did the 1973 column by Art Buchwald support Nixon as the Watergate scandal grew?,Did Buchwald endorse Nixon's actions in the Watergate scandal?,Did Buchwald write the article that featured Nixon's support of the Watergate scandal?,Did Buchwald write an article that included Nixon's support of Nixon as the Watergate scandal grew?
Did this photograph show farmers participating in the protest on 26 January 2021?,Has this photograph of protestors in the photograph reportedly been retouched for better resolution?,Did this photo allegedly show farmers participating in protests in the photograph?,Did this photograph allegedly show a large number of protestors in the photograph?
Did the sanitizer report over 40 deaths?,Did 7 death deaths include a person with an infected heart?,Did the victim support the sanitizer?,Was the victim alleged to be involved with other crimes?,Was the person referred to as a witness to crime?
Is there evidence that there were no planes using the 9/11 terror attacks on the World Trade Center?,Were there any reports in the media about this claim that the 9/11 terrorist attacks took place on planes?,Is there evidence that planes were used in the 9/11 terror attacks on the World Trade Center?
Would Trump receive $17 million in total for closed hotels under the GOP bill?,Would Trump get any of his own money from closed hotels in the past?,Is this bill correct?,Was this bill passed by the Republican Party?,Would Trump ever make any of his own money from closed hotels in the past?,Does this bill provide sufficient financial support for Trump?
Did Texas have a high school graduation rate that was one of the top five?,Did the percentage of Texas students who graduated high school actually increase from 2007 to 2010?,Did Texas have a high high school graduation rate of any kind during the 2011–12 school year?,Did Texas' high school graduation rate fall from 2008 to 2010?
Did Tweed Heads allow Aboriginal school children to attend COVID-19 vaccination centres without parental consent?,Did Aboriginal school children in Tweed Heads come out of school under age 12?,Were any Aboriginal children treated inappropriately by a COVID-19 vaccination clinic?,Were any Aboriginal school children at risk for infection?
Did large numbers of small businesses invest after the tax law?,Did the majority of new business investment after the tax law come from large corporations?,Did the majority of new business investment after the tax law come from companies that buy back their own stock?,Do the results from this analysis suggest that the majority of new business investment after the tax law came from large corporations?
Did Justin Trudeau have sexual relations with a minor?,Did the Prime Minister have the minor sign a non-disclosure agreement?,Did the Canadian Prime Minister have the minor sign a non-disclosure agreement?,Did the Canadian Prime Minister have the minor sign a non-disclosure agreement?
Do referendums provide the public with the opportunity to vote in the Milwaukee County Board budget?,Do referendums offer the public a chance to decide in the Milwaukee County Board budget?,Will voting by referendum give the Milwaukee County Board residents the option of not passing the Milwaukee County Board budget?,Will the referendum give voters a chance to decide in the Milwaukee County Board budget?
Was the bridge collapsed due to a collapse on it?,Was the bridge in a landslide?,Did there ever be a separate incident?,Did it result in any injuries?,Was any transportation available to the motorcyclists?,Did the motorcycles survive?,Are any roads still inaccessible?
Is the statement true?,Was this number true for Philadelphia?,Was this number true for Pitt?,Is this claim true?,Does this claim support this claim?,Is this claim accurate?,Have these claims been refuted?,Does this claim make this claim true?,Do you think that the claim is true?
Did Trump actually make the comments?,Has Trump actually said anything about Donald Trump's tweets since 2015?,Has Trump directly said anything about Donald Trump's tweets since 2015?,"Is there evidence Trump ever told Donald Trump he should be shot out of a cannon after the Dow dropped more than 1,000 points?"
Is $15 the minimum wage in Albany?,Was $15 a law passed before?,Are the Albany residents paying $15?,Are $15 minimum wages the law of the state?,Has anyone else raised the minimum wage?,Are there any other jobs paying $15?,Does the minimum wage in Albany still increase as a rule?
Did United States Special Forces kill a giant in Kandahar?,Is the cover-up going against the country's will?,Is the name of the killing controversial?,Are there any evidence to indicate the killing was intentional?,Is there evidence to suggest that there were a number of people involved in the killing?
"Did Musk say an 18 year old can't take out a $10,000 business loan?","Did Musk's claim relate to the age of needing a $100,000 student loan?","Was Musk's tweeting about a student loan only valid if an 18 year old is able to use a $10,000 loan?"
Did Germany agree to pay US$1.3 billion to Namibia for genocide of Herero and Nama people?,Did Germany agree to pay US$1.3 billion to Namibia for genocide of Herero and Nama people?,Did Germany agree to pay Namibia US$1.3 billion for genocide of Herero and Nama people?
Did this happen in Bangalore?,Did this video contain any tasers?,Did this video contain any explicit messages?,Was this called a law?,Did the video also contain other news items related to police actions?,Were there any tasers on this video?,Are there tasers on this video?
Was the woman 101 years old when she gave birth?,Does she still have children?,Has the woman given birth?,Are all the children of the woman present?,Are any of the children related to the mother?,Is the mother in the photo already 90 years old?,Are any of the children involved in the photo in any way?
Did the study cost $2 trillion over a 10-year period?,Did the Koch brothers sponsor this study?,Are there any other factors the Koch brothers might have contributed to this study?,Would the study's findings be valid in a general setting?,Are any other factors important for the conclusion of this study?,Is it possible to infer a large cost savings for the study by this study?,Is this study currently being funded?
"Did Holt, Pallone, and Pascrell support a healthcare takeover of Medicare?",Will Medicaid be cut to make these changes?,Did the health care takeovers result in a major cut in coverage?,Did this new policy save money?,Did the new policy entail cutting in services?
Does Robredo propose to widen the water pipe to 12 inches?,Has Robredo taken into account the possibility of contamination from other pipes?,Does Robredo make recommendations regarding resolving water shortages?,Did Robredo include a request to increase resolving water availability?,Were Robredo's proposed widening water pipes related to water shortages?
Is it true that no more than 10% of Nigerians with mental illness do not have access to the care they need?,Is the WHO's estimate accurate?,Does the WHO think all mentally ill Nigerians have access to care?,Is a majority of Nigerians with mental illness not able to access care?
Is there more than $ 50 billion generated in revenue?,Can it be further stated that Lagos is now generating $ 50 billion in revenue from its own expenditures?,Do other public entities generate revenue in a similar manner?,Are other public entities involved in this revenue process?,Can Lagos generate revenue from its own expenses?
Is there any evidence that UFO sightings originate outside the galaxy?,Is there evidence that this assertion is true?,Is it clear that the statement was made in June 2021?,Is it clear if this statement is correct?,Is there any evidence supporting the assertion?,Can you provide us with any additional information?
Did DWI crashes in Austin drop 23% since ride sharing entered the market?,Has Uber eliminated these crashes?,Are DWI crashes in Austin on a decreased basis since ride sharing entered the market?,Are these DWI crashes on a decline since ride sharing entered the market?,Are all Uber rides in Austin the same?
Is it true that this general admitted to Ukrainian forces that the country&#8217;s professional army has already been knocked out?,Did this general admit to Ukrainian forces that the country&#8217;s professional army has been knocked out?,Is this general referring to only the professional army?
Did the man fake being deaf and dumb in order to avoid hearing his wife?,Was the woman able to determine the truth of the false statement?,Did the man actually use the fake deaf and dumb statement to avoid listening to his wife?,Did the woman know the truth of the fake deaf and dumb statement?,Was the woman aware of the true statement?
Has the U.S. spent $805 billion to liberate Iraq?,Does this U.S. spend $805 billion in Iraq?,Does this U.S. spend $805 billion in Iraq?,Is this U.S. spending $805 billion in Iraq primarily for Liberation of Iraq?,Is this U.S. spending $805 billion specifically for liberation of Iraq?
Is the £10m cut by the SNP government a cut in bus pass eligibility?,Is the plan for the SNP to cut the bus pass eligibility criteria after the election clear?,Is the cut to the bus pass budget a cut in the eligibility criteria for a bus pass?,Is there anything else I can do to help ensure that more people get the bus pass?
"Did the removal of the rock cost $50,000?",Did this Rock create controversy?,Did the removal of this rock help the university?,Is this Rock considered a symbol of racism?,Is this Rock an issue of the public domain?,Did this Rock influence the university's decisions?,Were there allegations of racism by the student group that removed the Rock?,Is this rock considered a symbol of racism by students?,Is the removal of the rock responsible for the decision?
Did the CEO of Pfizer say he wanted to reduce the world population by 50%?,Did Pfizer's CEO support this stated objective?,Did Pfizer's CEO express confidence in this goal?,Was this stated goal made by Pfizer's CEO?,Would Pfizer's CEO support the proposed population reduction?
Did the video show people celebrating the murder of a man?,Did a video of these people actually murder a man?,Did this election result be declared before the murder of the man?,Have people on either side of the political spectrum shown these video clips?,Is it possible that the murder was recorded during a time of celebration?
Is there a specific 4 trillion deficit reduction plan?,Is there any evidence to suggest that this specific 4 trillion deficit reduction plan may be a lie?,Is this specific 4 trillion deficit reduction plan likely to be approved based on this specific 4 trillion deficit reduction plan?,Was this specific 4 trillion deficit reduction plan prepared by this specific 4 trillion deficit reduction plan?,Did Obama specifically say this specific 4 trillion deficit reduction plan?
Did in the 1940’s 70% of every health care dollar be paid by the patient?,Today is 11 cents! Is the number of patients paying for health care higher now or during the 40’s?,Did health care cost 70% of every dollar in the 40’s?,Did the number increase for the 1980’s or the 90’s?
Was a time-traveler using a hula hoop in the background of a 1939 photograph?,Was there no time traveler in the 1939 photograph?,Were hula hoop used to produce the time traveler?,Was there any time traveler in the 1939 photograph?
Does mitigation pay a net negative benefit in post-storm cleanup and rebuilding?,Will $1 spent on mitigation improve post-storm cleanup and rebuilding?,Have mitigation programs paid a net positive benefit in post-storm cleanup and rebuilding?,Are mitigation programs related to rebuilding?,Do mitigation programs pay a net positive benefit in rebuilding?
Did the county lose population in the last census?,Did the county lose population during the census?,Was the county in a denial of the census?,Was it not in a state of need to get people to a poll?,Were there no aversion to losing people to the census?,Did the county lose population during the last census?
Can Haiti meet that volume of people?,Is it an emergency?,Do people want to return?,Are the population challenges in Haiti more or less severe than those encountered by other countries?,Is Haiti's population population over 200 million?,Are the challenges in Haiti more or less severe than those encountered in other countries?
Do the words “will evoke (sic) what is called the Stafford act and order a two week mandatory quarantine for the nation” sound correct?,Did Trump cite the Stafford Act as a reason to order a quarantine?,Has Trump said this in an interview?,Is Trump referring to the Stafford Act as a cause to quarantine?
Was Adolf Hitler in Vogue in 1939 and Adolf Hitler in Zeitschrift in 2022?,Does Selensky have a wife in 2022?,Did Hitler and Braun both appear in vogue in 1939?,Does Selensky have a wife in 2022?
Did the GOP spend $48 million to repeal Obamacare?,Did the GOP spend more than $100 million?,Did the GOP spend more than $52 million to repeal Obamacare?,Did a majority of Republicans vote against repealing Obamacare?,Did House Republicans spend more than $52 million on repealing Obamacare?
Are overturned cars evidence of Bucha violence?,Does a photo of overturned cars indicate violence?,Have overturned cars been overturned in Bucha since the time of the event?,Do overturned cars indicate violence was staged in Bucha?,Has a photograph of overturned cars in Bucha yet been viewed?
Did Obama's budget increase Medicaid?,Did Obama's budget cut Medicaid?,Did Obama's budget increase Medicaid by $1.2 billion?,Did Obama's budget increase Medicaid by less than $1.2 billion?,Does Obama's budget include increases to Medicare and Medicaid?,Did Obama's budget include changes to Medicaid programs?
Did 80 percent of women receive services from other providers in 2010?,Did all women receive services from providers other than Planned Parenthood in 2010?,Is this percentage the most recent data available?,Would this percentage of women undergoing a Planned Parenthood visit have not received services from Planned Parenthood?
Did the President of Texas raise student graduation rates?,Have student graduation rates at the University of Texas been improved since this year?,Did the President of Texas raise student graduation rates by more than 50%?,Are four-year graduation rates higher at UT?,Have student graduation rates at UT increased since this year?,Do student graduation rates at Texas institutions drop by less than 20%?
Did the 11-year-old stop a home invasion?,Did the 11-year-old's parents or the Fox News reporters report this story?,Did Fox News have a link to this story?,Does this story show that the 11-year-old was the first to act on this topic?,Did Fox News report this story?
Was Justin Trudeau part of the India tour?,Did Justin Trudeau make any comments about India or the India tour?,Did Justin Trudeau visit Gurudwara during his visit to India?,Did Justin Trudeau visit Gurudwara after his election win in 2019?,Did Justin Trudeau leave India prior to his visit to Gurudwara?
Did this game bring 170 to 1800 jobs to the state?,Did this game lead to major hiring of jobs in the state?,Were the jobs in the state made available?,Were all state employees affected by the game?,Can some state employees take part in this game?,Can all state employees take part in this game?,Can all state employees participate in this game?
Did he claim the budget would increase national defense spending?,Is the budget an example of the national defense spending increase?,Is there any evidence this budget would increase defense spending?,Did any of the president's budgets increase defense spending?,Do any of the current president's budgets raise military spending?
Did Cory Booker do something to boost violent crime in Newark?,Was this crime spike a result of Booker's stewardship of a city?,Did this increase come after a policing reform?,Is this trend consistent?,Have homicide rates been increasing since Booker's administration?,Is this trend consistent?
Did Oprah Winfrey become president?,"Does ""The Boondocks"" have an animated sequence about Oprah Winfrey?",Did any of the scenes in the series reference Oprah Winfrey?,"Do ""The Boondocks"" features characters related to politics?"
Was Gaines awarded $1.2 million in award payments?,Was Gaines able to continue to win competitions?,Did Gaines and Thomas settle on a payout?,Was the settlement of Gaines and Thomas related to any type of sportsmen's competition?,Did Gaines settle with Lia Thomas prior to the settlement?
Are processed foods in an average grocery store 75 percent GMOs?,Is there any evidence that GMO foods are in an average grocery store?,Has this assertion been validated by third-party independent studies?,Does this study have data to back up this claim?,Are these studies being cited in a mainstream media account of this study's methodology?,Do the study researchers agree on the method of analysis that was used in this study?
Have graduation rates grown by over 90% since Evers became Wisconsin’s state school superintendent?,What other factors drove this growth?,Was this rate greater in 2008?,Has any other reason contributed to this growth in Wisconsin’s graduation rates?,Did Evers make changes to the college admissions program as a result of this increase?
Did the Black Lives Matter Utah Chapter call the American flag a symbol of hatred?,Did the Black Lives Matter Utah Chapter call the American flag a symbol of hatred?,"Was the Black Lives Matter Utah Chapter responsible for the call on July 4, 2021?",Did the Black Lives Matter Utah Chapter vote to pass legislation that made the US flag a symbol of hatred?
Did Nike pay factory workers 80% of whom are women 20 cents an hour and work 70 to 80 hours a week?,Did Nike pay factory workers 80% of whom are women 20 cents an hour?,Did Nike pay factory workers 80% of whom are women 20 cents an hour?,Is there evidence that Nike pays factory workers 80% of whom are women 20 cents an hour?,Is there evidence that Nike pays factory workers 80% of whom are women 20 cents an hour?
Did the people search function on Twitter return the personal account of President Trump?,"Did Trump use the word ""loser"" in the people search function?",Was Trump's election loss considered a result of Twitter's people search function?,Are there multiple examples of this search function?,Is Trump a Twitter personality?
Did the Keystone pipeline create 35 permanent jobs after construction?,Did the government report say that the pipeline created 35 permanent jobs after construction?,Has the Keystone pipeline ever been criticized for its alleged anti-environment stance?,Can Trump believe it is a reasonable amount to claim that the pipeline created 35 permanent jobs?
Has the virus changed if a person has taken an mRNA Covid-19 vaccine?,Is the mRNA vaccine still making you the same person?,Is the vaccine still making you the same person from the day it was invented?,Is the video showing this claim confirmed by Klaus Schwab?
Do vaccines for COVID-19 affect the body’s genome?,Does COVID-19 vaccines reduce risk of infection?,Does the COVID-19 vaccine reduce risk?,Are there any other benefits associated with COVID-19 vaccines?,Do vaccines for COVID-19 reduce risk for COVID?
Did the Democrats in six of these states have votes counted?,Did Trump win any of these states?,Did the Democrats win any of these states?,Were there any issues with voting in these states?,Did Trump win any of these states?,Will some of these states not be voted in?,Have any of these states been voted into yet?
Does Aboriginal Australians already have 50 organizations providing them with a voice?,Does the amount of organizations provide by Aboriginal Australians range from 50-75?,Do the numbers provide clear indications of what organizations are providing Aboriginal Australians with a voice?,Is the estimate for a full estimate by organizations clear?
"Did the state send 240,000 ballots?",Did the voter certify the ballots in this election?,"Are ""unverified ballots"" required under state law?",Is there any evidence that the voters certify the ballots that have not been verified?,Were the voters in this election completely oblivious of the alleged forged ballot?
Do about 8 out of 10 individuals support changes in Obamacare?,Are 8 out of 10 individuals favoring changes in Obamacare?,Are 8 out of 10 individuals voting to repeal Obamacare?,Do 8 out of 10 individuals in support of repealing Obamacare support the change in Obamacare?,Has 9 out of 10 people in support of repealing Obamacare voted in favor of repealing Obamacare?
Is it a real thing in 1933 and 2022?,Are there copies of the pictures?,Have there been multiple instances in these two historical events?,Was this event a known phenomenon?,Was this event a cult movement?,Does the event appear in this historical documentary?,Is this movement part of the broader history of Christianity?
Is Kenya achieving a 100 % transition rate in secondary school for the 2nd year running?,Is Kenya achieving a 100 % transition rate in primary school for the 2nd year running?,Is the number of students transferring to secondary school increasing?,Does Kenya have high graduation rates?
Was Chicago the deadliest weekend of the year?,Was 7 people dead or 52 wounded in this shooting in Chicago?,Was it the same number of people that died in other shootings?,Is Chicago the deadliest city in the country?,Is this shooting similar to other shootings in other countries?,Is the location of the shooting where the shooting took place?
Did the ANC have a year when no department received a clean audit?,Did DA have a year that 7 departments received a clean audit?,Did DA had a year that no department received a clean audit?,Was DA having a year where no department received a clean audit?
Did NBC report that vaccinated individuals have higher levels of SARS-CoV-2?,Does this indicate that vaccinated individuals were contributing to the summer 2021 surge in cases?,Is this in any way linked to COVID-19?,Does this imply that the cases in Summer 2021 were higher than in previous years?
Was Biden spending 15 times the money securing the Ukraine border as Trump did?,Were Biden spending more money on securing the border wall than Trump?,Did Biden spend more money on securing the border wall than Trump?,Did Biden spend more on securing the border wall than Trump?
Does this video contain an unofficial video?,Is this video an official video or an unofficial video?,Did this happen to a third person?,Has this incident tarnished the image of the man or women who was killed?,Is this man seen by a member of media?,Did the video include a victim identification?
Did Ford USA announce that Colin Kaepernick would star in their new 'Built Ford Tough' advertisements?,Did Ford USA announce that Colin Kaepernick would star in their new 'Built Ford Tough' advertisements?,Did Ford USA announce that Colin Kaepernick would star in their new 'Built Ford Tough' advertisements?
Did the Indian courts release those convicted of gangraging Bilkis Bano and murdering members of her family in 2002?,Is it known whether the Indian courts order the release of those convicted of gangraging Bilkis Bano and murdering members of her family in 2002?
Does Doyle approve these jobs?,Did Doyle approve this program in 2011?,"Was the cost of creating these jobs $247,000 per job?",Did Doyle ever give approval for this program?,Did this program provide 202 jobs?,X. Was this program approved by Governor Doyle?,X. Did Doyle sign this agreement on behalf of other state agencies?
Is the photograph accurately depicting a 'triple-neck' guitar owned by Led Zeppelin's bassist John Paul Jones?,Does the photograph accurately depict the guitar that John Paul Jones owns?,Did the photograph contain information about the guitar other than the type of guitar used?
Did Trump hire workers illegally from Poland?,Did Trump pay a million dollars in a judgment for hiring illegal workers?,Was Trump legally obligated to pay the judgment?,Is there evidence to support the claim of Trump hiring illegal workers from Poland?,Would the Trump administration have had to pay this judgment?
"Did President Trump use the word ""Mozzarella"" in his November 2019 tweet?",Did Trump claim that the US and Italy have been allies for thousands of years?,Did Trump claim that Italy is known for the high quality of its food?,"Did Trump call Italy's president ""Mozzarella"" as the president was speaking?"
Did the image depict a question mark in space?,"Is the ""question mark"" formation in space true?",Was the image shown on a social media website during the month of August of 2023?,Did this image genuinely depict a question mark formation in space?,"Did the ""question mark"" formation in space really exist?",Did a satellite enter and leave the galaxy of the spacecraft in the early hours of August 2023?,Was this photo available on a website that reprinted this image in the years following it's release?
Did President Obama experience a budget surplus at the beginning of the last decade?,Did Mr. Obama experience a one-year deficit of over 1 trillion?,Are there estimated deficits for the next decade that exceed $8 trillion?,Is the current deficit of $1 trillion or more?,Does Mr. Obama expect the deficit to increase from this year onward?
Did Mufti have orders to prevent vehicle checks at barricades?,Did Mufti make any decision against checking vehicles at barricades?,Did Mufti issue any orders to prevent cars being checked at barricades?,Is Mufti in charge of the government?
"Did Nelson sell agricultural land for home development, pocketing at least $1.4 million?",Was the land sold for agricultural development?,Did Nelson sell agricultural land to anyone else besides himself?,Is Nelson denying this report?,Did Nelson tamper with the report by providing more information?,Are there any other details cited by the reporter in his report?
Is it true that a law that mandates fingerprinting for gun purchasers has reduced gun crimes in five states?,Is the mandated fingerprinting for gun purchase required in other states?,Do gun crime reductions result from fingerprinting for gun purchase?,Would the requirements for fingerprinting for gun purchase in other states require similar reduction in gun crime?
Did 95% of job creators believe that Wisconsin was headed in the right direction?,Is Wisconsin headed in the right direction?,Is Wisconsin headed in the right direction?,Is there evidence Wisconsin is headed in the right direction?,Is Wisconsin headed in the right direction?,Is there evidence Wisconsin is headed in the right direction?
Did crime decrease in MAX station at 162nd Ave and East Burnside?,Was crime down in December 2009?,Was the crime rate in December 2009 significantly lower?,Did crime down in December 2009 outdo December 2009 crime rate?,Did the crime rate decline at MAX station at 162nd Ave and East Burnside?
Has it been a decade since business leaders have stated that China is no longer the world’s No. 1 place to invest?,Has China been a top investment destination since 2010?,Are there specific sectors of China that are no longer at the top of the investment ranking?,Are there specific areas where America ranks as the best place to invest?
Did the Fed create 15 trillion in the bailout process or 5 trillion went overseas?,Did the Fed create any money that could not be refunded?,Are the loans to the Fed refunded?,Is the Fed working to make more loans?,Is it safe to say that the Fed created a lot of money?
Was Schwarzenegger referring to Trump?,Did Schwarzenegger say Schwarzenegger would be a better president than Trump?,Does Schwarzenegger believe Trump would be better president than Trump?,Was Schwarzenegger referring to Trump in the context of general elections?,Did Schwarzenegger mention Trump when referring to general elections?
Is there more undocumented immigrants in this state than those in other states?,Is this state the most populous?,Did this state have higher undocumented numbers in 2015?,"Is it true that about 15,000 undocumented immigrants live in the state?",Is it true that many of these undocumented immigrants have criminal records?
Is this a promotional item for the Sonic Drive In location?,Does the tray keychain entitle the bearer to discounts on Route 44 beverages?,Is this a promotional item for the Sonic Drive In location only?,Does the Red Tray Keychain have a QR code?,Is there a special on the Red Tray Keychain?
Did Trump propose using nuclear weapons to threaten global warming?,Will Trump propose using nuclear weapons on the planet?,Will Trump propose nuclear weapons on the Earth?,"Would a nuclear attack on Earth increase temperatures to 250,000 degrees?",Would global warming cause chemical warfare on Earth?,Has Trump made an official declaration that global warming will occur on Earth?
Did this attack target all Indian soldiers?,Do Chinese troops have any connection to this attack?,Do other nations have any connection to this attack?,Was this attack directly in the South China Sea?,Did Chinese ships ever attack or kill Indian soldiers?,Did the attack take place in another region of the world?,Did other countries also attack Indian soldiers?
Did Texas receive more votes from young voters than any previous election?,Did Obama win more votes from young voters than any previous election?,Was Trump's early voting turnout more than any previous election?,Did Romney win more votes in Texas than any previous election?,Has Texas seen the most turnout in early voting history?
Did passengers of the flight photograph the launch of Chandrayaan-3?,Are the images being used for personal purposes?,Has this aircraft ever been flown commercially?,Is it true that Chandrayaan-3 has been flown commercially for use in commercial applications?,Did the flight have an announcement on its launch day?
Did British Columbia fires to create the idea of a 15-minute smart city?,Did the fires intentionally create a smart city?,Did the fires create a smart city in the foreseeable future?,Are there any other sources for the idea of creating a smart city?,Can there be an answer for any of these questions?
Is there any evidence that 20 million Chinese people have converted to Islam?,Is the novelty of this virus unknown to China?,Is the novelty of this virus known to Muslims?,Was the novelty of this virus unknown to Christians?,Did neogenicists believe the novelty of this virus did not affect Christians?,Does this virus have negative side effects to Muslims?
Has this molecule been tested for efficacy against cancer cells?,Can it kill cancer cells with this same amount of force if taken against breast cancer cells?,Have any other studies used this same molecule?,Are there any known side effects of this medicine?,Do any of these side effects result in death?
Does Soyinka write that Nigerians should vote for Rabiu Musa Kwankwaso in 2023?,Did Soyinka provide evidence for this advice?,Does Soyinka claim to have no evidence in support of this advice?,No evidence: Wole Soyinka says vote for Rabiu Musa Kwankwaso in 2023?
Did Nova Scotia have a mermaid found in 1918?,Is there evidence of the mermaid found in 1918?,Is the photo of the mermaid from 1918?,Is the mermaid in the photograph?,Did the mermaid in the photograph have long sex?
Did a study show a weakened immune response in kids injected with Pfizer’s COVID-19 shot?,Does mRNA COVID jabs damage immune responses to other viruses in children?,Does the study show a weakened immune response in kids injected with Pfizer’s COVID-19 shot?
Can you determine when this tax era happened?,Did this tax era exist in the UK?,Was there a tax era?,Did the tax era existed 100 years ago?,Was it known to exist 100 years ago?,Can you confirm this for me?,Can you give me more details?,"In other words, is there a tax era?"
Does this technology exist or are the 6th and 7th generation supercomputers based on Sanskrit language already in manufacturing?,"Has this technology been used in some other projects, such as supercomputers?",Does this technology have any technology advantage over the current 6th and 7th generation supercomputers?
Did the Biden Administration’s plan allow financial institutions to record all transactions from business and personal accounts?,Did the plan introduce the concept of a reporting requirement for most transactions of personal and business accounts?,Is it likely that the Plan would apply to business and personal accounts at all?,Is it likely that the Plan would apply to more than only business accounts under $600?
Did this move lead to a change in gun laws?,Did this move lead to gun control in these states?,Did this increase in gun laws make people rethink gun ownership?,Did this change lead to a decrease in gun ownership in this state?,Did this change lead to a decrease in gun ownership in this state?
Does a remembrance page in a magazine for pilots reveal skyrocketing airline deaths in 2021?,Has aviation-related deaths in recent years increased in the United States?,Is it true that the United States faces a significant spike in airline-related deaths in 2021?
Are there $700 billion savings from Medicare?,Do any Republicans have criticized Medicare as a source of these savings?,Are all Ryan's budgets based on this same amount of savings?,Is there a link between Ryan's budget and the $700 billion savings?,Are there any other Republicans attacking Medicare as a source of these savings?
Was Perry re-elected in 2014?,Has Perry been re-elected in 2016?,Has Perry lost any election?,Has Perry lost any other election?,Has Perry lost any other election?,Have any other notable figures won any major elections?,Were other occurrences of a significant majority for Perry?
Is the photo showing solar arrays that were destroyed by heavy rains in July 2023?,Is the rain responsible for the damage to solar arrays in photos taken on July 2023?,Is there any evidence to suggest that rain contributed to damage to solar arrays in photos taken on July 2023?
Did Biden propose to overturn Roe v. Wade in 1982?,Did Biden propose any other constitutional amendments to overturn Roe v. Wade?,Did Biden support any constitutional amendments to overturn Roe v. Wade?,Did Biden make any remarks regarding Roe v. Wade?
Is it true that the textbook of class nine in Karnataka preaches students to propagate Islam and Christianity?,Does it say that the textbook of class nine in Karnataka preaches students to propagate Islam and Christianity?,Is the textbook of class nine in Karnataka written in English?
Did Lindsey Graham receive heckling at an airport?,Was Lindsey Graham heckled at a New York airport?,Did Lindsey Graham receive heckling during his trip?,Did Lindsey Graham receive heckling outside of his trip?,Did Lindsey Graham receive heckling outside of his trip?,Did Lindsey Graham receive heckling at an airport prior to his trip?
Is it true that Mandel accepted three debates with Sen. Brown?,Is it true that Mandel has accepted zero proposed debates?,Is it true that Mandel has accepted any debates from either Obama or GOP candidates?,Is it true that Mandel has accepted multiple presidential debates from Obama and GOP candidates?
Did Spirit Halloween have any seasonal stores this year?,Did Spirit Halloween announce in August 2019 that it would not open seasonal stores?,Did Spirit Halloween announce this year that it would not open seasonal stores?,Does Spirit Halloween hold annual Halloween events?,Does Spirit Halloween have special events besides upcoming Halloween events?,Will Spirit Halloween remain open this year?,Does Spirit Halloween have stores in the upcoming Fall Season?
Are French people vaccinated?,Are there restrictions on eating food from supermarkets in France under the legislation?,Can people purchase food from supermarkets outside of France under the bill?,Have French people been affected by the legislation?,Are French people vaccinated enough to buy food from supermarkets?,Have there been cases of French people being harmed by the legislation?
Did Biden come out ahead by 100k when Wisconsin took a break?,Did Biden win over 100k supporters in Wisconsin before returning to Washington?,Did Biden raise enough money to bring Wisconsin over 100k?,Does this support Biden's assertion that Wisconsin took a break before regaining?
Was the percentage increase in the number of learners who passed the exams in 2009 a 25% increase since 2009?,Is the Khayelitsha area alone in Khayelitsha's area a good indicator of the level of improvement in quality of education?,Did there have higher passing rates in other areas of the country?
How many people evacuated from Afghanistan tested positive for COVID-19 upon arrival in Delhi?,Do all of those people who were evacuated from Afghanistan test positive for COVID-19?,"Is COVID-19 a very large health threat, and has this disease made it’s way into the United States?"
"Is the ""wake up"" of the two prehistoric worms responsible for these changes?",Did scientists realize they were moving and eating after these thawings?,Did the worms reactivate and move?,Did the scientists eat any of these worms?,Will these worms reactivate again in the future?
Did the President's impeachment trial start in early 2021?,Is Jake Angeli eligible for impeachment testimony?,Was Angeli charged with criminal charges related to the insurrection?,Were Angeli and his family in danger in the incident?,Are Angeli and his family in a position to testify?
Did Alex Sink funnel 3 - 1 - 4 million dollars in no bid contracts to Bank of America?,Did Alex Sink receive any payment from Bank of America for this transactions?,Did Alex Sink receive any payment from Bank of America for this transactions?,Did Alex Sink purchase any property during the period listed in this article?
Did India reimpose lockdown on April 20?,Was the lockdown relaxed from April 15-19?,Did the lockdown be reimposed on April 20?,Did India reimpose lockdown on April 20?,Have any other countries implemented lockdown on this date?,Have other governments also implemented lockdown on this date?
Has any county gone higher on the two-thirds gender principle?,Are any of these counties in the top 5 states in terms of gender representation?,Are any of these counties in the top 10 countries in terms of gender representation?,Is any county in the top 5 states in terms of gender representation?
Are there more lawyers in the Senate?,Is there one manufacturer and one accountant?,Is there a balance of all Senators?,Is Russ Feingold elected?,Is the Senate made up of all lawyers?,Is the number of manufacturers and accountants in the Senate smaller than the number of Senators?
Does Robredo need donations for the typhoon disaster?,Did Robredo spend a plethora of money to promote her 2020 campaign?,Will there be sardines or rice donations for the disaster?,Does Robredo require a sever portion of donations in order to use them to help typhoon victims?
Would the money spent on Test and Trace have paid for a 15% pay rise for every NHS worker from now until 2058?,Would the money spent on Test and Trace have paid for a 15 % pay rise for every NHS worker from now until 2058?,Would the money spent on Test and Trace have paid for a 15 % pay rise for every NHS worker from now until 2058?
Has the economy continued to grow during these eight years?,Have any taxes been cut?,Does the economy appear to be recovering or has it been reduced?,Did these budget cuts translate into revenue growth?,/ Does the economy appear to be recovering or has it been reduced?,Are these budget cuts effective?,/ Is there data to suggest these spending cuts were effective?
Would this pile of money weigh more than 136 aircraft carriers?,Does this pile of money weigh less than $14.1 trillion?,Does the pile of money weigh more than $14.1 trillion?,Is this pile of money heavier than the aircraft carriers?,Is this debt primarily owned by wealthy individuals?,Is the debt large enough to cause aircraft carriers to be heavier than the debt?
Did 70% of inmates receive COVID-19 vaccine doses?,Did DG Delhi Prisons share their own data?,Are there any other important aspects regarding the response?,Is the DG Delhi Prisons response to the RTI & data in line with other public information requests?,Does any other government agency assist these broader public inquiries?
Did friends sell her for $500 and weed?,Was the fetus of the alleged victim raped and killed?,Was any evidence used in the case to prove that the fetus of the alleged victim raped and killed?,Did this allegation come to light through social media?,Did this allegation relate to the death of the alleged victim?
Did Obama and Biden conceive of or implment the idea of killing the 9/11 mastermind with Iran?,Is this idea true?,Are Obama and Biden's collusions with Iran evidence?,Is this statement true?,Was this assertion true during this period of time?,Did Obama and Biden personally execute the 9/11 mastermind in an apparent act of love?
Did 63 new daily cases occur on 1 July 2020?,Did most people in the UK have the vaccination against Covid-19?,Did people in the UK get vaccinated against Covid-19 on 1 July 2020?,Did the UK have fewer new daily cases compared to previous years?,Did Covid-19 remain in the UK before 1 July 2020?
Is it likely that a 100 percent tax on millionaires would only fund four months of government operations?,Will a 100 percent tax on millionaires resolve fiscal deficits and debt?,Does a 100 percent tax on millionaires have an effect on state spending?,Would a 100 percent tax on millionaires directly address the budget deficits and debt?,Would a 100 percent tax on millionaires effectively reduce states deficits?
"Did Kathy Griffin give Jesus the ""god"" treatment during the 2007 Emmy Awards ceremony?",Was Griffin's emmy the god of her life?,Was Griffin's emmy a sign that she was going to kill Jesus?,Is it true that Griffin's emmy became her God?
Is there any evidence that people who are fully vaccinated against COVID-19 are prohibited from receiving any type of anesthesia?,Is there any evidence that COVID-19 vaccination has caused people to die immediately?,"Is it true that people who are fully vaccinated against COVID-19 are prohibited from receiving any type of anesthesia because it's a ""great hazard""?"
Did Bill Clinton think it was time for a regime change in Iraq?,Did Clinton say Iraq was using WMDs?,Did everyone blamed George W. Bush for causing a regime change in Iraq?,Did Clinton blame George W. Bush for the WMDs in Iraq?,Did Clinton talk about regime change in Iraq?
Did private sector job growth occur in Wisconsin September 2014?,Was this report about private sector jobs being created in Wisconsin?,Did this report show that private sector job growth in Wisconsin in September 2014 was the largest private sector job growth in more than a decade?,Did this report show that private sector job creation was in Wisconsin September 2014?
Is Plymouth Rock closer to the sea level than the ocean?,Is the sea level at Plymouth Rock higher than it was in 1620?,Do the levels of the seas at Plymouth Rock change with the seasons?,Does ice from land cause the sea to move more?,Are there any meteorological evidence supporting Plymouth Rock?
Did Jianli Yang allege 100 Chinese soldiers died in Galwan Valley?,Did Jianli Yang have reason to claim that these Chinese soldiers died in Galwan Valley?,Did Jianli Yang claim that these Chinese soldiers died in Galwan Valley?,Did Jianli Yang have any prior claims about the losses of these Chinese soldiers?
Did there still be no pizza delivered in the area 15 years ago?,Is it reasonable to believe that the delivery of pizza in this neighborhood has improved in the past few years?,Is this region known for its low supply of pizza?,Is pizza delivery in this area relatively inexpensive in the past 15 years?
Has any percentage of the sorties that left the base without dropping ordnances?,Did any ordnances ever drop off on a military base?,Did any wars involve any civilian casualties?,Has any country ever faced any civilian casualties?,Has there been any debate about the safety of military base weapons?
Did the average family income grow 50 percent during Bush's tenure?,Did Bush raise overall spending by 5 percent?,Did Bush raise overall spending by 20 percent?,Did Bush raise the average family income in the state of Arkansas?,Did Bush raise the average family income for the total population by 50 percent?,Did Bush raise overall spending by more than 50 percent when he was governor of Arkansas?
"Is the ""free ride"" facility of the Hyderabad Police connected to this helpline?",Does the help line relate to Hyderabad police in Hyderabad?,"Is the ""free ride"" facility related to the Hyderabad Police?",Is the Hyderabad police helpline a 'local' service?,Is the Hyderabad police helpline a 'local' service?,Is the Hyderabad police helpline a 'local' service?
Did the e-mails from May 2016 reveal a plot to make fake stories about Trump groping women?,Has there been a large amount of false statements made in these emails?,Did any of these emails come from the DNC?,Have there been any more e-mails in this collection?
Are there any statistics that show students relying on Pell Grants to pay for college?,Are there any statistics that show Pell Grants are used by 50% of Hispanic students to pay for college?,Does the percentage for Hispanic students in total still be accurate?,Does the percentage for students in total for all Pell Grant recipients show an increase?
Did the billionaire invest in this orphan?,Did he offer Wi-Fi as part of this donation?,Did he offer wi-fi to the world?,Is the world faster now?,Is Wi-Fi available to anyone?,Is this device free?,Would this be a good idea for everyone?
Did Michigan use a mathematical key to manipulate votes in 2020?,Did Michigan influence vote totals in 2020?,Was there evidence that Michigan used a mathematical key to manipulate votes in 2020?,Did Michigan manipulate vote totals in 2020?,Is the Michigan State University responsible for the use of this key?,Is Michigan a private research university?
"Did 38,000 people in Texas have their license to carry denied, revoked, or suspended over the last five years?",Did Texas legislators consider these individuals dangerous for carrying a loaded gun?,Did the Texas legislature pass this law to repeal a ban on carrying a loaded gun in public?,Is this change a complete reform?
Did the police stations in San Bernardino begin with no female police officers?,Did any other cities in San Bernardino start with a female police force prior to 2011?,Did any cities in San Bernardino start with a women police force prior to 2011?,Did any cities in San Bernardino stop construction of women police stations prior to 2011?
Has Feingold been a supporter of a stimulus plan?,"Did Feingold support a stimulus plan that allowed a company to create 3,000 jobs in China?","Has Feingold voted to support a stimulus plan that allowed a company to create 3,000 jobs in China?","Does Feingold support a stimulus plan that would allow a company to create 3,000 jobs in China?"
"Was Ukraine bombarded on February 24, 2022?",Was Ukraine bombarded on any other date?,"Was Ukraine bombarded on any date on Feb 24, 2022?",Did Ukraine receive any aid during this time?,Do we know when a new Russian attack would occur?,Did Russia attack Ukraine?,Does Russia presently have direct threats against Ukraine?
Did this video get shared widely in April 2022?,Was this the first Tucker Carlson program to air with this title?,Did this trailer consist of an episode of this program?,Did this trailer feature a specific actor?,Was the clip produced by this particular actor?,Did this clip include this statement?,Was this video produced by this particular actor?
Did Gwinnett County population grow by 15% from 2008?,Did Gwinnett County government staff increase by more than one percent in 2008?,Has the percentage increase in government staff exceeded that in population growth?,Are Gwinnett County population and government numbers growing at the same rate?,Is there a difference in government staff and population in Gwinnett County?
Has Cummings been arrested in connection with these videos?,Did Cummings actually beat up 35 neo-Nazis?,Was Cummings arrested for any crime associated with this neo-Nazi attack?,Has the neo-Nazis Cummings beat have been charged with terrorism?
"Is Healthcare.gov, formally known as Obamacare, an economic initiative?",Does Healthcare.gov cost $5 billion to complete?,Are there any records indicating that the Obamacare website was not built?,Did Obamacare make significant financial contributions to government?,Is healthcare.gov costing $5 billion?,Have there been any reports suggesting that Obamacare cost more?
Is Gustave the alligator that killed over 300 people near Lake Tanganyika in Africa?,Was Gustave responsible for killing several people close to the lake?,Did Gustave kill the people near the lake?,Did Gustave kill any people near the lake?,Did Gustave not kill a person near the lake?,Did Gustave kill any other people near the lake?
Is Adidas giving away 3100 pair of shoes and t - shirts to celebrate its 96th anniversary?,Is Adidas giving away 3100 free pairs of shoes and t - shirts to celebrate its 96th anniversary?,Is Adidas giving away 3100 pairs of shoes and t - shirts to celebrate its 96th anniversary?
Did the number of state agencies go up in the 2000s?,Are there more state agencies related to health care compared to the 2000s?,Was there more state agencies related to health care in 2010 than the 2000s?,Does the health care administration make up over half of the federal government's resources?,Does the health care administration employ a large amount of people?,Does the health care administration employ a significant amount of state and federal resources?
Would attendees spend $50 to see Gov. Scott Walker and a dozen members of his administration?,Will the public be allowed to buy tickets to the event?,Is Lambeau Field the venue of the event?,Will the speaker be speaking about economics?,Will the speaker be asked what his ideas and feelings on job creation are?
Does this image show 6 bomb blasts?,Did there appear to be at least 7 bomb blasts?,Did this image show a clear or partial set of bomb blasts in the township?,Was there a total of 2 bomb blasts?,Is this incident related to the bombings in Yangon?
Did the hotel and parking lot cost $30 million?,Did the hotel and parking lot cost $2.3 million a year?,Did the parking lot and hotel receive any tax money?,Did the parking lot and hotel receive any federal funds?,Did the project receive any state funds?,Did Kathy Manning spend any public funds?
Is the discount valid on $100 or more?,Can you get the coupon for any amount if your answer is yes?,Is there a description for this coupon on their website?,Is this coupon valid for lowes?,"Can you do a search for ""lowe's coupon""?",Can you pay with this coupon if you want to get a discount?
Is it true that Claire McCaskill voted for 100% of Obama’s judicial nominees?,Is it true that McCaskill voted for 100 percent of President Obama’s judicial nominees?,Is it true that Claire McCaskill voted for 100 percent of Obama’s judicial nominees?
Was this list a joke?,Was there no media for these names?,Was this list fake?,Was this post circulated?,Were there any other people that might have been influenced by this article?,Was this post manipulated?,Was this article true?,Are there other examples of this type of fake news?
Did he agree the health care bill is expensive?,Did Democrats answer the basic question on how they want to pay for the bill?,Did he say Dems would have to do a better job of balancing health care and spending?,Did he say the health care bill cost is expensive?,Did he say Democrats would have to do a better job of balancing health care and spending?,Did he say Democrats would have to do a better job of balancing health care and spending?,Did the health care bill need to have a ceiling in terms of what it costs?
Is the unemployment rate in right to work states higher than the other states?,Is the unemployment rate in right to work states higher than the other states?,Does this imply a general increase in the unemployment rate in right to work states?,Is the number of people unemployed in right to work states the same as the overall unemployment rate?
Did these women see an ultrasound after seeking an abortion?,Did 90% of these women choose not to have an abortion after seeing an ultrasound?,Were these women receiving any additional information regarding contraception during this time?,Was this data based upon estimates made by experts?,– Will this increase increase in abortions mean that the percentage of women that choose not to have an abortion goes up?
Can the New Jersey Medicaid enrollees get the matching federal funds under the Affordable Care Act?,Does it require that the New Jersey Medicaid enrollees be on the rolls before 2014?,Is there a rule limiting Medicaid enrollees from being able to get the matching federal funds under the Affordable Care Act?
Was this bill adopted by the Assembly in early 2021?,When was this bill published in California?,"Did this bill include ""stealing"" under sexual battery?",Was this bill approved by state legislature?,Did this legislation make its first appearance in the state?,Has this legislation made any significant changes since it was introduced?
Do State of the Union speeches increase presidential approval ratings?,"Do poll results from the last 35 years show that State of the Union speeches ""do not move"" presidential approval numbers?",Is there evidence that state of the union speeches move presidential approval numbers?,Are the State of the Union speeches considered a 'bad speech'?
Has the Petroleum Industry Act had a positive impact on the management of petroleum resources?,Has a stalled approach led to the development of a petroleum industry law?,"Specifically, has the Petroleum Industry Act increased the availability of petroleum?",Does the Petroleum Industry Act help host communities with issues of transportation and infrastructure?
Is there evidence that many of the documents Obama took to Chicago are classified documents?,Are these documents classified documents?,Is this claim substantiated with the available evidence?,Is there evidence that the documents Obama took to Chicago are classified documents?,Did Obama's trip to Chicago include a visit to a government facility?
"Are ""about 30%"" of those released from Guantanamo ""re-entered the fight?",""" is correct?",Does Guantanamo have a direct link to terrorist activities?,Does this include terrorist attacks at Guantanamo?,Is this a true number?,Does this number reflect the number of times Guantanamo has detainees re-enter their fight?
Did Jenner kill someone 6 years ago?,Is it true that Jenner was released by district attorney?,Was Jenner released by district attorney?,Do all of the people who said Jenner killed someone have a strong relationship with the DA?,Are there specific statements about Jenner's past actions?
Was the BBC report doctored in order to take a photo?,Is the BBC report from 2020?,Does the BBC report have anything to do with the recent protests in London?,Did the BBC report take photos of protesters?,Is the photo of protesters from 2020?,Did the tweet contain information about protests in London?
"Is it true that tax cuts did help create 80,000 jobs in New Mexico?",Did any of these job creation increases come directly from the tax cuts?,Does this increase reflect the effect that the tax cuts have on a person's tax bill?,Were there any other taxes in this state that the tax cuts may have affected?
Are more than 1 in 10 teens forced to have sex?,Is the number of teens forced to have sex up 27% since 2019. Is the number of teenage girls forced to have sex increasing?,Is the number of teenage girls forced to have sex increasing?,Is there evidence to suggest the number of teenage girls forced to have sex increases?
Are there all full operational prison camps in the United States?,Are all full operational prison camps completely empty?,Will FEMA operate all full operational prison camps?,Whether all full operational prison camps are staffed by full time guards will be decided by Congress in the future. What other government agencies will operate all full operation prison camps in the future?
Did Luton host this battle as pubs re-opened?,Did this fight happen prior to the pubs opening?,Did this city centre fight occur during this time frame?,Did the city centre fight take place prior to the pubs opening?,Did Luton host this battle in April 2021?
Is state spending today less than the 2009 spending of Jon Corzine?,Is state spending in fiscal 2008 a decrease in ten years than fiscal 2009?,Was 2010 the year we saw state spending reductions?,Can the state spend more money in fiscal 2008 than 2008?,Does the state spend more today than 2009 in the same period?
Was the Canal Saint-Martin drained for the first time 200 years?,Did this event result in any disturbing finds?,Did this event occur after a major project?,Did this event resemble a mass event?,Did this event occur in the United States?,Was the event in France?,Did this event occur in other countries?
Can BJP bring to power in West Bengal in 2021 elections?,Does BJP's central supervisor team report to President?,Is West Bengal subject to a state referendum regarding the election date?,Will any other elections in 2021 be held?,Will any other parties be elected in 2021?,Has BJP central supervisor team been informed?
Did Rep. Barrow leave taxpayers on the hook for a $950k study on genetic makeup of ants?,Are any taxpayers likely still facing taxes for this study?,Does the study show a reduction in ants' health?,Are there any more studies needing to be carried out on this subject?
Do workers who worked between 1990 and 2020 have the right to receive a benefit of 120000 rupees from the Ministry of Labour and Employment?,Does the benefit amount vary from month to month?,Can workers in a given year receive a benefit from the Ministry of Labour and Employment?,Do benefits in this period have a limit or are a number of years limited?
Was Hyde wearing glasses and a baseball cap in the photo?,Is there any proof that Hyde is a trans woman?,Did Hyde kill all six people at the elementary school?,Have there been any other photos of Hyde in the past?,Does this photo match the statement that Hyde killed six children in the school at Nashville?
Did Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez propose a 10% tax on white people?,Did Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez have a bill to introduce this tax?,Did Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez propose this tax?,Did Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez propose this tax?
Did people view the photo?,Did the photo accurately and fairly represent beach handball uniform requirements?,Did the photograph share information that was accurate and fair?,Did the photograph accurately and fairly represent men's and women's beach handball uniform requirements?,Does the photo accurately and fairly represent men's and women's beach handball uniform requirements?,Does the photograph accurately and fairly represent men's and women's beach handball uniform requirements?
Did Keurig Dr Pepper announce its discontinuation of 7UP in May 2020?,"Did this announcement occur before production on Dec 1, 2020?",Has Keurig Dr Pepper discontinued other types of drinks with 7UP?,0 days ago.. Does this drink contain other types of ingredients?,0 days ago.. Do I need to purchase 7UP?
Is the video from Russian?,Was the video from Russian?,Was this incident in September?,Is this event associated with Kim Jong Un?,Is the visit in Russia attributed to Kim Jong Un?,Is this incident from South Korea?,Was Kim Jong Un ever in South Korea before this tour?
Did Republicans hold a resolution in this country's Congress?,Did Republicans hold a resolution in this country's Congress before?,Did holding a resolution to pay bills increase the economic recovery?,Did holding a resolution to pay bills increase the economic recovery?,Did holding a resolution to pay bills increase the economy?
Was the $85 billion cost of the equipment actually delivered to the USA?,Did Donald Trump agree with the argument that a pause for the equipment to be returned to the US was a good idea?,Did Donald Trump think that there would be more than a pause for the equipment to be returned to the US in total?
"Did the president decide whether or not to sign an agreement that would keep 10,000 troops in Iraq?","Did the president decide whether or not to sign an agreement that would keep 10,000 troops in Iraq?","Did he have a vested interest in signing an agreement that would keep 10,000 troops in Iraq?",Is the agreement between the United States and the Iraqi government still active?
Did Chuck E. Cheese store lose more than 5 children?,Did Chuck E. Cheese store have multiple children missing?,Did Chuck E. Cheese place multiple children missing in the Chuck E. Cheese store?,Has this information been confirmed by USA Today or other sources?,Was this report inaccurate?,Are there any other stories or reports about children that included this information?,Is this report true?
Can you read conversations between the couple in WhatsApp?,"If so can you just use the phone number ""785"" to write it down on a paper?","Does ""785"" have a number after it?",Do the WhatsApp stickers have to be tagging specific contacts?,Is there another method for entering contacts without marking them with the phone number?,"Is it possible to create a ""785"" to signify specific contacts?"
Did Justin Trudeau tweet about limitation of sexual partners?,Did Trudeau mention limiting sexual partners due to monkeypox?,Did Trudeau mention limiting sexual partners due to monkeypox?,Did Trudeau recommend limiting sexual partners due to monkeypox?,Was the tweet about limiting sexual partners due to monkeypox?
Does the 9-9-9 plan not increase the income of those making less than average?,Is the 9-9-9 plan able to support the low-income?,Will the 9-9-9 plan increase the income of those that do not make much income?,"Does the 9-9-9 plan require a 20% tax rate on those that make less than $30,000 a year?"
Did Foster allegedly shoot himself in the back of the head before leaving?,Was Foster shot while driving a car?,Was the gun used for personal defense?,Was Foster's actions motivated by a lawsuit?,Did Foster shoot himself in the back of the head to avoid testifying?,Did Foster shoot himself in the back of the head when he was driving a car?
Did The Times of India gain 2.8 million Instagram followers after Kohli complained about fake news?,Did Kohli claim The Times of India distributed the fake news?,Did the 2.8 million Instagram followers who commented on the fake news get to know the truth?,Are all of these people who commented on the fake news still following the same company?,Did the Times of India claim responsibility for the fake news?
Did Ghana record a confirmed Ebola case between 2012 and 2016?,Did Ghana's population increase significantly in this time period?,Did any government officials are involved with this outbreak?,Was the outbreak detected in Ghana's public health system?,Did any government personnel contract this outbreak?,Did any public health authorities contact the outbreak?
Do JUH lawmakers generally support AAP's stance?,Is there evidence of a letter from JUH urging Muslims not to vote for AAP?,Does JUH send any letters to Muslims?,Is any word on what other JUH political leaders do?,Are there any similar JUH positions on this issue?
Will Merriam-Webster be changing its racism entries to show only white people are racist?,Did Merriam-Webster change its racism entries in 2020?,Will Merriam-Webster make racist entries for people from all different races?,Will Merriam-Webster be changing its racism entries for people from all different races?
Did only 4 legislators vote against the law?,Did the legislators vote against the law?,Was the law passed in the state?,Was the law based on an academic decision?,Did the law give in-state tuition rates to specific illegal immigrants?,Were all of these laws approved by the governor?,Has the Texas legislature done any research on these laws?
Did Virginia rank near the bottom of the country in per capita income 50 years ago?,Did Virginia have a very low rate of higher education attainment?,Is Virginia now above the national average?,Did Virginia rank near the bottom of the country in per capita income 50 years ago?,Is Virginia currently in the top 10 in per capita income?
Do 5 tons of earth make a battery?,Do 5 tons of earth make a battery?,Is 50 tons of earth necessary to make a battery?,Does 500 tons of earth make a battery?,Does this result in a positive result?,Is there any evidence that this result is positive?
Did Beyonce pay for Maryland Metro to run later following weather delays for her concert?,Was Beyonce paying $100K for Maryland Metro to run later following weather delays for her concert?,Is it true that Beyonce paid $100K for Maryland Metro to run later following weather delays for her concert?,Does the weather have led to a delay in the train?
Is the UK banned handguns in the aftermath of the shooting in Scotland?,Is a school shooting a continuing cause of gun violence in the UK since 1996?,Is the UK banned handguns since the incident in Scotland?,Does the UK ban handguns since the massacre in Scotland?
Did the video filmed in August of 2018 portray the July earthquake in Alaska?,Was there footage of the July earthquake from the 2018 video?,Did the Alaska earthquake occur on 7/15-2018?,Do video clips of earthquakes in Alaska appear in YouTube?,Did the video include the July earthquake?,Has any footage been released from this video?
"Is sae school funding per pupil down 16 percent compared to 2009, after adjusting for inflation?",Does this indicate a change in state funding per pupil?,Is this percentage down compared to state school funding per pupil?,Is this number a reflection of the increase in state funding per pupil?,Is this percentage the result of an adjustment in state funding per pupil?
Did Aquino arrive in the Philippines with Malaysian travel documents?,Was it true that Aquino arrived in the Philippines with Malaysian travel documents?,Was Aquino also arriving in the Philippines with Philippine travel documents?,Was Aquino flying out of the Philippine airport?,Did Aquino have any e-mail accounts for communication with Aquino?,Did Aquino arrive with Aquino's e-mail accounts?
Has there been an increased fetal death from flu shot?,Have there been any studies regarding this question?,Did the flu shot increase fetal death rates?,Did the flu shot increase the death rate in a large number of individuals?,Did it increase mortality in large numbers?,No Answer> You can't give an answer to this question because you do not have access to the data?
Did the state of emergency expire automatically?,Did Gavin Newsom call California's state of emergency an emergency?,Was Gavin Newsom the person who appointed the state of emergency?,Did Newsom have a power or authority to extend the state of emergency?,Did Newsom not authorize the state of emergency to expire automatically?
Will the PlayStation 3 server and store continue to operate?,Will the PlayStation 3 store continue to operate in addition to the server and store?,Did the PSP store in 2013 stop operating?,Has there been any other issue with the PSP?,Will the PSP store be shut down for the remainder of the gaming year?
Was the Milwaukee County budget balanced in 5 years?,Was the Milwaukee County budget balanced in 5 years?,Was the Milwaukee County budget balanced in 5 years?,Was the Milwaukee County budget balanced in 5 years?,Did the Milwaukee County budget budget have any significant deficit?,Did the Milwaukee County budget budget have many taxes?,Was the Milwaukee County budget balanced in 5 years?
Did Ben Franklin agree with this comment?,Was Franklin's statement true?,Did Franklin imagine that the tax man would visit on your death day?,Does Franklin have any other claims about taxes or taxes in general?,Did Franklin believe that the tax man would visit on your death day?,Does Franklin say he didn't see the tax man visiting on your death day?
Did George Soros make more than $1.8 billion in campaign contributions to local district attorneys during 2010-2011 election?,"If George Soros is convicted in this case, will he go to prison for years?",Was George Soros prosecuted because of his campaign contributions?,Was it true that George Soros contributed to the campaign expenses for the 2008 election?
"Was Cuomo's dog, Captain, taken care of by any staff members?",Was Cuomo's dog placed into the possession of any employees?,Did Cuomo let the dog to anyone else?,Did Cuomo leave a note for the animal to be taken care of at some point?
Does the vaccine kill infection in three hours?,Has the vaccine been used to reduce COVID-19 mortality?,Is the vaccine effective in fighting the COVID-19 virus?,Is the vaccine effective in killing COVID-19 viruses?,Is the COVID-19 vaccine administered in a hospital environment?
Did Trump spend billions on border upgrades?,Are the $1.5 billion he said Trump spent less than 6% of the $2.55 billion given to him in 2017/2018?,Is that information accurate?,Is this information accurate in regards to the budgets 2017-2018?,Can you please describe the actual amount of the $1.5 billion given to Trump in 2017/2018?
Did Cory Gardner fight an eight year crusade to outlaw birth control?,Did Cory Gardner support any bans of birth control?,Did Cory Gardner use his campaign monies to support contraception?,Did Gardner support birth control bans in Colorado?,Did Gardner have ties with the National Federation of Obstetricians and Gynecologists?
Was Dayton Mass Shooting suspect Connor Betts the same Connor Betts who died in Connecticut in 2014?,Was Dayton mass shooting suspect Connor Betts a member of the same Connor Betts network?,Did Connor Betts's death in Connecticut lead to an identity dispute?,Did Dayton mass shooting suspect Connor Betts die?
Did Obama send $450 million to China to build a wind farm in Texas?,Did Obama send $450 million to China to build a wind farm in Texas?,Was Obama aware that China planned to build a wind farm in Texas?,Did Obama send $450 million to China for a wind farm in Texas?
"Is allowing the payroll tax holiday to expire the cause of the loss of 900,000 jobs in 2012?",Is this amount accurate?,Are there other issues?,Is this number an estimate?,Has this number been revised significantly after this event?,Has the cost of the payroll tax holiday increased significantly?,Is this number accurate?
Did Obama give the money to help his friends at Solyndra?,Did Obama give half of the money to Solyndra?,Did Obama know Solyndra was on a path to bankruptcy?,Did Obama know Solyndra was on the path to bankruptcy?,Did Obama give the money to help his friends at Solyndra?
Did Russia jets fire at Ukraine?,Did Ukraine fire back?,Was the Ukrainian air force involved in the conflict?,Did Russian / Ukrainian armed forces take part in the conflict?,Did Russia and Ukrainian forces agree to exchange fire?,Did the war in Ukraine end before the Russian jets arrived?,Has the conflict between Russia and Ukraine been resolved since 2022?
Did the incident happen in the Philippines?,Did the aircraft attendant survive the attack?,Did the airliner crew report the incident?,Did the passenger have any injuries?,Are the passengers not accounted for in the story?,Was the flight attendant attacked and killed?,Did the perpetrator have any firearms?,Is there any indication in the story that the hostage would make any attempt to escape?
Was Northern Ireland's waiting time over a year higher than in England?,Was Northern Ireland's waiting time over a year higher than in England's?,Was Northern Ireland's waiting time more than a year in all areas?,Did Northern Ireland spend a significantly greater percentage of the years 2011-2013 on health care than England?
Did the website claim that Home Depot is giving away Coleman camping tents for free?,Did the site claim that Coleman brand tents were free?,Is there an additional shipping charge associated with the Coleman brand tents?,Is the Coleman brand tent the only brand that Home Depot is offering tents?,Is the Coleman brand tent a good seller?
Did Senator John McCain speak against Saudi Arabia’s pending senate investigation?,Did Senator McCain express concerns regarding stipulations of Saudi Arabia’s senate investigation?,Was Senator McCain's claim about Saudi Arabia's senate investigation correct?,Did Senator McCain mention Saudi Arabia's senate investigation?
Does this highway connect China to Pakistan?,Has China opened a highway to Pakistan?,Do these highways carry anything other than goods?,Is this highway only used for goods?,Is this highway an express route?,Do any roads run on the highway?,Will the Pakistan border be closed at this point?,Will the highway be in service until the Pakistan border is closed at this point?
Was the number of US Airstrikes in Somalia raised since 2016?,Has the number of US Airstrikes in Somalia tripled since 2016?,Has the number of US Airstrikes in Somalia increased since 2016?,Is the number of US Airstrikes in Somalia tripled since 2016?,Is the US Airstrike in Somalia increase due to the global economic slowdown?
Does there have sufficient evidence to put 300 million Americans in jail for election fraud?,Did the data include any illegal voting?,Does any evidence support this claim?,Do the statistics of this claim support this claim?,Are there any other cases that support the statement that there is sufficient evidence to put 300 million Americans in jail for election fraud?
Was Hammer a supercomputer used in this election?,Was Hammer a software program used in the election?,Did the Election Information Exchange allow this activity?,Were the tools mentioned in this article used in the polls?,Did the Election Information Exchange permit this activity?,Did this event occur in 2019?,Did this event occur in 2020?
"Was an $18,000 bonus given out for vaccinations for children under 2 years old?",Is it mandatory to be immunized for this age group?,Did Blue Cross Blue Shield pay bonuses for this age group?,Did this bonus increase or decrease with age?,Did this bonus increase or decrease with the number of children vaccinated?,Did this bonus increase or decrease with the number of patients who were vaccinated under 2 years old?
Was there any other financial factors related to the closures?,Has Chris Christie made any policy changes to lower funding for the federal health plans?,Are there any other financial factors associated with the closures?,Have those changes benefited individual recipients?,Has a majority of the state's family planning centers been closed?
Did Wisconsin graduates from technical colleges earn higher starting salaries than four-year college graduates nationwide?,Did Wisconsin graduates of technical colleges earn higher starting salaries than four-year college graduates nationwide?,Is it accurate to say Wisconsin’s technical college graduates have a higher employment rate and starting salaries than four-year college graduates nationwide?
"Does the law offer P10,000 monthly allowance for seniors and PWDs?",Is this allowance available to all senior citizens and persons with disabilities?,Is this allowance available for all persons with disabilities?,Is the allowance offered to all persons with disabilities?,Is this allowance available to seniors?,Is this allowance available for seniors under 70?
Did Trump administration transfer ten million dollars from FEMA to ICE?,Does ICE receive this money based off of FEMA?,Was this money transferred from the President's treasury to FEMA?,Was this money taken from the Trump administration by federal tax authorities?,Did Trump administration transfer this money from the treasury to ICE?
Would health care reform bill create socialized rules similar to those of Britain?,"Would the new health care bill allow people to die if their treatment costs more than $22,000?",Would the new health care bill have any provisions similar to those of the UK's socialized system?,"Is there any reference to a ""socialized"" system in the current health care reform plan?"
Did Mother Fox breastfeed the koala babies?,Did Mother Fox breastfeed the baby koalas during the 2020 Australian bushfires?,Does Mother Fox breastfeed the koala babies during the 2020 Australian bushfires?,Did Mother Fox breastfeed the baby koalas during the 2020 Australian bushfires?
Did the reduction of standing committees save the state?,Have the standing committees increased in size since the reduction?,Was there an increase in the amount of revenue?,– By the AP. – By the Chicago Sun-Times. – By the Chicago Times. – By CBS Chicago.?
What does the user need to search for?,Does the user have dementia?,Can the user make a search using other tools?,Does the user want to look at other resources that they have?,Are the answers in these other search tools the same?,Can this user look at an older version of this search tool?
Did McCain's economic adviser during the 2008 race estimate that Trump's promises would cause America to lose 3.5 million jobs?,Did McCain claim that Trump's promise would cause America to lose 3.5 million jobs?,Was Trump's promise based on studies?,During the 2008 election cycle was Trump's promise based on studies?
Are multiple different versions of the vaccine approved?,"Is the ""FDA approved version"" able to contain more than 3 ingredients?",Are the shots that people are receiving injections with more than 7 ingredients?,Do vaccinations that contain more than 3 ingredients have higher doses?,Did the FDA approve multiple vaccines in order to increase public awareness of tbr?
Did the fisherman survive in a whale's belly for three days before being flushed out alive?,Is there a connection between the Spanish fisherman and the whale?,Are there any other similar whale stories?,Did the whale's mouth have some kind of barrier that prevented escape from the whales?
Was there sufficient fentanyl for every person in West Virginia to be killed 32 times over?,Was the amount of fentanyl seized during this period sufficient?,Is the amount of fentanyl seized in this occurrence sufficient to kill every person in West Virginia?,Are the number of times in which this fentanyl was seized sufficient to kill every person in West Virginia?
"Has Doe's investigation been ""resolved""?","Has Doe's investigation been ""over""?",Did the Doe investigation get final word on the Trump campaign?,Have Judges approved Doe's report?,Have the legal decisions about Doe's investigation been finalized?
Are any other Prime Ministers from the US at that time?,Is the video of the speech in Goa?,Can anyone confirm that the speech is in Goa?,Are any other Prime Ministers from the US at that time?,Is the speech in Goa similar to Prime Minister Trump?,Did the speech take place in South Africa?
Did the photo of people filling the streets of Paris appear to be a photograph of people protesting the Covid-19 regulation?,Did this photograph of people filling the streets of Paris take place on 18 July?,Did this photograph of people filling the streets of Paris take place in the following months?,Did protesters fill the streets of Paris on any other days during this time frame?,Did the protesters fill the streets of Paris on some other dates besides 18 July?
Was the execution rate higher in 2017 compared to the previous five decades?,Is the average executed in 2017 more than the previous five decades?,Does this report contradict an earlier report?,Have more people been executed in 2017 compared to the previous five decades?,Has the Trump administration executed more people in 2017?,Is this claim valid?
Do 60 percent of counties in the United States refuse to implement gun laws?,Are there any specific counties in the United States who are refusing to implement gun laws?,Have the majority of states in this country refused to implement gun laws?,Are any other states in this country who are refusing to implement gun laws?
"Did Harvard University pay Elizabeth Warren $400,000 to teach one class?","Did Harvard pay Elizabeth Warren $400,000 to teach one class?","Did Harvard pay Elizabeth Warren $400,000 to teach one class?","Did Harvard pay Elizabeth Warren $400,000 for teaching one class?","Has Harvard paid Elizabeth Warren $400,000 to teach one class?","Has Harvard paid Elizabeth Warren $400,000 to teach one class?"
Did Trump differ on Obama's red line from Obama's red line in 2013?,Did Trump want to use Syria as a pretext to attack terrorists?,Do Trump and Obama have different opinions regarding the conflict?,Was the Obama red line crossed by Trump?,Was Trump a fan of the red line?
What were the steps to raise tobacco prices?,Did South Korean government announce that the price would be raised by 0.5% in June 2021?,Will tobacco price increase by 0.5% in June 2021?,Did South Korean government raise tobacco price in June 2021?,Did the South Korean government raise tobacco price in June 2021?
Did Disney say Disneyland would move to Texas?,"Would this be a ""local"" move?",Did Disney announce this in the media?,Will this move affect a large number of people?,Does this move include a rumored relocation of Universal Studios?,Will this move affect any Disney employees?,Has this relocation been reported before?,"Will this relocate be a ""local"" move?"
Do women in Saudi Arabia have the right to drive without a license?,Are all Muslim countries in Saudi Arabia part of the Muslim world?,Do all Muslim countries in Saudi Arabia have a prohibition against women getting licenses to drive?,Is Saudi Arabia among Muslim countries without a license?,Is Saudi Arabia the only country in the Muslim world in which women cannot get driving licenses?
"Was Gates said to be buying the burned-out lots for ""pennies on the dollar?",""" Did Gates actually donate the burned-out lots to charity?",Was Gates making money off the burnt-out lots?,Is the article factually accurate?,Was Gates selling the burned out lots for profit?
Are violent crime rates more than 18 times higher than they were in 1980?,Are violent crime rates less than they were in 1980?,Is violence against women still down in 2017?,Are there large changes in violent crime rates since 1980?,Are violent crime rates more pronounced since 1980?,Have any statistics show the return of violence?
Does salty and sour food cause SARS-CoV-2 to explode and dissolve?,Does SARS-CoV-2 cause COVID-19 to explode?,Does the specific food that causes SARS-CoV-2 to explode and dissolve vary in frequency and severity?,Has SARS-CoV-2 become more prevalent with salty and sour food?
Did Germany spend $580 billion on renewables this year?,Have all of these initiatives increased emissions?,Has Germany made any significant progress with reducing emissions in the past decade?,Did Germany have a net economic impact from these efforts?,Have other nations made significant progress with their energy and carbon goals?,Have the costs of the investments to these programs been well received?
Did Leonardo DiCaprio donate $10 Million to Ukraine Through The International Visegrad Fund?,Did Leonardo DiCaprio donate $10 Million to Ukraine Through The International Visegrad Fund?,Did Leonardo DiCaprio donate $10 Million to Ukraine Through The International Visegrad Fund?
Did the fox get skinned alive?,Did Lady Gaga's fur coat make use of the fox?,Was the fox skinned alive?,Was the animal used as part of Gaga's fur coat?,Will the fox be reintroduced with Gaga?
Was there a large amount of fraud for the election in Nevada?,Was there voter fraud for the election in Nevada?,Did the people who voted in Nevada live in Nevada?,Was there voter fraud for the election in Nevada?,Was there voter fraud for the election in Nevada?,Was there voter fraud in Nevada?
Did Clinton ever pressure Haiti to raise the minimum wage?,Did Clinton help pressure Haiti not to raise the minimum wage?,Was Clinton at the State Department in 2009 to protest the minimum wage raise in Haiti?,Did Clinton support or oppose Haiti raising the minimum wage?,Did Clinton support increasing Haiti’s minimum wage from 24 cents to 61 cents a year?,Did Clinton ask Obama to support Haiti raising their minimum wage?
Are there any changes to the deadline for linking Aadhaar with PAN?,Can either of those changes be made after a similar deadline?,Can any changes make the deadline for linking Aadhaar with PAN?,Are there any amendments to the deadline for linking Aadhaar with PAN?,Is there a significant difference between the deadline for linking Aadhaar and PAN?
Does the policy address climate change and infrastructure?,Is the policy going to address imprisoning people or restricting freedom of movement?,Can anyone have unfettered access to the city?,Are there any plans to limit access to a certain portion of the city?,Has Scotland established laws to limit the use of private transport?
Do the estimated savings from legalizing marijuana differ from actual numbers?,Do the estimates differ from actual numbers?,Is it likely that decriminalizing marijuana will ultimately save the state 4 million to 11 million dollars?,Is the cost of this decriminalization lower than other proposed policies?,Is a reduction in cannabis regulation a likely benefit to a lower cost based economy?
Will the cosmic rays affect global telemetry?,Will global telemetry indicate any cosmic ray radiation?,Is this the first time that the Earth will experience cosmic rays?,Is it the first time that any species has been exposed to cosmic rays?,Is there anything that has significantly impacted global telemetry?
"Did there exist masking duties, lockdowns, and restrictions?","Was the death statistics on 19 October ""null""?",Are there any restrictions placed on Sweden?,"Did a press release on the 19th of October claim that the death statistics were ""zero deaths""?",Is there any proof that the death statistics on the 19th of October were zero?
Is the agreement about sending back one refugee?,Is this an agreement on bringing back refugees to the UK?,Did the government sign the agreement on bringing in refugees from Rwanda?,Did the policy make this clear?,Does this policy have a effect on the humanitarian situation of refugees in the UK?
Is it true that the goal of the Affordable Care Act was to get 30 million people insured?,Has the Affordable Care Act reached this goal?,Is it true that the percentage of people that signed up for Affordable Care has gone down compared to the previous year?,Is it true that the average age of signing up for Affordable Care in 2018 is 35 years old?,"Is it true that the average income of people signing up for Affordable Care in 2018 is $24,478?","Is the average income for people signing up for Affordable Care in 2018 is $34,478?"
Will Argos sell 500 mattresses for £3 each?,"Will Argos sell 1,000 mattresses for £3 each?",Will Argos sell 1200 mattresses for £3 each?,Will Argos sell 1200 mattresses for £3 each?,Will Argos sell 1200 mattresses for £3 each?,Will Argos sell 1200 mattresses for £3 each?
Did Cummings incorrectly state that Democrats gave black people the right to vote?,Did Cummings have a prior history as a member of the Democratic party?,Did Cummings say that Democrats gave black people the right to vote?,Was the speaker correct to say that Democrats gave black people the right to vote?
Did Trump find Paris Hilton to be sexually attractive?,Did Trump call Paris Hilton's appearance pretty and attractive?,Are there any other interesting aspects about the Trump interview?,Did Trump call Paris Hilton to be beautiful and sexually attractive?,Do Trump and Paris Hilton have anything in common?,Have Donald Trump and Paris Hilton been married for longer than 12 years?
Did Putin acknowledge Joe Biden's election before Mitch McConnell?,Did McConnell acknowledge Biden's election before Putin?,Did McConnell acknowledge Biden's election before Putin?,Is McConnell the one who recognized Biden's election before Putin?,Is Trump aware of Biden's election before Putin?
"Did he say there are 2 million, it could be even 3 million criminal immigrants in the country illegally?",Was there any evidence that criminal immigration is a concern?,Did there any evidence that criminal immigration is a concern?,Would this be true if there were more criminal immigrants in the country illegally?
Did the PM admit that India had never had a government that was this strong and iron willed in 73 years?,Did the PM make a statement that India had never had a government this strong and iron willed?,Was the PM's statement made by someone that was the leader of a country that was this strong and iron willed?
Was this campaign directed towards Hindus?,Was the caller also urging the followers of UCC to support them?,Was the campaign intended for people from non-Muslim faiths?,Are Hindus expected to make the call in order to support the UCC?,Was the caller asked to leave this cell phone in order to support the UCC?
Was the pay raise for troops the biggest ever or the first pay raise in more than 10 years?,Did the troops receive their pay raises for the first time?,Was this raise the largest of its kind?,Was this raise the only raise the troops received in 10 years?,Was the raise significant?,Did this raise occur before or after the Congressionally mandated pay raise for troops?
Is there evidence that this person returned from abroad?,Were police on the ground for the investigation?,Would it be logical to infer this was an actual crime?,Were there any witnesses to the crime?,Did this person have insurance?,Did this person work for the government?,Did this person travel back to Pakistan to obtain treatment?
Did the United States report a 5 percent increase in economic growth over the last five years?,Has the country's economy experienced economic growth in excess of 5.6% over the last five years?,Is GDP growth less than 5.6% over the last five years?,Is the economic growth averaged?,Did the United States average 5.6% growth over the last five years?
Would Hillsborough County pay the highest sales tax of any Florida county?,Would Hillsborough County pay the highest sales tax?,Did Hillsborough County get one - cent sales tax increase in 2010?,Did Hillsborough County raise sales tax in 2011?,Does Hillsborough County want a one - cent tax increase?
"Did the per capita income in 2013 increase from 127.065 to 244,099?",Is the per capita income increase significant?,Did the income increase from 127.065 to 24499 result in a leap of 92.1 %?,Is the increase in income from 127.065 to 24499 a leap of 92.1 %?
Does the video show protests in Caracas in 2017?,Did protests in South Africa in 2021 use water cannons?,Did protests in Venezuela in 2017 use water cannons?,Did the video portray protests in Caracas in 2017?,Is there evidence of protests in Venezuela in 2017 using water cannons?
Did the finance minister say Taapsee Pannu’s house and office were raided in 2013?,Was Taapsee Pannu’s house and office raided in 2013?,Was finance minister Nirmala Sitharaman involved with the raid?,Did Taapsee Pannu take action on behalf of the raid?
Did Macron say all other EU member states will have to pay the full cost of Brexit?,Does Macron believe all other states will have to pay the full costs of Brexit?,Have other EU member states had to pay this same amount for Brexit?,Are these countries able to pay for this event?,Did Macron say that a UK referendum should not be conducted during a Brexit period?
Does Pfizer include an ingredient from a heart attack stabilisation regimen in Covid-19 vaccine for children ages 5 to 11?,Does Pfizer have an ingredient in Covid-19 vaccine for children ages 5 to 11?,Is Pfizer’s Covid vaccine designed for children aged 5 to 11?,Is Pfizer’s Covid vaccine safe for children ages 5 to 11?
Did Pryor support an overhaul of Social Security and Medicare?,Is Pryor the senator that supports limiting seniors in Arkansas to Social Security?,Would seniors lose entitlements to Social Security or Medicare if the reform is passed?,Would seniors not be able to get Social Security if the overhaul goes into effect?
Do vegetarian and vegan diets increase the risk of total or site specific bone fractures?,Does vegetarian and vegan diet increase the risk of bone fractures?,Does this study recommend a vegan diet?,Was this study done by a large group of researchers?,Does the diet of vegetarian and vegan people increase the risk for both total and site specific bone fractures?
Are any slaves in the image sold in a Black Friday auction in 1904?,Are any slaves also being sold in the picture?,Did Black Friday auctions typically offer slaves as far back as 1904?,Does the black friday auction in 1904 have slaves listed as items offered for sale?,Are any slaves in the image being sold directly in this auction?
Was Holder offered the money to murder Nipsey Hussle?,Did Holder take the money from the government?,Was Holder under any type of duress to give the money to Nipsey Hussle?,Is Holder claiming this is true?,Does Holder believe he should have been fired for the action?
What other requirements could have been waived if not signed absentee ballots?,Is the bill for obtaining absentee ballots discretionary?,"Do absentee ballots include the ""not signed out"" requirement?",Are late votes required by law for those who did not sign the ballot?
"Did Gandhi read ""How to convert India into Christian nation""?",Did Gandhi have any other books besides this one on her bookshelf?,Was this book written by a Christian person?,Was this book translated into english or any other language?,Did this author publish other books besides this one?,Was this book written by a Muslim person?
Was Will Smith in India in April 2022?,Was Will Smith meditating in front of the Taj Mahal in April 2022?,Did Will Smith pose for photographs during this visit?,Did Will Smith take any photos during this visit?,Did Will Smith leave his camera bag at home?,Did Will Smith leave his bag at home?
Did the August 2023 wildfires in Hawaii occur after a nuclear test?,Did any nuclear reactors or nuclear weapons destroy a nuclear reactor in Hawaii?,Did these wildfires result from direct energy weapons?,Was there an increase in wildfires in Hawaii from 2023 to 2024?,Are there any studies proving the direct energy weapons involved are responsible for the wildfires in Hawaii?
Did Parton give money from her own funds for victims of the wildfires?,Did Parton ask for donations from others?,Did Parton want donations from other people?,Was it true that Parton was asked for donations by the victims of the wildfires?,Did Parton ask for donations from the victims of the wildfires?
Was this image a composite of the image?,Was this clip of the 2022 Oscars a composite?,Did this image contain a reference to a celebrity slapping another celebrity?,Did this clip have a reference to a celebrity slapping an actor?,Did Smith slap Rock?
"In what month did Taco Bell announce its intention to hire 5,000 employees in a single day?","In what month did Taco Bell announce its intention to hire 5,000 employees in a single day?","In what month did Taco Bell announce its intention to hire 5,000 employees in a single day?"
"Is it true the state of Michigan threatened local beavers with a $10,000 per day fine for failing to remove their dams?","Is it true the state of Michigan threatened local beavers with a $10,000 per day fine for failing to remove their dams?",Is the state of Michigan aware that local beavers are vulnerable to habitat loss?
"Was the hotel closed due to flooding in Huzhou in Huzhou, China in July 2020?","Did the hotel close due to flooding in Huzhou in Huzhou, China in July 2020?",Did the hotel experience any damages caused by flooding?,"Did the hotel experience any losses due to flooding in Huzhou, China in July 2020?"
"Do numbers for 2018 equal 83,211?",Is this number based on a single figure?,Is this total based on an individual number?,Is this information based on the totals only?,Is the total number of illegal immigrants killed in the United States calculated in this manner?,Does this number have any statistical treatment?
"Did PayPal reinstate its policy to fine users $2,500 directly from their accounts if they spread'misinformation'?",Is there any record that shows this policy existed previously?,Is there any record showing this policy was introduced before this?,Is any information from this article consistent with the earlier Facebook post?
Did the media report on a protest to impeach Leni Robredo in 2017?,Did the protest focus specifically on Robredo's power?,Did Robredo's critics question the legitimacy of the protest?,Did the protest target an individual?,Whether Robredo resigned after the protest?
Did the german government issue a bill for damages caused to the economy due to the coronavirus?,Has Germany sent any bill?,Was the cost of the damages related to the coronavirus paid for by China?,Was the entire damage bill paid by China?,Has China paid any of the damage caused by the coronavirus?
Was a cop attacked during the communal clashes during the Hanuman Jayanti procession?,Was a cop attacked during the communal clashes during the Hanuman Jayanti procession?,Was the policeman who attacked the cop in a peaceful way?,Did the policeman manage to rescue the cop?
Do the Jan.1 tax changes the GOP is defending the way they are?,Exactly how would this increase impact each American?,"If all American's save for these taxes, will the tax hikes cause them to leave their investments?",Does this increase have direct impact on individual income tax?,Does this increase affect the income tax?,Is it true that this tax hike affects individuals?
Is the patient being pictured outside of an Italian hospital?,Is the patient in one of these images waiting outside of an Italian hospital?,Is the patient in the picture outside of an Italian hospital?,Does the patient appear to be a COVID patient?,Is the patient in the picture outside of an Italian hospital?
"Did 449,000 people turn down jury duty because they are not U.S. citizens?",Are these people registered to vote?,Are people with voting status considered U.S. citizens?,Did most of the people in this population turn down jury duty?,Have the data uncovered multiple occurrences of jury duty refusals?
Did this claim come from data that were gathered in an aggregated manner?,Has 83% of doctors considered leaving the profession because of Obamacare?,Has this claim been substantiated?,Do other medical professionals also think similar statements are true?,Does this claim also support the claim that 80% of doctors have considered leaving the profession because of Obamacare?
Did Burger King Thailand sell a cheeseburger without meat?,Did the Cheeseburger have cheese with toppings?,Did Burger King Thailand sell a cheeseburger without meat?,Did Burger King Thailand sell a cheeseburger without sauce?,Did Burger King Thailand sell a cheeseburger without any meat?,Were there any other ingredients?
Have any illnesses been reported from raw milk in Texas - in more than 4 years?,Have any illnesses been reported from raw milk in the last 20 years?,Has the number of illnesses from raw milk increased in the last 20 years?,- Is the state of Texas in a situation with a high incidence of illness linked to raw milk - in total?
Did this Russian missile enter a Ukrainian home in a Ukrainian house?,Did this Russian missile cause any injuries to family members?,Did this Russian missile hit a Ukrainian home without exploding?,Is this missile from Russia?,Is this missile responsible for a crime in Ukraine?,Is this Russian missile located within Ukraine?
Did the video show money being distributed by the BJP ahead of UP elections 2022?,Did the video take place before the UP elections 2022?,Was the BJP directly involved in this distribution of money?,Is this a video by a political party affiliated to the BJP?,Has BJP given out money for UP elections before this distribution?
Is there evidence that these regulations will increase electric bills by 17 billion every year?,Will these regulations put people out of work?,Can these regulations be expected to increase electric bills overall in the future?,Can these regulations be expected to increase energy costs overall?,Is there evidence that these regulations are expected to increase electric bills in the near future?
Does Langevin have debt from his campaign for secretary of state?,Can Langevin afford any debt in his budget?,Would Langevin be unable to afford to pay a debt in his budget?,Is Langevin having a fundraiser to retire his debt from his campaign for secretary of state?
"Did 64 percent of the failing schools spend above $8,400?","Did 26% spend more than $8,400 in their schools?","Do 24 percent of failed schools spend significantly more than $8,400?","Were failing schools spending above $8,400, or exceed that amount?",Are the 26% of failed schools failing?
Was this photo posted before or during the protests?,Was this photo taken during the protests?,Is this photo depicting farmers who are against the status of Kashmir in the U.S.?,Does this photo appear in any news organizations?,Do these farmers think this protest will negatively affect their lives?,Is this protest held for the benefit of Kashmir's special status?
Are Marcos's law school grades listed for 1983?,Does Marcos's school name begin with the letter ML?,Is Marcos's law school class listed in alphabetical order?,Is the class number given for Marcos's class of 1983?,Has Marcos graduated from the UP College of Law in the year 1983?
"Did Obama make the promise about families making less than $250,000 a year not going up in tax bills, even if they could pay more tax?",Is Obamacare raising 18 different taxes?,Did Obama promise that under Obamacare families would not go up in tax bills?,Did Obamacare raise many of the different taxes that Obamacare is raising?
Do the top 2 percent of Americans earning over $250K per year receive tax breaks?,Do people earning below $250K per year receive tax breaks?,Does the top 2 percent receive tax breaks?,"Is the top 2 percent of Americans earning $250,000 per year or higher eligible for these tax breaks?","Is there a requirement that any of these tax breaks apply to those earning $250,000 per year or higher?"
Is it true that Sheriff Avery has never asked for more then inflationary budget increases?,Did Sheriff Avery ask for additional funding because of inflation in any of his 10 budgets?,Was there more than inflation in any of Sheriff Avery's 10 budgets?,Has the mayor of Milwaukee requested any money from the county in this past year?
Did Trump contribute any money to the Clinton Foundation?,"Was Donald Trump paid $10,000 on behalf of the Clinton Foundation?","Is Donald Trump the one who made the $100,000 donation?","Is Donald Trump the one who donated $100,000 to the Clinton Foundation?",Does Donald Trump contribute any money to the Clinton Foundation?,"Is Donald Trump the one who contributed $100,000 to the Clinton Foundation?"
Was Nestle still operating in Russia?,Did Nestle begin importing Russian products?,Was Nestle currently operating in Russia prior to the Russian invasion of Ukraine?,Will Nestle still exist in Russia during the upcoming 2022 political crisis?,Will Nestle still be headquartered in Russia after the upcoming political crisis?
"Does texting ""USPS"" to 50409 enable a service called Resistbot to send a letter of support for the Postal Service to a user's political representatives?",Does this texting service use the ad-supported app that sends letters of support to users?,Is this ad-supported application a common application?
Has Obama ever submitted a budget?,Is the budget the reason for not passing one?,Has Congress imposed a budget?,a budget?,a budget?,a budget?,a budget?,a budget?,a budget?,a budget?,a budget?,a budget?,a budget?
Did Protasiewicz support the child's transfer?,Was the transition of a 12-year-old girl without parental consent?,Did Protasiewicz say there was not sufficient evidence for the student's medical records to show it was a transgender student?,Was the student involved in the act?
Does this young girl receive prison time for getting an abortion?,Was this young girl ever in jail for getting an abortion?,Was the prosecutor involved with this case?,Is it true that the 12-year-old girl got an abortion in Alabama?,Did this young girl receive a wrongful conviction?
Was the picture a photograph in June 2023?,Was the hill described in the photograph?,Did the photo show a street in the area of San Francisco?,Was the photograph posted in an online social media portal?,Did the hill depicted in the photograph have its height changed after it went viral?
Did vaccine effectiveness drop from 100% to 20%?,Did CDC claim early reported vaccine effectiveness figures were lies?,Was the CDC's claim that vaccine effectiveness declined from 100% to 20% false?,Did the CDC report vaccine effectiveness figures that were not accurate?,Did the CDC report vaccine effectiveness figures that were false?
Did Modi make a statement in London Court about bribing BJP leaders with 1300 crores to abscond from India?,Did Modi know about 1300 crores bribes in order to abscond from India?,Did Modi say he did not know about 1300 crore bribes?
Did the county open 22 schools over six years?,Did the new schools have class size amendments?,Did the new schools have a population over 50%?,Was the population increase reflected in the new schools?,Did the new schools have a population over 65%?,Did the new schools have a population in excess of 60000?
Did the images show any Kenyan cattle rustlers escaping to Uganda during the security operation?,Have these pictures shown Kenyan cattle rustlers escaping to Uganda during the security operation?,Would this video have been released in the aftermath of a security operation?,Did this video show any Kenyan cattle rustlers escaping from Sudan during the security operation?
Did Haeckel make the state's best maintained sewer system in 2007?,Did Haeckel ever become the state's best-maintained sewer?,Is there any proof this is true?,Have there been any recent studies?,Did Haeckel have to fight to maintain his sewer system?,Can Haeckel do this work with any current sewer crews?
Did the devotees pull the chariot of 2022 Jagannath Rath Yatra?,Does the video capture devotional sequences?,Is the chariot of 2022 Jagannath Rath Yatra a popular religious object?,Is the video of the 2022 Jagannath Rath Yatra from India?
Did this group feel they were crucicified by staying at home?,Is there any other information about this group that would support this claim?,Is the photo a real thing?,Are these groups related to each other?,Did anyone witness these activities?,Is the group at a distance in the picture?
Has Melania Trump visited troops in a combat zone since 1969?,Are there any prior FLOTUS visits in combat zones?,Is Melania Trump the first FLOTUS to visit troops in a combat zone since 1969?,Was Melania Trump the first FLOTUS to visit troops in a combat zone since 1969?
Did Southwest Airlines cancel a large number of flights?,Did Southwest Airlines cancel flights that the pilots were protesting COVID-19 vaccine mandates?,Did Southwest Airlines cancel a large number of flights that the pilots were protesting COVID-19 vaccine mandates?,Were any flights operated that was canceled that were rescheduled for later on that day?
"Did Lensky buy a $8,000,000 villa?",Did Lensky purchase any brand new vehicles?,Did Lensky buy his parents a salt water pool?,Did Lensky buy a vehicle a new salt water pool?,Did Lensky sell his vehicles?,Did Lensky sell his cars in the past?
Was Disney offering this offer to everyone on Facebook?,Did this offer offer anyone a holiday?,Can someone share a post?,Would this offer apply to anyone?,Will this offer be extended?,Will Disney offer this offer to anyone for a price of $250?,Will this offer expire after the end of the year?
Did at least 55 of our largest corporations use loopholes to pay zero income tax in 2020?,Is this report a formal independent study of tax policy?,Is this report about corporate tax policy?,Did this independent study determine any of these loopholes?,Is this report based on an independent study?
Did the father die?,Did protesters block roads?,Did ambulances get to the hospital at the hospital?,Did anti-Trump demonstrators block roads?,Did anti-Trump protesters delay the ambulance in a hospital?,Are any protesters responsible for the death of the father of a 4-year-old girl?
Does vaccine have any effect on the death rate?,Can people be killed by COVID-19 even after being fully vaccinated?,Has CDC documented the death rates by vaccines of people with COVID-19?,Has CDC documented the deaths by vaccines of people with COVID-19?
Did a video of a clash between India and China air in 2021?,Did the incident happen within an area known for domestic violence?,Did the incident occur during a time frame when India was regaining control of the region?,Did anyone subsequently report this incident in their newspaper?,Did the incident happen due to India being regaining control of the region?,Did either sides issue any statements about the incident?
Did Field tweet about the 2011 threat of threatening a girl on the tube?,Did Field vote in 2014 for the ban of beating women and children?,Has Field tweeted in any of these years?,Did Field tweet about the 2014 ban of beating women and children in previous years?,Was Field the only MP to vote in favour of the ban of beating women and children?
Did the videos show the students commuting or interacting?,Was the Uttar Pradesh state representative in the video?,Did the videos show the students walking in the state?,Did there appear to be any violence in the videos?,Did there appear to be any violence in the videos?,Did the videos show a particular type of violence?
Is the amount being given to people with COVID-19?,Has the money been approved by Congress?,Did the money come from a federal/state grant?,Did the money come from a charity?,Does this amount come from a government department?,Does the WHO have a list of people on this list?
Did Hyde-Smith argue that voting on Sunday is wrong?,Did Hyde-Smith disagree with all of Hyde-Smith's assertions?,Does Hyde-Smith agree with the biblical interpretation of Sunday as a day of rest?,Did Hyde-Smith support the Christian interpretation of Sunday?,Is Hyde-Smith's statement about voting on Sunday accurate?
Does this person have a third eye?,Does this person have a third eye?,Is this person the third eye in this baby's family?,Is this person having three eyes?,Is this person in this family?,Is this person being born in Germany?,Is this person's condition unknown?
Is this information from the government document proof vaccines are intended for genocide?,Has this information been cited in other studies?,Was this information published in other studies?,Is this evidence available on a government website?,Will 60% to 70% of all Covid deaths this summer be among the vaccinated?
Can you call to track the status of your stimulus check?,Will you receive a call to track the status of the stimulus check?,Can you receive a call to track the status of the stimulus check?,Is there a 800 number to track the status of the stimulus check?,Has the website been updated with the 800 number?
Did the Russian army leave Bucha on 30 March?,Was there any blood on the streets on that day?,Was Bucha the primary destination of the Russian army?,Was any Russian military casualty on the streets on that date?,Did the Russian government say a dead body was on the streets?,Does the Russian government say there were no bodies on the streets after the Russian military left Bucha?
Did Donald Trump say that a shutdown falls on the president's lack of leadership?,"Did Trump say ""A shutdown falls on the President’s lack of leadership,"" in 2013?","Did Trump say any specific time in the 2013 shutdown that ""a shutdown means the president is weak""?","Did Trump say any specific time in the 2013 shutdown that ""a shutdown means the president is weak""?"
Are there any households where every household is filled by a worker?,Is it a common fact that one in five households do not have workers who have a job?,Is it true that one in five Americans do not have people on payroll for them to start a new job?,Is it true that one in five Americans have no workers?
Did DePape film the Jan. 6 insurrection?,Is DePape a person convicted of attacking Paul Pelosi?,Did DePape attack Paul Pelosi?,Is the photo of the Jan. 6 insurrection in a collection of photographs?,Is the subject of the Jan. 6 insurrection photograph identified by the caption?
Is there a maximum amount of doctors in Nigeria?,Is there a minimum amount of doctors in Nigeria?,Are there a specific amount of doctors currently practicing in Nigeria?,Is there a specific number of doctors in Nigeria?,Is there a precise number of doctors in Nigeria?,Is there a specific number of doctors in Nigeria?
Did the senators who have been convicted of felonies still get their retirement?,Did the senators who have been convicted of felonies still get their retirement after they are out of prison?,Did the senators and congressmen who have been convicted of felonies get their retirement after they are released from prison?
Is this picture taken in Northern Ireland?,Is this picture from the United States?,Is this a picture of a missing person in the United States?,Was this man missing for more than a year?,Was he reported missing?,Has this information been released to the public?,Is this information correct?
Does the COVID-19 vaccine cause 3 deaths per vaccine dose?,Can the COVID-19 vaccine be used to protect people from HIV?,Does the vaccine cause two deaths per dose?,Can COVID-19 vaccine be used to prevent AIDS?,Does the vaccine cause any bacterial infections?,Is the vaccine effective?
"Did the IRS hire 87,000 soldiers to prosecute citizens?","Will the IRS raise taxes on those making $30,000 or more?",Does the IRS think there is any need for a higher tax rate?,Does the IRS use an illegal method to prosecute citizens?,"Did the IRS hire 87,000 soldiers to prosecute citizens?"
Did 1 of the top 10% of income earners pay 40% of all state income taxes?,Did the bottom 10% of income earners pay little or nothing?,Did the bottom 10% pay a significant amount of state income taxes?,Did either of these income groups pay any income taxes at all?,Did all income earners pay income taxes at all?
Is NSFAS funding used to fund other needs by the government?,Did NSFAS investment contribute to the funding needs of the poor?,Is NSFAS funding used to support economic growth?,Is NSFAS funding used to support other government needs?,Is NSFAS funding used to support economic growth?
Was Tolentino the vice president from 1986 to 1997?,Did Marcos flew to Hawaii before Tolentino was the vice president?,Did Tolentino survive Tolentino's election?,Did Tolentino fly to Hawaii after Marcos died?,Did Tolentino replace Marcos?,Did Tolentino serve at least a year in office?
Is the team that Chapecoense is fined for forfeiting their final match fined for forfeiting?,Was the club fined for forfeiting their final match?,Did Chapecoense play in their final match?,Is this the team's first forfeit?,Did Chapecoense lose any of their players in the plane crash?
Is Abe considered to have taken illegal vaccines?,Was Abe's position regarding vaccines the cause of this assassination?,Was there a vaccine-related death associated with this assassination?,Is it known which vaccinations Abe received from the private sector?
Did the taxi driver in the Italian national Coronavirus case contract the viral disease?,Did the taxi driver in the Italian national Coronavirus case seek ransom money from the Nigeria government?,Does the taxi driver in the Italian national Coronavirus case want ransom money?,Does the Nigeria government want to pay ransom money to the taxi driver in the Italian national Coronavirus case?
"Did Coffman say ""you're going to be deported"" in an English-language TV interview?","Did Coffman say ""stop the deportations"" in a Spanish-language debate?","Did Coffman say ""you're going to be deported"" in a English-language TV interview?"
"Did girls aged 10 to 14 have 3,500 births in 2019?",Are there any pregnancies in girls aged 10 to 14 in 2020?,Are there any pregnancies in girls aged 10 to 14 in 2020?,Are there any sex-related pregnancies in girls aged 10 to 14?
"Did WHO say India would see 50,000 deaths by April 15?",Did WHO give a specific number of deaths?,"Did WHO say India will see 50,000 deaths by April 15?","Did WHO say India will see 50,000 deaths by April 15?","Did WHO say India will see 50,000 deaths by April 15?","Did WHO say India will see 50,000 deaths by April 15?"
"Is the debt of 2,212 crore waived off from Ruchi Soya company?",Can Ramdev Baba reportedly own Ruchi Soya company?,Can Ruchi Soya company still operate under Ramdev Baba?,Is the debt waived off of Ruchi Soya company?
Did Foxx make this statement while performing on the late night show SNL in 2012?,Did Foxx refer to the white people he killed in the movie in this monologue?,Was Foxx's monologue spoofing racism in general?,Has Foxx's monologue been filmed with the cast of the film?
Did November 2018 California wildfires match up 'exactly' with the proposed high speed railway route?,Is there any evidence that California's proposed high speed railway route would have been affected by the November 2018 California wildfires?,Is it true that any of the California wildfires were a direct result of the California high speed railway?
Did Marcos flew to Belgium to claim a bank deposit of his father?,Was Marcos involved with the deposit?,Did Marcos claim the deposit from Marcos' father?,Did Marcos' father receive the deposit in the United States?,Was the deposit amount to a dollar amount?,Was the deposit a cash deposit?,Did Marcos claim the deposit with an escrow agent?
Will the Kochs make $100 billion if the government approved the Keystone XL pipeline?,Would the Kochs make more in the case of the Koch brothers v. the pipeline?,Can the Kochs' influence in the pipeline lead to greater profits if the pipeline is approved?,Will the Koch Brothers support the Keystone pipeline?
"Did job centers close all of their centers, primarily due to the Coronavirus outbreak?",Did there happen to be any job sites that were closed due to this outbreak?,Can job centers still remain open and function normally?,Did any of these job sites have full access to workers?,Did the affected individuals receive any medical treatment for the Coronavirus outbreak?
"Did the U.S. provide money to build a bigger airport for Ouzinkie, Alaska?",Did the U.S. fund the airport?,Did the U.S. make any money to pay for the airport project?,Did the United States funding the airport project pay for the improvements or other measures in town?
Do Obama administration's delay of health care law's employer mandate affect about 1% of the American workforce?,Can a change in a federal health insurance plan affect 1% of the workforce?,Does a change in a federal health insurance plan affect 1% of the workforce?,Does a change in a federal health insurance plan affect 1% of the workforce?
Do 7 out of 10 Oregon families living in poverty have one parent that works?,Do 7 out of 10 families living in poverty have any children who work?,"Does the state have a ""few families"" poverty rate?",Have there been a number of families living in poverty in Oregon?,Is there evidence in this case that a child is living in poverty if a parent works?
Is there evidence that HIV policy turnaround helped treat 3.2 million people living with HIV?,Is HIV treatment available to those living with HIV?,Did the HIV policy turnaround lead to treatment for 3.2 million people living with HIV?,Is the increase in treatment due to the HIV policy turnaround?,Did the HIV policy turnaround lead to the treatment of 3.2 million people living with the virus?
Did Soleimani storm the US embassy in Tehran?,Was Soleimani part of the group that stormed the American embassy in Tehran?,Did Soleimani play a role in capturing the hostages of the US Embassy in Tehran?,Did Soleimani arrest 52 hostages of the US Embassy in Tehran?
Did most workers in businesses that are likely to stay open receive sick leave benefits?,Were the benefits covered by the second coronavirus relief package?,Is this the only estimate for sick leave benefits under the second coronavirus relief package?,Is this estimate for sick leave benefits based on the current health care workforce crisis?
Did the United States do more than any other country in reducing carbon dioxide emissions?,Did the United States have the best overall record in reducing carbon dioxide emissions by any country from 2019?,Are there any other countries which have had better record in reducing carbon dioxide emissions than the United States?,Do any of these countries have the best record in reducing carbon dioxide emissions?
Did Khan say that he will take Jalsamadhi if he is not invited for the Pujan Divas?,Did Khan claim to have been asked to attend the Pujan Divas?,Did Khan say that he would take Jalsamadhi if he is not invited for the Pujan Divas?
"Did Confederate flags appear at a gun-rights rally in Richmond, Virginia?",Did the Confederate flags appear at the rally?,Did anyone at the rally wear Confederate flags?,Did the Confederate flags appear at the rally?,"Was the gun-rights rally in Richmond, Virginia a protest against the rescinding a bill?"
Did Obama cover up an explosion that killed 29 miners?,Did Obama's cover up in this explosion relate to mine safety?,Did Obama cover up this incident?,Did the Obama administration cover up this incident?,Have other incidents related to mine safety been uncovered?,Has this particular incident been uncovered by the government?
Does each of the 13 folds have a special meaning?,Were the 13 folds unique?,Was the Flag of the United States originally constructed in 13 folds?,Are all 13 folds unique in their importance to the flag?,Was the Flag of the United States originally designed in 14 folds?,Are all 13 folds unique in their importance in the flag?
Will businesses that move into Wisconsin not have to pay any taxes for two years?,Does Walker's proposal make any mention of any taxes on income?,Does Wisconsin have legislation addressing this issue?,Did Wisconsin Governor Scott Walker pass the tax freeze?,"Was there any evidence to suggest this was a ""worst policy ever imposed"" on a tax reduction?",Is this a statutory provision or is this a legislative policy?
Was Biden president before Jeffrey Epstein?,Did Biden own an island that was owned by Epstein before Biden?,Was Epstein a disgraced financier?,Did Biden own an island that was owned by Epstein before Biden?,Is there a relationship between Biden and Epstein?
Was Foxx partially blind and paralyzed during the medical incident?,Was Foxx under the influence of drugs or alcohol at the time of the incident?,Was Foxx able to walk or drive once his recovery was complete?,Was Foxx considered blind as a result of the COVID-19 vaccination?
Will the GST increase this year?,Is GST a separate tax on house rent from GST?,Is the levy based on the individual tenant's income?,Does GST increase the cost of house rent?,Did GST increase this year?,Did GST increase in the last fiscal year?,Does GST affect only specific rents?
Did the officers at the US post have a relationship with the Chief Minister?,Did the officers at the US post use Adityanath’s bulldozer to arrest the officer who shot four policemen?,Did the police arrest the officer who shot the four policemen?,Did the police post photographs of Adityanath's bulldozer in a picture of an officer?
Did the Bush Administration lose 22 million e-mails between 2003 and 2005?,Did the Bush Administration lose this number of e-mails via private servers in total?,Did this number include e-mails sent and received via private servers at this time?,Does this number include e-mails from the past?
Are approximately 1 million children participating in early childhood development facilities in the US?,Are early childhood development facilities the largest type of facility that we're aware of?,Are there other types of facilities that we're aware of that can participate in this type of program?,Do a large number of facilities exist that specialize in early childhood development?
Did Pangilinan and Hontiveros declare they will be running for president in 2028?,Did Pangilinan announce they will be running for vice president in 2028?,Did Hontiveros announce they will be running for president in 2028?,Did Pangilinan announce they will be running for vice president in 2028?
Was a man in a elevator stuck with his wife for 71 hours?,Was the man in the elevator in a way that was criminal?,Did the man eat his wife?,Does the man have a criminal record?,Was the man in the elevator alone when they killed their wife?,Is it possible that the man in the elevator had a criminal record?
"Do one half of federal spending go to Social Security, Medicare, and Medicaid?","Does one half of federal spending go to other programs funded with money ""borrowed from a foreign land?",""" Is one part of federal spending for each state equal to 50% of total spending?",Do states use any percentage of federal funds for other programs?,Is one large percentage of federal funding used for other programs?
"Is the claim ""There's no evidence that white supremacists were responsible for what happened on Jan. 6"" a lie?",Are there any indications that it was a conspiracy?,Is it common for conspiracy theorists to speak of white supremacists?,Is this true?
Are 'two striped telamonia' spiders a serious threat?,Are 'two striped telamonia' spiders found in public restrooms?,Is there any proof that 'two striped telamonia' spiders are a possiblity in public restrooms?
Was this photo taken of a lithium supply mine?,Did this photo atypically contain entire mountain ranges?,Are the whole mountain ranges eliminated in this photo?,Do the entire mountain ranges include more than one unit of terrain?,Can a larger area be eliminated in this photo?,Does this photo imply this mining technique is only applicable to a certain level of the Tesla plant?
"Did these airports construct 7,000 kilometres of tarmac in the last five years?","Did those airports construct 12,000 kilometres in 50 years?","Did airports in all these 50 years construct 7,000 kilometres of tarmac?",Did those airports have any construction costs associated with them?
Has Trump proposed to deport 16 million people?,Are 11 million people without documents in the country without documents?,Does Pence and Trump oppose the rights to naturalization?,Do both Trump and Pence want to get rid of birthright citizenship?,Are any of the proposals mentioned in the sentence also mentioned in the other sentence?,Is Trump calling for the deportation of all immigrants?
"Is it true that the average federal employee makes $120,000 a year?","Is it true that the average private employee makes $60,000 a year?",Are these two types of workers similar?,Are all private employees paid the same amount?,Is it true that federal employees make more than private employees?,Can these two types of employees be combined?
Will Walmart Canada require in-store customers to show proof of vaccination against COVID-19?,Will Walmart Canada require in-store customers to show proof of vaccination against COVID-19?,Will Walmart Canada require customers to show proof of vaccination against COVID-19 in November?,Has COVID vaccine been made available to retailers?
Did the mortuary worker become pregnant by the corpse?,Did the mortuary worker leave the hospital after becoming pregnant by one of the corpses?,Did the mortuary worker receive treatment for her pregnancy?,Is the mortuary worker currently employed at the mortuary?,Does the mortuary worker believe that the pregnancy was successful?
Do these 10 civilians killed in Donetsk meet the stated statistics?,Are these 10 civilians killed in the southeastern Russian city of Donetsk?,Does this report say exactly how many civilians were killed in Donetsk?,Is the above claim false?,Were these 10 civilians killed in Donetsk?
Did the protesters in Russia hold anti-Putin banner in May of 2019?,Is the banner similar to a banner put up by protesters in Russia in May of 2015?,Are the protesters in Russia holding a banner in May of 2019?,Is the banner similar to a banner put up by protesters in Russia in May of 2015?
Do stress balls have a positive effect on agricultural workers?,Do stress balls help to increase employee morale?,Did the Texas Department of Agriculture purchase any stress balls this year?,Is this a large purchase?,Is it a larger budget request than previously reported?,Are stress balls popular with farm workers?
Was the S.S. Cotopaxi lost near the Bermuda Triangle in 1925?,Did the S.S. Cotopaxi complete its mission before she lost contact with the Bermuda Triangle?,Does the photo depict what took place near the Bermuda Triangle?,Did this photo have to be taken from more than 100 miles from the Bermuda Triangle?
Did Obama's spending reduce the deficit?,Did Obama's spending contribute to the debt?,Did Obama's spending prevent any debt from growing?,Did Obama's expenditures generate debt?,Did Obama's spending reduce any debt?,Did Obama's spending reduce any debt after his term?,Did Obama's spending have any effect on the debt?
Did over half of daily marijuana smokers become addicted / addicted to this drug in the USA?,Was the 2.7 million people that got addicted to cannabis / marijuana in the US reported by this survey?,Was this population of daily marijuana smokers the most likely to become addicted?,Have there been any studies to find out the effects of marijuana on public health?
"Did Biden's executive order to stop construction of the Keystone XL pipeline ""destroyed"" 11,000 jobs?",Did the jobs that were lost in the pipeline creation process?,Did the pipeline construction process in the United States cause jobs to be lost to other companies?,"Did Biden's executive order to stop construction of the Keystone XL pipeline cause 11,000 jobs to be lost in the construction process?"
Have farmers received cow dung in return for stubble?,Is stubble procured by the UP government?,Are the farmers receiving cow dung in return for stubble?,Currently the only government in the country purchasing stubble is the UP government. Is this government procuring stubble from farmers?
Did Biden call for an end to shareholder capitalism?,Have any other people called for an end to shareholder capitalism?,Did Biden call for an end to shareholder capitalism for the 2020 presidential election?,Did Biden call for an end to shareholder capitalism before 2020?,Did Biden call for an end to shareholder capitalism in 2018?
Did Phogat win 10-0 in this match?,Did Phogat lose this match against a US wrestler?,Did Phogat lose this match to another wrestler?,Did Phogat lose this match against a world wrestling championship wrestling team?,Did Phogat lose this match during the Hungary Ranking Series?
"Did the CDC report 118,000 deaths after COVID-19 vaccines were rolled out?",Is this report accurate?,Do any other CDC records prove the CDC claim?,Do these records appear to be accurate?,Did the CDC report on a recent study of the COVID-19 vaccine?
Did the press briefing have a curtain used as a table cloth?,Was the press briefing at the World Health Organization a press briefing?,Did any of the press briefings have the same curtain used as a table cloth?,Was the press briefing held on a specific date?
"Will 50,000 troops be left on the US bases after the withdrawal?","Will 50,000 troops be left on the U.S. bases after the withdrawal?",Is there a certain amount of troops to be left on the bases?,Is a certain amount of troops to be left on the bases after the withdrawal?
Did 5 people convert from Hinduism to Islam in Rajasthan?,Did this convert belong to a minority group?,Did the convert have access to a school of study?,Did the convert work or study in the government?,Are there any other issues related to this religion in the state?,Was the conversion process conducted by government or private individuals?
Did the P-500 paracetamol tablets contain Machupo virus?,Did the Machupo virus have a high mortality rate?,Was there any evidence of the P-500 paracetamol tablets containing Machupo virus?,Did the P-500 Paracetamol tablets contain Machupo virus?
Did this business burn to the ground?,Did this business produce any ballots for elections in 2020?,Did this business have any employees in 2019?,Did this business produce any ballots in 2019?,Did this business employ a number of employees in 2019?,Did this business have any employee during 2019?,Did this business have any employees in 2019?
Did Trump offer actors $50 each to cheer him on at his campaign announcement?,Did the Trump campaign offer actors $100 each to cheer on him?,Did Trump offer actors $100 each to cheer him on at his campaign announcement?,Has Trump offered actors anything in the past that has specifically been given to actors?,Did Trump offer actors $100 to cheer on him at his campaign announcement?
"Did the Obama administration originally want 10,000 troops in Iraq?","Was the original idea that 10,000 troops were to remain in Iraq to watch the counterterrorism effort?",Did the Obama administration ask for special operations forces as a part of the US forces in Iraq?,"Did the Obama administration ultimately want 10,000 troops in Iraq to stay in place for the duration of the operation?"
Did all senators who are a member of this Senate get a cost of living adjustment from this budget?,Did all senators not receive cost of living adjustments?,Is it true that some Republican senators received a cost of living adjustment from the 2015 budget?,"Are all senators who blocked this raise paid at least $2,800 in 2015?"
Did the federal government subsidize pancakes for yuppies?,Did the federal government spend any money to subside pancakes for yuppies?,Does the federal government spend any money to subsidise pancakes for yuppies?,"Is there any evidence the federal government is spending $765,828 on subsidize pancakes for yuppies?"
Did the 273 million passwords and login credentials stolen by the Russian hacker sold for $1?,Did the 273 million passwords and login credentials stolen by the Russian hacker have legal consequences?,Was this hacking incident connected to an actual crime?,Were the 273 million passwords and login credentials stolen or sold for $1?
Has the Dengvaxia vaccine been tested in many different cases?,Have the results for this study confirmed the efficacy of the vaccine?,Has the Dengvaxia vaccine worked in any other clinical trials?,Was this clinical trial funded?,Is this test conducted by a medical professional?,Is the Dengvaxia vaccine approved in the United States by the FDA?
Did 71% of the Black Lives Matter donations go to its founders?,Did the Black Lives Matter Global Network receive donations from members outside of its broader base?,Is 73.1% of the donations to the Black Lives Matter Global Network from a single contributor?,Did the Black Lives Matter Global Network receive donations from more than one individual?
Do all the vaccines in the last 20 years killed more people than Covid-19 shots combined?,Did Covid-19 shots kill more people than all vaccines combined?,Was the total number of Covid-19 shots in the last 20 years higher than all other vaccines combined?,Is the number of Covid-19 shots in the last 20 years higher than all other vaccines combined?
"Was there any news on April 18, 1930?",Was the 'no news' statement from the BBC correct?,"Is it common for the BBC to fail to provide news on April 18, 1930?","Is it normal for the BBC to fail to provide news on April 18, 1930?","Are there any other types of reporting for April 18, 1930?"
Did Söder stay on holiday with his family in Borkum?,Did he stay in quarantine for more than 14 days in Quarantäne?,Did Söder contact the positive person in Quarantäne?,Was Söder allowed to stay in quarantine for more than 14 days in Quarantäne despite contacts?
"Did Obama know Tony Rezko would be saving him $300,000 on his home purchase?",Did Rezko offer Obama money for his purchase?,Did Obama receive a benefit from Rezko's saving?,Did Obama receive any benefit in return for Rezko's saving?,Did Obama receive the benefit for his home purchase?
Was a 13-year-old Afghan refugee's four-year-old niece sex abused by a German citizen?,Was an 18-year-old European sex abuser freed from custody?,Is it true that a European sex abuser was freed from custody by the German state?,Was a 13-year-old Afghan refugee released free of sex abuse by a German state?,Is there any evidence to prove that a 13-year-old Afghan refugee has sex abused a 14-year-old girl?
Is the support of universal background checks higher than 90%?,Is the support of universal background checks more than 90%?,Does 97% of gun owners support universal background checks?,Is the support for universal background checks more than 90%?,Does 97% of gun owners support universal background checks?,Does the support for universal background checks have a percentage in the 97% range?
Are many people harmed by Covid-19 vaccines?,Is the number of people harmed by vaccines equal to the number who contracted the virus?,Is the number of people harmed by vaccines equal to the number who contracted the virus?,Is the number of people harmed by vaccines more than 5 million?
Was Singapore imposing fines for people not wearing masks during COVID-19 pandemic?,Did Singapore impose fines for people not wearing masks during COVID-19 pandemic?,Does Singapore have a system for fines for people not wearing masks during COVID-19 pandemic?
Are there ever a deficit of about 6 million imported?,Did the government of Washington actually have a deficit of about 6 million?,Did the government of Washington create a deficit of about 6 million imported?,Did the government of Washington import anything more than 6 million at a time?,Are these figures representative of the federal government as a whole?
Did Bush lead the Texas General Land Office that repaired homes during Hurricane Harvey?,Did Bush take direct responsibility for this home repair?,Was the Texas General Land Office responsible for repairing homes in Florida during Hurricane Harvey?,Did the Texas General Land Office repair homes in Puerto Rico during Hurricane Harvey?,Did Harvey lead to the Texas General Land Office repairing any homes in Puerto Rico?
Is U.S. debt at $15 trillion?,Is Trump responsible for as much debt as any of the other presidents combined?,Are any of the other presidents more or less in debt?,Is it true that Obama is responsible for more than all of the other presidents combined?,Is Obama responsible for more debt than most of the other presidents combined?
Are any other Democrats indicted for orchestrating a coup d'etat?,Did any other Democrats have at least one coup d'etat?,Is there any evidence that any other democrats are involved in the coup d'etat?,Is there any evidence that any other democrats or any other leader would be involved in the coup d'etat?
How many people died globally on a daily basis as a result of pregnancy-related causes?,Was 111 of the global deaths from pregnancy-related causes from Nigeria?,Was there a nationwide bias in this global statistics regarding pregnancy-related deaths?,Were these numbers from the WHO?,Have these figures been reported in other publications?
Did the colonizers leave Tanzania with a GDP of close to KSh6.4 billion in 1963?,Is the Gross Domestic Product of Tanzania higher than KSh6.4 billion?,Is the Gross Domestic Product higher than KSh64 billion?,Did the colonizers leave Tanzania with an economy larger than KSh6.4 billion?
Has Kishor's team worked with Jagan Reddy's party?,Has Kishor's team worked with Jagan Reddy's party in the past 2 years?,Has this team worked with Jagan Reddy's party in the past 3 years?,Is it safe to assume that Jagan Reddy's party will be a regret for a lifetime?
Does fasting for 3 days regenerate the immune system?,Did eating and fasting result in the healing of immune cells?,Do all immune cells revert from damaged state after fasting?,Does fasting for 3 days generate more immune cells that revert to damaged state?,Does fasting for as little as 3 days produce increased immune cells?
Did 13 nations commit to abolition of farming?,Did 13 nations agree to abolition of farming?,Was all agricultural development limited in 13 nations?,Did all nations agree to abolish farming?,Are there any more abolitions being discussed?,Is there a need to increase agricultural development in other countries?
Is the judiciary considered to sit 6 days a week?,Does this amount of time per week apply to each judge?,Do all judges meet during the week?,Have judges always met on the week of their choice?,Have judges in the past met only at regular hours?,Do all judges at least once work on their individual assignments?
Did the swastika appear on the stairs of the shopping center in 2022?,Did the swastika display take place outside or inside of the shopping center?,Is this swastika a fake or true?,Is this swastika a real Nazi symbol?
Has Ted Cruz had a worse record on bipartisanship than any other senator of any party over 25 years?,Is there a senator other than Ted Cruz from either party who has a worse record on bipartisanship?,Has any other senator from either party in the 25 years have a worse record on bipartisanship?
Did Chris Coons think property taxes should be hiked over 50%?,Did Coons think that property taxes should be hiked over 50%?,Is it true that Chris Coons thought property taxes should be hiked over 50%?,Is there any other information that shows that Coons thought that property taxes should be hiked over 50%?
Is the COVID-19 vaccine needle still open?,Was the needle still sealed?,Was the COVID vaccine used at this time?,Is Pelosi currently a representative of California?,Did Pelosi receive the COVID vaccine this time?,Are there any other documented shots in Pelosi's photo collection?
Did Kitzhaber's budget for this biennium increase 8 percent over this biennium?,Is the increase a major factor in how Kitzhaber's budget is approved?,Have there been any controversies surrounding Kitzhaber's proposed budget?,Will these problems continue for another biennium?
Did the battery of the Nokia 3310 stay 70% of its battery when found in the drawer 20 years ago?,Did the battery on the Nokia 3310 increase after it was found in the drawer 20 years ago?,Was the battery of the Nokia 3310 not refunded after it was found in the drawer 20 years ago?,Did the battery of the Nokia 3310 increase after it was found in the drawer 20 years ago?
Did a majority of voters elect Senators in 2018?,Did 2/3 votes of Democrats elect more Senators than Republicans?,Did the majority party represent a minority of voters in the Senate?,Did the majority party receive a majority of the voting population?,Did the majority party represent a majority of voters in the Senate?
Did this increase happen because some Oregon families did not have insurance?,Does this increase pay for the additional insurance?,Is this increase a small price to pay?,Does this increase make sense in a state that has high rates of health insurance?,Is the increase in insurance premiums a small price to pay?
Is the spending cut expected to lead to the balance of the budget?,"Is Obama trying to address this issue of fiscal deficit, reducing the budget deficit or lowering the budget deficit?",Is Obama recommending an elimination of federal income taxes?,Is Obama recommending an elimination of federal income taxes?
Did the CFII study show 8.2 lakh confirmed COVID-19 cases?,Was the CFII study based on the correct data?,Did ICMR study confirm that COVID cases would have exceeded 8.2 lakh if the lockdown was not imposed?,Do statistics from the CFII study indicate that the cases are likely to have reached 8.2 lakh if the lockdown was not in place?
Did Mandel win in 2008?,Was the District with a 2:1 Democrat / Republican voter ratio represented by Mandel?,Was the district after 2008 overwhelmingly GOP?,Did the Democratic party outnumber the Republican party?,Do these numbers show how the district was represented in 2008?,Is the district of 2008 overwhelmingly GOP?
Are there any reported arrests in relation to the recent Maoist attack in Bijapur?,Were there any arrests in relation to the recent Maoist attack in Bijapur?,Are there any reports that indicate these arrests took place in Chhattisgarh?,Have all of these arrests been in a single instance?
"Did Biden make the statement on March 4, 2021?",Did Biden actually say the statement?,Were all Indian Americans taking over the country?,Did Biden ever say the same statement again?,Did Biden have a negative effect on Indian Americans?,Did Biden say anything specific about Indian Americans?,Was Biden talking to white people at the time?
Did Pentagon accounting errors cost over $21T?,Is Medicare for All estimated to cost over $32T?,Would 66% of the costs of Medicare for All have been funded by the Pentagon?,Did Pentagon accounting errors amounted to over $21 billion?,Did Pentagon accounting errors amount to over $22 billion?
Did this picture show the entire group of convicted of corruption in China?,Did this photo show each convicted politician being sentenced to death in China?,Did the 26 individuals in this photo represent any particular group?,Are all convicted individuals sentenced to death in China?,Has there ever been any other cases in China where the convictions have been used to convict people?
Did the Clinton Foundation donate $7.1 million to anti-fascist groups during the 2016 presidential election campaign?,Did the Clinton Foundation donate a total of $7.1 million to anti-fascist groups during the 2016 presidential election campaign?,Was there any controversy associated with the Clinton Foundation's donation to anti-fascist groups during the 2016 presidential election campaign?
"Does Cindy's income meet the $30,000 tax threshold?",Is Cindy a single mom?,Is Cindy expected to start saving for her future?,"Is there any reliance on the number $30,000 as a maximum income?",Is the tax bill intended to pay for the income of a single mom?
Do approximately 40 people on death row have appeals completed?,Do there appear to be at least 40 death row inmates waiting on a death warrant?,Is there one death row inmate on death row?,Will there be any death row inmates that have appeals completed?,Do death row inmates on death row have a deadline to appeal?
Did the video show a bear chasing the skier down a mountain in Romania?,Did a bear chase the skier down a mountain in Romania in January 2021?,Is this the first video of this bear chasing a skier down a mountain in Romania?,Is the video from this video of this bear chasing a skier down a mountain in Romania?
Is Chauvin arrested and prosecuted?,"Was Chauvin convicted of murder on April 20, 2021?",Does Chicago Police use Twitter to communicate felony convictions?,Has this tweet been retweeted?,Was Chauvin ever a convicted felon?,Was Chauvin ever convicted of any crime?
Did one of these four patients have underlying illnesses?,Did the four patients being treated for Covid have any form of viral disease?,Do these individuals have any underlying illnesses?,Did these four patients have a known risk of developing viral disease?,Did these four patients not have any known underlying illnesses?,Did these individuals take anti-inflammatory drugs?
"Did the Capitol Police express ""profound disappointment"" in Republican leadership's support for the Jan. 6 commission?",Did the Capitol Police say that the Republican leadership is responsible for the lack of support for the Jan. 6 commission?,Did the Capitol Police say that the Republican leadership is the responsible for the lack of support for the Jan. 6 commission?
Did a silver alert exist to find this child?,Was it activated for the bike that the missing child was riding?,Did the alert need to be activated in order to get an alert?,Was the alert activated to find this child?,Did the alert need to be activated to find the kid?
Did a New York City restaurant set a world record by serving $200 French fries?,Did the New York City restaurant make the record attempt?,Were the French fries sold outside a New York City location?,Did the New York City restaurant make any other records while offering French fries?,Did the New York City restaurant raise awareness in relation to this record?
Did Merriam-Webster change their definition of fascism in 1987 to censor links between its new corporate owner and fascists?,Did Merriam-Webster change their definition of fascism to censor links between its new corporate owner and fascists?,Did Merriam-Webster change their definition of fascism in 1987 to censor links between its new corporate owner and fascists?
Do violent crime using a gun have decreased in New York State since 2013?,Does this stat come from a federal study?,Does this statistic reflect a national average of gun violence?,Was this information collected from sources outside of the U.S.?,Do all of these factors make up the overall trend in gun violence in the New York State?
Do Coronavirus vaccinations cause 50 times the adverse events of flu vaccinations?,Are Coronavirus vaccinations in general more dangerous than flu vaccinations?,Do Coronavirus vaccinations increase the risk of stroke?,Are Coronavirus vaccines widely available?,Are Coronavirus vaccinations effective compared to flu vaccination?,Would flu vaccinations cause 50 times the adverse events of a Coronavirus vaccination?
Did King Charles III declare Donald Trump the winner of the 2020 elections?,Is the proclamation a statement about Donald Trump or another presidential candidate?,Was the proclamation issued as part of Charles III's official proclamation?,Was Charles III's proclamation based on any other statement?
"Did Walmart have a loot on December 25, 2022?",Did Walmart lose money during that storm?,"Are Walmart and other retailers affected by the December 25, 2022 snowstorm?",Was Walmart owned by an individual or company?,Did the looting occur while at a specific time?,Did the individual or company that looted Walmart have their names mentioned?
Did 40 students receive vaccination after vaccination?,Did KNP India vaccinate all the students who got vaccination?,Did these students die after their vaccinations?,Was a vaccine vaccinated all the students at KNP?,Did any of these students die during their vaccination?,Did this vaccine vaccinate all students in all KNP?
Did NASA confirm the massive rock will hit Earth on 07 October 2020?,Is there any indication that the rocks will be giant?,Is the rock likely to be as big as Jupiter?,Is the rock very large?,Does NASA predict a massive planet to hit Earth on this date?,Is the planet likely to be larger?
Did Obama state that Congress adopted lenient measures against terrorists involved in the 2008 Mumbai attacks to appease the Muslim vote bank?,Did Obama describe that Congress adopted lenient measures against terrorists involved in the 2008 Mumbai attacks to appease the Muslim vote bank?,Was Obama’s memoir “A Promised Land” written in response to the attack in Mumbai?
Was Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez actually in the Capitol building when the rioting occurred?,Did Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez say she wasn't in the Capitol building during the rioting?,Did Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez speak about how she wasn't in the Capitol building during the rioting?
Did Wisconsin increase road construction for 15 percent?,Is gravel replacing paved roads in Wisconsin?,Does Wisconsin's new state budget include a 15 percent increase for road construction?,Did local towns tear up paved roads and replace them with gravel?,Would a 15 percent increase for road construction increase road construction if it was not increased in Wisconsin's new state budget?
Did this vaccine lead to a rise in death among young men?,Was this vaccine effective in preventing or even decreasing the mortality of t young men?,Was this vaccine effective in preventing or even even decreasing the mortality of t young men?,Was this vaccine effective in preventing or even even decreasing the mortality of t young men?
Did 3 million Americans earn money in the green-collar workforce?,Did green-collar workers produce less than fossil fuel workers?,Is the number of people in the fossil fuel industry larger than the number of people in the green-collar workforce?,Did the number of people working in the fossil fuel industry increase?
Did the American Security Against Foreign Enemies Act pass in 2015?,Was the American Security Against Foreign Enemies Act an immigration measure?,Did the American Security Against Foreign Enemies Act provide an immigration measure?,Is it a contested immigration measure?,Was the American Security Against Foreign Enemies Act an immigration measure?,Is there evidence that the American Security Against Foreign Enemies Act is an immigration measure?
Did the video depict multiple sheep deaths in the United States?,Was this video created by somebody living in the United States?,Did sheep deaths in the U.S. start at any specific place?,Did the video depict specific places?,Did these sheep die mysteriously?,Does the video present any clue to who is responsible for the deaths?
Was there any evidence that Democratic districts received 60% of stimulus funds?,Did any Democrats represent more than 10% of Florida's 25 districts?,Are Democrats in all of Florida's 25 districts represented by Democrats?,Was there any evidence in this report that Democrats were essentially receiving only 60% of the stimulus funds?,Did any Democrats represent more than 10% of Florida's 25 districts?
Do Chick-fil-A coupons offer free restaurant meals for one year?,Does Chick-fil-A's coupon offer free restaurant meals in Facebook Messenger?,Does Chick-fil-A's coupon offer free restaurant meals for one year in Facebook Messenger?,Does Chick-fil-A's coupon offer free restaurant meals for one year in Facebook Messenger?
Did a giant squid get washed up in a beach in New Zealand in 2015?,Has this giant squid ever been seen in any other countries?,Has the giant squid ever been seen in any other country?,Was this big squid spotted on any other planet?
"Did Biden visit Ground Zero on September 12, 2001?",Was Biden born at Ground Zero?,Was Biden born in the same country as Ground Zero?,Was Biden born before 9/11?,Are there any records of Biden's birth place before 9/11?,Was Biden the only person to visit Ground Zero before 9/11?
Was Irena Sendler a candidate for the Nobel Peace Prize?,Did Irena Sendler win for the Nobel Peace Prize in 2007?,Did Irena Sendler ever win for the Nobel Peace Prize?,"Has the 3,000 Poland Jews saved from the Holocaust been awarded any peace awards?","Has the 2,500 Polish Jews saved from the Holocaust been saved from the Holocaust?"
Did the 4th South Africa Investment Conference raise R367 billion in investment commitments?,Is the 5-year target for the SA Investment Conference now firmly within sight?,Has the conference raised anything else in the past year?,Did the conference raise some other things in the past year?,Is there any evidence that the investment conference raised a single amount in 2015?
Did Greta Thunberg receive more than $54 million in monetary compensation?,Did Thunberg have a long career as an activist?,Did Thunberg receive additional monetary compensation than other activists?,Did Thunberg receive money in excess of $13 million as a politician or activist?
Did the aerial photo showing Cagayan province nearly completely submerged in floodwater occur before or after the onslaught of Typhoon Ulysses?,Was the photo taken prior to or after the onslaught of Typhoon Ulysses?,Was the photo taken prior to or after the onslaught of Typhoon Ulysses?
"Has the Democratic controlled Senate passed a budget in more than 1,000 days?",Is this claim factual?,Did Democrats control the Senate in 2013?,Is there any evidence to support this claim?,Has this Senate been heavily criticized for passing budgets?,Is this senator a member of the United States Senate?
Does this amount pay back $1.60 in benefits every dollar?,Is this amount adequate?,Will this amount be enough to pay back $1.60 in benefits every dollar?,Were the benefits to this investment sufficient?,Were these benefits based on a very specific set of assumptions?,Did this investment yield an accurate result?
Did Biden ban fracking in his 2020 presidential election?,Did Biden call for a ban of fracking in his 2020 presidential election?,Does Biden support the ban of fracking in the 2020 presidential election?,Do Biden support fracking in the 2020 presidential election?,Does Biden support a ban of fracking in the 2020 presidential election?
Is there evidence pointing toward the accuracy of the claims in the meme?,Does the meme provide proof of the accuracy of the claims?,Is there an article on the meme that contains support for the claims?,Can we rely on independent and other sources to confirm the allegations?,Can multiple independent sources contradict the claims in the meme?,Does the meme provide evidence of the accuracy of the claims?
Did Huckabee grant more clemencies than the previous governors combined?,Did Huckabee grant more pardons and commutations than the previous governors combined?,Does Huckabee grant more pardons and commutations than the previous governors combined?,Did Huckabee grant more pardons and commutations in total than the previous governors combined?,Did Huckabee grant more pardons and commutations in total than the previous governors combined?
Did Nevada Republicans do anything to cut spending in 2015?,Did Nevada Republicans do anything to cut spending in 2015?,Did Nevada Republicans do anything to cut spending in 2015?,Did Nevada Republicans do anything to cut spending in 2015?,Is this a true statement?,Was this a true statement?,Did Nevada Republicans do any action to cut spending in 2015?
Does the video indicate an exchange of greetings between Atiku Abubakar and Nyesom Wike?,Do both leaders look to express good wishes after the 2023 elections?,Did Atiku Abubakar and Nyesom Wike attend a joint press conference after their elections?,Is the video clearly inferred by the two leaders that they had exchanged greetings?
Did pirates hijack the tanker?,Did the pirates have access to the container?,Is there evidence that the container was hijacked?,Does this cargo include hand sanitizer?,Is this cargo regulated under US regulations?,Is this cargo transported internationally?,Do US regulations regulate export of hand sanitizer?
Has Wisconsin had all ballots counted by 8 p.m. on election day?,Will it be more than one election?,Has the judge decided that voting was required?,Whether a judge will order voters to vote by 8 p.m. is yet to be established. Does the federal court order say how many votes will count?
Did seven Indian military personnel die during a ceasefire between Nepal and India?,Is the ceasefire ongoing?,Did any civilians die in the firing incidents?,Was the ceasefire formally broken by the Indian military?,Was the Indian army directly involved in the firing incidents?,Was the ceasefire in force after the firing incidents?,Was the ceasefire violated?
Has there been any documentation that McDonald was carrying off by police?,Was McDonald questioned by police or released?,Have police officers been pictured with McDonald?,Was McDonald actually taken into custody by police?,Were any of the officers wearing police riot gear?,Is Ronald McDonald considered to be a hateful character by the police?
Was the image shared widely on social media during October 2020?,Was Biden pictured taking a knee during the national anthem?,Was the image shared by social media shared online as a joke?,Was Biden pictured doing protests during the national anthem?,Did Biden practice taking a knee during the national anthem?
Does the influenza virus create spike proteins?,Is it true that vaccines can cause permanent damage in children's critical organs?,Are spike proteins caused by the influenza virus?,Does vaccines for influenza cause permanent damage?,Does a vaccine infect children?,Have vaccines for influenza caused permanent damage?,Does vaccination cause permanent damage?
"Did more than 1,500 new healthcare facilities in Hyderabad?","Did more than 1,000 new facilities get built in Hyderabad?",Are there hundreds more healthcare facilities in Hyderabad being revamped or build?,"Did Hyderabad build 1,500 new healthcare facilities in 2008?","Did Hyderabad rebuild more than 1,500 healthcare facilities?",Did Hyderabad start the process of building new healthcare facilities?
Did the photograph show Guevara executing two women?,Did Guevara execute both women?,Did Guevara execute women in a specific day?,Did the photograph show Guevara executing women in a different location?,Are there any other photographs of Guevara executing women in Cuba?
Is this 1968 Israeli ‘Shekel’ coin depicting the 9/11 terrorist attacks?,Is the image that is shown in the illustration not from the 1968 Israeli ‘Shekel’ coin?,Did the Israeli ’Shekel’ coin depict the 9/11 terrorist attacks?,Does this image show the Israeli ’Shekel’ coin of the same denomination?
"Did the Assam government set a total sum of Rs 15,000 per month to temple priests?","Did the Assam government declare a total sum of Rs 15,000 per month to temple priests?",Are temple priests receiving the maximum sum?,Are the total sums for each temple priest as defined by the Assam Government?
Did this photo take place in June 2023?,Was this photo taken by an internet user?,Do the photos with this photo show mang e trees?,Is the mango tree in this photo real?,Did this photo be shared widely online?,Would this photo make a good addition to a photo collection?
"When the Trump administration took office in January, had any special visas been processed in more than a year?",Have any special visas been issued since March of 2020?,Have any special visas been issued since that date?,Did the Trump Administration delay processing special visas?,Was there an overall decline in special visas since March of 2020?
Did President Obama spend all day sitting in the Oval Office with his feet on the desk watching basketball?,Did Trump carry victims down the steps of the World Trade Center while standing?,Did Obama carry victims down the steps of the World Trade Center with Trump as his help?,Has Trump personally carried victims down the steps of the World Trade Center while standing?
"Was the protester fined Rs 1,500?",Was this protester from the Indian city of Amritsar?,Has this protester been punished for stone throwing?,Is this protester's image known?,Has any government penalty been imposed in this case?,Is there any information about the government's penalty policy in this case?
Are Ohio students in debt?,Did Ohio students graduate in debt?,"Was tuition debt more than $27,000?",Did Ohio students in debt receive free meals?,Do these expenses cover tuition?,Does tuition debt have any effect on the state's educational system?,Did Ohio students graduate debt-free from university or college?,Is tuition debt a major concern for Ohio schools?
Did Scott take $1.3 billion from public schools?,Did Scott take out federal funds?,Was Rick Scott responsible for this action?,Does Florida have school vouchers for a percentage of its budget?,Was Florida Gov. Rick Scott responsible for this action?,Was Rick Scott responsible for this action?,Did Rick Scott's action result in this outcome?,Did Florida Gov. Rick Scott take out federal funds for this action?
Is it true that Election Commission has ordered for re-elections in 142 seats due to EVM tampering?,Is it true that Election Commission has ordered for re-elections in 142 seats due to EVM tampering?,Did the commission order for re-elections in 142 seats due to EVM tampering?
Is there any evidence to suggest that the ratio is far less than 1600?,"Is there any evidence to suggest that there is an increased apportion of primary care providers, which would mean an increase in physician shortages?",Is there a shortage in primary care physician physicians in Nigeria?,Does the number of primary care physician physicians in Nigeria fall short of the recommended ratio of 1600?
Did Morrisey's firm lobby against Gorsuch?,"Was Morrisey's firm paid $500,000 to lobby against Gorsuch?",Was Morrisey's firm paid anything else to lobby against Gorsuch?,Did Morrisey's family lobby against Gorsuch?,Did Morrisey's family lobby against Gorsuch?
Did the medical oddity show two pupils in each eyeball?,Does this medical oddity occur in every eyeball?,Did the medical oddity make its way into this image?,Does this oddity occur in every eyeball?,Did the medical oddity present in this image originate in the United States?,Can medical oddities be found in any other medical locations?
Did this man treat lovers at a movie theater with a Valentine's Day gift?,Did the person do this for romantic reasons?,Did the person know the Valentine's Day gift was fake?,Did this man sabotage Valentine's Day?,Did this person share the Valentine's day gift with anyone else?
Is Harry Shearer leaving 'The Simpsons'?,Is Shearer still a part of the show?,Is the show still going on as of April 2019?,Is there evidence that Shearer is leaving the show?,Has the show suffered from any problems since the season of 'The Simpsons' was aired in October 2017?
Did Kibaki manage to triple tax revenues?,Did he reportedly triple revenue by 2011?,Is it true that a tax revenue in 2002 was $2 billion?,Did a tax revenue increase from $2 billion to $6 billion by 2011?,Is it true that a tax revenue increased by $2 billion in 2002?
Are there estimates of an amount that is left uncollected?,Is there a reason why this amount is left uncollected?,Are there estimates for a different amount of money on the table despite IRS lack of resources?,"if all the other estimates are incorrect, is there evidence of the IRS being able to get all of the money collected?",are there any other estimates/estimates that are valid?
Are this type of wind turbines using 200 gallons of jet fuel to de-ice?,Is this Wind Turbine required to operate to use 80 gallons of synthetic oil?,Are these turbines producing 100% clean energy?,Is this new wind turbine in use?,Is this wind turbine currently being utilized?
Did Pelosi urge Wheeler to blame Trump?,Does Wheeler acknowledge Pelosi's request?,Does Wheeler acknowledge Pelosi's request?,Does Wheeler accept Pelosi's request?,Does Wheeler accept Pelosi's request?,Can any other people or entities make a claim regarding Portland civil unrest?
"Was this comment made by Hillary Clinton on Aug. 8, 2015?",Has Hillary Clinton ever stated this exact quote in any other media?,Did this comment come from Hillary Clinton herself?,Did Hillary Clinton do this statement after she defeated Donald Trump?,Was Hillary Clinton also the first woman to be elected to the White House?,Was Hillary Clinton the first woman to be elected to the White House?
Do these individuals have terrorist ties?,Are these people captured?,Did these individuals live near the border with Mexico?,Has any information been released on these individuals?,Are these individuals wanted in relation to these individuals?,Do we have access to these individuals' phones?,Do these individuals have criminal records?,Would a similar investigation be conducted by another entity?
Does Ivermectin take the average amount of time for people to be cured?,Does this treatment work quickly to get people healed?,Does this product work quickly and effectively?,Is this medication an effective cure for malaria?,Is this medicine effective in treating malaria?,Would someone who doesn't have malaria get better quickly with Ivermectin?
Did the Indira Gandhi government order the killing of hundreds of Sadhus and Gau rakshaks?,Did the Indira Gandhi government direct police firing?,Did police firing have a direct link with the agitation?,Is it true that hundreds of Sadhus and Gau rakshaks were killed in Delhi?
Does Cameron Diaz work a 9-5 job?,Is Diaz in a movie?,Is Diaz a famous actor?,Is Diaz working 9 -5 with no children?,Is there proof that Diaz is working 9 -5?,Is there a photo of Diaz?
Does he indicate that his leadership skills are twice as high than others?,Does he indicate that the leadership skills of his 2016 candidates are twice that of all others?,Did he specifically say that he scored two and three times more than all others on certain questions?,Does that score apply to the leadership skills of the 2016 candidates on other questions as well?
Does the map suggest a future of America after climate change if no action is taken?,Would this map look like a United States in 2050 if climate change was not addressed?,Is the climate change map in the United States based on global trends?,Have global trends changed since the United States took office?
"Did the French ""stood by"" the United States in the last 20 years?","Has any politician said that France has not ""stood by"" the United States in the last 20 years?",Did it not seem like the French stayed by the US in the last 20 years?,"Does it seem like any politician has said that French ""stood by"" the United States in the last 20 years?"
Was the village without electricity in Tamil Nadu?,Did the bird nest and hatchlings have a long distance from the electricity?,Did the village need to stay without electricity for the 30 days following this situation?,Was the incident of this type of thing rare in the country?,Were there other reasons for this situation?
"Is EctoLife producing 30,000 lab-grown artificial babies every year?",Can a child's brain and body withstand this amount of energy?,Is lab-grown artificial births typically less expensive than human births?,Does a birth would be more expensive than human births?,Is there any research or evidence suggesting that lab-grown artificial babies are more expensive than human births?
Does the city’s 30 percent set aside for affordable housing in urban renewal areas?,Is it citywide or district by district?,Is the city’s 30 percent set aside for affordable housing in urban renewal areas consolidated?,Was the city’s 30 percent set aside for affordable housing in urban renewal areas implemented nationwide?
Is Barack Obama contributing to the national debt?,Do these numbers represent the total debt in total?,Has the national debt been reduced by these spending levels?,Can a budget for these spending reducing measures be calculated?,Has this funding for this work helped fund these spending increases?,Has the budget for this funding of these reducing measures been calculated?,Does the Obama government finance policy allow the government to make up the money spent on national debt in this way?
Did Republicans take office in January 2011?,Did Republicans actually take control of Wisconsin during that time period?,Did Republicans drastically cut Medicaid spending while under administration in January 2011?,Did Wisconsin Republicans retook control of their state?,Did Republicans control the budget during this time period?,Is Wisconsin a democratic state or a Republican state?
Is the percentage allocation of 8% of the total budget for education or total budget for education high?,Has Punjab's administration set a precedent for all of the country for prioritizing education?,Have all public schools been benefited by this type of funding?,Is this funding amount reflected in national funding?
Did the Spanish biological researcher call for Ronaldo and Messi to find a cure for COVID-19?,Did the football stars earn more money than the scientists?,Did the 'Spanish biological researcher' offer a solution to the COVID virus on the football field?,Did Ronaldo and Messi make more money than the scientists?
Were the same number of children transferring from primary to secondary education?,Did every student graduate from primary school?,Was there a 100% transition to secondary education rate from primary to secondary?,Did these student drop out from secondary school?,Did this education system entail standardized testing?,Did the government ensure 100% transition from primary to secondary education?
Did Avant know of this diagnosis?,Is Avant still alive?,Is Avant going to have a long and productive career?,Does Avant still have a fighting chance?,Is Avant still alive?,Is Avant still hopeful?,Is Avant optimistic about his health?,Is Avant optimistic about his medical bills?,Is Avant optimistic about his long term health?
Is the term 57 DEL for more than 20 fractures?,Did the mother experience a single-bone fracture?,Did the mother experience multiple bones fractures while giving birth?,Have these injuries occurred only in one woman?,Is the term 57 DEL for over 20 bone fractures?,Are the injuries specific to one woman?
Does New Jersey get 61 cents back on every dollar sent to Washington?,Do Kentucky get 1.51 on every dollar sent to Washington?,Is there any information regarding this information?,Are any percentages of the state's equidistant totals listed?,Are any state percentages listed with zeros?
Did this estimate cover all of these families?,What percentage are these families paying in housing costs?,How much are these families paying for housing?,Was this estimate calculated for all housing costs?,- Did the average price of housing rise because of these increases?,- How much did housing costs increase due to these increases?
"Is this woman's death a confession of swapping more than 5000 babies for ""fun""?",Is this woman believed to have committed this swapping while still alive?,"Is this woman's death a declaration that this woman swapped more than 5000 babies for ""fun""?"
Does clip of 2014 Russian gas station explosion edit to add light beam?,Is the clip edited to add light beam?,Is the clip of 2014 Russian gas station explosion edited to add light beam?,Is the clip of 2014 Russian gas station explosion edited to add light beam?,Is the clip of 2014 Russian gas station explosion edited to add light beam?
Did the crowd applaud the injury?,Was the crowd in Toronto supportive?,Did the bar owner say anything to the crowd?,Did the crowd react to the injury?,Did the crowd re-create the scene?,Was this incident in New Jersey?,Did there even happen to be an earthquake in the area?,Did the people in this bar have a lot of drinks?
Did CDC use this CDC data to evaluate vaccine safety?,Did this study deem the vaccine to be safe?,Did CDC review this CDC data?,"Did this study find COVID-19 vaccine was a safe, effective tool?",Did CDC use this data to make decisions regarding vaccine safety?
Can the United States be considered a marijuana nation?,Are all drugs associated with a car accident?,Did marijuana cause a 25% of death accidents in the U.S.?,Is marijuana the single major cause of car accidents in the U.S.?,Does marijuana pose more risks than other drugs?
Was Rittenhouse's family represented in photographs of the protest?,Is Rittenhouse alleged to have killed or injured two people at a protest?,Are there any witnesses in this photo?,Are there any known witnesses to this incident?,Was Rittenhouse able to walk back to his home?
Did the Nigerian troops take down the flag of the insurgents in January 2021?,Did a photograph of the troops take down the flag of the insurgents in January 2021?,Did the troops take down the flag of the insurgents in January 2021?,Does this photograph have a caption?
Did Grosskreutz testify that he was the man who shot Rittenhouse in his own back before pointing a gun?,Was Grosskreutz able to prove Rittenhouse's theory that he had a gun before shooting Rittenhouse?,Did Grosskreutz testify that he pointed a gun before Rittenhouse killed him?,Is Rittenhouse an innocent person?
Is there any evidence that Musk's deal did not trigger Section 230 reform?,Has the Section 230 reform legislation been passed?,Is there any evidence that Musk's deal has sparked any Section 230 reform?,Is the Section 230 reform legislation currently on the books in the state where Musk's Twitter deal is to be implemented?
Has Gov. Gavin Newsom signed any laws that mandate mail-in ballots in elections?,Has any law mandated mail-in ballots in elections?,Does Gov. Newsom's signature mandate this law?,Is there any evidence that Newsom signed the law in order to force local election officials to mail voters a ballot?
Did the government give a 3-month free recharge plan to celebrate a successful vaccination drive?,Did the government give a 3-month free recharge plan to celebrate a successful vaccination drive?,Did the government give a 3-month free recharge plan to celebrate a successful vaccination drive?,Did the government give a 3-month free recharge plan to celebrate a successful vaccination drive?
Does the video for Argentina in doing it contain code that would enable the hack?,Was the video uploaded by someone inside Argentina?,Was it posted after the event?,Did any person else hack the phone?,Did anyone else hack this phone?,Did anyone else hack this phone?,Is there more information about the attack?
Did the five intelligence agencies in the photo go to Delhi for a meeting?,Was the photo of the five intelligence agencies in the photo captured by a photographer?,Did the five intelligence agencies in the photo work together to perform these tasks?,Did the five intelligence agencies in the photo work together to conduct these tasks?
Is this video footage from the G20 in Italy in 2021?,Was this video footage from this G20 event?,Was this video footage from this event produced?,Did this video footage happen in Indonesia?,Can I view other video footage from this G20 event?,Is this video footage of the Indonesian President interviewing the G20 summit from Italy?
Did the Coast Guard release any audio of Titanic banging noises?,Was the audio released after Titanic lost contact?,Did the U.S. Coast Guard release any audio of Titanic banging noises?,Was any audio released to the public after Titanic lost contact?,Was a U.S. Coast Guard audio released after Titanic lost contact?
Was Lee one of two senators who opposed sanctions against Putin?,Did Lee fly to the Kremlin after dropping sanctions?,Did Lee oppose armed Ukrainian forces fighting for their lives?,Was Lee a proponent of arms for Ukrainians fighting for their lives?,Are there other people who oppose arms for Ukrainians fighting for their lives?
Did Russian missiles take down two British cargo ships?,Did the ships transport explosives to Ukraine?,Did Russian missiles halt the transport of explosives from Britain to Ukraine?,Was the attack by Russia limited to shipping of explosives between UK and Russia?,Did Russia destroy the British cargo ships?,Is the Russian response of trying to destroy British cargo ships a complete fabrication?
Will all small business be freed from income-tax relief in Wisconsin?,Will small business be able to expand and create jobs?,Will 98% of small business be freed from income tax relief in Wisconsin?,Will 98% of small business be freed from income tax relief in Wisconsin?,Do all small business qualify for income tax relief in Wisconsin under the plan?
Did the May 2017 fires start by Mexican drug cartels?,Did the Mexican drug cartels intentionally cause these fires?,Was the Mexican drug cartels intent on making the fires in California illegal?,Are there any other relevant examples of the Mexican drug cartels involvement in these fires?,Did these California wildfires help to increase the marijuana industry?
Does the infusion of mango leaves help manage type 2 diabetes?,Does it require consuming more mango leaves?,Is there conclusive evidence in this study?,Is the infusion of mango leaves safe?,Does mango leaf use reduce diabetes risk?,Will mango leaf infusion help manage type 2 diabetes?,Is mango leaf effective in reducing diabetes risk?
Is this illness the number one killer worldwide?,Are there more illnesses per day?,Are all diseases caused by COVID-19?,Is the virus spread far in the globe?,Was COVID-19 one of the hottest killers globally?,Is the virus responsible for only 56 deaths per day?
Has Boebert visited the Capitol or any other place?,Has Boebert been arrested for protesting?,Is the Capitol rioters involved in the photos?,Did Boebert tour the Capitol before rioters entered?,Is the photo taken from inside the Capitol building?,Did the protesters leave before the Capitol was broken up?
Did Rodrigo Duterte confirm that Sara Duterte has chosen Bongbong Marcos as her running mate in the 2022 elections?,Has Bongbong Marcos chosen Sara Duterte as her running mate in the 2022 elections?,Is Sara Duterte's name the same as Bongbong Marcos?
Did this video happen on a flight in India?,Was the video captured from this flight?,Is the video of this video shot in India?,Was this video recorded in the country of origin?,Is the video of this video produced by any specific company?,Did the video show a Chandryaan-3 liftoff?
Did America cease slavery by 1850?,Did America end slavery in any significant ways?,Did America implement anti slave measures after 1850?,Is there any proof that America succeeded in ending slavery?,Does the country claim to have stopped slavery?,Are there any evidence that America was the first country to stop slavery?,Do any studies claim the country was the first country to end slavery?
Does Ohio's unemployment rate exceed that of the national average?,Is Ohio's unemployment rate above that of the national average?,Do the Democrats agree that the stimulus bill was a failure?,Are there indications that Ohio's unemployment rate is rising above the national average?,Is there evidence that Obama accelerated the process of approving the economic stimulus bill?
Did Harley and Davidson release their first motorcycle in 1914?,Did Harley and Davidson unveil their motorcycle at their office?,Was there evidence of Harley and Davidson publicly announcing their invention at their office?,Were Harley and Davidson publicly announcing their invention in the photograph?,Did Harley and Davidson announce their invention?
Did the 1973 sci-fi horror classic movie Soylent Green portray people eating wafers made from human corpses?,Is the movie based on a timeline?,Did the movie depict people eating wafers made from human corpses in the 2022 time period?,Did the movie include a story of a dystopian future?
Did the American Civil Liberties Union issue a response to President Trump's 2018 State of the Union address?,"Did Trump use the word ""America"" more than 80 times in his address?","Did he use the word ""America"" more than 80 times in the address?","Was there sufficient evidence that Trump used the word ""America"" more than 80 times in his address?"
Are incarcerated people eligible for stimulus relief?,Did Dzhokhar Tsarnaev receive stimulus?,Did COVID-19 cause a spike in prison admissions?,Did any incarcerated people receive stimulus aid as part of COVID-19?,Will there be an announcement of stimulus relief?
"Do a majority of Americans want a reduction of legal immigration from 1 million a year to 500,000 or less?",Do these immigrants represent a large percentage of the US population?,Do these Americans support reducing the number of illegal immigration in the country?,Would more illegal immigrants be a better economic resource for the US government than illegal immigrants?
Was the Cumbre Vieja Vulcan on La Palma so polluted that German cars in 100 years could not exist?,Was the Cumbre Vieja Vulcan so polluting that it polluted the air?,Did any other volcanoes on La Palma pollute the air?,Did any other volcanic activity on La Palma pollute the air?,Did any volcanic activity on La Palma pollute the air in general?
Did the video of the defeat of India have any videos?,Did the team win the match?,Did the team win by more than 2 runs?,Did the team do well on the pitch?,Was the cricket team unable to defeat England?,Did the team lose by more than 2 runs after the final score?,Did the team beat England?
Has SARS CoV 2 caused 100 million illnesses worldwide?,Do all of those long-term after-effects differ widely?,Is it common knowledge that there are more long-term after-effects of SARS-CoV-2 worldwide than the short-term ones?,Is AIDS associated with SARS-CoV-2?
"Was the protester paid $3,500?",Was Trump rally protester paid to protest Trump rally?,Was Trump rally protester paid to protest Trump rally?,Did Donald Trump rally protester pay to protest Trump rally?,Did Trump rally protester pay to protest Trump rally?,Do protesters often pay to protest Trump rally?
Is this a video depicting illegal ballots in Michigan?,Was the van delivering illegal ballots overnight in Michigan?,Does this video show the driver of the van?,Is this the first time this has been shown in this video?,Is this a documentary or a video from one of the political parties that was shown?
Did eating meat contribute to diseases by age 30?,"Were eggs included in the ""Rice and Beans, Milk, Cheese, Butter and Eggs"" diet?",Were eggs included in the list of recommended foods?,"Were foods containing dairy and meat included in the ""Rice and Beans, Milk, Cheese, Butter and Eggs"" diet?"
Did Roseanne adopt an African kid?,Did Roseanne adopt an African kid?,Did Roseanne adopt an African child?,Does Roseanne admit to being Racist?,Was Roseanne gay?,Did Roseanne's adopted child have any sex of sexual violence?,Has Roseanne ever adopted a stray dog?,Did Roseanne adopt a stray dog?
Did Sanders appear in this photograph?,Is it a true photograph?,Are Sanders and King visible in the photograph?,Would Sanders have participated in this march?,Would Bernie Sanders have attended this march?,Is it true that Sanders and King appeared together in this photograph?,Would Sanders have been present in this photograph?
Did 95% of marriages in the US take place in high school or middle school?,Did most marriages in the US occur during their high school years?,Was there a significant difference in the percentage of marriages in the U.S. compared to other countries?,Did the percentage of marriages in the U.S. increase between people who started dating during their middle or high school years?
Did AT&T have an appointment to conduct an audit prior to the January 2020 blast?,Did AT&T have an appointment to conduct an audit prior to the January 2020 explosion?,Did AT&T terminate a contract with Dominion Voting Systems in December 2020?,Were the reasons cited by AT&T to terminate the contract clear?
"Did people from foreign countries attend Sadhguru's event in March, which has caused over 1,000 corona cases in Tamil Nadu?",Are these people quarantined at Isha Yoga Center?,Is there any evidence that foreigners could have caught corona in the event?,Are the foreigners quarantined at Isha Yoga Center?
"Has there been a total of 1,253 deaths cause by the Covid-19 vaccine?",Has there been any negative effects of Covid-19 vaccines?,Has there been any negative effects from the Covid-19 vaccines?,Has this increase been due in large part to the Covid-19 vaccines?,Has the Covid-19 vaccine induced deaths?
Was the study supported by any evidence?,Did it establish what this period of accelerated aging was?,Are there other ways to estimate this period of accelerated aging?,Is there any other information or hypothesis to explain the findings?,Is it reasonable to assume that the speed of accelerating aging occurs around 34 years of age?,Is there any evidence for this claim?
Did Hillary Clinton's opponent have federal investigations in 2008?,Did he have any investigation by the federal government?,Did he contribute to Hillary Clinton's election campaign?,Did Hillary Clinton's donations include campaign contributions?,Is Hillary Clinton's political campaign active at the time she was elected?,Did Hillary Clinton's campaign have any legal liability in this election?
Did Toomey visit Joe Sestak while in office?,Did Toomey vote against every veterans appropriations bill?,Did Toomey vote against all veterans bills in 2009?,Does Toomey support President Obama's military spending bill?,Is Toomey running for reelection in 2017?
Does taking two - three drops of Carbo Vegetabilis increase the oxygen level in a human body?,Was Carbo Vegetabilis produced by using a homeopathic medicine?,Were the two - three drops of Carbo Vegetabilis produced by a homeopathic medicine?,Was this homeopathic medicine formulated to increase the oxygen level in a human body?
Is food demand going to double between now and 2070?,Is the world population going to double between now and 2070?,Is there a significant increase in food demand between now and 2070?,Are these estimates based on reliable sources?,Does food demand look set to double between now and 2070?
Does Fitzpatrick landed his plane on a New York street on a bar bet?,Does Fitzpatrick land a plane on a New York street on a bar bet two years later?,Does Fitzpatrick land a plane on a New York street on a bar bet two years later?
Was Ice Cube credited with criticizing Cardi B's Grammy win?,Was there evidence that Ice Cube is the writer of this negative criticism?,Did Ice Cube actually write this negative critique of Cardi B's Grammy win?,Did anyone else have these issues with Cardi B's Grammy win?
Did Pete Buttigieg lose by 20 points statewide in Indiana?,Did Pete Buttigieg lose by 20 points in the Indiana State Senate Race?,Did Pete Buttigieg lose by 20 points in the Indiana statewide primary race?,Did Pete Buttigieg win in the Indiana statewide primary race?
Did Trump make this statement after Cruz came in second at the 2016 Iowa caucus?,Is it true that Trump made this statement after Cruz came in second at the 2016 Iowa caucus?,Do Trump and Cruz agree on the merits of this claim?,Has Trump been criticized for this claim?
Is the claim true that Heck voted 10 times to defund Planned Parenthood?,Is Heck a defender of a woman's right to choose if her health is in threat?,Did Heck vote to defund Planned Parenthood 10 times?,Is Heck an defender of a woman's right to choose even if her health is in threat?
Did the notes were being made in Pakistan?,Are the fake bills being manufactured in Pakistan?,Is this item being sold in Pakistan?,Has this item been stolen before?,Did this product pose a threat to India?,Would a similar product being sold by a foreigner likely be similar to the one shown in the video?
Is there any video of Trump speaking at this address?,Are any of Trump's statements on this speech accurate?,Is it possible to find additional information on Trump during this address?,Was Trump present during this address?,Was the first lady present in this address?,Was this address part of a televised event?
"Did Donald Trump retweet the photo of Amy Coney Barrett on Dec. 8, 2020?",Did the photo of Amy Coney Barrett have the eyes radiating light beams?,Has Donald Trump published photos of judges before?,Has Trump edited any of these photos?,Was the photo of Justice Amy Coney Barrett in an enlargement of Trump's tweet?,Was there a photo of this judge?
Have six financial institutions with assets that are the equivalent of 60 percent of the GDP of the United States of America?,Do all six financial institutions have assets that are the equivalent of 60 percent of the GDP of the United States of America?,Is there any evidence that the assets of the six financial institutions are equal to 60 percent of the GDP of the United States of America?
Will the rebuilding of three high schools benefit 40% of Portland Public School students?,Will all of the rebuilding be completed on time?,Does the rebuilding include all of the renovations?,Has the rebuilding cost the same to students and parents in other schools in Portland?,Is the rebuilding of three high schools included in this project?
Does the President think that his executive orders have contributed to a drop in illegal immigration?,Did the President change immigration patterns after his executive order?,Was the amount of the fall in illegal immigration unprecedented?,Did the President have other policies that helped reduce immigration?,Does the President plan to continue his policies in the future?
Did the GOP give tax breaks to big business in 2017?,Did the GOP give tax breaks to businesses in 2017?,Did the tax giveaway to the super rich in 2017 result in them facing a tax increase?,Did the Republicans increase taxes on middle class families?,Did they pass a tax reduction bill?,Have Republicans raised taxes on middle class families since 2017?
Did this pilot fly on a Soviet helicopter?,Was this pilot wearing a Soviet outfit?,Were these Soviet outfits required to operate the helicopter?,Did the Russian pilot fly on a Soviet helicopter?,Did the Soviet outfit used in the aerial photograph match up to the outfit depicted in the photograph?
Has the administration cut more than half a billion dollars of its total budget?,Has the agency had any employees that are no longer working for the administration?,Is there any evidence that the agency is losing jobs in this period?,Do the estimates that the department is losing jobs reflect actual results?,Are the actual numbers for the department not being accurately reported?
Did the vaccine participant die of any illness?,Was there any evidence of adverse events?,Did the FDA find any new evidence of adverse events?,Was the FDA's verdict accurate?,Did the FDA make any corrections to their statement?,Has the FDA ever made an announcement?,Was this statement accurate?,Was this statement made in an official statement?
Are there any records of this?,Are there any records of this?,"Did this claim claim ""black lives matter"" and ""antifa disappeared"" in march 2021?",Are there any records of this?,Has this claim been widely reported?,Has this claim been widely shared?,Is this claim true?,Are there any records of this claim?
Do the vaccination requirement states that vaccinated citizens will have to stay in quarantine camps?,Can quarantine camps be used when vaccines are not effective for a public health objective?,Is this statement accurate?,Would quarantine camps be available when vaccines are not effective for a public health objective?
Did Coke lose $4 billion in market value in 2019?,Are people boycotting Coke due to their statement?,Are these boycotts a response to the statement?,Are all Coke’s products considered to be white?,Are these boycotts happening to Coke employees or consumers?,"Posted on June 22, 2016 June 21, 2016?"
Did Nancy Faeser say that 41 percent of the victims of violence were attacked by opposing forces?,Does Faeser believe most of the violence was by extremists?,Did the report refer to policing?,Did Faeser say that most of the violence was committed by extreme elements?
Was die Zahl von Krankenhäusern seit 2000 massiv gesunken?,Has the number of people in the age group of 80s remained constant?,Was the number of people in the age group of 81-86 remained the same in this same time frame?,Has there been any decrease in the number of people in the age group of 80s since 2000?
Are the Naxalites described as revolutionaries after the Bijapur attack?,Did Babbar condemn the attack on Bijapur?,Did Babbar believe that the Naxalites were revolutionaries?,Does Babbar support the attack on Bijapur?,Has Babbar called the Naxalites as revolutionaries?
Is it true that a monthly unemployment allowance from the government can be received under the PM Berojgaari Bhatta Yojna – 2021?,Does the link point to the govt website where a monthly unemployment allowance can be derived under the PM Berojgaari Bhatta Yojna – 2021 scheme?
Did Obama go on a spending binge?,Did all Americans contribute to this debt?,Did President Obama's spending binge result in any reduction in the debt?,Did Obama's spending binge result in any reduction in the debt?,Do all Americans contribute to this debt?,Does Obama have any obligation to pay any of these debts?
Did Disney World begin requiring guest to wear pronoun pins in August 2023?,"Did Disney World require guest to wear pronoun pins on April 17, 2018?","Does Walt Disney World require guest to wear pronoun pins on August 15, 2018?",Is Disney World a non-profit that supports pronoun pins?
Did Biden pay Biden $50K a month?,Did Biden go golfing with Biden?,Did Biden and Biden play together at a Ukrain oil exec's?,Did Biden eat dinner with the Ukrainian oil exec?,Was Biden or Biden at a golfing location with Biden?
Does Biden want a national lockdown to combat a virus that has a 99%+ survival rate?,Has Biden supported a nationwide lockdown to combat a virus that has a 99%+ survival rate?,Is there evidence Biden supports a nationwide lockdown to combat a virus that has a 99%+ survival rate?
Did Jackson receive a life sentence for stealing a $159 jacket in Louisiana?,Did Jackson receive a life sentence for stealing a $159 jacket in Louisiana?,Was the jacket under $30 before receiving a life sentence?,- How long did Jackson serve in prison - Did Jackson leave prison alive?
Did Biden claim that he was raised in Section 8 housing?,Did Biden not describe his background in his biopic?,Was Biden’s stance in his biopic regarding the housing issues stated in his biopic?,Did Biden say anything against Section 8 housing?,Did Biden say that there were many tenants in Section 8 housing?
Did the bill established health clinics?,Were the clinics regulated by the FDA?,Are there any laws against abortion?,Will it cost taxpayers millions to fund clinics?,Will clinics require public funding to operate?,Did the bill establish health clinics for a specific cause?,Whether clinics would offer specialized services?
Is Bernie Sanders considered wealthy?,Is Bernie Sanders considered a successful businessman before he was elected?,Is Bernie Sanders considered a failed businessman?,Is Bernie Sanders considered a successful businessman before he was elected?,Is Bernie Sanders considered a failed businessman before he was elected?
Did the doughnuts sell out?,Did the doughnuts sold out after 8:30 a.m.?,Did the doughnuts sell out on the day of the event?,Did the doughnuts sell out for more than 90 minutes in total?,Did the event have enough doughnuts sold out by the time of the event?
Is Jianli Yang a Chinese politician?,Is this claim true?,Is the statement false?,Is Jianli Yang the current Chinese Secretary of Defense?,Is Jianli Yang a Chinese political figure?,Is this statement true?,No such mention of Jianli Yang has been made!?
Does this tax increase represent a modest tax increase?,"Will a 3-percent tax increase for a $100,000 home be more than a $300 tax increase?",Will this tax increase be enough to increase property values in Buffalo?,Does a 3 per cent tax increase in Buffalo exceed what people in Buffalo pay in property taxes?
"Is Strickland earning $400,000 a year as a lobbyist after leaving Ohio for Washington?","Is it true that Strickland also earned $400,000 a year as a lobbyist after leaving Ohio for Washington?","Is there evidence to support Portman's claim that Strickland did not earn $400,000 as a lobbyist after leaving Ohio for Washington?"
Did the 2022 artwork for the “Sgt. Pepper’ album cover” incorporate elements from this album cover?,Was the artwork featured in the album cover depicting 2022 celebrities?,Did the artwork depict celebrities who died in 2022?,Has this artwork been shown elsewhere?,Is this artwork available for purchase in the U.S.?
Was Malia Obama a victim of a racist Antifa attack?,Was the police officer who arrested her found dead under suspicious circumstances?,Was the arrest of Malia Obama among 10 arrested in the Antifa attack?,Did a police officer who arrested Obama die from suspicious circumstances?,Did the police officer who arrested Obama die of suspicious circumstances?
Did Menendez vote to enact a new tax on homes of 3%?,Was this tax effective for a new home?,Was the tax effective for a new home and would this tax make up the total?,Did this tax not cover all homes?,Did the tax come from a statewide measure?
Did two radical Muslims kill the girl when she refused to convert to Islam?,Did the two radical Muslims die as a result of the killing?,Is it true that the two radical Muslims killed the girl because she didn’t agree with converting to Islam?,Did the two radical Muslims kill her in spite of their being a Hindu?
Did Biden's family admit Biden died and re-established himself after 2019?,Did Biden's family re-create Biden in 2019?,Did Biden's family announce Biden's resignation?,Was Biden replaced by an actor in 2019?,Did Biden die in 2019?,Did Biden die prior to 2019?,Did Biden die during 2019?
Did this photo show police officers guarding an opposition rally in Nairobi in December 2022?,Was this rally an anti-government protest rally?,Is this photo from the same event as the photo?,Is this image for a different event than the protest rally in Nairobi?,Is this photo for a different political candidate than the protest rally in Nairobi?
Does this person claim the CIA agent killed Marilyn Monroe?,Did this person die during this incident?,Did the agent die while in the CIA?,Is this person considered dead?,Did this person die while in the CIA?,Would the person's death be considered an act of murder?,Did this person have knowledge of the actual date and time of the murder?
Have these photographs been produced since 1912?,Are all of the photographs from the year of the 2014 photograph?,Have the photographs been produced since 1912?,Is the location of the Niagara Falls ice-free in the year of the photograph?,Are the photograph from the year of the 2014 photograph?,Is the location of Niagara Falls ice-free in the year of the 2011 photograph?
"Did the BBC, newspapers and other media cite a lack of funds for a single wespe titrating?",Was a titrant who paid 50.000 Euro for an illegal wespe titration in July 2009 deemed to have violated this ban?,Was a titrant who paid 50.000 Euro for an illegal wespe titration in 2012 deemed to have violated this ban?
Are concealed weapon laws limited to guns for school use in Wisconsin?,Do concealed weapon laws require background checks when carried around schools?,Is it an ideal situation for concealed weapons to be carried around schools?,Have concealed weapons laws in Wisconsin been repealed previously?,Would concealed weapons laws be repealed in Wisconsin if passed?
Was a missile launched into the city of Beirut?,Did the bomb cause a massive explosion?,Has it ever been revealed to have exploded in Lebanon?,Does it make any sort of noise?,Did any of the video's clips contain a significant amount of numeric data?,Did any of the videos contain footage of bombs from outside Lebanon?
Has the Supreme Court been expand to three locations?,Has the Supreme Court been expanded to any other locations?,Does the Supreme Court have seats in Chennai?,"Has the Supreme Court had seats in Mumbai, Kolkata, and Chennai?",Does the Supreme Court have seats in any other cities?,Has there been any expansion of the Supreme Court?
Does this phenomenon have the appearance of two suns in the sky?,Can photographs be used for scientific studies?,Are this photographs of an uncommon phenomenon?,Have these photographs been used before?,Do these photographs indicate a rare phenomenon?,Has Hunter's Moon had a recent history in human history?,Are this photos associated with this phenomenon?
Did the person in question have anti-India comments?,Has the person in question been shaved?,Was the person being shaved a male?,Did any of the women in the photos have children?,Do the woman that posted the photos have a child?,Is there any doubt as to whether this was actually the case?
"Did the anchor say "" you and everyone you know are dead "" if Ian moved 20 miles to the west?","Can I say "" you and everyone you know are dead "" if Ian moves 20 miles to the west?",Were the people or things mentioned by the anchor dead as a result of Ian?
Does mercury contamination pose hazards to the environment and human health?,Is the photo being depicted in this photograph?,Is methylation of mercury dangerous to human health?,Was this photograph released in 2022?,Did this photograph feature an actual leach field?,Do this leach fields exist in all states?
Did Hillary Clinton have any e-mails detailing her plan to seize guns from Republicans?,Did Hillary Clinton write e-mails detailing her plan to seize guns from Republicans?,Does Hillary Clinton have any e-mails about guns that would be confiscated from Republicans?,Was Hillary Clinton responsible for seizing guns from Republicans?
Did the settlement reported in July 2019 allow members of the public to claim monetary benefits?,Did the settlement allow for a settlement that could have caused damage?,Did the settlement result in financial benefit to individuals?,Was the settlement reported in the media and widely reported?,Is the Equifax compensation settlement authentic?,Is there any evidence supporting the assertion that the settlement was genuine?
Are white men most likely to be arrested for violent crimes?,Are white men at a higher rate of criminal convictions?,Are white men at a higher rate of criminal convictions for violent crimes?,Does the statistics show a link between white men and violent crime?,Does the figure have a causal relationship to the number of violent crimes?
Are the doctor departures for the UK counted for this dataset?,Are all the doctors currently employed in the UK?,Does the UK have the highest rate of doctor recruitment in Nigeria?,Does it have the highest number of doctors in Nigeria?,Would it be unusual for there to be fewer doctors in Nigeria compared with the UK?
Is clapping together 5 pm a good way to destroy coronavirus?,Has this activity been seen in humans?,Does clapping together cause the virus to change?,Will clapping together cause virus to change?,Could shaking at 5 pm create a vibration that would destroy the virus?
"Did anand Seth, the owner of Amul Milk, fire 1.38 lakh workers for eating beef?",Did 1.38 lakh workers eat beef?,Was Amul Milk’s owner in charge of the process?,Did the Amul Milk workers pay for the beef?,Was Amul Milk owner's name shared in public media?,Was Amul Milk's name changed?
Is the new virus heat-resistant?,Can the new virus be killed by a temperature of 26/27 degrees?,Is the new virus prone to sun damage?,Is the new virus a form of biological warfare?,Is it likely that the new virus is heat-resistant?,Is there any evidence that this claim is true?
Did the total number of hospital beds increase by 47% from 2013 to 2014?,"Is the total number of hospital beds currently equal to or greater than 82,291?",Does the total number of hospital beds continue to increase from 2013 to 2014?,Did the increase in hospital bed capacity come from fewer hospital bed spaces?,Did the increase in hospital bed capacity come from fewer hospital bed sites?,Is there a current estimate of the total number of hospital bed capacity in the United States?
Did judges in a majority of the 61 cases determine the allegations were without any merit?,Did a majority of the 60 cases that judges decided the allegations were without any merit have a federal element?,Did Judges do their job by exercising discretion in all these cases?,Did Judges have their own independent rules in the majority of these cases?,Does Judges’ authority to judge in these cases differ from that of other judges?
Have these family members worked on this car business prior to Henry Ford's time as president?,Was this family family associated with this family?,Have these family members worked on this car manufacturing business prior to Ford's time as president?,Has this family worked on this car manufacturing business prior to Ford's time as president?
Did a fight occur in Tawang on 9 December?,Did any Chinese soldiers die?,Did any Chinese soldier receive the funeral?,Did either Indian or Chinese soldier die?,Did the Chinese soldiers die due to violence?,Did any other civilians get killed in the battle?,Did any of the Chinese troops have amnesia?
Did Lynn leave behind a pro Trump note to her fans?,Did Lynn's note to her fans contain political content?,Did Lynn's note contain any political content?,Did Lynn leave behind a pro Trump note to her fans during her death?,Are Lynn fans currently voting for Trump?,Do Lynn fans have a pro Trump stance?
Did the unemployment rate in Wisconsin drop to 2.1 percent a year after Calhoun was governor?,Does the unemployment rate in Wisconsin have been the lowest in the country for 40 consecutive months?,Is Calhoun the only governor that has cut unemployment to 2.1 percent as of date of this review?,Is Calhoun the only governor that has cut unemployment to 2.1% as of date of this review?
Are there any children that eat 16 packs of sugar?,Did these kids eat sugar after eating 16 packs of sugar?,Did these kids eat the same amount of sugar after eating 16 packs of sugar?,Are these children likely to consume more sugar after a meal?,Would all kids eat 16 packs of sugar after eating 16 packs of sugar?
Did they stop a bus full of seniors from voting?,Does the Jefferson County senior center have voting privileges in the county?,Did Jefferson County officials stop the bus filled with seniors?,Did the Jefferson County senior center close its doors?,Did the seniors leave their senior center for another location?,Did the senior center operate on a day prior to the vote?
Is this the first time these animals have been seen in Florida?,Do New Guinea Flatworms pose any serious health risks?,Is the reason for calling 911 when you see these animals?,Is there a way for Florida to alert police when this animal is sighted?,Are there any other methods of addressing this threat?
Did China pay for their tariffs on Trump goods?,Did Trump pay for tariffs on these goods?,Did Trump pay for the tariffs that were in place before he became president?,Are tariffs used to protect from trade tariffs?,Does Trump plan to pursue further trade tariffs?,Is Trump presently negotiating trade tariffs with China?
Did Donald Trump talk about deporting 16 million people?,Was there a mention of deporting 16 million people as a possible plan?,Was Trump's original plan to deport 16 million people a part of his plan to deport 17 million people?,Did Trump have specific remarks regarding deporting 16 million people?
Was the Coronavirus predicted by Sylvia Browne in the 1981 book End of Days?,Did Browne predict Coronavirus in other books in general?,Did Browne predict Coronavirus in a specific way?,Was the book End of Days published in a particular year?,Did Browne predict Coronavirus in general?
Was Lee Fisher against a tax increase in 2008?,Would the tax increase have resulted in the loss of many jobs?,Did Lee Fisher plan to raise taxes at any point during this year?,Did Lee Fisher want a tax increase to fund the state of Kansas?,Does Lee Fisher think tax increase increased the cost of education?
Did Trump say Ruto would be receiving a 'heroic' welcome in the United States in 2022?,Did Trump say Ruto would receive a 'heroic' welcome in the United States in 2022?,Did Trump say Ruto would receive a 'heroic' welcome in the United States in 2022?,Was there any footage from Trump referencing Ruto's success in China?,Did Trump mention Ruto's success in China?
What percentage of people have moved from Texas to Maryland?,Is there evidence that Texas have more people?,Does Texas have the largest population of people in the US?,Has Texas gained more people from Maryland?,Does Texas have the largest number of people in the US?,Does Texas have a larger population of people in the US?
Would I receive $50 coupons from Tim Hortons to celebrate their 56th anniversary?,Would I receive $50 coupons from Tim Hortons to celebrate their 56th anniversary?,Would I receive $50 coupons from Tim Hortons to celebrate their 56th anniversary?,Would I receive $50 coupons from Tim Hortons to celebrate their 56th anniversary?
"Do all video include clips of French police beating up protesters, including women?","Have all videos shown footage from French police beating up protesters, including women?","Has any video show footage from French police beating up protesters, including women?",Is there any evidence for any of the footages?,Is any of the footage from a video from a French protester a part of the video?
Will this project create 500 jobs?,Does Cuomo expect this project to make $1.5 million per job?,Is Cuomo confident that the Buffalo SolarCity project will create a job for every employee?,Are Cuomo's predictions based on actual data?,Does Cuomo have any doubts about Buffalo's SolarCity project?
Did the presenters collapsing on camera due to side effects from the COVID-19 vaccine?,Was the video of the presenters taken by Pfizer during a live broadcast?,Did all presenters suffer side effects from the COVID-19 vaccine?,Did all presenters collapse while speaking with the video?
How many women in South Africa have been raped in their lifetime according to the South African Institute of Race Relations?,Are estimates for raped women as wide as the difference between the actual estimated numbers and underreporting?,Are the estimates by the South African Institute of Race Relations accurate?,Are statistics from other sources rounded to the same degree?
Did this particular legislature spend fewer dollars for mental health services than any other governor in this county?,Did this legislature spend money in this state on mental health services?,Is this legislature going to cut spending on mental health services in the future?,Did Gov. Scott Walker put more money into mental health services than any other governor in Wisconsin for the past 25 years?
"Did the CDC remove ""Covid-19 pandemic"" from its website?","Does ""Covid-19 outbreak"" contain a new title?",Was the information on the website correctly rearranged as of December 2016?,Did the CDC change the titles on its website to clarify the CDC's views?
Does counting the number of chirps by crickets in 14 seconds help in determining the temperature in Fahrenheit?,Does multiplying the number of chirps by crickets in 14 seconds help in determining the temperature in Fahrenheit?,Is it important to find a correct measurement in Fahrenheit?
Has Mahendra Singh Advani supported Bhagwant Mann in his race as CM?,Has Mahendra Singh Advani endorsed Bhagwant Mann?,Has Mahendra Singh Advani supported other election candidates?,Has Mahendra Singh Advani supported other candidates?,Has Arvind Kejriwal endorsed any other election candidates?
Would Tim Michels force a 12-year-old girl to deliver the baby?,Is this girl under the age of 14 years?,Does Michels support the idea that a 12-year-old girl should deliver the baby?,Would this girl have a hard time getting pregnant without Michels' help?
Did a 1% of Americans qualify for SSDI or SSI?,Was a 1% of Americans disabled at the time of this claim?,Is there any other information to support the claim by Green et al?,Did a 1% of Americans get SSDI or SSI in 2009?
Did the U.S. budget less than the Corzine-Buono budget in 2008?,Is 2014 the latest year where federal funds are used less than in 2008?,Is the U.S. budget less than fiscal year 2008?,Can you tell me which year the U.S. budget is spending less than before?
Will the new rules require tax on all Third-Party Payment App transactions totaling over $600?,Will the tax be paid on third-party payments apps?,Will the tax be triggered by new laws regarding mobile payments apps?,Will the tax be triggered by new laws relating to third-party payments apps?
"Are COVID-19 vaccines able to suppress the immune system and make people more susceptible to HIV, shingles and herpes?","Are COVID-19 vaccines able to suppress the immune system and make people more susceptible to HIV, shingles and herpes?","Does Covid-19 vaccine suppress the immune system and make people more susceptible to HIV, shingles and herpes?"
Did the WHO warn of the limited stock of PPE?,"Did the Trump administration announce it was sending 18 tons of masks, gowns and respirators to China on February 7?","Did the Trump administration announce it was sending 18 tons of masks, gowns and respirators to China the same day?",Did the WHO warn about the limited stock of PPE the same day?
Did the 4 Republican representative vote to impeach Trump?,Was there any other Congressional voting on impeachment?,Did any of the Republican representatives support impeachment of Trump?,Did any of the Republican representatives vote for impeachment?,Did any of the Republican representatives vote to impeach Trump?
Did Pakistani Ary crashes in Pakistan?,Did a pilot die in the crash of Pakistani Ary?,Is it clear that Pakistani Ary crashes are caused by terrorism?,Was Pakistani Ary crashes a deliberate act of terror?,Did Pakistani Ary crashes on an official mission?,Is Ary crashes on official missions?
Did the 1908 Model T earn better gas mileage than a typical SUV sold in 2008?,Did the 1908 Model T make an initial profit from the model after the model was sold?,Was a specific model made of the Model T that did better on mileage?,Are there any other models that did better on mileage than the Model T?
Did he carry the horse for 3 miles?,Did he make a good decision?,Did he have a good body for the horse?,Was the horse bitten?,Did the man try to save the horse?,Is there information about whether the horse is still alive?,Can snake bites be deadly?,Is the man who saved the horse from snake bites still alive?
"Did Hochul fire 34,000 workers?",Did Hochul's record include firing all of these workers?,Is the time the health care workers were fired over five years?,Does Hochul seem to have changed his or her firing record?,Does Hochul use her firing record for political purposes?,Is this record correct?
Has an 80 million year old shark been discovered in Japan?,Did a video show the discovery of the 80 million year old shark?,Was this video a live video?,Did the video show an 80 million year old shark?,Is it safe to say that this was a live video?,. Do sharks in Japan have a longer life span than the rest of the world.?
Did $2.2 billion in cash flow to Iran?,Has the Obama administration acknowledged use of cash by terrorist organizations in Iran?,Is money flown into Iran used for terrorist activities?,Are the Obama administration and other countries ignoring the use of cash by terrorist organizations in Iran?,Has cash flown into Iran been fully documented by the Obama administration?
"Have Milwaukee blacks had a 45 percent increase in male unemployment, 60 percent truancy, a 50 percent graduation rate, the ""worst"" reading scores and lead in infant mortality?","Do Milwaukee blacks have a 35 percent increase in male unemployment, 60 percent truancy, a 50 percent graduation rate, the ""worst"" reading scores, lead in infant mortality?","Are there other studies that have shown that male Milwaukee blacks are more likely to have lower rates of truancy, truancy, a 50 percent graduation rate, reading scores and infant mortality compared to?"
Did Trump post the image as a montage or a picture?,Was Trump in the Revolutionary War?,Was Trump a leader in any war?,Did Trump post the image?,Was Trump in the Revolutionary War?,Did Trump post in early 2023?,Is Trump in the Revolutionary War?
Did this mock funeral take place at a protest?,Did this mock funeral occur in this country?,Did the PM show sympathy for the Muslim people in this country?,Do any of the elections held in India in 2018 involve any Muslim citizens?,Was this mock funeral held because of the election victory in Pakistan?,Did this mock funeral take place by a protest?
"Did Customs and Border Protection seize 11,201 pounds of fentanyl in 2021?",Was fentanyl the primary drug of choice for those who were killed by fentanyl in the US?,"Were deaths from fentanyl linked to the use of narcotics by US citizens, as stated in the report?"
How can I register my support for UCC?,Can I call to register support for UCC?,Can I call to register support for UCC?,Can I use the UCC's phone number to call someone back?,"Is the UCC phone number the same as the """""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" number used to register support for UCC?","""""?"
Is the US going to export 20 million tons of grain from Ukraine?,Can the US export a large amount of grain from Ukraine?,Is the U.S. going to organize a famine with this grain export from Ukraine?,Is the U.S. going to export 20 million tons of grain from Ukraine?
Does the video show the Bowlbot 5000 scoring a strike?,Does this video contain any explicit violence?,Does this video contain any sexual content?,Is the bowling machine a safe product for families with little or no bowling experience?,Is the video in any medium?,Does the video include any graphic violence?
Did the plane land with skeletons in the cabin?,Did the cockpit and passengers have a total body count of about 30?,Was the plane's cabin empty of humans when it landed?,Is the cabin populated by skeletons?,Is it common to have a cockpit full of skeletons?
Was Kathleen Sebelius going to determine whether Sarah Murnaghan would live or die?,Did Sebelius not have a vote on the outcome of Sarah Murnaghan's life?,Did Sebelius not vote on the outcome of Sarah Murnaghan's life?,Was Sebelius appointed to determine whether Sarah Murnaghan would live or die?
Did Putin release 500 lions to keep people indoors?,Did Putin release the lions to keep people indoors?,Did Putin release the lions to keep people indoors?,Are all of the lions in the country aimed at keeping people indoors?,Did Russia release the lions to prevent the spread of Coronavirus?
Did this statement change due to an increase in banks' profits?,Did the banks profit increase significantly from the previous years to 2020-21?,Did banks make a profit by the time of India's fiscal 2016-17?,Is the revenue increased from the year of 2016-17 due to the increased banks' profits?
Has the health care premium increase been higher with Obamacare than before?,Has the health care premium increase been faster with Obamacare than before?,Has the health care premium increase been slower with Obamacare than before?,Does Obamacare lower healthcare costs than before?,Does Obamacare reduce insurance costs?,Are health care costs for the elderly or those with preexisting conditions higher than before?
Did the coin from 1818 depict Lord Ram?,Did the coin depict Lord Ram even during the Mughal rule?,Did this coin exist on a forged paper prior to the 1818 mint?,Did these coins exist in print prior to the 1818 mint?,Did the Mughal ruler actually issue Lord Ram coins before the 1818 mint?
Is the net wealth of Carter's cabinet more than a third of the American total?,Does Carter's cabinet currently have an unimpressive wealth balance?,Is the net wealth of Carter's cabinet greater than 31% of the American population total?,Is the net wealth of Carter's cabinet more than a third of the American people total?
Is the date of this warning?,Is the date of this warning public?,Did Netflix send out a test warning?,Does this warning apply to all accounts?,Is this warning effective?,Does this warning concern all users?,Is this warning effective for all accounts?,Is this warning effective in any specific locations?,Is this warning effective in the following cities?
Can Homeopathy cure diabetes?,Can a diabetic get cured in 2 days?,Has a diabetic doctor ever claimed to cure diabetes?,Are Homeopathy doctors not trustworthy?,Did a diabetic doctor claim to cure diabetes in 2 days?,Is there any way to get rid of diabetes?,"If diabetes can be cured with a simple homeopathic approach, will a diabetic be cured in 2 days?"
Did Suzanne Bonamici support the $500 billion Medicare cut passed last year?,Does Bonamici agree on the overall cost of the Medicare cut?,Is the proposed $500 billion Medicare cut cost-effective?,Did Bonamici support the overall costs of the Medicare cut?,Is the proposed $500 billion Medicare cut in the current funding source?
"Is the video of a ""warrior"" commemorating June 4 in 2023 available?","Is this person a ""warrior"" on a national level?","Are there other ""warriors"" commemorating June 4 in 2023?",Is this person a national politician?
Did Jacob Chansley have Capitol Police at all times on Jan. 6?,Was the entire time he was being led by Capitol Police?,Was the entire time Chansley was being led by Capitol Police?,Was the entire time Chansley was being led by Capitol Police?,Does this video show what the Capitol Police are doing?
Did tide gauges measuring sea level in Rhode Island in the 1930's have risen by 10 inches since the 1930's?,Did the 20's see a rise in sea level measurement?,"Originally, was it a simple trend?",Did the 1930's see a rise in sea level measurement?
Did any of Nevada's 16 counties have at least one Obamacare exchange provider?,Has every Nevada county had an Obamacare exchange provider?,Does the average increase in Obamacare premiums for the year be a double-digit increase?,Is there a minimum amount of increase in the average Obamacare premium per year?
"Did a judge order the release of 10,000 convicted sex offenders?",Is the decision based on a judge’s ruling?,Are there any other judicial rulings to consider in the matter?,Will there be additional judicial rulings?,Are sex offenders eligible to become free citizens?
Do estimates that the Virginia population increased by 8 percent from 2005 to 2015?,Did per capita budget spending in the state increase 38 percent?,Was the population increase due to a decrease in the income tax?,Did Virginia increase spending in part due to an increase in the income tax?,Did the increase in population in the state increase due to a decrease in the income tax?
Does the FDA report mention that plant-based food supplements have helped with diabetes?,Are there any medical conditions that are likely to result from taking plant-based supplements?,Do medical conditions associated with consuming plant-based foods help with diabetes?,Does the FDA report include these medical conditions?,Does the FDA report any dietary restrictions for plant-based foods?
Does Hillary Clinton plan tax small businesses by almost 50 percent?,Would small businesses be taxed by 50 percent under Clinton's plan?,Has Clinton's plan been adopted?,Has Clinton ever proposed taxing small businesses disproportionately?,Would Clinton's plan increase small business taxes?,"Despite stating that Clinton's plan has potential tax breaks, does the Clinton plan actually include tax breaks?"
Did the Trump administration wipe out the $3.6 billion deficit?,Will the federal deficit increase due to a new President's tax reform bill?,Will the state of the tax code for 2019 and 2020 change?,Did this administration's decision to repeal and replace Obamacare help them fund their fiscal deficit?,Did any other congressional leaders and the press agree on their view regarding this bill's nature?
Is the vaccine mRNA a serious danger to young children?,Did the CDC and Pfizer warn parents that the vaccine mRNA was unsafe?,Was one in every 500 children aged under five years hospitalized for a vaccine injury?,Was the vaccine considered safe by the FDA?,Can there be a correlation between vaccine injury and the number of kids who were vaccinated?
Is it true that there are as many as 200 pregnant women dying daily in Nigeria?,Is this statistic true?,Is the number of deaths caused by pregnancy in Nigeria?,Is this number a reasonable estimate?,Did this statistic come from studies in this country?,Could this be true?,Is this report accurate?
"How many more voters are ""other"" in Florida than the number of Democrats and Republicans combined?","Is the difference the difference in the number of people who are registered as ""other"" in Florida compared to the number of people who are registered as ""democrats"" or Republicans?","Is the difference between how many people are registered as ""other"" in Florida compared to those who are registered as ""democrats"" if we take into account the difference in the number of people who are registered as ""other""?"
"Did any more residents stay back in West Pakistan, than in East Pakistan?",Did less people stay back in East Pakistan as a result of partition?,Did more people stay back in West Pakistan as a result of partition?,Did the percentage increase between West and East Pakistan over time for this period?,Were the percentages for both cities varying?
Did the Northwest Florida Beaches International Airport have a flooded runway in October 2018?,Are there any other Hurricane Michael related photos in this collection?,Are any of the photographs of this collection previously published?,Was any photograph or video taken during this hurricane?,"Besides Hurricane Michael, did any other hurricanes have a flooded runway at Northwest Florida Beaches International Airport in October 2018?"
Is it accurate to say the agency spent more than $165 million to develop pen that worked in space?,Is the accuracy of the pen used in spacenas based on the pens used in space?,Is the accuracy of the pen used in spacenas based on the pens used in spacenas based on the pens used in spacenas based on the pens used in spacenas based on the pens used in spacenas based on the pens used in spacenas based on the pens used in space?
Is Christianity Today backed or funded by George Soros?,Is Christianity Today a front organization for George Soros?,Is George Soros still active in politics?,"Can George Soros be seen as a ""flagship"" for Christianity Today?","Does Christianity Today aspire to become a ""front organization"" for George Soros?"
Did the increase in the number of miscarriage cases occur because of a COVID-19 vaccine?,Were the number of miscarriages due to COVID vaccine due to a vaccine?,Were the number of miscarriage cases due to a vaccine due to a vaccine?
Does Starbucks say it is going cashless in 2022?,Does Starbucks say they will stop charging customers for cash?,Has Starbucks publicly stated it is going cashless in 2022?,Statements Are there any other Starbucks stores going cashless in 2022?,Are other stores going cashless in 2022?
Are the soldiers starving?,Is the photo taken in the year 2023?,Do the soldiers have medical supplies?,Did the photo originally show hunger?,Are the Ethiopian soldiers starving of food?,Is the Ethiopian military starving soldiers?,Has this photo been used in any way?,Count me as one who believes that the Ethiopian soldiers starved of food in 2023.?
Did China and Japan continue a strict coronavirus lockdown in mid-May 2020?,Did China and Japan enter a lockdown after a second wave of the virus?,Was there any major public health issues in China and Japan during this period?,Was the amount of time of lockdown in China and Japan relatively short?
Is it true that the Conservatives plan to cut all homeless people in half by 2025?,Was the Tube advert purporting to be from the Conservatives?,"Did the advertisement read ""We plan to cut all homeless people in half by 2025 - we plan to cut all homeless people in half by 2025""?"
Has the Modi government awarded Adani with the contract to store food grains for 30 years without the FCI?,Did the Modi government contract Adani to store food grains for 30 years?,Was the contract with Adani for the storage of food grains by the Modi government void of any FCI?
Can @[4:0] leave a phishing email?,Does leaving a phishing email reveal if your account has been hacked?,Does leaving @[4:0] leave a comment of unknown gender reveal if your account has been hacked?,Can @[4:0] leave a comment of unknown gender reveal if your account has been hacked?
Is COVID-19 vaccine experimental?,"Did vaccines killed thousands of people, have spike protein caused damage,?",Did vaccines cause an increase in spike protein?,Did vaccines kill thousands of people?,Are vaccines a cause for a spike protein?,Has vaccine data proven that spike protein caused damage?
Did Soweto receive free electricity after 1994?,Was Soweto promised free electricity after 1994?,Did Eskom say Soweto received free electricity after 1994?,Did Eskom state publicly on Facebook that Soweto was promised free electricity after 1994?,Was Soweto promised free electricity after 1994?,Did Eskom say Soweto was promised free electricity after 1994?
Did Yechury address Xi Jinping as his ‘Boss’ in a tweet on 20 October 2015?,Did Yechury name Xi Jinping as his ‘Boss’ in the tweet?,Did Yechury address Xi Jinping as his ‘Boss’ in a tweet with his name?
Did Amit Shah have a photo in which he said 53 crore would be transferred to 41 crore people?,Did Amit Shah actually say 43 crore would be transferred to 41 crore people?,Is there any evidence that Amit Shah transferred 43 crore people to 41 crore people?,Is there evidence that Amit Shah did not actually say 43 crore people would be transferred to 41 crore people?
Did the AAP poster imply the central govt would give the money to women in Himachal Pradesh?,Was the poster from AAP affiliated to the opposition?,"Does the AAP poster say it will give funds to women in Himachal Pradesh ""if central govt gives it funds""?",Was the poster from AAP associated to the opposition?,"Was the poster said to be part of AAP's ""finance plan""?"
Have these Act 10 reforms saved taxpayers more than $3 billion?,Did the act 10 reforms save taxpayers?,Are these Act 10 reforms currently in effect in any state?,Is this statement in reference to the entire act 10 reform?,Is this statement in reference to a particular section of Act 10?
"Will Trump be indicted, convicted, or in jail in 2024?",Is it true that Trump can run if he is indicted?,"Are there any other reasons Trump cannot run if he is indicted, convicted or in jail?",Do Trump and other candidates have to do a lot of work before being able to run?
Did this home video depict Haiti when it actually depicted Alaska?,Did the video caption specifically depict Haiti?,Do you think this was a mistake?,Are there other videos that depict Haiti?,Would a mistake like this be unflattering?,Are there any videos that depict Haiti?,Do you think this is a common error?
Did the house survive Hurricane Ike?,Did the house have an exorcism 10 years prior to Ike?,Does the house in question have a history of supernatural incidents?,Did anyone die in a supernatural incident 10 years prior to the first hurricane?,Does the property in question have a history of supernatural events 10 years prior to the first hurricane?
Did Obama give Syria $195 million to celebrate religious holiday in Syria?,Was $195 million in Syria used for religious purpose?,Did Obama give Syrian $195 million to celebrate religious holiday in Syria?,Did Obama give Syria $195 million to celebrate religious holiday in Syria?,Was Syria given $195 million to celebrate religious holiday in Syria?
Did Putin bomb Biden-owned Villa during this attack in Ukraine?,Did Putin bomb Biden-owned Villa while hammering bio labs?,Did Putin bomb Biden-owned villa while hammering biolabs?,Was there any information regarding the bombing of Biden-owned villa in Ukraine?,Did Putin bomb Biden-owned villa while hammering bio labs?
Did Biden say that dozens of police were killed during the attack?,Did Biden say that exactly zero people died on Jan. 6?,Has Biden ever said there were dozens of police killed in the attack?,Does Biden say there were exactly zero people killed on Jan. 6?,Does Biden claim that there were exact zero people killed?
Did either side increase income taxes on the wealthy?,Is this plan a substitute for a tax cut for the rich?,Is this proposal more balanced in comparison to the Republican plan?,Was this plan a substitute for any tax cuts?,Is this plan less competitive in comparison to the Republican proposal?
Was there a video of this action?,Did the robbery occur in Nagpur?,Did this action take place during the COVID-19 era?,Did a reaction against the robbery occur?,Did the crime take place in a foreign country?,Does it appear that a hospital in Nagpur was involved?
Did this video take place in 2019?,Is this video from the same year?,Did protesting farmers prepare a rally in the 2019?,Is this protest occurring in 2020?,Are protesting farmers opposed to these reforms?,Is this rally likely to happen in the 2021?,Do protesting farmers have a history of protesting?
Was there a major fire in London on Saturday?,Are more people wounded compared to killed?,Are any officials saying there is no reason to be alarmed?,Was this attack in London a terrorist attack?,Did the attack take place at all?,Are there any people arrested in connection to the attack?,Are there any witnesses reporting these events?
Is the 2019 novel Coronavirus spread by the garlic that is heated in a pot?,Does garlic cure the 2019 novel Coronavirus?,Does the 2019 novel Coronavirus contain the antibodies needed to destroy the 2019 novel Coronavirus?,Is the 2019 novel Coronavirus spread by garlic?,Can garlic cure the 2019 novel Coronavirus?
Did the author mention any PTA meetings?,Did the author say parents are currently putting meetings together to help kids create as much chaos as possible in school?,Did the author say that PTA meetings are conducted to help parents tell their kids how to create chaos in schools?,Was the author referring to any specific schools?
Did Russia demand Elon Musk delete Tucker Carlson's Twitter account in 72 hours or there would be consequences?,Did Musk snub the demands of Ukraine?,Did Musk demand Tucker Carlson delete his Twitter account in 72 hours or there would be consequences?,Did Musk snub the demands of Ukraine?
Is the video of a Boeing 737 Max plane taking off at a 90-degree angle?,Did a video show a Boeing 737 Max plane taking off at a 90-degree angle?,Are there any other planes like this in the skies that have been recorded taking off at a 90-degree angle?
Did the cost of ObamaCare surpass the estimates of $1.8 trillion?,Did the cost of ObamaCare exceed those estimates by more than half?,Will ObamaCare cost double that amount?,Do Republicans agree with these estimates of ObamaCare's budget?,Have other estimates of ObamaCare's cost been published?
Did Albert Bourla say he wants to reduce the world population by 50%?,Did Albert Bourla say he wants to reduce the world population by 50%?,Did Albert Bourla say he wants to reduce the world population by 50 percent?,Did Albert Bourla speak of reducing the world population by 50 percent?
Did the MO school district ask parents to sign a COVID-19 liability waiver in advance of the 2020-2021 school year?,Did the MO school district require parents to sign a COVID-19 liability waiver in advance of the 2020-2021 school year?,Did the Missouri school district ask parents to sign a COVID-19 liability waiver in advance of the 2020-2021 school year?
Did Obama helped more than a million veterans and military family members go to college?,Did Obama help more than a million veterans and military family members go to college under the post 9/11 GI Bill?,Is the post 9/11 GI Bill considered a success by many veterans?,Did Obama personally provide money to help a veteran that were lost to the 9/11 GI Bill?
Was the server that the US military seized in Germany seized by the U.S. military?,Did the seized server have any data that prove Trump was the winner of the 2020 election?,Does the seized server hold any data that proves Trump won the 2020 election?,Is the server that the U.S. military seized in Germany seized by the U.S. military located in the EU?
Did the state's current balanced budget have a $12 billion hole?,Does the state have an income tax?,Is the state's balanced budget equal to what people make in the general economy?,Did the state's budget include income taxes?,"Is the ""balanced budget"" equal to people earning in the general economy?"
Do 90% of women with Covid-19 vaccines experience a miscarriage in the first 12 weeks?,Is the number of miscarriages the same across all vaccined women?,Do 70% of Covid-19 vaccines cause miscarriages?,Are the Covid-19 vaccines effective during pregnancy?
Did this increase primarily be due to a shift in priorities?,Did this increase primarily be due to a change in funding patterns?,Did this increase primarily result from a change in the overall government budget?,Are there other instances in which these changes are occurring?,Does this increase seem to be a direct result of a change in policy?
Did the test kit have positive and negative control swabs in it?,Did the test kit have negative and positive control swabs in it?,Did any of the test kit components are manipulated with the negative control swabs?,Did any of the test kit components have negative and positive control swabs in them?
Did Habeck say that 42 hours a week was sufficient to fund the arms shipment in Ukraine?,Did Habeck say that he was willing to work 42 hours a week?,"Did Habeck say that if a citizen was willing to work 42 hours a week to fund the arms shipment in Ukraine, they should agree to work 42 hours a week in order to fund the supplies in Ukraine?"
Did Obama repeal any of his own health care legislation?,Has Obama amended or delayed 19 components of his own health care legislation?,Did Obama repeal or delay 19 components of his own health care legislation?,Was Barack Obama part of any government effort to repeal or delay 19 components of his own health care legislation?,Do these numbers show a change in Obama's own health care reform?
Did Trump say the vaccine took years to develop?,Did Trump claim the vaccine could take years to develop?,Did Trump say he had the vaccine before most people thought it was impossible?,Did Trump have any success with the vaccine in general?,Did Trump say the vaccine made him an successful president?,Did Trump say the vaccine took three to five years to develop?
Is this statement from 9/11 correct?,Does 9/11 include any reference to a certain type of debris?,Does 9/11 have any reference to the effects on other structures?,Are there any other examples of destruction on buildings other than the ones mentioned in 9/11?,Is there any evidence that 9/11 is a result of two planes?
Has federal funding grown by 375 percent in the past 30 years?,Has the number of students graduating from higher education decreased over the same period?,Has the number of students graduating from higher education increased over the same period?,Has the number of test score drops over the same period as the growth of federal funding?
Do the results of the recent global temperature increase support the theory that human-produced carbon is one of the factors behind climate change?,Does the global temperature increase support this theory?,Are there multiple evidences supporting the theory that humans-produced carbon is one of the factors behind climate change?,Does this theory support the claim that human-produced carbon is a significant factor for climate change?
Would spending of $2.3 trillion keep unemployment at 8.5%?,Is $3.2 trillion enough for the economy to stay around 10% unemployment?,Was Obama's commitment to reducing unemployment a promise?,Was Obama in charge of the spending of $7 billion in 2012?,Is this claim true?,Is this promise based on a claim made by Barack Obama?
Was this well the first oil spilt in the Gulf in the last 10 years?,"Did this well occur a year, six weeks or a year, and a half prior to the BP oil spill?",Does the BP spill have a history with hurricanes or hurricanes?,Is there evidence in this case that the BP oil spill is ongoing or a historic trend?
Are there any other sources of this information available?,Is it true that Gandhi quoted two entirely different MSP rates?,Do any of these sources claim to have seen Gandhi quote multiple MSP rates in the same state?,Is it true that Gandhi quoted one rate of paddy in this state?,Are these claims based on credible sources?
Did the Indian football team play barefoot in 1948 Olympics?,Does the Indian football team currently have an official football shoe?,Did the Indian football team play barefoot in 1948 Olympics?,Did the Indian football team travel for this 1948 Olympic Games?,Would the Indian football team have traveled to attend this 1948 Olympic Games if the Nehru Government paid them to go barefoot?
Did Cruz say 54 million evangelical Christians stayed home in the last election?,"Did Cruz say if Christians show up and vote our values, we can turn this country around?",Was Cruz talking about voting for the right candidate?,"Did Cruz say if Christians show up and vote for our values, we will turn this country around?"
Did the survey give you 2 free tickets?,Did anyone else get 2 free tickets?,Did this survey get you 2 free tickets?,Would I get 2 free Alaska Airlines tickets if I reacted to this survey?,Was this survey forwarded to anyone?,Did this survey give you 2 free Alaska Airlines tickets?
Did these images originate after Suman Haripriya's statement?,Is this image true or false?,Did these images lead to this action?,Is this image true or false?,Did these images lead to this action?,Have these images lead to a specific action?,Did this image lead to these actions?
Do people from all walks of life agree on this assessment?,Do people in the general population aspire to reduce the world population?,Does this statement have any implications on the global environment?,Does this view based on the World Economic Forum conference have any effect on global food and water supplies?,Do all the population reduction measures available have any impact on the global food and water supply?
Is the cost of the bill $100 million?,Did the bill bring about this reduction?,How much will the average Wisconsin homeowner save in property tax relief?,Do most tax relief bills benefit the average individual?,Are most property tax relief bills similar?,Are any tax relief bills similar to the one described in this piece?
"Has Abele ""have had five years"" and done nothing on Estabrook Dam?","Has Abele ""had a little to no recollection"" of Estabrook Dam?",Does Abele's statement imply any involvement in Estabrook Dam?,Has Abele acted on Estabrook Dam?
Did the Vatican confirm that Pope Francis and two of his aides tested positive for coronavirus?,Did the Vatican confirm Pope Francis was not immune to the coronavirus?,Did the two aides of the Pope test positive for coronavirus?,Did the Pope test positive for coronavirus?,Was the Pope tested positive for coronavirus?
Did Sundar Pichai meet his teacher after 27 years?,Was Sundar Pichai's teacher present at the time of meeting?,Was Sundar Pichai able to attend the meeting?,Are there any other known instances where Sundar Pichai met his teacher after 27 years?
Did the military-related conspiracy theories explain why several Walmart stores suddenly closed in April 2015?,Did any other conspiracy theories explain the sudden closure of stores in April 2015?,Did any other conspiracy theories explain the sudden closure of stores in April 2015?,Did the military conspiracy theories explain the sudden closure of stores in April 2015?
Did the image depict the exact length of the crocodile?,Was the crocodile killed before the photograph was taken?,Did the crocodile live for more than 40 years?,Has crocodile mortality increased since the photograph was taken?,"Did the crocodile die from natural causes, or was it intentionally killed?"
Did Nixon declare a war on drugs?,Did police deaths rise during Nixon's war on drugs?,Did the number of police deaths decrease after Nixon declared war on drugs?,Is it true that drug laws helped lead to increases in the number of police deaths?,Do police deaths have risen in the time since prohibition?
Are there many fire trucks in Johannesburg?,Is it difficult to confirm?,Does Johannesburg have multiple fire trucks?,Do all fire trucks in Johannesburg work?,Are there other fire trucks in Johannesburg?,Did the Firefighters in Johannesburg use any other fire trucks?,Have any of the fire trucks in Johannesburg not started yet?
Was the device designed to cut 50 % off an average home’s power bill?,Was the device manufactured by the young whizkid in the US?,Did the young whizkid go on to manufacture the device?,Was the device manufactured in the US?,Were there any other controversies around this device?
Did Gonzalez’ losing campaign against you last spring receive funding from Bruce Rauner?,Did Gonzalez receive funding from Bruce Rauner's supporters?,Did Gonzalez receive funding from Rauner supporters?,Did Gonzalez receive funding from other supporters?,Is the funding related to any other individuals?,Did Gonzalez win election from another election?
Did the photo show dramatic differences in two boys who were exposed to the same smallpox source?,Did the photographer obtain a positive response to the smallpox exposure in either of the boys?,Did the photographer report the results to the media?,Did the photo show the results to the media?,Did the photograph provide the public with any information regarding the cause or outcome of smallpox in either of the boys?
Are the tablets for Hindus impotent?,Are there any other statements about this article?,Is ribyani in a separate vessel for Muslims & Hindus?,Do the ingredients for this restaurant differ for each person?,Does the food used by this restaurant differ for each group?,Is the restaurant in Coimbatore a Muslim restaurant?
Has the starting salary for police officers increased from its level in 2010?,Does the starting salary for police officers have anything increased since 2010?,Has there been any change in the starting salary for police officers since 2010?,Did the starting salary for police officers increase in 2016?,Will there be any changes in the starting salary for police officers in 2017?
Is half ownership on a property now limited to five years?,Is it currently deemed to be a valid reason not to live in a home for seven years?,"Is the term ""half ownership"" now extended to five years?",Does the change allow for an increase in the time required to acquire half ownership on a property?
Are there any records of the vaccine vaccinated people suffering health issues in April and May 2022?,Do statistics relating to the population in the UK reveal any vaccine vaccinated people are suffering?,Do other national statistics indicate any vaccine vaccinated people are suffering health issues in April and May 2022?
Does Chipotle offer gift cards?,Is it possible to purchase gift cards from Chipotle?,Does the giveaway require a donation?,Is the giveaway open to all types of people?,Is there a pre-sale for the giveaway?,Is the giveaway open to everyone?
Did Obama promise 5.7 % or 6 % unemployment in exchange for stimulus money?,"Did Obama promise 6% unemployment, which is similar to the unemployment rate expected after a stimulus?",Was it unclear whether Obama made his statements verbatim?,Did the White House confirm any of the President's promises?
Did May 2018 mark the 401st straight month of global temperatures exceeding the 20th century average?,Did May 2018 also mark the 50th straight month of global temperature surpassing the 20th century average?,Did the 50th month occur after the 2000s?,Are there any other recent examples of global temperature exceed the 20th century average?
Did two pipeline workers in the Chicago area receive fentanyl-laced water bottles?,Did the workers take fentanyl-laced water bottles out of a vehicle?,Are the fentanyl-laced water bottles used for injection?,Are there any reports of workers getting fentanyl-laced water bottles?
Did the economy recover the 1-million jobs lost as the results of the 2008 global recession?,Is employment now higher than it has ever been?,Were there jobs created as a result of the recession?,Do most economists believe that these estimates of the economy recovered jobs?,Does the economy actually have more than 1 million jobs now?
Is this a single source of revenue?,Are economic chancers not the majority of hotels?,Is the £7M a day spent on economic chancers a high number?,Are these days the best times to be economic chancers?,Did Obama claim they are not the main source of revenues for his government?
Did they say there are only 4 senators older than McCain?,Did McCain say that all of the senior senators are over 40 years old?,Did McCain say there are only 44 senators older than him?,Did McCain say the senior senators were older than him?,Did McCain state there are 4 senior senators older than him?
Did Rubio take over $3 million dollars from fossil fuel executives as part of his campaign to run for re-election?,Did Rubio take more money from fossil fuel executives than was previously claimed during the 2016 election?,"Did Rubio pay more than the $400,000 reported?","Did Rubio receive a payment of more than $300,000 from fossil fuel executives?"
Do people who serve the public 8 hours a day wear masks?,Do people who serve the public unknowingly intoxicate themselves?,Is there evidence to support this claim?,Does mask use affect a worker’s performance?,Is a worker’s safety compromised when wearing masks?,Is there evidence to indicate that mask usage and safety should be monitored closely?
Has Obama's administration created a record amount of jobs?,Has Obama created the same amount of jobs in all sectors?,. Has Obama's administration created a record number of jobs in all sectors?,. Has Obama's administration created any jobs in the last three months?,. Have Obama's policies created 5 million jobs in the private sector?,.?
Does the economy of New Jersey get $38 billion from businesses at the Shore?,Is this the amount in which businesses generate revenue from the Shore?,Is this the amount in which businesses do a disproportionately large portion of their revenue?,Is it true that businesses in the Shore are contributing $38 billion to the economy in New Jersey?
Did 500 scientists sign the open letter to the UN?,"Did this open letter establish any ""climate change"" as to the extent of science to support this assertion?",Was the open letter based on any data that contradicted the stated statements?,Was this open letter considered a part of an overall message for the climate change conference?
Did the interviewer claim to know Cynthia Villar because of her money?,Did the interviewer claim that the interviewer works 18 hours a day and does not have an eyebag?,Are the interviewees more knowledgeable about their work than those reported in the interview?,Was it true that the interviewer was asked if their work was bad or great?
Has this poll shown that 72% of Americans and 60% of Democrats say big government is the biggest threat to our country's security?,Does this poll show that 12% of all Americans and 3% of all Democrats claim that big government is the biggest threat to our country's security?,Is this poll based in the US?,"Did this poll show that 72 percent of Americans and 56 percent of Democrats ""say the biggest threat to our nation's security is big government""?"
"Did the Supreme Court Shake Up The 2020 Election, Assign Conservatives To Swing State Circuit Courts?","Did the Supreme Court Shake Up the 2020 Election, Assign Conservatives To Swing State Circuit Courts?","Did the Supreme Court Shake Up The 2020 Election, Assign Conservatives To Swing State Circuit Courts?"
Did Trump win this special election?,Did Trump win by 20+ points?,Did the special election take place on a Thursday?,Did this election have a negative turnout?,Did Trump have a record overall?,Did Trump win this special election?,Were there any other special elections between this election and then?
Has Roy Cooper filed nearly 1 lawsuit per month?,Has every single one of these lawsuits been aimed at expanding his own power?,Has any of these lawsuits been related to the State of Georgia?,Is any of the lawsuits filed by Roy Cooper related to the State of Georgia?,Is there evidence that any of these lawsuits are related to the State of Georgia?
Is it true that Xavier Becerra is putting together plans to raise property tax revenue?,Is it true that Prop 13 is not being repealed?,Is there any evidence that Prop 13 has not been repealed?,Is it possible to enact a bill that would repeal Prop 13 without having a negative effect on property values?,Is there any evidence that California's Attorney General is putting together plans to raise property tax revenue without having a negative effect on property values?
Did the CIA arrest 700 agents?,Did all CIA agents face charges?,Did any CIA agents pose as protesters?,Does this claim support a claim by the CIA that 700 agents were arrested?,Can this claim be independently verified?,Do any CIA agents pose as protesters?,Is any CIA agent associated with this claim?
"Are 40,000 US soldiers resigning and throwing away their medals after fighting in Afghanistan and Iraq?",Can one estimate the number of US soldiers who resigned?,Can one estimate how many people resigned after fighting in Afghanistan and Iraq?,Is the number of people who resigned and threw away their medals inflated?
"Will a texas tax bill save the average homeowner $20,000 a year?",Is a texas tax bill backed by Democrats a tax cut plan?,"Are there estimates that such legislation would save homeowners $20,000 a year over the next 20 years?",Is the average homeowner in Texas a resident of the state?
Is there any regulation against oral sex in this group of states?,Is it considered illegal by this group in this state to have oral sex?,Is any state in the United States that prohibit oral sex to prohibit oral sex?,Is it considered illegal by this group to have oral sex?
Did this claim imply a general pattern?,Has this claim been validated by reliable sources?,Was this claim based on data or assertions that are unconfirmed?,Did the number of women killed by their husbands or boyfriends after Sept. 11 exceed the number of Americans killed by 9/11?
Does SARS-CoV-2 cause COVID-19?,Is it necessary to keep this virus in a pH range between 5.5 and 8.5?,Does it require cultured bacteria to maintain this pH?,Does a cultured bacteria need to be sterilized in order to infect this virus?
Did Eastwood make this claim?,Did Obama have any type of fraud during his presidency?,Did Obama cause any other problems in general while in office?,Does Eastwood agree that Obama's presidency was wrongfully labelled as fraud?,Did Eastwood think that a president could do more to defeat the fraud?
How many more power generation facilities do you have compared to the last year?,Do you think a substantial amount of capacity is more available than in 2013?,Are there any other factors that contributed to Texas' growth as a country?,Do you believe the Texas economy is healthy and stable?,Are there any other factors contributing to this growth?,Are there other factors contributing to Texas' growth as a country?
Has Hochul passed more than 400 new bills since taking office?,Is Hochul the only politician in this country who passed 400 bills?,Has Hochul been in office for a longer period of time?,Does Hochul have any other lawmaking experience?,Has Hochul had any experience with a lot of business?
Can it be derived that sixty percent of Americans now support legalizing marijuana?,Is this statement accurate?,Is 60 percent of people now supportive of legalizing marijuana?,Are all voters in this country against legalizing marijuana?,Does this statement reflect population support for marijuana?,Is this statement true?,Is this information accurate?
Will WhatsApp charge users to use the app unless the message is shared with 50 contacts?,Will WhatsApp charge users to use the app unless the message is shared with 50 contacts?,Will WhatsApp charge users to use the app unless the message is shared with 50 contacts?,Is it mandatory to share the message with 50 contacts on WhatsApp?
Did the EPA permit languish under Strickland?,Was it completed in 2 days?,Is the EPA permit in question the one Strickland was running on?,Was the EPA permit in question reprinted by another EPA?,Have other EPA Directors since worked for Strickland?,Have any EPA Directors since worked under Strickland?
Does the Central Government allocate funds to the States?,Did the States fail to install the required oxygen plants?,Did the Central Government allocate funds from the PM CARES fund?,Does this fund support the CARES scheme?,Is the Central Government responsible for all the programs in the PM CARES fund?
Did the baby have a travel bag?,Did the kidnapper know the baby was being transported to Dubai?,Did the kidnapper have a visa?,Did the kidnapper report the kidnapper to authorities?,Was the kidnapper's identity confirmed?,Does the baby have a valid passport?
Has the increase in people on food stamps been caused by Obama’s taking full control of Washington?,Has this increase been accounted for by the Congressional Data Center?,Did this increase occur at the time Obama took full control of Washington?,Has the increase in people on food stamps been caused by a Congressional data center?
Has a photo of the dog taken by the journalist shown the dog having slept by his master's grave every night for seven years?,Did the photo have proof of the dog sleeping by his master's grave every night?,Did the photo show the dog having slept by his master's grave every night for seven years?
Did people in Mysore think there was a relaxation in coronavirus lockdown?,Did people in Mysore think there was any relaxation in coronavirus lockdown?,Did people in Mysore believe there was any relaxation in coronavirus lockdown?,Have people in Mysore become aware of the coronavirus lockdown?
Did these business owners leave the area?,Will there be another 500 or so businesses that close during the year?,Will there be any more small businesses or minority businesses left in the state?,Are there additional large businesses slated to close during the year?,Will there be any additional small business closures within the state?
Did they announce this withdrawal?,Was this withdrawal official or a planned withdrawal?,Did this withdrawal affect any retailers in the US?,Is this withdrawal made by Reese's?,BxAxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxaxa?
Are there any video clips showing a monster climbing over buildings in Russia?,Are there any clips showing a monster climbing over buildings in Russia?,Is there any video that shows a monster climbing over buildings in Russia?,Is there any video that shows a monster climbing over buildings in Russia?,Is there any video that shows a monster climbing over buildings in Russia?
Did Meek not pass any of his bills?,Has Meek published any of his bills?,Did the bills that Meek wrote pass?,Did any of his bills pass?,Was Meek part of any bill passing or non-passing in the past?,Does Meek still have any of his bills?,Did Meek ever try to repeal a bill in a state legislature?
Has General Biden made any calls or requests about a ban on CIA smears?,Is this a quote from a letter?,Will Biden allow any general to speak to Congress about a ban on CIA smears?,Will Biden call for Congress to rescind the ban on CIA smears?
Did this claim apply to more than 600 police and fire pensions in this state?,Has this claim not been confirmed by federal agencies?,Does this claim imply the police and fire pensions in this state are on the cusp of insolvency?,Can these pensions be paid off at this rate?
Does the Houston Astroworld festival have a capacity of 20k?,Did Live Nation use a venue that is larger than the Houston AstroWorld festival?,Is the Houston AstroWorld festival larger than the Houston AstroWorld festival?,Is Houston AstroWorld a large venue?,Is there evidence that the Houston AstroWorld music festival will use a smaller venue this year?
Does the Pfizer CEO agree that there is a need to reduce the world population by 50%?,Does this CEO want to cut the world population by 50%?,Is it necessary for Pfizer to cut the world population by 50% if they plan to reduce the population by 50%?,Is it possible for Pfizer to reduce the world population by 50% if they do not plan on doing so?
Did Grateful Dead provide tie-dyed jerseys to Lithuania's basketball team during the 1992 Olympics?,Did the Lithuanian basketball team receive a Grateful Dead donation for their trip to the 1992 Olympics?,Was the Grateful Dead associated with Lithuania's basketball team at the 1992 Olympics?
"Does Maggie Hassan pay zero property taxes on her $500,000 home?","Does Maggie Hassan pay zero property taxes on the $500,000 home she owns?","Does Maggie Hassan pay zero property taxes on her $500,000 home?","Does Maggie Hassan pay zero property taxes on the $500,000 home she owns?"
Has the percentage of school counselors decreased?,Is the lowering of the percentage a result of increased funding?,Is there a lowering of the percentage due to decreased funding?,Is there a lowering of the percentage because of reduced funding?,Is this information accurate?,Is there a lowering of this percentage due to increased funding?
Does poverty have been reduced since 2000?,Have poverty levels been significantly reduced since 2000?,Do poverty levels have been significantly reduced since 2000?,Does poverty reduction primarily occur in the rural areas?,Are social assistance programmes used to alleviate poverty?,Do poverty reduction efforts mainly benefit the poor?,Do social assistance programmes have significant effects on economic performance and unemployment?
Is the information from Jyoti Paswan accurate?,Was Jyoti Paswan injured before her death?,Were any victims of rape and murder in the village of Darbhanga?,Was it a peaceful place to live?,Did the victims appear to be members of a gang or criminal organisation?
Did 74 percent of the autopsies reviewed by this preprint paper contain these vaccine-related deaths?,Did the authors of the preprint paper report that the vaccine in general causes 44% of the deaths?,Did the authors report that the vaccine had a direct role in these deaths?,Was any other source associated with these deaths?
Did Tucker Carlson make the comments about the forced masks outside?,"Did Carlson quote the speech from April 26, 2021?",Was Carlson the last person to publicly slam the forced masks?,Was Carlson the first person to argue the forced masks are a form of child abuse?
Did Nirmala Sitharaman misquote Katha Upanishad & Swamiji?,"Was it Swamiji's adoption of the saying ""Arise Awake"" that prompted the tweet by Nirmala Sitharaman?",Were there any other quotes from this source?,Did Nirmala Sitharaman misquote Swamiji in this tweet?
Did Moderna have reports that serious adverse events occurred in 1 in 200 toddlers?,Did Moderna report on the adverse events causing 1 in 200 toddlers to have mRNA vaccines?,Did Moderna conclude the mRNA vaccine was safe in children?,Did Moderna report on the serious adverse events in 1 in 200 toddlers?
Did the plane crash at Gatwick airport on Wednesday?,Was the number of people in the plane fatalities total?,Did more than one person die in the crash?,Were more than 100 people hurt in the crash?,Did any passengers die in the crash?,Were more people killed in the crash?,Has the plane's owner commented on the crash?
Are the two groups involved in this video local youths?,Does this video consist only of one group?,Does this video include refugees?,"Is this video from Wicklow, Ireland?","Is this video from Wicklow, Ireland?","Is this video from Wicklow, Ireland?",Do I have to cite this video as proof of refugees or asylum seekers?
Are the farmers allowed to enter their fields for 5 days?,Has the pesticide Monitor been used in a controlled chemical test?,Is Monitor very toxic?,Is it necessary for farmers to spend days restraints on an herbicide?,"Considering the adverse effects it may have, is it an acceptable option for farmers to stop using Monitor?"
Was Russia ever the largest nuclear arsenal?,Does Russia have more nuclear warheads than the United States?,Have nuclear warheads in Russia increased since the 1970s?,Did Russian nuclear warheads increase in the 1970s or 1980s?,Are the number of Russian nuclear warheads increasing in the 1970s or 1980s?
Did the Digital clock read 4:20?,Does this clock show the time at 4:20?,Was the digital clock visible in the video?,Did the clock change the time on the day of the event?,Is it possible for the person wearing the watch to have a faulty clock?,Is this the first time that Modi has been photographed wearing a watch?
"Is it true that in 32 other states and Washington DC, voters can avoid the wait by voting before Election Day?",Does this statement relate to the individual voter in any of the states?,Is voting before Election Day in any of the states described?,Can voting before Election Day ensure a presidential election?,Is deciding a presidential election by the majority of voters a long-term concern?
Did the company raise its rates this year?,Did Mike Morris have a salary increase in 2010?,Was Mike Morris's compensation increase a result of an increase in the company's stock price?,Did the company's increase in dividends in 2010 exceed the year before?,Did Mike Morris receive a pay raise after resigning?
"Did the state have 70,000 absentee ballots that were not accompanied by the required matching ballot applications?","Did Wisconsin residents receive 70,000 absentee ballots that did not have matching ballot applications for their absentee ballots?",Did these absentee ballots result in any ballot errors?,Did this occur due to a change in Wisconsin laws?
Can the police confiscate Covid-19 vaccines?,Can police confiscate Covid-19 vaccines without evidence?,Do state laws allow a police to confiscate Covid-19 vaccines?,"Considering the level of evidence required, are there evidence of a warrant that can stop the police from confiscating Covid-19 vaccines?",Are there any laws for police to confiscate Covid-19 vaccines that are not in this state?
Is there any evidence that the asteroid will cause mass destruction when it reaches Earth in February 2017?,Does astronomer Peter Green suggest the asteroid will cause mass destruction?,Is there any evidence astronomer Peter Green has discredited the asteroid?,Can it be predicted the impact will cause mass destruction?
Did the richest 14 Americans increase their net wealth by more than $157 billion between 2013-2015?,Did the richest 14 Americans increase their net wealth by more than $157 billion from 2013-2015?,Would the Republican budget require these wealthier Americans to contribute to deficit reduction?,Did the richest 14 Americans increase their net wealth from 2013-2015?
Is this image of a group of women a representation of ISIS selling women for 10 dollars?,Is this image of ISIS religious women a representation of ISIS selling women for 10 dollars?,Are Hindus urged to be alert to this threat?,Is this image of ISIS religious women a representation of ISIS selling women for 10 dollars?
Did Republicans try to impose a 30% tax on everything after taking the House majority?,Is this the first time Republicans attempted a 30% tax on everything?,Do Republicans want this tax?,Are there other items that Republicans would like to impose a 30% tax on?,Have these proposals been formally rejected?
Are there protesters outside of Ohio Statehouse during the COVID-19 pandemic?,Did the Statehouse host protests for the COVID-19 pandemic?,Did Ohio Statehouse host protests in the last two years of the COVID-19 pandemic?,Were protests in the statehouse during the COVID-19 pandemic?
Did Democrats in Congress have control of Congress before January of 2007?,Did Democrats in Congress pass a law regarding waterboarding?,Have Democrats in Congress passed any law affecting waterboarding?,Did Democrats in Congress have control of Congress before January of 2007?,Has any law been passed making waterboarding illegal?,Is there any law currently made to prevent waterboarding?
Does the Centre plan to impose a complete lockdown in Delhi-NCR from June 18?,Does the Centre plan to impose a complete lockdown in Delhi-NCR from June 18?,Are the actions to take place during the lockdown being evaluated?,Is there any concrete evidence indicating that the operation will take place?
Did the stimulus fund cover the entire cost of the study?,Did the study include women freshmen?,Will researchers at this research project have access to the funds once they receive them?,Did the study conduct include any interviews with other women freshmen?,Did this study take place at a school or community college?,Did this program help women transition into the workforce?
Is there an increase in the tax rates from the previous tax-reduction measures?,Does the increase in tax rates go up when you sell a home?,Is there a change in the tax rates by Obama's health care law?,Is the change in tax rates on houses a statutory change?
Did the United States have more murders in 2009 than any other country?,"Was the U.K., Germany, and Japan all large countries in 2009?",Did large countries worldwide have more or less murders than U.S. in 2009?,Was there no increase in murders in 2009?,Is it reasonable to infer the United States and many other countries had lower murder rates than the rest of the world in 2009?
Did footage that purported to show Kenya protests on March 20date to at least August 2022?,Did footage in the documentary show protests in Kenya?,Did the video cite actual video evidence to support the statement?,Was the video produced by an individual known to the alleged protests?,Did Kenyans protest with or without protesters?
Does the video show a Pfizer CEO discussing a pill with a sensor for mental illness?,Does the video show a Pfizer CEO discussing a new pill with a sensor for mental illness?,Does the video show a Pfizer CEO discussing a new pill with a sensor for mental illness?,Does the video show a Pfizer CEO discussing a new pill with a sensor for mental illness?
Is a vaccine that was sold by Pfizer Covid-19 in 2010 effective on viral infection?,Is there any evidence of increased virus replication?,Were other viral infections in the region previously linked to the Covid-19 vaccine?,Has the response to Covid-19 vaccination been positive?,Have more deaths occurred due to Covid-19 vaccine?,Are Gibraltar's health officials investigating if a vaccine could be used to prevent recurrence of the virus?
Did the man use the airplane as a landing vehicle?,Did the man use the airplane as a landing vehicle?,Does the aircraft consist of any other items?,Did the man fly above Los Angeles in the airplane?,Are there any other similarities to this article?,Are any other articles similar in a similar way to this one?
Did these 4 jets fly to Glasgow for COP26?,Did the images include a flight estimate?,Did this image imply that these 4 jets would fly to Glasgow?,Did this image imply that the 400 jets flown to Glasgow were going to fly?,Would this image indicate that there were no jets flying to Glasgow?
Did fewer than 0.05 percent of approved dealers have their licenses revoked?,Was 38 percent of dealer inspections non-compliant?,Has there been a decrease in the number of revoked licenses for these dealers?,Did the number of revoked licenses for these dealers decrease significantly between 2011 and 2012?
Did Ryan say 22 million Americans choose to be poor?,Does Ryan claim that 22 million Americans choose to be poor?,Does Ryan claim that 22 million Americans can afford to be healthy?,Does the majority of American choose to be poor?,Does Ryan claim that the majority of American's can't afford to be healthy?
Did these prisoners end up in prison?,Did the sentences for these prisoners result in any incarceration?,Whether these prisoners were put in prison is a subject for further investigation. Did there come to any conclusions as to how the prison population was accounted for?,Did some prisoners have a positive impact on the state?
"Are 35,500 jobs expected to support this funding?",Does this funding support existing jobs?,Does this funding support all jobs?,Has this funding supported any other programs in this sector?,Is this funding sustainable?,Does this funding support any businesses outside the clothing and textile sector?,Is this funding sustainable?,Are these jobs supported by this funding?
Is the Senate immigration bill designed to come into being?,Is there immediate legalization?,Is there border security in the future?,Is the Senate immigration bill designed to never come into being?,Is the Senate immigration bill designed for its initial approval?,Does the Senate immigration bill provide a path for law enforcement to be eliminated and/or deregulated?
Is infant mortality lower in the area surrounding University Circle than in most third world countries?,Is infant mortality higher in the area surrounding the University Circle than in other third world countries?,Does infant mortality differ in the three miles surrounding the University Circle area?,Is infant mortality higher in the area surrounding the University Circle than in other third world countries?
Is there anything specific about 44 plans?,Has Scott administration rejected all of the plans?,Did the administration's decision affect the entire population?,Have most of the plans affected the entire population?,Has the Scott administration rejected all of these plans?,Is there evidence of a significant change in the outcome of the plan changes?
Did the accident occur on NH 10 in India?,Was the NH 10 in India the exact location of the crash?,Is the video from the crash available to see?,Is there any evidence to confirm that this accident was actual or false?,Is the video from the crash from a different source?
Has Trump's budget given a $100 billion tax break to any of these families?,Has the Trump budget included any of these families?,Did Trump’s budget include the three wealthiest families as part of this tax break?,Does Trump’s budget include any family members on the list of wealthiest families?
Were Congress's Christmas policies the same as 7-Eleven's in regard to Christmas festivities?,Did congress have the same attitude toward Christmas celebrations as 7-Eleven's in regard to Christmas celebrations?,Did Congress have the same attitude toward Christmas celebrations as 7-Elevens in regards to Christmas celebrations?
Are nearly six in ten Americans against ObamaCare?,Are about 70% of Americans opposing ObamaCare?,Do more than half of Americans oppose ObamaCare?,Did a Quinnipiac poll in June suggest a 57% to 30% divide in support of ObamaCare?,Was a Quinnipiac poll conducted in September of 2013?
Are at least 15 homeless people found frozen to death in Chicago?,Have those people died of heart problems?,Is it likely that these individuals survived?,Were the death results related to disease and illness?,Did any of the homeless individuals die?,Can some of these individuals be attributed to other causes of death?
Is it true that PM Modi said that the government gave jobs to 150 crore people during coronavirus lockdown?,Has PM Modi stated that the government gave jobs to 150 crore people during coronavirus lockdown?,Was PM Modi the only official to have confirmed that 150 crore people were given jobs during the coronavirus lockdown?
"Is it likely to cost more than $300,000 to run for a seat on the Pedernales Electric Cooperative board of directors?",Is it safe to say that the board of directors will have at least one woman in that position?,Did a female in that position run for a seat at Pedernales?
Has Biden said 150 million people have been killed with guns since 2007?,Has Biden mentioned 150 million people being killed with guns since 2007?,Have Biden's remarks on gun violence changed between 2007 and 2019?,Has Biden talked about gun violence during other debates?,Does Biden support gun violence?
Are there a significant number of registered sex offenders in the country?,"Are there at least 100,000 sex offenders unaccounted for?",Are any sex offenders reported to the US Attorney's office for prosecution?,"Would 500,000 sex offenders be convicted of sexual assault in the US at any given time?"
Can Aspidosperma Q 20 be used to increase blood oxygen level?,Is Aspidosperma Q 20 a natural substance?,Can Aspidosperma Q 20 be used to increase blood oxygen level?,Is there any research on the benefits of Aspidosperma Q 20?,Is there any medical evidence of the effectiveness of Aspidosperma Q 20 to increase blood oxygen level?
Was this turtle rare?,Was this rare turtle found in India?,Is this turtle yellow?,Did this turtle become a national symbol?,Does this turtle have a crest?,Was this turtle previously discovered?,Do turtles have crests?,Did this turtle find a crest in India?,Did this turtle originate from another country?
Did 60 percent of provisional ballots voted for in the 2012 election?,Was more than half of the provisional ballots cast in the 2012 election valid?,Was the percentage of provisional ballots that were disqualified valid in a given year?,Did this rate rise in the years following the 2012 election?,Did some people vote for different parties in the 2012 election?
Is this the first time a photo has been posted showing robbers?,Did this photo show two men on the run?,Is this the first time a photo has been posted showing robbers?,Does this man appear in a photo?,Are there any other photos showing robbers?
Did Gov. Scott cut nearly $1 million from mosquito control?,Did Gov. Scott close the state’s mosquito research lab a few years ago?,Were mosquito control programs related to this budget cuts?,Was the mosquito research lab closed down?,Is the state a mosquito hot spot?,Do people have issues with mosquitos in the state?
"Is the Ukrainian Football Association's announcement 'in memory of 300,000 Fallen Soldiers' real or fake?","Is the Ukrainian Football Association's announcement 'in memory of 300,000 Fallen Soldiers' true or fake?",Is there any evidence this announcement is real?,Do any of these matches show Ukrainian soldiers commemorating their fallen?
Did a video of the election show a rigged EVM?,Was a video of the election filmed?,"Was the election held on February 10, 2022?",Is there evidence that the election took place on February 10th?,Would there be another election in 2022?,Would the election be the first in India to be rigged?,Would any election in 2022 be rigged?
Did the Governor help the prosecutors receive their first raise in 10 years?,Is the governor planning on trying to get prosecutors a raise?,Are all attorneys in the state involved in this effort?,Are all lawyers willing to give prosecutors raises?,Were prosecutors paid in advance for the raise?
Is COVID-19 vaccines unsafe?,Were COVID-19 vaccines tested in humans before being released to the public?,Did COVID-19 vaccines skip animal testing before being released to the public?,Did COVID-19 vaccines fail in human testing?,Does COVID-19 vaccine toxicity affect people?
Did Ocasio-Cortez suggest that businesses should be closed until after the 2020 presidential election?,Has Ocasio-Cortez resorted to this practice?,Are Ocasio-Cortez's policies against businesses consistent?,Has Ocasio-Cortez ever withdrawn support for a ban on businesses?
Did Bush say $500 billion in Medicare cuts are coming?,Did Bush say $500 billion in Medicare cuts are coming?,Did Bush say $500 billion in Medicare cuts are coming?,Did Bush say $500 billion in Medicare cuts are coming?,Did Bush say $500 billion in Medicare cuts are coming?,Did Bush say $500 billion in Medicare cuts are coming?
Did Pelosi thank millions of babies for their sacrifice?,Did Pelosi thank babies for sacrificing their lives for women's rights?,Did Pelosi thank mothers for their sacrifice?,Did Pelosi thank all women for their sacrifice?,Did Pelosi thank women for their sacrifice?,Does Pelosi think that women should be treated equally in this country?,Does Pelosi think that women should be treated equally in this country?
Is it true that Allen voted to raise his own pay 4 times?,Is it true that Allen had voted to raise his own pay 4 times?,"Is Allen's job title listed as a ""Senator""?",Is it true that Allen will be retiring in 2019?,Is this statement true?
Has there been death related to the MMR vaccine in the last 10 years?,Is this a nationwide epidemic?,Is this vaccination responsible for this outbreak?,Are any people in this nation at risk of getting measles?,Has the vaccine prevented this epidemic?,Has this vaccine prevented any deaths from measles?
"Are five-pointed stars considered a sign of ""swinging""?","Is there any evidence of five-pointed stars being an ""inference"" of a swinging person?",Is five pointed stars in the outside of a house a way of indicating a swinging person?
Did this 21 year old man marry this 52 year old woman?,Does this man look young?,Did this woman have this gender in common?,Is this marriage legal?,Does this man look 21 years old?,Is this woman a bride?,Did this man have any sex in public before?,Has this man since divorced or been divorced?
Did the BSNL Staff Selection Commission introduce a new level exam?,Is this new exam only for job applicants?,Does this new exam only require to take this level exam?,Is there any evidence to prove this claim?,Is it true that this exam has been introduced to make it easier for jobseekers to get hired?
Did NASA announce the opening of a 100 foot fissure crack at a Yellowstone volcano?,Did NASA say a 100 foot fissure cracked was at the crater of a volcano?,Did the crack open up on a high pressure surface?,Did the crack open up on a low pressure surface?
Are COVID-19 mortality rates low?,Is it important to know if you have a low chance of dying from COVID-19?,Are there any current data on COVID-19 mortality rates?,Was COVID-19 a very low death risk for those who were 70 or older?
Does the program fund direct cooperation with paramilitary groups?,Does the program fund any types of organizations?,Does the program fund any types of organizations?,"Does the program support the UVF, RHC, and UDA?",Is the program funded by the Department of Justice?,Is the Department of Justice funding the Program for Tackling Paramilitary Activity and Organised Crime?
Was John F. Kennedy planning to expose this plot before he left office?,"Was there any mention of a plot to enslave every man, woman and child before John F. Kennedy's murder?",Did John F. Kennedy disclose this plot before Kennedy's assassination?,Was it a clear promise to disclose the plot before Kennedy left office?
Did Mitt Romney win the 2012 presidential race by a large margin?,Did Romney have a large margin in his 2012 presidential race?,Did Perry lead at all during the early part of 2012?,Did Romney have a large margin in the second half of the 2012 presidential race?,Did Perry lead at all in the first half of 2012?
Did two novels published in 1981 and 2008 predict the COVID-19 pandemic?,Did an old newspaper clipping include this information?,Has there been a revision to this information?,Are novel titles that predict the COVID-19 pandemic the same ones that were in print?,Has the date of publication for both novels been accurate?,Has there been any revision of the date of publication for these novels?
Are there two senators?,Is there any election going on in Georgia?,Does the Georgia state government allow the counting of ballots?,Is any election happening in Georgia?,Are all election results published in newspapers/journals?,Is Georgia a Democrat state?,Is Georgia a Republican state?
Does this state have one of the highest private sector job growth rates in the nation?,Did this state's private sector job growth put it in the top three in the state overall?,Does this state have the fourth highest private sector job growth in the country?,Is this state in the top three among all of the states?
Was this statement made by Thunberg in 2018?,Does Thunberg say anything in this statement?,Was this statement made in any specific year?,Was Thunberg's statement about the world ending in 5 years true?,Did Thunberg make this statement in regards to any specific political ideology?,Did Thunberg declare that this world is about to end?
Did the state vote to raise their own property taxes because Republicans failed to fully fund public schools for eight years?,Do more than a million Wisconsinites have voted to raise their own property taxes because Republicans failed to fully fund public schools for eight years?,Has the state voted to raise property taxes because Republicans failed to fully fund public schools for eight years?
Are all of Wisconsin's manufacturing jobs in China?,Does China steal Wisconsin manufacturing jobs?,Are all jobs in Wisconsin factory jobs?,Is China the only country manufacturing jobs in Wisconsin?,Is Wisconsin manufacturing jobs in China?,Is the cost of Wisconsin manufacturing jobs in China over?,Is there evidence proving that these manufacturing jobs in China are being stealing?
Did Putin declare a pact with Ukraine in a video or text?,Did Putin and Zelenskyy claim political power in the Ukrainian government in a video?,Did both leaders say any statements in this video or text?,Did this video suggest a pact with Ukraine?,Did this video support Vladimir Putin's statement?
Did Gowdy's son die in a dumpster?,Did Gowdy's son know where his son was found?,Was Gowdy rehabilitated for child abuse?,Do Gowdy's family retort on this statement?,Was Gowdy's son found dead in a dumpster in DC?
Was Cosmo After Dark able to be watched by children as young as 13?,Is Cosmo After Dark pornography only viewed by adults?,Was Cosmo After Dark an established child entertainment channel?,Are there other social networks that allow children to view pornography?,Did Cosmo After Dark have any parental control over its content?
How are women paid for the same job?,Is women paid 77 cents per dollar for the same work?,Is there any data to indicate men and women are paid a similar ratio?,Do men and women both agree that women get the same pay?,Do women only work in the same jobs in most instances?,Is it reasonable to assume that women are paid significantly less for the same work that men do?
Does drinking water help to activate internal organs?,Do two glasses of water after waking up help to activate internal organs?,Does drinking water help to activate internal organs?,Do two glasses of water after waking up help to activate internal organs?,Does drinking water make you feel better after waking up?
Did the Biden crime bill increase violent crime rates?,Did the Biden crime bill increase murder and violent crime rates?,Did homicide and murder crime rates increase after the Biden crime bill?,Did the crime bill increase violent crime rates?,Did this crime bill result in an increase in murder and violent crime?
"Did Space vote for budgets and debt, energy taxes, and the stimulus?",Was Space in favor of these policies?,Did Space support these policies?,Did Space support these policies?,Has Space voted for these policies?,Is Space a bipartisan politician?,Is Space in favor of the following?,Is Space a member of the liberal party?
Did the photograph taken in 1965 show Kenyan politicians Ruto and Mudavadi at the State House party in the 1990s?,Is the image from that period authentic?,Does the photo accurately depict the location of the State House in 1990s?,Is the photo from that era accurate?
Was the person referring to Victor Rodriguez?,Did he have any other statements about his decision to leave the administration of President Marcos Jr?,Did this lawyer quit the administration of President Marcos Jr?,- Do Marcos aides claim that this man will be returning to work for them?,- Was this man rehired by Trump as the new head of the White House?
"Does the IRS plan to add 87,000 new agents?","Is the IRS larger than the Pentagon, Federal Bureau of Investigation, Customs and Border Protection and the State Department combined?",Is the IRS expanding its bureaucracy?,Did the US government increase its bureaucracy during the 2017 fiscal year?
Are 75% of jobs created in Ohio in small business?,Are 75% of jobs created in Ohio in large corporations?,Are 75% of jobs created in Ohio in wealthy individuals?,Are 75% of jobs created in Ohio in a small business?,Are 75% of jobs created in Ohio in big corporations?,Are 75% of jobs created in Ohio in small business?
Did Buono vote 154 times to raise taxes?,Did Buono vote for several tax increases?,"Did Buono tax utilities, nursing homes, cell phones, parking lots, lottery wins, gyms?","Did Buono tax parking lots, lottery wins, gyms?",Did Buono contribute to New Jersey's $2 billion debt?
Did temperature records not begin to be collected in Australia until 1862?,Did the longest-running weather station ever record a pattern of warming?,Did the highest temperature record ever occur there?,Was the longest-running weather station established before 1800?,Are there any other existing weather stations located in Australia that have recorded records of warmer than this one?
Did Wisconsin have a 50-50 split on partisan lines?,Did Wisconsin have a 50-50 split in state legislatures?,Is this map accurate?,Is Wisconsin's legislature based on partisan lines?,Did Wisconsin have 50-50 splits in state legislatures?,Is this map accurate?
Did a woman found what turned out to be one kilogram — 2.2 pounds — of cocaine in a crochet kit she bought in Seattle?,Did she buy it because she used it to crochet?,Was the price for the crochet kit around 2021.7 percent of the price of the item sold?,Did the woman use it to make her crochet kits?
Is there a state in the United States that a 40-hour minimum wage work week is sufficient to afford a two-bedroom apartment?,Is there any other state that has a 40-hour minimum wage work week?,Does this state in the US have a 2% minimum wage?
Are there video clips that show the meeting point of the Atlantic and Pacific?,Are there any clips showing that the Atlantic and Pacific oceans touch but do not mix?,Are there any videos showing a meeting point of both oceans?,Does the video show that there are no overlapping oceans?,Do any of these videos show any overlapping oceans?
Did the Egyptian pyramids display the Lebanese flag after the attacks?,Did the pyramids light up with the Lebanese flag?,Was the Lebanese flag illuminated when the explosion occurred?,Was the Lebanese flag illuminated at the pyramids in February 2010?
Does arsenic Album 30 have a beneficial effect on immune health?,Can arsenic Album 30 be used to prevent coronavirus?,Was arsenic Album 30 developed by the United States government?,Have any studies or studies been done examining the effects of arsenic Album 30?
Did five leaders die for opposing COVID-19 vaccines?,Are there any documented cases of deaths for opposing COVID-19 vaccines?,Do there any known cases of deaths for opposing COVID-19 vaccines?,Were any alleged deaths for COVID-19 vaccines linked to an actual COVID-19 vaccine death?
Did the total in the recall election projection get corrected?,Did all of this make any difference in the final result?,Did voters who did not vote in this election see a correction to the final total?,Do these projections use real-time voting?,Do the projections used in these projections include any errors?
Is there evidence of a massive transfer of completed curated ballots in the 2022 election?,Is there evidence of a massive transfer of completed curated ballots in the 2022 election?,Is there evidence of a massive transfer of completed curated ballots in the 2022 election?
Are there other ways to save a quarter a day for a year that are less invasive than these?,Would not a quarter save me $9100 a day for a year?,"If a quarter saves me $1 per day for a year, would this get me less than $9100 a year?"
Did A.K. Antony use 28 crores of government money to purchase paintings?,Was A.K. Antony married to a painter?,Was A.K. Antony married to a painter?,Has A.K. Antony bought paintings from his wife?,Did A.K. Antony buy paintings in the last ten years of his tenure in office?
Are [COVID-19] cases spiking due to the increased testing population?,Are COVID cases higher after testing increases?,Are COVID cases up after testing increases?,Are all cases up from testing increases?,Are there any other examples of spiking COVID cases?,Are any tests in COVID cases higher than normal?
Did Robredo change her mind and announce that she would not be running for a presidential position in 2022?,Did Robredo resign from the 2022 presidential race?,Does Robredo currently have a political party?,Are Robredo's decisions making a political stance clear?
Have the percentages of Americans holding jobs been lower in the past 40 years?,Are the percentages of Americans holding jobs more than 20 years ago?,Do the percentages of Americans holding jobs less than 5 years ago have been lower?,Have any of these numbers increased over the last 40 years?,Did Obama make this claim publicly?
Can Georgia have a substantial increase in educational funding by going after $2.5 billion?,Can Georgia create $2.5 billion in uncollected taxes in the process?,Is the state of Georgia able to create $2.5 billion in uncollected taxes for education?,Does Georgia have an education funding gap that can be effectively addressed?
Is this true of the federal workforce since 1990?,Has there been any net growth in the federal workforce since 1990?,Have the federal workforce numbers increased in the last few decades?,Is there evidence of the current workforce growth in the government?,Do these numbers reflect the government's strategy of investing in the economy?
Did SpaceX reenter their rocket into the atmosphere on March 25?,Does the Northwest light show show the reentry of the rocket?,Does the Northwest light show show a discarded rocket?,Are experts unsure whether this rocket was discarded for the time that the light show took place?
Did Obamacare save millions of dollars?,Are there other areas that were able to save money from the Obamacare bailout?,Does Obamacare have a significant impact on America's economy?,Is it likely that Obamacare will continue to be in operation under Trump's leadership?,Is it likely that Trump will continue to be in office under Trump's leadership?
Is the bill with only one senator in favor of it still on the table?,Is the Senator who favors the bill in the hospital?,Do we have the votes to pass the bill by Friday?,Is the bill with only one senator in favor of it still on the table?,Have any of these Republicans actually voted for it?
Did Lenawee County threaten to demolish the homes of several Amish families?,Are Amish living in Lenawee County deemed to be in defiance with health codes?,Was Lenawee County able to reach an agreement with several Amish families?,Did the Amish families agree to comply with health codes?
"Do most people in finance make over $80,000 a year?",Is there any evidence for this claim?,Are all finance workers paid this amount?,Can an average person in finance work in multiple finance positions?,Do finance jobs have a better pay range?,Would an average person in finance be better off in retirement than in other career fields?
Was Banerjee faking her leg injury in March 2021?,Is there evidence of Banerjee being faking the leg injury?,Was the person in the photograph able to physically walk out of a wheelchair?,Was the person involved in the photo physically in a wheelchair?
Did the Wetherspoons account post a Facebook post in which anyone is eligible to win a free meal for two for celebrating the retirement of the chain's boss?,Was the post shared on a social media platform?,Was the post a promotion to celebrate the retirement of the company's owner?
Did this cornfield kill more bees than average?,Did this cornfield cause much disease?,Does this cornfield contain GMO?,Did this cornfield cause significant harm to native bee populations?,Has this cornfield caused similar effects to other agricultural crops?,Does this cornfield appear to be a popular crop?
Did records suggest more than 100 batches of absentee ballots in Fulton County could be missing?,Can records provide more info on the total number of absentee ballots in Fulton County?,Can records identify any issues with missing absentee ballots in Fulton County?,Did all absentee ballots in Fulton County come from a single source?
Do the board can prosecute for violators?,Can a state attorney general prosecute violations of IDEA?,Do there exist existing IDEA enforcement units?,Would the attorney general prosecute those issues in this state?,Could the attorney general prosecute IDEA offenders without having to hire a state attorney general?
Did Nigeria produce more rice in 2015 than in 2015?,How many tons of rice were produced in 2015?,Is the average amount of rice produced by Nigeria higher than the average amount of rice produced in 2015?,Have the production and distribution of rice in Nigeria increased significantly over the past decade?,Are the average prices of rice in Nigeria lower than before 2015?
Did the DOL give employees who worked during the COVID-19 pandemic hazard pay?,Was hazard pay incentivised at the DOL for workers in the COVID-19 pandemic?,Was hazard pay incentivised in the DOL for workers not in the COVID-19 pandemic?,Are COVID 19 pandemic workers eligible for hazard pay?
Is it true that putting two drops of lemon juice in the nose will cure one of COVID-19?,Is it true that putting two drops of lemon juice in the nose will cure one of COVID-19?,Is it true that putting two drops of lemon juice in the nose will cure one of COVID-19?
Has Yadav announced plans for construction of mosques in the state?,Did Yadav announce plans for building mosques?,Did Yadav publicly declare plans for building mosques in the state?,Did Yadav make this announcement at an event?,Would Yadav be a representative for any political groups?
Did Centerville Elementary School cancel the Christmas play because of parents complaining about references to God?,Did Centerville Elementary School cancel a Christmas play because of parents complaining about references to God?,Did Centerville Elementary School cancel a Christmas play because of parents complaining about reference to God?,Cancelled a Christmas play have a reference to God in it?
Is the number of jobs that have been reclaimed in Texas the same as the nation?,Has Texas made at least a hundred percent of all jobs reclaimed during the recession?,Is this a record?,Describe these data. Can you explain this data?,What did he quote in his speech?
Did this video show that there were thousands of sheep dead in Idaho that day?,Did this video show the animals had been treated for the same diseases that killed them in Kansas?,Did this video show the animals had been treated for the same diseases that killed them in Kansas?,Were these conditions present in Idaho before this video was shared?
Did 40% of these people not have a college diploma?,Did 70% of these people have a college diploma?,Do these people work as a truck driver or nail technician?,Are these people part of the workforce?,Was this report based on a source that was independent from government?,Is there evidence the information presented in this report was false?
Did Hawley sue to keep this law?,Did Hawley succeed in this lawsuit?,Could a case like this result in the loss of health care coverage for people with pre-existing conditions?,Are there other health care costs associated with having pre-existing conditions?,Would it be a waste of taxpayer money to sue if Hawley succeeds?
Did the CHIPS and science law create more than one million construction jobs?,Did the CHIPS and science law create more than one million construction jobs?,Did the CHIPS and science law create more than one million construction jobs?,Did the CHIPS and science law create more than one million construction jobs?,Did the CHIPS and science law create less than one million construction jobs?
Would Florida’s proposed medical marijuana amendment be considered lenient?,Will Florida's proposed medical marijuana amendment allow use of cannabis for ‘other conditions’ specified by any physician?,Would Florida’s proposed medical marijuana amendment allow use for any of the following conditions?,Is medical marijuana used for any other condition listed by any physician in Florida?
Did the number of homicides in 2015 increase by 17 percent in the 50 biggest cities?,Did the homicides increase by 17 percent in large cities in 2015?,Did the increase in 2015 have a direct effect on the number of homicides?,Were the data collected in 2015 based on data from 2015 or prior years?
Is Columbia Missouri one of the fastest growing cities in the region?,Is Missouri one of the fastest growing cities in the country overall?,Is Columbia Missouri one of the fastest growing cities in the state?,Is Missouri one of the fastest growing cities?,Is Columbia Missouri one of the fastest growing cities?
Does 80% of the population in South Africa still occupy fewer than 10% of South Africa's land?,Are the numbers of those living in the Cape occupying less than 10% of South Africa's land?,Have the numbers of people living in the Cape occupied less than 10% of South Africa's land in the past decade?
Did a franchise chain agree to this deal?,Can chain restaurants offer this deal to people with tattoos from this company?,Were tattoos obtained at this chain restaurant associated with food or beverages?,Did this company promise free food for life?,Are people who have tattoos of brands at these chains still legally eligible for free food?
Was there any evidence that the woman had a catatonic phobia?,Did the woman have a Kit Kat in her house?,Did the woman believe that Jesus appeared in her kit kat?,Did the women in the car have any injuries in the accident?,Was the woman from a different religion?
Was this crash serious?,Did the driver of this car die?,Is this car a model G?,Are any other cars involved in this crash?,Was anyone injured in this crash?,Is this car a model G?,Was this car a model G?,Did this driver kill the driver?,Is this car a model G?
Did Peters vote against the Ban on a ban on sex-selection abortions?,Are there other laws that she voted against that have similar results?,Has Peters voted against these types of bans?,Was Peters not endorsed by this organization?,Does the article include other evidence that Peters has a pro-abortion voting record?
Does this video clearly show Biden falling down the steps of Air Force One?,Was this video filmed at Air Force One?,Has any video been uploaded to a social media network that features Biden?,Does this video appear to have come from a video sharing site?,Does this video include the Biden family?
Did the donation go to the PM's relief fund against coronavirus?,Is it true that Maulana Saad donated 1 crore to PM's relief fund against coronavirus?,Can we say this is a reported event?,Can we see evidence that the donation was made by someone outside of the Muslim community?
Did Republicans raise $58 million to create jobs for North Carolina?,Did the Republicans raise $58 million in total to create jobs?,Do North Carolina residents pay for the money raised?,Do Republicans spend $58 million in total yearly on state bills?,Have some GOP members raised more money to create jobs than a Republican party?
Did domestic violence cases decrease by 67 percent since the federal Violence Against Women Act was adopted in 1994?,Did domestic violence cases decrease by 67 percent between 1994 and 2012?,Did domestic violence cases decrease by 67 percent in 2012?,Did domestic violence cases decrease in both 2014 and 2014?,Did domestic violence cases increase by 67 percent in 2011?
Was this photo taken during protests?,Was this PM visiting the wealthiest family?,Was this event in 2020?,Did the protests take place during protests?,Can we infer this photo was taken during protests?,Can we infer this was the most popular protest taking place at the time?,Can we infer this was the most politically divisive protest?
Did the 16-year-old's death occur from the COVID-19 vaccine?,Did the vaccine cure COVID-19?,Can anyone who is diagnosed with COVID-19 and has the vaccine had a reoccurring illness?,Is there any evidence to support these claims?,Have any other people in the country claimed the same thing?
Did Obama make this pledge from day one?,Did Obama keep this promise?,"Did Obama pledge to take care of his ""bad"" debts?",Have the bad debts been addressed?,Did Obama say that bad debts would go first?,Has Obama kept this pledge?,"Was Obama referred to in the interview as ""never, ever""?"
Did Gibbs work fewer than 6 days during his one year anniversary?,Is Gibbs on paid vacation?,Does Gibbs have an active private life?,Is this information true?,Is this information accurate?,Is this information reliable?,Does this information change if corrected by someone else?
Did the science pass rate go up by 31% and maths went up by 65%?,Did either passing ratio increase by more than 15%?,Did there increase in total percentage of pass rates for science and maths for the year under the DA?,Was the percentage increase in the maths pass rate larger than the percentage increase in science?
Did the Earth pictured in 2002 have a composite image?,Did the Earth pictured in 2002 have a composite image without clouds?,Did the Earth pictured in 2002 contain any clouds?,Does the Earth pictured in 2002 have any clouds?,Did the Earth pictured in 2002 have any clouds?,Does the Earth pictured in 2002 have any clouds?
Does this represent a 9% increase from the total seized licenses?,Did the total seized licenses have voter registrations?,Did all of these fake ids come from China?,Was the resulting number of seized licenses all Democrats?,Did the fake licenses not actually contain voter registrations?
Did Jerry Brown sign the law requiring all students in California to learn Spanish?,Does the law require all state and private schools to teach Spanish?,Are all schools required to teach Spanish?,Are all schools required to teach Spanish?,Is this law required by state law?,Does this law appear in any other state's code?
Did Trump ever face allegations of racism before he ran for president?,Has any person been accused of racism before Trump ran for president?,Has Trump received any prior accusations of racism?,Was Trump subject to any governmental action prior to running for president?,Did Trump receive any governmental action before running for president?
Did Ted Cruz try to ban contraception five times?,Did Ted Cruz ever try to ban contraception?,"Is Ted Cruz a ""progressive"" politician?",Does Ted Cruz support pro-choice measures?,"Is Ted Cruz a ""progressive"" politician?",Is Ted Cruz a pro-choice politician?
Is it true in Wisconsin that you can change your early ballot?,Do all states have the same procedure?,Does Wisconsin have this process?,Do other states have the same process?,Is there a specific reason for this process?,Can one change early ballots for various reasons?,Do other states offer this process?
Is Arsenicum Album 30 available in India?,Did Naik claim Arsenicum Album 30 was a palliative for COVID-19?,Is there any evidence to suggest Arsenicum Album 30 was a palliative for COVID-19?
"Did an Austrian astronaut jump frome a spacecraft to Earth and travel 1,236 km?","Did an Austrian astronaut jump frome a spacecraft to Earth and travelled 1,236 km?","Did an Austrian astronaut jump frome a spacecraft to Earth and travel 1,236 km?"
"Is the increase in migraines, strokes and dementia caused by climate change?",Is the increase in neurological diseases caused by climate change?,Is the increase in health outcomes caused by climate change due to Covid-19 vaccines?,Is this research based on current evidence?,Does this research support existing studies?
"Are more Georgians in support of legislation that would ease gun restrictions in schools, bars, clubs and on campuses?","Are more Georgians in support of legislation that would ease gun restrictions in schools, bars, clubs and on campuses?","Are more Georgians in support of laws that would ease gun restrictions in churches, bars, clubs, and on campuses?","Are fewer Georgians in support of legislation to ease gun restrictions in schools, bars, clubs and on campuses?"
Did 50 lakh new banks open?,Did this initiative benefit workers?,Will this initiative be followed up for another two years?,Will this initiative be supported with a budget?,Will this plan continue to be implemented?,Would this strategy improve workers' lives?,Will this strategy improve the effectiveness of this programme?,Will this scheme benefit workers in the long run?
Do these studies report a total of 1 in 19.1M deaths?,Does this estimate include a small sample of 50 to 64 year olds?,Is the majority of these people over 65 years old?,Do these statistics include an average age group?,Is this average age group susceptible to the COVID-19 flu?
Did Kenyatta move out of his State House in 2013?,Are there any images of Kenyatta moving out of State House prior to 2019?,Are the current presidential photo on Kenyatta's website from 2013?,Was the 2013 photo from Kenyatta's State House public domain?
Did these cases have similar occurrences?,Is the link to these two cases skewed towards positive?,Is this evidence likely to be synchronized?,Is this article about 322 and COVID-19 similar?,Are these two diseases synchronized?,Has this evidence been documented in any other publications?
Did the Dalit woman behead six Muslim men after being threatened with rape and religious conversion?,Was the Dalit woman responsible for the massacre of Muslim men in Varanasi?,Did the Dalit woman commit the murder of six Muslim men in the city of Varanasi?,Was the Dalit woman responsible for the murder of six Muslim men in Varanasi?,Did the Dalit woman commit the murder of six Muslim men in Varanasi?,Was there any proof of the Dalit woman's murder?
Did the budget allocate over half of the budget to states headed for elections?,"Did the budget allocation to Tamil Nadu, West Bengal and Kerala result in elections?",Did the allocation of over half of the budget to these states affect the germination of elections in these states?,Do the states that receive the largest portion of the budgets allocate a larger share of the budgets?
Is the video from India?,Is it a man?,Do people like this video?,Is this man white?,Did this Muslim man have an alias?,Does this man know how many children he has?,Were these children related to the Muslim man?,Do Muslims have children in general?
Are we giving almost $2 billion of taxpayer money to the junk food and fast food industries?,Will fast food and junk food be taxed for food purposes?,Will junk food and fast food make the childhood obesity epidemic worse?,Did any other studies indicate that this amount of money will do a better job?,Does this amount of money equate to the total tax money that is attributed to the junk food and fast food industries?
"Did the company use the $5,000 grant to teach an employee about Facebook and Twitter?",Does the company teach employees how to use these social networking sites?,Was the grant for the employer made through the Governor's Workforce Board?,Did the grant to the company teach the employee about using Facebook and Twitter?,Are there other organizations that provide access to social networking websites?
"Is this number the only number in the data that shows that 118,000 children and young adults have died suddenly since the COVID-19 vaccines were rolled out?","Is this number the only number that shows that 118,000 children and young adults have died suddenly since the COVID-19 vaccines were rolled out?"
Did a Budweiser employee pee in a beer tank for 12 years?,Has he ever been fired for doing this?,Were any other employees made aware?,Are there any other allegations in this case?,Does this employee have a criminal record?,Did Budweiser hire these employees?,Did these employees clean the tank every week?
Is this footage taken during the protests?,"Do these farmers plan to hold this rally on January 26, 2021?",Can video be seen during the demonstrations?,Does this footage include the video's subject in a documentary fashion?,Will the demonstration take place on January 26th?,Is this video shot in the capital city of Ontario?
Has Trump worked with Congress to pass more legislation in his first 100 days than any president since Truman?,Is Trump the only president that has worked with Congress to pass more legislation in his first 100 days?,Has Trump worked with Congress to pass more legislation in his first 100 days than any president since Truman?
Did Brigham Young University repeatedly wash away chalk murals that  contained love and support for LGBT+ students?,Is it true that the chalk murals were washed away in August 2021?,Is there evidence that the chalk murals were washed away during this time?,Did any of the chalk murals contain LGBT+ friendly messages?
"Has a study confirmed that in the absence of federal reproductive health funds, abortion in Georgia would increase by about 44%?","Are there other studies supporting that a study shows that in the absence of federal reproductive health funds, abortion in Georgia would increase by about 44%?","Has any study or evidence provided that a study shows that in the absence of federal reproductive health funds, abortion in Georgia would increase by about 44%?"
Did Elizabeth Warren take a bogus DNA test?,Was Elizabeth Warren under 10% of the average American?,Did Elizabeth Warren do a good job of explaining the results of the DNA test?,Is Elizabeth Warren a 1/1024 male?,Is Elizabeth Warren 1/1024 female?,. Did Elizabeth Warren use a bogus DNA test?,Is Elizabeth Warren a 1/1024 male?
Is the removal of cremation form 5 due to a change in procedures in the state of California?,Does this result in the denial of cremation rights by the state of California?,Does this process in the state of California involve cremating against the wishes of the family?,Is there evidence that this method is used by these entities to desensitize people to cremation?,Is it estimated that roughly 90% of this process occurs in California?
Did a majority of GOP National Security officials respond to the open letter?,Do these voters think Trump is unqualified to be president?,Will this group of officials vote for Trump?,Are there any non-republican Republican national security officials?,Does the letter have a total of 100 signatures?,Is the letter public?
Was the largest tax increase in the history of America on Dec 31?,Is it safe to say that any tax increase on Dec 31 would be the largest tax increase in history?,Is it true that the biggest tax increase in America occurred in 2009?,Have the tax cuts in the past been cut?,Is it safe to say that all the tax cuts in the past were not eliminated?
Do people in Russia have to keep indoors while catching coronavirus?,Did Putin release lions for the purpose of restraining people?,Has Putin released lions in Russia before?,Are people in Russia infected with coronavirus?,Is it possible to catch coronavirus in Africa?
Did Rick Scott allow Republican legislators to cut his teacher pay raise proposal?,Did Rick Scott approve of any of the reductions in teacher pay raises?,Did Rick Scott authorize a reduction in teacher pay raises?,Did the reductions in teacher pay raises come under scrutiny in Florida?,Did Rick Scott allow a reduction of teacher pay raises?
Did Trump put all of his father's money into a mutual fund?,Did Trump get a substantial tax benefit by spending his father's money?,Could Trump spend all of his father's money on a mutual fund?,Did Trump 'put his father's money in a mutual fund'?
Would it make sense for Antarctic temperature to rise 100 degrees to melt ice?,Is it unlikely for the ice in Antarctica to melt within 100 degrees?,Would global temperature increase of 100 degrees cause the melting of ice?,Was this information accurate?,Have other studies demonstrated that melting of ice in Antarctica is likely to have a higher negative effect on global warming?
Is there any information that Hitler stated in 1928 about his movement being Christian?,Does Hitler claim he only tolerates those attacks on Christianity?,Is Hitler's movement religious?,Is there any evidence he said this in 1928?,Is any evidence that Hitler ever had this sentiment after this event?
Was Goldeneye 007 originally intended to be developed for Super NES?,Did Goldeneye 007 originate in Japan or Japan-based regions?,Was Goldeneye 007 originally designed to run on 64/Super NES?,Does Goldeneye 007 support 2D and 3D graphics?,Did Goldeneye 007 utilize support for 3D graphics?
Did authorities say 7.2 magnitude earthquakes would strike Mindanao?,Did authorities predict earthquakes of 7.5 magnitude would strike Mindanao?,Are these earthquakes of the magnitude 7.5 to 8.0 magnitude are on their way to the coast?,Do earthquakes with magnitude 7.5 or greater likely strike in Mindanao?,Is this region prone to earthquakes?
Did CNN Philippines include a video promoting Neocardia caps?,Did CNN Philippines list Neocardia caps as a product that can cure hypertension?,Did the videos include an image of a doctor-recommended product?,Has the product been well-received by consumers?,Did any commercially successful studies show the product to be effective?
Was the man raped by women?,Did the men kidnap and rape the man?,Was the man raped by three women in Telangana?,Is the man in India eligible to stand trial for murder?,Would the woman and man be trying to use this crime for profit?
Did photo taken by NASA prove the moon was once split in two?,Was evidence of the moon splitting in two found in photo?,Is there evidence that the moon was once split in two?,Was photo taken in 1999?,Did photograph of moon split in two come from NASA?,Is photo taken by NASA consistent with other evidence?
Has global warming gone up since 1895?,Has CO2-driven global warming gone down since 2023?,Has the average temperature of the year prior to 1895 been higher than April 2023?,Have these temperature differences been smaller than this one?,Do these data support the alleged hoax that a direct cause of global warming is from CO2?
Did Obama vote for a border wall?,Was Schumer a member of the same group as Clinton?,Is a border wall a primary policy issue of the 2016 campaign?,Did Democratic lawmakers agree with Hillary Clinton's support for a border wall in 2016?,Were other senators a part of the group that voted for a border wall in 2016?
Did alcohol be served during a BJP event in Telangana in July 2022?,Did alcohol be served to attendees during the event?,Does the footage include alcohol - specifically alcoholic alcohol - in it?,Did the event have alcohol served at the end of the event?,Was alcohol served outside of the event or in a venue where alcohol was served?
Did you click the PM button under the digital clock?,Did you see the time change between 5:00 and 6:00?,Did you change the time to 4:10?,Did you go to the airport at this time?,Did you go to the restaurant at this time?,Did you see the time change between 4:35 and 4:05?
Has South Africa tested more than 20 million people?,Is there any research that shows this is the case?,Are there any reports that show this is not the case?,Does this campaign indicate that people believe in the health system?,Are the numbers that confirm this statement correct?,Does this number include non-southern citizens?
Did Barra earn this amount of money after only a year?,Did Barra's compensation increase after only one year?,Did Barra earn this much money in more than one year?,Did Barra's compensation increase after only a few years?,Did Barra pay all of this money?,Was the amount that Barra paid in total not greater than most companies' average employees?
Is there an evidence that India took down 300 people in the Balakot airstrike?,Is there evidence that India took down more than 300 people in the Balakot airstrike?,Is the number of people killed in the Balakot airstrike higher than the number killed during the riots?,Is this incident a demonstration of Indian intent?
Did McConnell claim that Democrats would have no victories after December 2020?,Was this claim only made at that point in time?,Did this statement apply to all Democratic legislative efforts in any given year?,Did this statement apply to all congressional legislative efforts in general?,Was this statement just about repealing tax reform laws?
Did Fauci claim masks do not work in an April 2023 interview?,Is there evidence that masks do not work?,Is the mask claimed by Fauci an actual mask?,Does the mask used in the interview provide proof of mask's ability to reduce bleeding?,Does the mask use a metal rod?
Did the man from the photograph ever go to the police?,Did the man depicted as the Qanon Shaman go on to cause riots in Brazil?,Were the Jan 8 riots specifically related to the Qanon Shaman?,Was a riot in Brazil caused by a Qanon Shaman?
Is this a proposal signed by all new elected Senators?,Did any Senator certify this pledge?,Does this pledge require a vote?,Does this pledge have any legal basis?,Has this pledge been accepted by any other government agencies?,Has this pledge had any legal basis other than endorsement?,Is this pledge based on federal law or on the individual voting rights of certain states?
Did the teacher receive a 19 percent raise?,Did this raise help settle the union strike?,Did the teacher agree to this raise?,Did this raise help settle the union strike?,Did the teacher agree to this raise in this case?,Did this raise help settle the strike?,Did this raise help settle the teacher strike?
Is a photo of a purported coin from 1839 confirmed that coins depicting Lord Rama were issued during the British regime before India’s Independence?,Did any coins depicting Lord Rama in British mintage before India's Independence?,Is there any evidence that Lord Rama was an official facetted figure on coins released prior to Independence?
Was Robredo's State of the Nation Address in 2019 or 2023?,Is Robredo's State of the Nation Address from 2019 - 2020?,Was Robredo's State of the Nation Address from 2020 - 2023?,Is there proof Robredo insulted President Marcos Jr.?
"Was the photo of 700,000 migrants showing any problems?",Is the picture the same as this picture?,Does this picture show a specific group arriving at the border?,Has this picture shown what are the results of this particular crossing?,Is this photograph associated with any particular reason that migrant families are headed into the United States?,Does this picture represent the overall U.S./Mexico border situation?
"Was Abbott advising Texans to ""pick up the pace"" when he first urged new gun purchases?",Have gun purchases increased by more than 20% over the last 18 months?,Do gun purchases represent a percentage of the total gun purchase market?,Are guns generally considered as the most popular criterion for purchasing guns?
"Did Tata say that ""if the death of 65 soldiers increases the popularity of a prime minister, then nobody can save this country""?","Did Tata believe that ""if the death of 65 soldiers increases the popularity of a prime minister, then nobody can save this country""?",Did Tata discuss whether the death of 65 soldiers would boost popularity of a prime minister?
"Was Scott only referring to jobs created ""on top of normal growth""?",Did Scott change his job plan in any way?,"Has Scott stated his job proposal is merely 700,000 jobs?","Did Scott say 700,000 jobs were created just above average growth?","Were Scott's jobs more than 700,000 jobs?"
Did McAfee Support send email messages saying that your device is at risk?,Did McAfee send email messages claiming your device was at risk?,Did McAfee Support send emails claiming your device is at risk?,Did McAfee support email messages claiming your device is at risk?
Do you think this video shows blackmail?,Did this video come out in the last few years?,Did the video cover the exact same location?,Will this video be released?,Is there any evidence that a woman in China is blackmailed over a road accident?,Do these reports support the claims in the video?
Did police fire pepper balls at a car after the passenger told them he was pregnant?,Did officers fire pepper balls in response to the passenger's words?,Did the driver of the car yell at the police?,Does anyone believe this was intentional?,Did police fire pepper balls at the protest site?
Has Washington's unemployment rate been above the national average for 137 months?,Does Washington's unemployment rate exceed national average?,Is Washington's unemployment rate above the national average?,Has Washington's unemployment rate been above national average since 2001?,Is Washington's unemployment rate below national average?,Is Washington's unemployment rate above the national average since 2001?,Is Washington's unemployment rate above the national average?
Is it true that the federal government spends 3 million per day on the border wall?,Is the border wall being used to keep out people illegally?,Are these activities illegal?,Does the border wall being used for illegal immigration provide any benefit for the national economy?,Has the federal government paid for this wall?
Did the train accident occur in West Bengal?,Did the train crash occur outside of West Bengal?,Was there a photograph of the train accident?,Will there be any photos from the train accident in the future?,Has any death occurred in connection with this train accident?,Has there been any death resulting from this train accident?
Did Dave Barry write 16 Things it took me over 50 years to learn?,"Did Dave Barry do the writing for ""16 Things it took me over 50 years to learn""?",Did Dave Barry release a book based on 16 Things it took him over 50 years to learn?,Did Dave Barry ever write a book based on 16 Things it took him over 50 years to learn?
Did the state board headed by Patterson receive funds from the state?,Did the state board head by Patterson implement the changes to the constitution?,Has Patterson ever implemented a change to the constitution?,Are all the changes to the constitution consistent with the passage of the amendment?,Were any changes to the constitution passed by the state board?
Is there evidence that Ohio train was derailed intentionally to push the 15-minute city plan?,Is the Ohio train related to a crime?,Does Ohio train derailed intentionally to push the 15-minute city plan?,Does the Ohio train derailed intentionally to push the 15-minute city plan?,Do Ohio train derailed intentionally to push the 15-minute city plan?
Did all 30 municipalities in the Western Cape receive clean audits?,All municipalities in the Western Cape were governed by the DA. Are there any other governing bodies in the Western Cape that received clean audits?,Were any of the governing bodies in the Western Cape not governed by DA?
Did Russell Johnson serve as a bombardier during World War II?,Was Russell Johnson a popular character on Gilligan's Island?,Did Russell Johnson play the Professor in Gilligan's Island?,Did Russell Johnson fly 44 combat missions as a bombardier?,Did Russell Johnson play the Professor in Gilligan's Island as a professional?
Was Sami Abu Dyak incarcerated for 11 years?,Was Sami Abu Dyak died due to medical negligence?,Was Sami Abu Dyak incarcerated for more than 11 years?,Was Sami Abu Dyak alive before his death?,/ / / / / /?
Did Portland have a surplus of $22 million?,Was the surplus an overall surplus?,Does the surplus include all or part of the city's budget?,Does Portland have a surplus of general revenue?,Are there any other items in the budget?,Does the budget cover all or part of city's yearly expenses?
"Did Yadav promise to build 2,000 new mosques in UP if SP won?",Did Yadav pled to build new mosques in UP if SP won?,Was Yadav's promise in writing?,Does Yadav's promise still stand?
Does Starbucks give 50$ coupon for 50th anniversary?,Is there any other promotion on the coupons?,Does Starbucks have a coupon for 50th anniversary?,Is there any other promotion on the coupons?,"- The coupons expire on Jan. 20, 2015. - The coupon ends on Feb. 15, 2020.?"
Is McCain a Democratic presidential candidate?,Did Obama attack McCain for proposing cuts to Medicare?,Is Obama a Democratic presidential candidate?,Does Obama attack McCain for proposed cuts to Medicare?,Is it true that McCain attacked Obama for proposing cuts to Medicare in 2008?,Is Obama a Republican presidential candidate?
Did 1 out of 4 Wisconsin schools in 2012 have a subpar rating on their DPI report cards?,Did 1 out of 4 Wisconsin schools fail their children?,Did 1 out of 4 Wisconsin schools have the highest percentage of non-performing children?,Do the DPI Reports reveal all the schools that have failed their children?
Will WhatsApp be off from 11:30 pm to 6:00 am every day?,Did WhatsApp announce that WhatsApp would be off from 11:30 pm to 6:00 am?,Has WhatsApp announced any other plans to cut down on the use of chat messaging?,Has WhatsApp announced any other plans to cut down on the use of chat messaging?
Has a population of 28 million people been supported?,Is there any evidence that this government has continued to support a population of 28 million people?,Was there a significant increase in the number of people supported in the study?,Did the study reveal a significant increase in the percentage of people supported?,Is there any evidence that there was an increase in the percentage of people supported in the study?,Is this population population not the same as the general population?
Did Mark Zuckerberg say jai shree ram is written more than 200 crore times on Facebook each day?,Is Jai Shri ram written on Facebook more than 200 million times each day?,Has Mark Zuckerberg said Jai Shri ram is written on Facebook more than 200 million times?,Did Mark Zuckerberg say Jai Shri Ram was written more than 200 million times each day on Facebook?
Does Texas law provides 6 weeks for abortions?,Does abortion law in Texas support abortion after 6 weeks?,Did the Texas law protect abortion after 6 weeks?,Does the law in Texas support abortion after 6 weeks?,Have the Texas abortion laws established minimum days for abortion?,Is the Texas abortion law influenced by any other state's abortion laws?
"Did Weems defend BP, Enron, and just about every big oil company against the working man?",Did Weems' legal record include a strong legal defense of big oil companies?,Did Weems' legal record include strong legal defense against oil firms?,Does Weems' legal record include a strong legal defense of small oil companies?
Did Schumer delete a Feb 5 tweet criticizing Trump’s ban on travel to and from China?,Did Schumer delete other tweets during this time period?,Did Trump prohibit travel from China?,Did Schumer delete a Feb 4 tweet regarding China?,Did Schumer delete any other tweets after this time period?
Are Mexican nationals receiving $24 billion a year from the U.S. in remittances?,Are some of the remittances coming from illegal aliens?,Does Mexico receive more money from illegal aliens than from Mexican nationals?,Does the majority of remittances come from illegal aliens?
Is the event an outbreak?,Did any of the burgers cause any harm?,Is it true that the burgers caused some damage?,Is there evidence of anyone getting sick after eating the burgers?,Is there evidence that some of the burgers are harmful?,Did some people get sick after eating a burger?
Did the glaciers of the day of Gore's birth still exist?,Did glaciers of the day of Gore's birth still exist today?,Have more glaciers died since the day of Gore's birth?,Did the glaciers of the day of Gore's birth still exist?
Was Biden's recommendation based on a document from the Foreign Relations Committee?,Was Biden the ranking member of the Foreign Relations Committee?,Did Biden endorse the partition of Iraq?,Does Biden support the creation of three separate entities?,Would Biden support dividing Iraq into three distinct entities?,Would Biden support dividing Iraq into three separate entities?
Will NJ launch a 30-day speeding ticket frenzy on July 28?,Is this type of speeding ticket frenzy known to have happened in previous years?,Is NJ's'speeding ticket frenzy' based on an actual situation?,Is this type of speeding ticket frenzy currently running in New Jersey?
"Was Kroger in the position in Bourbonnais, Illinois in summer of 2020?",Was Kroger also required to provide change in the area?,"Is there evidence Kroger stopped giving cash to customers in Bourbonnais, Illinois?",Was the cash change policy implemented in a Kroger store in the area?
Does Wallace want to tax families of five for 'irresponsible breeding'?,Does Wallace want to tax families of five for 'irresponsible breeding'?,Did Wallace make this proposal in response to a tweet?,Has Wallace made this proposal in response to a statement in a news story?,Has Wallace made this proposal in response to a remark in a prank call?
Did immigrants capture all the jobs that were created since 2000?,Is immigration directly responsible for all the jobs created since 2000?,Are immigrants making jobs in the U.S. from the same source?,Do Americans create jobs from the same source?,Does the U.S. employ immigrants from abroad?,Does this population have access to jobs?
Is Nanjing 2021 a city with a public university?,Is this protest a protest for equality?,Will retired employees participate in this protest?,Does this protest involve any other political issues other than equal treatment for retired workers?,Can this protest be streamed on social media?,Do these protests take place in other countries?
Was Juli Briskman elected to office in a jurisdiction where one of his golf clubs is located?,Did Briskman flip off President Trump's motorcade during his election?,Did Briskman receive any money from Trump?,Did Briskman receive a contribution from Trump?,Did Briskman win the 2019 primary?
Did it take this long to get down the channel?,Are these queues longer than the Channel itself?,Did there have a significant delay in the lorry queues?,Can the lorries be seen from space?,Would this lorry queue have been spotted by others?,Will these queues be visible from space?
Has Clinton said she's always argued against enriching uranium?,"Did Clinton agree with a 2009 ""Iran could enrich uranium"" statement?",Did Clinton defend this statement in 2014?,Was Clinton not sure whether Iran could enrich uranium before 2014?,Is Iran currently enriched uranium?
Did NASA hire 24 theologians for this project?,Did these 24 theologians receive a salary from NASA?,Are all of these 24 theologians related to religion?,Did this hire come out of a NASA official?,Are these 24 theologians related to a religion?,Did these 24 theologians receive any funding from NASA?
Did this photo of women wearing masks occur during the 1918 Spanish influenza outbreak?,Was this photograph taken during the 1918 Spanish influenza outbreak?,Were these women wearing masks?,Did this photograph take place before?,Was this photograph of women wearing masks taken before the 1918 Spanish influenza outbreak?,Was this photograph taken after the 1918 Spanish influenza outbreak?
Is there a $3.7 billion budget deficit?,Do I think this will be a surplus?,Are there other spending plans?,Are there other budget options to be considered?,Are the numbers projected correctly?,Does the deficit continue to grow?,Will the surplus increase over time?,Are there any changes in spending plans?
Did Rivera tape the unruly passenger to his seat?,Did Rivera tape the unruly passenger to his seat despite an investigation?,Does Rivera say he taped the unruly passenger to his seat during a flight?,Did Rivera say that there were no tickets for that flight?,Did Rivera tape the unruly passenger to his seat despite an investigation?
Is the quote accurate in this context?,Do many states have similar laws under which full- and part-time workers will be required to buy health insurance?,Will workers who work full- or part-time have to pay for health insurance in the new law?,Is there any debate over whether this law is reasonable?
Do balloons cure blood cancer?,Do balloons cure many other diseases?,Have balloons been used to cure many diseases?,Do balloons cure asthma?,Are balloons effective in fighting cold?,Do balloons cause breathlessness?,Can balloons cure certain diseases?,Does the balloon blow into the air often?,Are balloons able to envelop any organism?,Can balloons be inflated by adults or children?
Did Lake congratulate the obese American public?,Did Lake believe the alleged fattest U.S. president was Taft?,Did Lake say congratulations to the obese American public?,Did Lake specifically praise Trump?,Did Lake think Trump was the fattest U.S. president since Taft?,Did Lake tweet the tweets after Trump received an Oval Office?
Is SARS-CoV-2 related to COVID-19?,Are the COVID-19 outbreaks responsible for many deaths?,Is the origin of the virus COVID-19?,Did the US start the COVID-19 outbreaks?,Is SARS-CoV-2 related to COVID-19?
Did New York Times claim that 250 million people attended the AAP Gujarat rally?,Has The New York Times made any claims on the claim?,Has New York Times made any claims on the claim?,Do a majority of the people that attended the AAP rally have a criminal conviction?,Do New York Times claims that the AAP Gujarat rally is considered one of the highest attended rallies in India?
Did 73 % of veterans graduate from the Drug Court?,Did 53% of veterans graduate?,Did most of the veterans whose applications were rejected by the court get help?,Did the court increase the number of cases veterans could take?,Did the court decrease the number of cases veterans could take?,Did drug courts help veterans?
"Did this year's budget leave $6 billion in the ""rainy day fund""?",Have this dollars been used to pay for major public programs?,Did this year's budget make money out of the budget?,Have the public accounts paid for the entire state budget?,"Did the 2012-13 state budget budget leave any money in the ""rainy day fund""?"
"Did this group refuse to remove an online message urging supporters to prepare for war despite the U.S. Capitol insurrection on Jan. 6, 2021?","Did this group refuse to remove an online message urging supporters to prepare for war despite the U.S. Capitol insurrection on Jan. 6, 2021?"
Is it true that $1 billion will pay 1 million for every American?,Is there any evidence this estimate is accurate?,Will the proposed funds allow every American to receive 1 million?,Have other estimates been made in the past?,Is it unclear if the proposed aid will be used in any way on a cost basis?
Did Palestine get permission to compete in the 2019 Eurovision?,Did Palestine receive any permission to enter the 2019 Eurovision?,Is there any evidence that Palestine did receive permission to compete in the 2019 Eurovision?,Did Palestine receive the necessary necessary permission to enter the 2019 Eurovision?,Is the 2019 Eurovision due to be held in 2020?
"Have many people including PM Modi, former Pakistani cricketers, ICC CEO demanded a rematch between India and England and India paid 25 crores to reach final directly?",Did India pay 25 crores to reach final directly?,"Have several people including PM Modi, former Pakistani cricketers, ICC CEO demanded a rematch between India and England and India paid 25 crores to reach final directly?"
Did 1 of every 3 DeSantis spends come from the federal government?,Is there any evidence to suggest the money was used by federal employees?,Did DeSantis use federal employees?,Was there any evidence to support DeSantis' spending on public employees?,Is there a sufficient resounding yes to DeSantis' spending on public employees?
Did all Democrats in the Senate and House vote to cut $280 billion out of Medicare just two months ago?,Did any Republicans vote to cut $280 billion out of Medicare just two months ago?,Was there a majority in both chambers that voted to cut $280 billion out of Medicare?,Did a majority in either chamber vote to cut $280 billion out of Medicare just two months ago?
Did Trump post about Elon Musk and Ron Wesley?,"Did Trump post about ""meatball' Ron Wesley?",Did Trump post about both Musk and Ron Wesley?,Is Trump related to Ron Wesley or Elon Musk?,Did Trump post about both of these subjects in the past?,Are Trump and Wesley related?
Did Sanders throw eggs at black civil rights protestors?,Did Sanders throw eggs at white protestors?,Was Sanders arrested for throwing eggs at white protestors?,Was Sanders arrested for a crime other than throwing eggs at black protestors?,Did Sanders throw eggs at white protestors on his way home?
Did Barack Obama carry congressional District 13 by 8.2 points in 2008?,Did Barack Obama carry congressional District 13 by 5.6 points in 2012?,Is Barack Obama also President of the United States?,Are there any other sources that confirm this claim?,Did Barack Obama carry Congressional District 13 by 8.2 points in 2008?
Was the 6-year-old girl raped by 30 men?,Did the 6 year old girl die as a result of her ordeal?,Did a report from the Border agents provide an estimate of the crimes involved?,Would these 30 men have been involved in the rape?,Is there any record of the attack?
Did the New England Journal of Medicine study reveal that 82% of women who were vaccinated against covid-19 miscarried?,Did this study find that 95% of women in this group do not miscarry?,Did the New England Journal of Medicine study reveal that the miscarriage rates for this group are lower than those for women that were not vaccinated against covid-19?
Did Biden propose a tax on profits from selling your home?,Did Biden propose a tax on the profits from selling your home?,Do Biden's tax proposals include any other potential taxes besides those currently used?,Does Biden's proposed tax plan include any other potential taxes?,Is there evidence that Biden's tax proposal will not increase profits from selling your home?
Is 5G associated with Coronavirus?,Is there a correlation between 5G and Coronavirus?,Is 5G not associated with Coronavirus according to current knowledge?,Has 5G in any way caused the deaths of 181 people?,Do there a lot of studies supporting the relationship between 5G and Coronavirus?
Does the Trump Administration pose a threat to the global economy?,Are these analysts reporting on Trump’s potential economic impact?,Is Trump likely to affect the economy and global peace and stability?,"Is the Trump presidency, in general, potentially one of the greatest threats to the world economy?",Is terrorism one of the top threats to the global economy?
"Did the November 1997 Issue on the ""Betty"" comic book page that was shared widely online have anything to do with home schooling?",Was the February 1997 issue discussing remote learning in 2021?,Did the April 1997 issue discuss remote learning in 2021?,Did the June 1997 issue talk about home schooling in 2021?,Did the June 1997 article also talk about remote learning?
Is the signature audit of absentee ballots in Georgia going to overturn the results?,Can the signature audit merely affect absentee ballots in Georgia?,Is the signature audit scheduled for this fall?,Is a signature audit of absentee ballots in Georgia required?,Will these audits be conducted at the same time that states conduct their own signature audits?
Did Marcos have shabu addiction?,Did Duterte's children have shabu addiction?,Is the statement from Marcos accurate?,Did Marcos claim he used to be an addict?,Is Duterte's three children addicted to shabu?
Did Pence make this statement when asked how he funded homeless shelters?,Was Pence actually talking about funding homeless shelters?,Does Pence provide funding for homeless shelters?,Would Pence support funding homeless shelters?,Are homeless shelters funded by Pence in any other states?,Does Pence think they are safe shelters?
Is this job growth representative of 25 percent of all jobs in the U.S.?,Is New Jersey the only state that's job growth is 25% of all job creation in the country?,Are there other job-creation statistics?,Is New Jersey job growth the sole source of jobs in the U.S.?
Did the SS Warrimoo span four different hemispheres and two centuries?,Did the SS Warrimoo pass through four different hemispheres and two centuries?,Is there evidence that the SS Warrimoo crossed the American ocean?,Have any other ships made this claim?
Was this bill passed in the senate?,Did Hurt vote in the vote to increase energy rates?,Is this bill an exception to the law?,Are these new electric rates very high?,Is this bill related to climate change?,Is there any proof that the bill will increase power rates?
Did the giant die battling a snake?,Did the giant leave Krabi in 2017?,Did the giant's skeleton belong to an actual snake?,Did the giant's skeleton contain any bones?,Did the giant die in Krabi during a period of snake hunting or is it unknown?
"Did Ellen DeGeneres give away $5,000 to people who criticized her?",Is this claim true?,"Did people who criticized Ellen DeGeneres donate $5,000?",Is this claim true?,"Is it true that Ellen DeGeneres is giving away $5,000 to people who criticized her?",Is this claim true?
Did McCain purchase weapons in Pakistan with respect to Osama bin Laden?,Did McCain sell weapons to Pakistan on the July 4 weekend?,Did McCain sell weapons to Pakistan on the same day as bin Laden?,Did McCain sell weapons in Pakistan on the same date as bin Laden?,Did McCain offer bin Laden weapons in Pakistan on the same day as bin Laden?,Did McCain sell weapons to Pakistan on the same date as bin Laden?
Are the emergency room visits for Obamacare patients increasing?,Has the health care bill benefited the emergency department more than Obamacare patients?,Has the emergency room visits increased by over 50% for Obamacare patients?,Is there any evidence that the Obamacare health care plan has contributed to the increase in the emergency room visits?
Did Gates say Trump will go down as one of the greatest presidents?,Did Gates say Trump will go down as one of the greatest presidents?,Did Gates say Trump will go down as one of the greatest presidents?,Did Gates claim Trump will go down as one of the greatest presidents?
Did the state senator say she doesn't live in the district?,Was the district the state senator hoped to win?,Is there an election that Campbell could win in 2012?,Will this election be close?,Does this election have a high risk of turning off voters?,Are there any people in that district who don't live in it?
Does over-vaccination cause faster mutation of COVID-19 virus?,Is there evidence that over-vaccination causes a super virus?,Is this virus capable of surviving in the near future?,Does the COVID-19 virus have the potential to become a super virus?,Are there any other factors associated with the COVID-19 virus?
Did vaccines kill millions?,Are hospitals incentivized to report COVID-19 diagnoses?,Do flu vaccines increase the odds of contracting COVID?,Was hydroxychloroquine the best treatment for COVID?,Has any of the statements stated below been proven?,Is it plausible that there is a link between oxychloroquine and COVID-19?
Did the CBO predict that 23 million people would be covered in 2017?,Did the CBO underestimate the number of people covered?,Did they underestimate the number of people covered by the CBO when the bill was signed?,Was the CBO's estimates far off on the amount of people covered?,Is it true that 10.3 million people are covered by the CBO?
Did Obama have more unemployment under Reagan?,Does Obama have higher unemployment under Obama than Reagan?,Was Reagan more productive?,Did Obama end with higher unemployment than Reagan?,Did Obama ever raise unemployment?,Did Obama have less unemployment than Reagan?,Did Obama actually have higher unemployment under Reagan?,"Posted by davidkjensen February 9, 2013?"
Did John Kennedy present a letter during the January 6 hearing?,Was John Kennedy present during the January 6 hearing?,Did John Kennedy present a letter to the President of the United States?,Did any of the individuals identified by the letter have legal issues?,Did the individuals mentioned by the letter have any legal problems?
Did the general assembly essentially borrow money from pension funds at a very high interest rate?,Did the delay in contributions cost billions in dollars?,Did the delay in contributions cost billions of dollars to a very high rate?,Do people still have pension funds?,Does the state's government fund the retirement of members of the general assembly?,Does the state's government fund pension funds?
Was Linetti a fervent supporter of Rodrigo Duterte?,Was Linetti critical of Duterte for the poor economic performance in the Philippines?,Were Duterte and the Philippines fortunate to have Duterte?,Did Linetti say Duterte is one of the best politicians she has met?
Are crows as powerful as ravens in having 17 main wing feathers?,Are crows as large as ravens in having 16 main wing feathers?,Are the numbers between ravens and crows the same as in other mammals?,Are crows as apes and ravens like each other in the number of main wing feathers?
Is it true that President Obama plans to ban trucks to avoid a repetition of the July 2016 Nice terror attack?,Is there any evidence that President Obama will support bans on trucks to avoid a repetition of the July 2016 Nice terror attack?,Is there any evidence that President Obama will support limiting truck use in order to avoid a repetition of the July 2016 Nice terror attack?
Did Gaetz receive $482K in PPP loans for not having business?,Did Gaetz claim he paid the loan back with income tax refunds?,Did Gaetz have a business?,Did Gaetz claim tax refunds from PPP loans?,Did Gaetz pay back the loan after having a business?
Was Slotkin against condemning cyber attacks by the Chinese Communist Party on American organizations developing COVID-19 treatments?,Does Slotkin support the CDC in prosecuting the Chinese Communist party for cyber attacks on American organizations developing COVID-19 treatments?,Did Slotkin voted for condemning cyber attacks by the Chinese Communist Party on American organizations developing COVID-19 treatments?
Did the kite lift the 3 year old girl?,Was the video shot by the same person from other videos?,Did the kite in the video appear to be in a desert environment?,Was the kite used at any event?,Was the video shot in Ahmedabad?,Are the kites usually used in this location?
Does the ship have a history in Europe?,Was this ship the first ship of its type to return to London since 1787?,Have ships that had extensive ports of call in Europe been re-entry points for this vessel?,Is the ship featured in the image from the East India Company?,Did the ship travel from the west coast to port in this country?
Did Russia down NATO aircraft over Ukraine in 2022?,Have Russian missiles inflicted any damage?,Will Russia continue to launch missile attacks on Ukraine after 2022?,Is there evidence that a video has been filmed?,Is there evidence for Russian missiles inflicting damage on Ukraine during the Russian invasion?
Did six states decide to stop counting votes on election night?,Was Trump headed for victory?,Was Trump going for a win?,Were state polls reliable during the election?,Did all states omit polls during voting?,Do polls reflect Trump’s direction before election night?,Were Trump numbers lower than normal for election night?
Did any children die from the Covid-19 vaccine?,Is the vaccine effective in children aged 12 to 17?,Did the vaccine result in children dying?,Did the vaccination result in multiple deaths?,Would the vaccine have had multiple side effects?,Will the vaccine continue to be effective in children 12 to 17?,Does the vaccine have long-term safety?
"Did Gates say ""at least 3 billion people need to die"" from the planet?",Does Gates support the idea of a population drop?,"Did Gates say ""at least 3 billion people need to die"" from the planet?","Did Gates say ""at least 3 billion people need to die"" from the planet?"
"Does Facebook donate one dollar per ""share""?",Did the photo that Zuckerberg shared last for one year?,Was the photo of a sick boy taken before 2014?,"Does Zuckerberg feel ""huge relief"" a picture was taken?",Will Zuckerberg and Facebook work together to help cure childhood cancer?,Has Zuckerberg created this initiative before?
Did the ICAPs in these states and UT be combined or were they separate?,Has the ICAP in these states and UT been combined or combined?,Did these states receive more ICAPs than the UT?,Are there any differences between states and UTs in terms of the number of ICAPs?,Has there been any disciplinary action against the ICAPs for any of these states?
Did Trump Jr. say that Christianity hasn't gotten us anything?,Has Trump Jr. said that following Christian principles has gotten us nothing?,Has Trump Jr. said that conservatives are following Biblical principles?,Does Trump Jr. think that religious beliefs only have made people change?,Does Trump Jr. think that based on religion one should change their view on Christian beliefs?
Are there any reports of unexpected spikes in vaccine adverse events?,Have VAERS reported any sudden spike in vaccine adverse events?,Are there reports of unexpected spike in vaccine adverse events?,Are unvaccinated people a threat to vaccinated people?,Are VAERS reports of unusual spike in vaccine adverse events?,Are the VAERS reports about vaccine adverse events of a very low nature?
Is it true that JFK Jr was declared the frontrunner for the NY Senate seat in 1999.?,Was the plane crash a major factor in Hillary Clinton's winning of the seat?,Did Clinton go on to win re-election in 2000 or 2000?,Was Hillary Clinton the only person to win re-election in 2000 or 2000?
Has the USPS taken no taxpayer aid since 1971?,Has the USPS made an operating profit year after year?,Has the USPS taken any taxpayer aid from 1971?,Is this government agency's revenue entirely derived from the sale of stamps and related products?,Does the USPS make any profit from its taxes?
Did people say a word in opposition to the Iraq war in 2003?,Did some people call on the Bush administration to withdraw US support from Iraq?,Do all of these people are named?,Did all of these people support the Iraq war in 2003?,Did any of the cited individuals cite the Iraq war in 2003 in support of the Bush administration?,Did any of these individuals object to the Iraq war in 2003?
Did the exam-results board tweet that form 4 candidates failed?,"Did the official release the exam results on November 11, 2017?",Did the national exams board issue this post in response to a fake tweet?,Did any form 4 candidates pass this exam in Uganda?,Did the Uganda national exams board issue a statement with this tweet?
Did the perpetrator of the mass shooting have a background in Scientology?,Did the victim of the mass shooting have a connection with the perpetrator?,Were there any other related mass shooting claims?,Did a source who spoke to the investigation come to conclusion that the shooting perpetrator was a Scientology man?
Did the Medicaid drug program come in under budget?,Did the design of the plan allow the program to come under budget?,Has the design of the program allowed the program to come under budget?,Is the amount of money the program collected under budget comparable with other programs?,Has the design of the program averted the deficit?
Does anyone approve changing ingredients without FDA approval?,Does a doctor have to approve altering an ingredient of a drug?,Can a doctor change up to 49% of an ingredient?,Does an FDA approve using an ingredient of an in-vitamin?,Can the FDA approve using an ingredient of an in-drowning medicine?
Does this variant account for 4 in every 5 Covid deaths?,Do Covid deaths rate increase with the new COVID-19 variant?,Do data shows that this COVID 19 variant is the worst ever?,Does this COVID 19 variant have a lower mortality rate than those using the most current COVID vaccine?
Is this Putin video?,Will Putin resign in 2023?,Did Putin give a video of this statement to the international community?,Do a majority of Russians think that Putin resigns?,Did Putin give a video of this statement to the international community?,Was Putin's response to this video positive?
"Are there 2,040 drugs recalled every year in this report?","Is the FDA recalling 1,274 drugs every year?",Are any of these drugs known to be unfit for human consumption?,Is the FDA recalling all of these drugs?,Does the FDA recall any drugs because they are no longer suitable for human consumption?
Did the stimulus purchase wind turbines in China?,Did the stimulus purchase wind turbines in America?,Does the stimulus purchase energy from other sources besides renewable energy sources?,Do the turbines in the stimulus buy electricity in other countries besides China?,Did the stimulus purchase wind turbines in the United States?,Is the stimulus spending on renewable energy the biggest source of jobs in the U.S.?
Did Punjab's government have a pro-Khalistan congress?,Are pro-Khalistan rallies against India happening in Punjab?,Has Punjab experienced anti-Hindu protests?,Is the anti-Hindu protests in Punjab similar to those observed in Delhi?,Is the Punjab pro-Khalistan rally similar to the one observed in Delhi?
Did NASA claim to have communicated with four races of aliens?,Did NASA claim to have communicated with four races of aliens?,Is there any evidence that the US government knew about any communication with alien races before this announcement?,Is the United States Government trying to hide behind a cover up?
Was there an arrest at Pfizer?,Was there an attack by a criminal group?,Was there a killing of two bodyguards by a group?,Was the perpetrator of the attack arrested?,Was the company that this person worked for arrested?,Was the person in this crime involved in a public criminal activity?
Did American Airlines receive 7 billion dollars in PPP loans during the COVID-19 pandemic?,"Did American Airlines lay off 30,000 employees as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic?",Did American Airlines CEO receive 11 million dollars in compensation during the COVID-19 pandemic?
Has growth of 3.2 percent in the U.S. economy from 1994 to 2012 been consistent?,Is there evidence that the economy is growing 3.2 percent a year in 2012 despite the global recession?,Does the U.S. unemployment rate increase during the recession?,Are there any significant variations from year to year based on other sources?
Did Instagram change its algorithm to make only 7% of a user's followers see a post?,Are there any other changes in the Instagram algorithm?,Has this algorithm been changed before?,Have the Instagram algorithm changes contributed to these changes?,Have these algorithm changes resulted in a decrease in the number of people seeing a user's post?
Did the Indian government not want the players to wear shoes?,Did the Indian government need the players to use the shoes?,Did the Indian government allow the players to play barefoot during the 1948 Olympics?,Did the Indian government subsidize the players?,Did the Indian government assist the athletes with footwear?,Did the Indian government do this to the athletes?
Did Democrats send a letter to the prosecutor in Ukraine in 2018?,"Did all senators want to talk to a prosecutor to ""investigate Trump""?","Did all senators want a prosecutor to ""investigate"" Trump?","Did any Senate members send a letter to the prosecutor to ""investigate Trump""?"
Do Bernie Sanders's arrests relate to the segregation issue of 1967?,Did Joe Biden protest segregation in 1975?,Did both men argue against segregation in the following years?,Did either have a public speech at a racially based event?,"Reporting by Adam Greenberg, Reproduced by Adam Greenberg, Reproduced by Adam Greenberg.?"
"Does ""one of three patients hospitalized"" by their care be harmed by the care received?",Was the care of one of these patients harmful?,Was the care of this patient harmed by the care received?,Does this patient have no insurance?,Did the hospital provide medical treatment for this patient?,Has this patient ever received a medical bill for this hospital care?
Did the majority of black male baby born today in the U.S. end up in jail?,Are there records that show that the majority of black male baby born today in the U.S. did end up in jail?,"a href=""http://www.edsoutheasterday.com/colleges/article/commissioners-on-criminology/proposals/section8.html"">br>?"
Did any shows in the parliamentary channel receive ratings of more than one million viewers?,Is there a recent report showing ratings of television shows in the parliamentary channel?,Did the last analysis of ratings of television shows show parliamentary channel among the most watched?,Did this survey result in a survey of television shows which have a very high rating in comparison to all other television shows in the parliamentary channel?,Did this survey indicate parliamentary channel among the most watched programs?
Did the fence decapitate the suspect?,Did the fence contain anything that could have been used as a weapon?,Did the fence make any other type of connection to the suspect?,Did the fence have a large opening?,Did the suspect leave the fence?,Were other people in the area at the time of the incident?
Did Aldi offer this offer?,Was this offer valid today?,Was this offer available for everyone?,Was the $75 coupon available for all customers?,Do these deals last on multiple items at Aldi?,Are coupons valid for more than one purchase at Aldi?,Can Aldi change the offer?,Are there any other coupons associated with this sale?
Did Obama pay the FBI an informant over $1 million?,Did Obama pay the FBI informant any additional money to do it to Trump?,Is it true that Obama paid the FBI informant over $1 million to do it to Trump?,Is it true that Trump paid the FBI informant over $1 million to do it to Trump?
Did the majority of the deaths reported to have a cause other than Covid?,Those who died of other serious illnesses are at a very low risk for catching and transmitting cve virus. Are more deaths from other illnesses than from covid?,Is the number of deaths from other illnesses or illness a reasonable estimate of the total number of deaths?
Did the patron pay a Denny's restaurant tab for seven families?,"Did the patron leave a $1,500 tip to his server?",Is Denny's a Denny's?,"Did the patron leave the $1,500 tip to the server?",Were the seven families a large group of people?
Is there any evidence that this bonus has ever been offered?,Was the incentive based on any particular vaccine?,Is the doctor able to apply for this bonus?,Can this bonus be used to help pay for the vaccine?,Is there any proof of this bonus being awarded?,Is there any evidence to demonstrate the bonus is legitimate?
Did those states call for money to bail out their pension systems?,Did those states specifically call for funds to bail out their programs related to the COVID-19 outbreak?,Has California called for funding to bail out its pension systems?,Has New York called for funding to bail out its pension systems?,"Have states like New York, Illinois and California called for funds to bail out their pension systems?"
Does the Nigeria Center for Disease Control study show that over 50% of Nigerians have experienced virus exposure?,Does this study show that the Nigerians have been exposed to COVID?,Does this study show that more Nigerians have antibodies for COVID?,Has COVID-related deaths decreased in Nigeria?
Do the shots in this video consist of real war footage from Chechnya?,Do these shots include any non-war footage?,Are there real war scenes in these shots?,Do these shots constitute war footage?,Are these images in the video representative of the real or fictional situations in Chechnya?
Did Uttar Pradesh Police conduct a 30-day mask checking initiative?,Will Uttar Pradesh Police take actions during this period?,Is there any other specific policy for this period?,Will any other actions be taken by the police to ensure this 30-day period?,Is there any specific policy for this period?,Do any other states have similar programs to this one?,Is there any other state that has similar programs to this one?
Was a video captured of Taliban militants auctioning women for Rs 100?,Was there any media reports of militants auctioning women?,Was this video taken from the internet?,Was this video recorded in Pakistan?,Did this video have any Taliban branding?,Was this video aired in Pakistan?,Was this video related to the Taliban?
Does the proposed regional transportation tax cover a minimum of 10 years?,Has the proposed regional transportation tax been approved to last longer?,Does the proposed regional transportation tax cover a minimum of 10 years?,Does the proposed regional transportation tax cover a minimum of 10 years?,Is there a minimum amount of years a proposed regional transportation tax covers?
Does this article reference a 1915 referendum that went down in New Jersey?,Did a legislative effort follow the 1915 referendum?,Did New Jersey pass this referendum?,Is it true that the Legislature passed the 1915 referendum?,p>Do these votes show New Jersey women voted in favor of women's right to vote?
Did Stonehenge appear artificially created in 1954?,Was Stonehenge created by a person who was born in 1954?,Is there any evidence that Stonehenge was artificially created in 1954?,Did other people create Stonehenge in 1954?,Did this person create Stonehenge after 1954?,Is there any evidence that the structure of Stonehenge was a natural stone monument?
Are the remains of more than 250 soldiers dumped in a landfill between 2004 and 2008?,Did the mainstream media ignore this fact?,Was the newspaper the first to cover the discovery of this discovery?,Are the remains of more than 250 soldiers still located in a landfill in Colorado?,Are the remains of more than 250 soldiers still found in a landfill in Denver?
Did Reed and Goethals believe mosquitoes were responsible for malaria?,Did Reed and Goethals believe mosquitoes could transmit malaria?,Did Goethals and Reed believe mosquitoes transmitted malaria?,Was Goethals believed mosquitoes contributed to malaria?,Was Goethals believed mosquitoes transmitted malaria?
Did manufacturing employment shrink by a third from 2000-10?,Does the manufacturing employment statistic compare favorably with the average of the previous decade?,Did manufacturing employment not drop from 2000-10 because of a resurgence in the economy?,Do any of the previous statistics from this era support this resurgence in manufacturing employment?
"Is it true that Canada's governor general has expressed need for 958,000 emails to remove PM?","Is it true that Canada's governor general has expressed need for 958,000 emails to remove PM?","Is it true that Canada's governor general stated need for 958,000 emails to remove PM?","Is it true that Canada's governor general stated need for 958,000 emails to remove PM?"
Did incomes continue to grow in Wisconsin?,Did the average tax burden of Wisconsin residents decrease in nearly 50 years?,Have incomes increased in Wisconsin in recent years?,Did incomes continue to grow in Wisconsin in recent years?,Did the average tax burden of Wisconsin residents decrease in nearly 50 years?,Did the average tax burden of Wisconsin residents lower in nearly 50 years?
Did gun control reduce the number of exterminations?,Did gun control cause this mass extermination?,How many people were rounded up and killed?,Was gun control associated with mass incarceration?,Do there have any published statistics on the number of people rounded up and killed in gun control?,Are there any published reports on the number of people killed and why?
"Is there more than $2 billion recovered from Wall Street for the workers, retirees, and investors who were harmed?",Was the office that recovered the $2.1 billion owed Wall Street?,Is there a record amount of money recovered from Wall Street?,"Has the department recovered millions for workers, retirees, and investors?"
Did the police officer attend an incident in London on 7 May where two dogs were shot dead?,Did the police officer attend an incident in London in East London on 7 May where two dogs were shot dead?,Did the police officer attended the incident in London in east London in East London?,Did the police officer attend an incident in London in East London in East London?,Did the police officer attend the incident in London in East London in East London in East London?
Are all of Texas' legislators below 30 years of age?,Do millennials make up 25% of the state electorate?,Has any of the state's legislators in any position of power that is under 30 years of age?,Does the state have any age restrictions?,Are any of the legislators in this state under 30 years of age?
Did Mexico arrest hundreds of asylum seekers?,Did a caravan of asylum seekers arrive in San Diego with suicide belts?,Did over 500 asylum seekers participate in the caravan of asylum seekers?,Did the Mexico arrest those who participated in the caravan?,Did the Mexico arrest everyone in the caravan?,Did all of the asylum seekers have the suicide belts?
Did all these private jets park in Davos?,Is Davos a city that host a World Economic Forum?,Does Davos host a large amount of private jets?,Are these private jets parked in Davos before or after the 2022 World Economic Forum?
Did Pfizer funnel $12 million to Anderson Cooper as part of a deal to promote COVID jabs to the American public?,"Did Pfizer funnel $12,000 to Cooper?",Did Cooper receive any money as part of the deal?,Did Cooper receive any money from Pfizer as part of the deal?
Did Nancy Pelosi take $24 billion from Social Security to cover impeachment costs?,Did the Social Security fund have an equivalent amount of $2.4 billion?,Did Nancy Pelosi actually lose $2.4 billion on Social Security?,Did Nancy Pelosi change a major piece of the Social Security fund?
"Does this mean that ""100 million Americans with preexisting conditions can once again be denied health-care coverage by their insurance companies. That’s what the law was before Obamacare.""?","Is it true that if Republicans had their way, 100 million Americans with preexisting conditions can once again be denied health-care coverage by their insurance companies?",Is the reason for Republicans limiting access to preexisting conditions a specific case?
Did Pacquiao tell the public to vote for President Rodrigo Duterte's allies?,Is Pacquiao currently fighting for the Philippines in the 2019 elections?,Is Pacquiao's re-election the most likely outcome to the 2019 elections?,Is the 2022 election a good opportunity for candidates to avoid an election boycott?
Did APC take the revenue to N33 billion in 1999?,Are there any other factors at play that contributed to the increase in revenue?,Is the increase in revenue attributed to the increase in spending?,Did the increase in revenue be due to the increase in spending?,Did the increase in revenue be attributed to the reduction in taxes?
"Did this list contain all reporters, cameramen and producers at all times?",Did this list include all types of people?,Did this list have any names that were not mentioned in the article?,Do these reporters and cameramen have jobs now?,"Does the article mention any specific reasons that these reporters, cameramen and producers will lose their jobs?"
Did Florida offer special incentives to Deutsche Bank?,Did the state offer special incentives to other banks?,Did the state offer special incentives to any other companies?,Did the state offer special incentives to any specific bank companies?,Did the state offer incentives to any specific banks?,Does this policy apply to all banks in Florida?,Do other banks also offer special incentives to all states in Florida?
Was this fighter jet manufactured by a Filipino company?,Did this video exist in 2017?,Was this manufacturer filmed in 2017?,Was this model released in 2017?,Does this fighter jet have a price tag over P30 million?,Was this fighter jet manufactured in 2017?,Did this model achieve national popularity?,Did this airplane cost significantly more to produce than the previous model?
Is the original Space Jam website still running?,Is it accessible through a computer?,Is the Space Jam logo available on the original website?,Is the promotional website for Space Jam up and running?,Is any other information of interest available from this website?,Is this website still in use as of 2019?
Did Obama reduce his guest list to family and close friends?,Was Obama hosting hundreds of people for his 60th birthday party?,Did Obama's guests decrease due to this reduction in guest list?,Did Obama reduce his guest list because of this reduction in guest list?,Does Obama plan to host more guests in future years?
Did McClintock author three laws since his election in office?,Did McClintock rename two post offices?,Did McClintock rename other post offices?,Did McClintock rename any governmental buildings?,Did McClintock rename any post offices in the last election?
"Would 30,000 federal law enforcement officers be cut?",Would Trump's plan also cut the FBI?,Would Trump's plan also cut the DEA?,Would this plan include additional agency personnel?,Could Trump's plan include other federal agencies?,"Were there other types of federal law enforcement agents, other than FBI and border agents?"
Are there migrant caravans?,Are there migrants in the video?,Are there any migrant caravans on the ivy coast?,Is a video of migrant caravans in the ivy coast in May?,Is the ivy coast home to migrants on the ivy coast?
Is Health and Human Services admitting there has never been federally required monitoring of vaccine safety?,Is this statement true?,Has Health and Human Services consistently failed to monitor vaccine safety?,Has this statement been made for over 30 years?,Has the Office of Regulatory Affairs regulated vaccine safety in any capacity?
Did 70 percent of firearms recovered in drug cartel crimes in Mexico originate from the United States?,Does ATF data confirm this data?,Is this data accurate?,Have any firearms recovered from drug cartel crime in Mexico originated from the United States?,Has this data been verified?,Can this data be independently verified?,Are there any other reliable sources besides these published media outlets?
Is there a chance that the Bangladesh ship carrying fuel sinking in August 2022?,Is it likely that the Bangladesh ship carrying fuel are under the condition that there is a safe amount of water inside?,Are there any other factors to consider besides the safety of the Bangladesh ship carrying fuel?,Are there any other factors to consider in light of the safety of the Bangladesh ship carrying fuel?
"Did Willie appear in an episode of ""The Simpsons""?",Did Willie wear horned attire like the Pro-Trump rioters?,Did Willie appear in a movie?,"Did Willie ever wear the same attire as rioters on Jan. 6, 2019?"
Did Starmer say police should not prosecute Muslim gangs?,Did Starmer warn police not to prosecute Muslim gangs to prevent Islamophobia?,Did Starmer suggest Muslim gangs could be prosecuted because of Islamophobia?,"Did Starmer say ""Muslim rape gangs"" are a bad cause?"
Does it have an effective rate of 50 % for the vaccine?,Is the vaccine in general used in a larger scale?,Does it produce 100% results?,Did Sotto say that a vaccine can be used to inject a person with 50% effectiveness?,Is it a good strategy to inject people with 50 % efficacy to get higher outcomes?
Does the Army spend $7 million?,Is the Army sponsoring any of the NASCAR teams?,Is the Army paying for the NASCAR teams?,Is the Army paying for the NASCAR teams?,Is the Army paid for the NASCAR teams?,0 0 0?
Does email or a phone call tell you that you've won Mega Millions and ask you for a fee to claim your prize?,Did someone get a phone call saying that they won Mega Millions and asked for a fee to claim their prize?,Does someone receive a phone call saying that they've won Mega Millions and asked for a fee to claim their prize?
Did Trump become sued for racial discrimination in 1973?,Did Trump deny discrimination?,Did Trump initially deny discrimination in 1973?,Did Trump deny discrimination in 1973?,Did Trump deny discrimination in 1973?,Did Trump receive an award in 1973 for discrimination in 1973?,Did Trump deny discrimination in 1973?
Did this game have a release date of November 1999?,Was this game ever released?,Did this game come out on Microsoft's e-commerce site?,Did Microsoft make this game?,Did this game have any problems?,Did the e-commerce site that this game was included in make any money?
Did France deliberately suppress information about torture and mutilation at the Bataclan in November 2015 to avoid upsetting Muslims?,Did France intentionally suppress information about torture and mutilation at the Bataclan in November 2015 to avoid upsetting Muslims?,Does France intentionally suppress information about torture and mutilation at the Bataclan in November 2015 to avoid upsetting Muslims?
Did Biden put a 95% tax on prescription drugs in his proposal?,Does Biden plan to increase the total cost of medical insurance?,Will Biden's tax on prescription drugs lower health insurance costs in general?,Was Biden in favor of the tax on prescription drugs in his proposal?,Was Biden's plan based on a statement stating that prescription drugs will increase in cost?
Do statistics show 2 to 3 Texas women per week have major complications and 10 women per week seek help at an ER after an abortion?,Did statistics show 2 to 3 women per week are having major complications and 10 women per week are seeking help at an ER after an abortion?,Was the data presented in this article true or false?
Did the BBC report that the Ukrainian Army was behind the missile attack on Kramatorsk?,Did the attack in Kramatorsk kill more than 50 people?,Did the BBC report that Ukraine was behind the missile attack?,Did the Russian Air Force and the Ukrainian army carry out the missile attack?,Does the Ukrainian Army have any equipment capable of supplying weapons against Russian aircraft?
Does gun violence have a high impact on young African American men?,Does gun violence affect more young African American men than other causes combined?,Does gun violence exceed the other nine causes of death for young African American men?,Do statistics indicate a significant correlation between gun violence and death rates for young African American men?
Is there evidence that a Pakistani fan danced and teasing Afghan fans at the 2022 Asia Cup?,Can we establish that the Pakistani fan danced and teasing Afghan fans?,Can we discern who the Pakistani fan dancing and teasing Afghan fans was?,Can we gauge the context of the video by looking at the length of time the Pakistani fan danced and teasing Afghan fans at the 2022 Asia Cup?
Was the singer Dolly Parton saying Trump is better than 16 years of Bush and Obama?,Did Trump out perform Obama when he was president?,Did Parton say Trump is better than 16 years of Bush and Obama combined?,Was Parton saying Trump is better than 16 years of Bush and Obama combined?,Was Parton saying Trump is better than 16 years of Bush and Obama combined?
Is Donald Trump's electoral map based on Facebook analytics?,Did Facebook predict Trump's election?,Are Trump's election votes based on Facebook statistics?,Is Trump's electoral map based on Facebook analytics inaccurate?,Is Trump's election map based on a specific election?
Did Pelosi claim to have been arrested in 2021?,Did Pelosi claim to have been arrested in 2021?,Did the real Pelosi seek the speaker position again?,Did Pelosi have to be present to say she did not intend to seek the speaker position?,Did Pelosi receive any incriminating information from the police?
Did the shortfall of Rs. 1.7 lakh crores in government earnings in 2018-19 compensated by taking money from RBI?,Did the shortfall of Rs. 1.7 lakh crores in government earnings in 2018-19 compensated by taking money from RBI?,Did the shortfall of Rs. 1.7 lakh crores in government earnings in 2018-19 compensated by taking money from RBI?
Can the 60-vote threshold be preserved in the future?,Will Congress use the 60-vote threshold after 2020?,Will any amendments to a bill require the approval of 60 votes?,Will a bill pass without passing the 60-vote threshold?,Will all votes count for a bill that passes the 60-vote threshold?
Was the 79-year-old woman with an AK-47 responsible for the rescue?,Did the officers fought back from the gang?,Did the officer who was rescued take part in the police gang raid?,Did the officer who was rescued take part in the police gang raid?
Does this image show planet Venus?,Will climate change cause earth to change in 20 years?,Does the planet Venus look the same in 20 years as Earth does now?,Does the planet Venus have a higher percentage of carbon dioxide and methane emissions than Earth?,Does this image show a planet similar to Earth?
Did India have over 4.7 million free houses built since 1994?,Did the free houses benefit more than 14 million people?,Is the total number of free houses in India higher than 14 million?,Is the free house program only effective in rural areas?,Has the free house program in other countries already made a significant impact in rural areas?
Was it true that unions did not create the eight hour work day and the 40 hour work week?,Did Ford create these things or did unions?,Did Ford create these things or did unions do them?,Did Ford create these things or did unions?,Can you list the names of those individuals?,Finished?
Does Airtel Uganda have mobile money?,Did Airtel Uganda transfer its mobile money to a different entity?,Did Airtel Uganda lose USh4.1 billion?,Did Airtel Uganda transfer its mobile money business to another entity?,Did Airtel Uganda lose any assets as a result of this transfer?,Did Airtel Uganda reclaim the USh4.1 billion it spent on this transfer?
Is there evidence that SIDS becoming nearly non existent in 2020?,Is there evidence that babies will not receive the immunization in 2020?,Will the incidence of SIDS drop due to decreases in vaccines in the United States?,Will vaccinations in the United States increase significantly?
Did Duncan Jr. cosponsor only a single piece of legislation?,Did all of the cosponsors support this legislation?,Did the legislation ultimately get passed?,Was the legislation a passing piece of legislation?,Is the bill that he cosponsored in the last 10 years a passed piece of legislation?
Did the Obama administration prosecute more than 44 felons and fugitives in 2010?,"Did 48,000 felons and fugitives lie and illegally try to purchase guns in 2010?",Did the Obama administration prosecute more than 44 felons and fugitives in 2010?,Did the Obama Administration prosecute more than 44 felons and fugitives in 2010?
Was Ivanka Trump shot and critically wounded in Washington DC?,Was Ivanka Trump shot in a public place in Washington DC?,Was Ivanka Trump able to resume work despite her injuries?,Are any current medical records available for Ivanka Trump?,Did Ivanka Trump return to work after her injuries?
What actions did Obama call for addressing abuses of the subprime market?,Did Obama explain how he proposed doing this?,Did Obama discuss specific proposals for addressing abuses of the subprime market?,Was Obama unable to explain those proposals?,Is this a reference to a specific article?
Are higher paid union workers required to pay higher federal income taxes?,Are higher paid federal employees required to pay more income taxes compared to lower income workers?,Are higher paid union workers required to pay federal income tax more than lower income workers?,Are higher paid union workers required to pay more federal income taxes than lower income workers?
Is the entire state of Connecticut offering free drinks to anyone who gets the COVID-19 vaccine?,Is the state offering free drinks to anyone who gets the COVID-19 vaccine?,Is the state providing a total amount of free drinks?,Is there any other benefit related to the program?
Did the economic stimulus plan exceed $1 trillion in total consumption?,"If the US budget has spent $100 billion since the start of this fiscal year, would the economic stimulus plan exceed $100 billion?",Did the economic stimulus plan spend more than $100 billion as originally proposed?,Did the projected economic stimulus plan exceed $100 billion as originally proposed?,Did the proposed economic stimulus plan contain any major economic spending?
Are white applicants three times more likely than black or Hispanic applicants to be able to get a mortgage if they have the same credentials?,Do white applicants have fewer mortgage applicants than black or Hispanic applicants?,Do white applicants typically have more difficult loan application requirements compared to black or Hispanic applicants?
Has Obama added more debt than all previous presidents combined?,Will Obama add more debt than any other president in recent history?,Were there previous presidents with higher debt levels than Obama in the recent history?,Are any of the previous presidents with higher debt levels or more debt than Obama in recent history?,Are there any other similar historical figures?
Did his article talk about the financial crisis of 2007?,Did he discuss any specific issues surrounding the financial crisis?,Did he refer to his work in regards to his personal experience regarding financial issues?,Did he speak to anyone who would listen about the financial crisis of 2007?,Did he think a crisis was coming?
Does the 2021 infrastructure bill require all new vehicles to have kill switches?,Does the 2021 infrastructure bill require law enforcement to send a warning to drivers when impaired?,Is the 2021 infrastructure bill clear on the mandates?,Is there any data supporting the mandates of the 2021 infrastructure bill?
Are Kenya's revenue estimates likely to be stolen?,Has the Kenyan economy experienced a period of fiscal un-regulation for years?,Are any Kenyan officials claiming these figures to be true?,Have these claims been repeated over several decades?,Are the claims for this period consistent?,Does Kenya have any records of these claims?
Did this government send these letters?,"Did there have to be 12,000 recipients of these letters?",Did these letters have to contain a letter requesting payment of the debt?,Did the letter ask if the individual would pay the debt?,Was the letter required in order to collect a debt?,Would some of these debt collectors have been required to pay it back?
Would Sen. Whitehouse support bans on the internet?,Do the 18 senators in the vote support bans on the internet?,Is it possible for the majority of the senators to support bans on the internet?,Have any other senators supported bans on the internet?,Is Whitehouse known as a proponent of net censorship?
Was it possible for one test to contaminate the other titer of Covid-19 swabs?,Is the overall number of positives due to one person swab testing positive?,Would the presence of one person swab test contaminate four titer of Covid-19 swab tests?
Did Obama miss 60 or 70 percent of his votes in 2008?,Did Kerry miss 60 or 70 percent of his votes in 2004?,Did Bob Graham miss over 30 percent of his votes in 2004?,Did Obama miss 60 or 70 percent of his votes in 2008?,Did McCain miss 60 or 70 percent of his votes in 2004?
Did two scientific studies find men should inject the COVID-19 vaccine into the penis?,Did the vaccine increase penis size for some men?,Did the vaccine cause penis size in some men?,Are there any known studies regarding the COVID-19 vaccine?,Are COVID vaccines generally regulated by govt?
Was there a 3.5 million in the Israeli army?,Was there a 2 million population in the Ukrainian army?,How many Israeli citizens went to fight?,Is there any comparison between the two countries?,. Was there any plethora of Russian military personnel involved in these fighting efforts?,. Did Ukraine have a 3.5 million population?
Are Covaxin vaccines approved for children above 12 years of age?,Is the vaccine available to children who are 12 years of age or older?,Is the vaccine manufactured by Bharat Biotech?,Is Covaxin available in the U.S.?,Are vaccines available for Covid-19?
Is this crocodile a saltwater crocodile?,Was the crocodile captured after two people were killed?,Were two other people killed by this crocodile?,Is the saltwater crocodile native to New England?,Was this saltwater crocodile released into the wild?
Is it accurate to say that Swinson called for a referendum on leaving or remaining in the EU?,Did Swinson support ending the EU?,Does Swinson support continuing the EU?,Was the 2008 referendum on leaving or remaining in the EU?,Does Swinson support ending the EU?,Is there sufficient evidence to back Swinson’s call for a referendum on leaving or remaining in the EU?
Did this boy in Punjab spitting on the note throw the Rs 2000 and Rs 500 notes?,Was this person from a different town than this one?,Did he spitting on the notes throw these notes?,Did this person throw these notes after spitting on them?,Has this person been reported as a suspect in the crime?
Did two Royal Australian Navy ships ram a boat loaded with undocumented migrants?,Did the ships ram the boat after entering the country?,Has there been any evidence of anyone escaping from the boats?,Did the boats have a clear path?,Was the boat loaded with immigrants?,Did the crew of the boats leave on foot?
Would this bill commit the U.S. to spending 0.7% of gross national product on foreign aid?,What are the tax benefits of this bill?,Is there a link between this bill and the proposed tax benefit?,Would this bill's total tax benefit be significantly higher if it were passed?,Would this bill's tax benefit be significantly different if it was not passed?
Did Bob Geldof predict the internet's future in 1999?,Did Geldof suggest that the internet would help raise the Antichrist?,Did a satirical video from 2016 reveal any ties between the internet and the Antichrist?,Are the ties between the Internet and the Antichrist clear?,Did Geldof predict the internet's future in 1999?
Can a commercial vehicle (refer to article: What Causes 90 Percent of Highway and Bridge Damage )?,"Are these vehicles more hazardous than regular trucks, trailers, motorcycles and other types of vehicles?",Does this article explain the specific conditions under which commercial vehicles cause road damage?,Is this article intended to prove a point?,Is this article intended to support or disprove any argument?
Did Smith go to the hospital for a medical investigation?,Was Smith diagnosed with a life-threatening disease or something else?,Was Will Smith the subject of a medical investigation?,Did Smith undergo medical treatment?,Did Will Smith attend a medical examination before being diagnosed with a life-threatening disease?,Did Smith attend a medical exam before being diagnosed with a life-threatening disease?
Is it true that every 40 seconds a child goes missing in the U.S?,Can it be concluded that there are around 300 children a day who disappear?,Are there reports of this children disappearing as the percentage of all missing children increase?,Does this data support this claim?,Are there multiple studies on the child abductions?
Does Amazon close 3 of these warehouses?,Are the cookware sets available for $3?,Will all of these warehouses be impacted?,Can all of these cookware sets be purchased?,Did Amazon offer Tefal cookware sets for sale as a compensation to the workers of these warehouses?,Does Amazon offer these cookware sets for less than the cost of the warehouses?
Is it true that Central Bank of India is planning to close 600 branches by the end of March 2023?,Is there any proof that Central Bank of India is planning to close 600 branches by the end of March 2023?,Is there any evidence that Central Bank of India is planning to close 600 branches by the end of March 2023?
Are there specific criteria under the DREAM Act to be eligible for citizenship?,Is there a specific requirement under the DREAM Act to bring your extended family to the US?,Is the DREAM Act a good way to bring your family to the United States?,Does DREAM Act leave an eligible for citizenship window allowing you to bring your family?
Was it safe to go to the movies and the gym?,Was there anything to worry about in February 2020 relating to COVID-19?,Was it safe to go to the gym?,Was it not safe to go to the movies?,Was there anything to worry about in Febuary 2020 relating to COVID-19?
"Did the IRS hire 87,500 enforcement agents during Biden's presidency?",Is there evidence of this hiring taking place under Biden's administration?,Are there any other examples of Biden-related hirings?,Would these hirings be carried out exclusively under the Biden administration?,Are there any other examples of Biden-related hirings?
How long ago did the man enter Atlanta's busiest airport?,Did the man carry a loaded AR-15?,Did the person shoot the gun?,Did the gun come with a magazine?,Did the gun in the man's possession carry more than 100 rounds?,Did the man enter Atlanta's busiest airport on a public transportation system?,Did the man possess weapons in Atlanta?
Is this cloud in the shape of China?,Did this cloud form in May 2021?,Has this cloud been seen in past years?,Has this cloud appeared every year?,Has this cloud come from any other country in the past?,Is this cloud on an island in the Pacific?,Has this cloud ever erupt in the Caribbean?,Has this cloud produced a series of storms?
Did this tradition in the Senate go back 232 years?,Did the filibuster become the tradition in the Senate for 232 years?,Does the filibuster remain the tradition for the Senate?,Was the tradition of the filibuster a tradition from a previous era?,Was the tradition of the filibuster one that the Senate adopted a tradition from?
Was a marathon in China in het vergangenen Monaten recorded?,Was the 7th place finisher from this marathon in China?,Did this Marathon win any medals?,Does this Marathon have a 7th place finisher in China?,Does this Marathon have a 7th place finisher in China?
Did the woman's baby die?,Did the driver of the vehicle drive at a speed exceeding 94 miles per hour?,Did the person who drove the vehicle have a child?,Was the vehicle traveling at an accelerated speed?,Did the woman have a minor child?,Did the person responsible for the accident go to prison?,Did the woman appear before a judge?,Was the woman charged with negligence?
Did Politico's article say 20 million Ukrainian soldiers would have to die to retake territory from Russia?,Is this screenshot fake?,Did Politico report that 20 million Ukrainian soldiers would have to die to retake territory from Russia?,Is this article the same as Politico's article?
Is it true that some dog food manufacturers in China allegedly manufacture food in America?,Has this food lead to multiple deaths?,Did the Chinese producers of these products contribute to these deaths?,Describe the specific type of product in question. Are these products considered the best?,Are these products made in China?,Did these products cause the deaths of a dog?
Did the plastic cone mask the photo shows be invented as a practical solution to protecting faces in a snowstorm?,Did people who used plastic cone masks for protection in snowstorms wear these masks for protection?,Did people wear plastic cone masks in the 1930s?,Does this photo imply that plastic cone masks became common practice in the 1930s?
"Was there a total of 3.239.920 votes cast in Wisconsin, but only 3.129.000 registered voters?",Did those votes go to the Democratic candidates?,Does the total number of votes cast in Wisconsin represent a high level of voter turnout?,"- If these voters are in Wisconsin, would a higher turnout rate occur in other states?"
Are there any other statistics?,Does global food demand increase 50% to 77% by 2050?,Is there a general movement towards the future demand for food?,Is there any evidence of a larger global food demand than is being reported?,Were the data collected by the global food demand project?
"Did the Supreme Court determine that India will become known as Bharat from June 15, 2020?",Is there evidence to suggest that the government is making this determination?,Are there any further changes regarding this decision?,Is there any evidence for this change in any of the languages?,Is this a complete and complete decision?
Have many of these bonuses increased in value?,Do these bonuses increase in value over time?,Are these bonuses more widely available than previously reported?,Has unemployment and unemployment benefit increased in recent years?,Are government programs designed to provide tax benefits?,Have the benefits been available for all taxpayers?,Are any taxes reduced due to the tax cuts?
Was the person who appeared in the video acting as Harris at his State of the Union speech?,Is there proof that she was acting as Harris?,Did the person who appeared in the video take her mask off?,Was the person who appeared in the video wearing any clothing?,Was Biden at the State of the Union speech?
Did Rubio sell his home?,Did Rubio support the chiropractor?,"Did Rubio sell the home for $380,000?",Was Rubio involved in a deal with the chiropractor?,Does Rubio support the chiropractor?,Did Rubio raise the issue of automobile insurance with the chiropractor?,Has Rubio raised the issue of automobile insurance with the chiropractor?
Are there other parties contributing in total to Planned Parenthood's expenses to influence the outcome of the midterm elections?,Are Planned Parenthood's expenses for the 2018 midterm elections all of these related expenses?,Were the donations of the 2017 election funding the total of all Planned Parenthood's spending in the midterm elections?
Is it possible to receive a fine in flip flops?,Can I expect a driving ban after driving in flip flops?,Is it not possible to receive a fine in flip flops?,Does this penalty apply to a driver's age limit?,Does the penalty differ for women and men?
"Did 2,000 illegal aliens in the US in 2017 commit murders?",Was the number of ICE arrests for criminal crimes higher than the number of arrested illegal aliens?,Was ICE responsible for the majority of arrests for crimes that occurred in America?,Does the ICE report have information relating to these crimes?
Were there more than 2.4 million voters in Nairobi?,Does Nairobi have a greater percentage of voters than any other part of the country?,Do any 2% of the voters in Nairobi vote?,Are all of the votes that are registered by the city not in Nairobi?,Does Nairobi have a larger percentage of voting people than most other countries in the world?
Is a COVID 19 test kit manufactured by just one company in the world?,Is there more than one COVID test kit in the world?,Do COVID-19 test kits cost the same in some regions?,Are there COVID test kits in all other countries?,Is there any evidence that some companies manufacture tests specifically for COVID-19?
Did Marco Rubio spend $400K on this project?,Did Rubio spend money on this project?,Was this project a part of his election agenda?,Did Rubio's campaign donate money towards this project?,Did Rubio make this decision on his own?,Was this project funded by taxpayer money?,Did this project contribute to Rubio's election?
Did this poem about self isolation come out in the Spanish Flu pandemic or in the 2020 pandemic?,Was the poem about self isolation reprinted in the Spanish Flu pandemic or in the 2020 pandemic?,Did the poems about self isolation resurface during the Spanish flu pandemic or the 2020 pandemic?
Did the vaccinated population account for the majority of Covid-19 hospitalisations or death?,Did the vaccinated population account for the majority of Covid-19 deaths?,Did the vaccinated population account for the majority of Covid-19 hospitalisations or death?,Did the vaccinated population account for the majority of Covid-19 deaths or hospitalisations?
Did Rittenhouse attend a Trump rally?,Was Rittenhouse involved in a protest?,Did Rittenhouse attend a Trump rally?,Did Rittenhouse attend a rally in support of Trump?,Did Rittenhouse attend a Trump rally?,Was Rittenhouse responsible for two murders at a protest?
Did Virginia women receive an equal pay of $18 per dollar to men?,What percentage of the dollar does Virginia pay women for every dollar paid to men?,Would Virginia women's wages be equal to the number paid to Virginia men?,Would Virginia women pay women 80 cents for every dollar a day for $18?
Did the president appoint a committee consisting of three former Ministers to analyze the expert review report on the MCC?,Was this committee established to analyze the expert review report on the MCC?,Is this committee composed of members of any political party?,Were the members of the committee members of any political party?
Did the discount store chain threaten to bar the family from shopping at one of their stores?,Did the family have another incident with the discount store chain prior to the threat?,Did the discount store chain have any criminal history that caused this threat?,Did the family have any other allegations against them?,Did the husband have any criminal convictions?
Did Kingston have more earmarks than each of the Georgia delegation combined?,Did Kingston have more earmarks than each of the Georgia delegation combined?,Did Kingston receive more money than the Georgia delegation combined?,Did Kingston receive more money than the Georgia delegation combined?,Did Kingston receive more money than the Georgia delegation combined?
Does the Rife cure any disease?,Do the Rife machines cure more diseases than any other form of ray therapy?,"Have the Rife machines in use for over 5,000 years?",Are the Rife machines still available for sale?,Would it be possible for a Rife to cure all diseases?
Did 4000 RSS workers protest while performing unnatural sexual acts?,Did any RSS leaders have criminal convictions for performing unnatural sexual acts?,Did any RSS leaders have arrests for performing unnatural sexual acts?,Did any RSS leaders have criminal convictions for performing unnatural sexual acts?,Did any RSS leaders hold criminal convictions for performing unnatural sexual acts?
Does this hazard pay amount include all cases associated with the COVID-19 pandemic?,Does hazard pay cover victims of a single attack?,Is this hazard pay available to employees that have been working during this incident?,Does this hazard pay cover employees that have been killed or killed in the COVID-19 pandemic?
Did Campbell's customer service Facebook account insult a customer after she complained about the brand's commercial featuring two dads?,Did the customer respond to the Facebook insult?,Did the Facebook insult result from the customer complaining about the commercial featuring two dads?,Was this complaint related to a Campbell's commercial featuring two dads?
Are people paid to not vote in 2022 UP elections?,Are people paid to not vote in 2022 UP elections?,Are people paying to vote in 2022 UP elections?,Are people paid to vote in 2022 UP elections?,Are people paid to vote in 2022 UP elections?,Are people paid to vote in 2022 UP elections?
"Does a $1 million tax rate cover the cost of a $100,000 house in the US?","Does a $100,000 tax rate cover the cost of a $100,000 house in the US?","Does a $1 million tax rate cover the cost of a $100,000 house in the US?","Does 1 million tax rate cover half of the cost of a $100,000 house in the US?"
"Did this person receive $20,000 from a pro-Assad group?",Is this person the only candidate to receive money from a pro-Assad group?,Was this person in good standing when he took money from this group?,Is this person currently an Ohio state representative?,Did the contributor pay this individual tax?
Did the Sakonnet River Bridge have the 4 % of traffic that came from out of state?,Is there any proof that the Sakonnet River Bridge is carrying outstate traffic?,Does any data show that outstate traffic was significant over the bridge?,Do any other states have similar bridges?
Did this poll show declining public trust in the NLD?,Does this poll show public trust falling in NLD?,Did this poll show public trust in the NLD declining?,Is this poll showing public trust in the NLD declining?,Is this poll showing public trust in the NLD declining?,Are there plans to hold a recall election this year?
"In April 2016, did Planet Fitness allow men to use women's locker rooms?",Did Planet Fitness allow women to use men's locker rooms?,Did Planet Fitness allow women to use men's locker rooms?,Can men and women use women's locker rooms at Planet Fitness?,Was this policy announced prior to April 2016?
Was there a tweet that referenced the death of the Queen?,Did this tweet promote the film titled Black Adam?,Did the tweets reference specific celebrities besides Dwayne “The Rock” Johnson?,Is this tweet in connection with the film Black Adam?,Were these tweets related to the film titled Black Adam?
Did the average Head Start dollar return $5-$7 to the economy?,Does the percentage per dollar increase in economic recovery relate to the amount invested in Head Start?,Is the amount of money given in Head Start part of the economy's overall recovery?,Is Head Start part of any economic recovery?,Is there evidence for this claim?
Does a gram of oxygen produce 1000 tonnes of oxygen?,Can a gram of oxygen produce 10 tonnes of oxygen?,Is the total amount of oxygen produced by a gram of oxygen 1/10 pound of fire?,Is it possible to produce a gram of oxygen out of 1000 tonnes of oxygen?
Did Bush say this?,Did the administration say this?,Did the budget exclude the amount spent by Texas on this expansion?,Will other states receive this portion of funding?,Did Bush's position imply that all Texas Medicaid recipients would receive this portion?,Was there any other funding sources that would help this expansion?,Are the projected taxes paid by Texas taxpayers part of the funding for this expansion?
Did homicides in the 50 largest US cities increase by more than 17 percent last year?,Was this the largest increase in 25 years?,Did the increase amount to an 18% increase?,Did the increase not affect any specific category?,Are there more homicides in smaller US cities than in larger ones?
Did Indian soldiers celebrate at 4.30 in the morning after carrying out airstrikes on Pakistan?,Did Indian soldiers celebrate at 4.30 in the morning after carrying out airstrikes on Pakistan?,Did Indian soldiers celebrate at 4.30 in the morning after carrying out airstrikes on Pakistan?,Did Indian soldiers celebrate at 4.30 in the morning after carrying out airstrikes on Pakistan?
Did Perry receive some kind of federal help with his budget?,Did Perry take a great deal of help from Congress?,Did the Congress that Perry gave the help to agree to do something with the government's budget?,Did the Congress that Perry provided some help to negotiate with the government's budget?,Did Rick Perry admit to the help he received in his budget?
Is Fetterman urging a reduction in the prison population?,Does Fetterman believe that returning dangerous criminals back into the community will reduce crime?,Does Fetterman agree that there are too few criminals in the country?,Is Fetterman supporting any of his suggested policies?,Is there any evidence that Fetterman is supporting any of his policies?
Is this information true?,Did he suggest this change to bill payers?,Did he recommend this measure to the electorate?,Are electric kettles more energy efficient than regular kettles?,Did he encourage this idea?,Hopefully these are the last of the ole energy bills to be cut.?
Did the Supreme Court of Canada approve the case?,Have other Canadian officials been accused of crimes against humanity for implementing measures against Covid-19?,Does the Supreme Court of Canada have any appeals?,Will the Supreme Court of Canada be investigating the case?,Do other Canadian citizens have immunity from prosecution from justice in the Supreme Court of Canada?,Will the Supreme Court of Canada rule in favour of the case?,Are any other civil officials involved in this case?
Has this train service travelled over 2.5 million passengers since its commencement?,Was this train system popular?,Did this train operate in any other countries?,Is this train system popular outside India?,Is this train system an average of any other trains in the world?,Is this train system the highest capacity train on the world?
Did this percentage of votes in Texas not get tallied for Trump?,Did this number of votes in Texas not get tallied for Trump?,Was the total number of votes reported for Trump tallied accurately?,Have there been multiple reports of votes for Trump in Texas?,Does this number represent the total number of votes in Texas?
Does Australia’s 2021 official death statistics provide evidence COVID-19 vaccines cause thousands of excess deaths?,Are COVID-19 vaccines used by a small number of Australians who have been infected with coronavirus?,Are COVID-19 vaccines used for Australians who have been infected with coronavirus?
Did Donald Trump and his predecessor lose an election in 2020?,Was the election of 2017 rigged?,Is there evidence of a rigged election?,Does this claim reflect the general sentiment of Trump supporters?,Did Donald Trump and his predecessor suffer from a rigged election?,Did Trump or Trump's predecessor lose an election?
Did this hospital collapse in 2023?,Did the hospital close in 2023?,Is this hospital still open?,Did some of these patients die from the collapse of this hospital?,Is the hospital still open?,Is this hospital a part of Chinese society?,Is the hospital closed to the public?
Did Rahul Gandhi say that his maternal grandfather spent 15 years in jail for the cause of India?,Did Rahul Gandhi say that his maternal grandfather spent 15 years in jail for the cause of India?,Did Rahul Gandhi claim to have seen his maternal grandfather spend 15 years in jail for the cause of India?,Was the claim based on a person known to have lived in India?
Did Nancy Pelosi have the most bipartisan senators in the Senate in the last 25 years?,Does Nancy Pelosi think she is bipartisan?,Did Nancy Pelosi say she was bipartisan in the Senate during these 25 years?,Whether Nancy Pelosi believes she is bipartisan in her work?
Did Johnson profit from the loophole?,Did Johnson's wealth go up from his business?,Did Johnson cashed out from his business for $5 million?,Has Johnson doubled his wealth since taking office?,Has Johnson gone from zero to double his wealth?,Did Johnson benefit from the loophole?,Did Johnson cashed out of his business for $5 million?
"Was the shrimp caught near Homosassa, Florida?",Is the 102-lb shrimp a male or female?,Was the shrimp caught in a local restaurant or retail store?,Has this shrimp ever been tested and confirmed as a male?,Has the 102-lb shrimp been tested and proven to be a male?
Did unemployment increase between 7.8% and 9.9% under Obama?,"Was the S&P 500 at 1,115.1 when Obama took office?",Did the GDP go down 2.8% under Obama?,Did unemployment go from 7.8% to 9.9% under Obama?,Did unemployment go up between 7.8% and 9.9% under Obama?,Did Obama make the S&P 500 higher or lower during his administration?
Was there a silver alert activated in response to George's disappearance?,Is George 74 years old and has dementia?,Is George 74 years old with dementia and has diabetes?,Is George 74 years old and has Alzheimer's?,Do these individuals tend to get together regularly?
Did the CEO of Pfizer say this in the video?,Did he say that this plan could drastically reduce world population by 2023?,Did the CEO of Pfizer want to eliminate the world population?,Did this plan include the use of drones?,Did the Pfizer CEO make this claim in the video?
Did all staff at St Thomas' Hospital sign the Official Secrets Act?,Did two doctors refused to sign the Act?,Did one doctor refuse to sign the Act?,Did one doctor claim to have no knowledge of the virus?,Did any of the doctors that were sent to home 'on leave' have evidence of the virus?,Did all staff need to sign the Act?
Is the sea level the same on photographs taken 80 years apart?,Did the sea level rise to the same extent?,Were the photos taken at different times?,Is sea level a constant factor on photographs taken with an unknown device?,Have sea levels fluctuated during the 80 years that the photo was taken?
Has any US government authorized abortion abroad since Biden signed his order?,Did Biden's order allow the U.S. to fund abortions abroad?,Has Biden's executive order established international abortions?,Did Biden sign an executive order in a single year after he signed his executive order?,Did Biden sign the executive order in January of 2018?
Did Springsteen cancel the show after not getting the ticket sales they wanted?,Did Springsteen have all of the tickets sold by this date?,Did Springsteen cancel the Greensboro show after getting 8000 tickets sold?,Was there a cancellation involving Springsteen?,Did Springsteen cancel the Greensboro show?
Did five Chinese soldiers die in the India-China skirmish?,Did it have a direct impact on India?,Did it result in any civilian casualties?,Was the situation of any civilians affected?,Will the Indian Army have any force or support during any situation in the future?,Will there be any conflict in India from this event?
Does the user have any idea how long the niece has been missing?,Is it possible that the user has known the girl for a few years?,Have any of the family members reported that their niece has gone missing?,Has the page been viewed by anyone other than the account user?,Are there any other family members or friends that could possibly know of the girls' disappearance?
"Did the vaccine that Bill Gates created cause 47,000 children in India to be disabled?",Was this vaccine harmful to children?,Was the vaccine created at a hospital?,Did Gates violate the country's laws?,Is Gates no longer allowed to travel to India?,Did Gates receive the expulsion by a medical doctor in India?
Is Iran getting 150 billion dollars to purchase bullets?,Is Iran purchasing bullets from us?,Can Iran attack US troops with our purchases?,Would Iran be willing to take a trade route to our soldiers?,/Did Iran pay us $150 billion?,/Has Iran offered anything from the $150 billion Obama has given them?
Did the average hour of tax compliance for Americans be 6.1 billion hours?,Was this the percentage of American employees who spent 6.1 billion hours complying with tax laws?,Has this percentage increased since 2000?,Is there any data from 2015 to 2016 that shows this increase?,Does this increase result in the cost of complying with tax laws by Americans?
Did the election in Wisconsin have a turnout of 89%?,Was the turnout a major factor in deciding who was the winner of the election?,Are there any other records related to the election?,Were any disputed ballots reported in the 2020 election?,Were any of these reports based on true poll data?
"Did NTV Kenya quote the Education Cabinet Secretary, delaying the reopening of schools?",Did the Education Cabinet Secretary not quote the NTV report regarding delay in schools reopening?,Was there any news about this issue being reported on TV?,Did there have to be any news stories about this issue being reported on TV?
Was the number of American death within 9 hours of Biden's presidency reported by Fox News?,Was the number of Americans killed within 9 hours of Biden's presidency?,"Was Fox News reporting accuracy of 400,000 Americans' death within 9 hours of Biden's presidency?","Was Fox News reporting accuracy of 400,000 Americans' death within 9 hours of Biden's presidency?"
"Did the documents reveal that Pfizer, the FDA, and the CDC knew that the shot was not safe for pregnant women?",Are the documents published in a publication of public interest?,Has any of the documents published in the press show evidence this is true?,Will any of the documents be released on the market?
How does he say this stimulus will be spent?,Does he talk about the money remaining?,Are there any other benefits?,Does he say we don't need any money?,Did he talk about lowering the budget before the stimulus was passed?,Does he talk about the money remaining?
"Is there information indicating that there are 88,000 United States service members still missing?",Did most of those service members in question leave the country during World War II?,"Do 88,000 people in this country still have the opportunity to be reunited with their families?",Have a number of people been missing in this country in the past year?,Did this person leave the country during the previous year?
Did the Department of Health report a spike in COVID-19 cases that they attribute to Leni Robredo's campaign rallies?,Is the COVID-19 case spike due to Robredo's campaign rallies?,Is it disputed that the COVID cases spiked due to Robredo's campaign rallies?
Is 94% of carbon emissions caused by nature?,Is 94% of carbon emissions caused by nature?,Is 94% of carbon emissions caused by nature?,Is 94% of carbon emissions caused by nature?,Does Cicilline say this?,Has Cicilline spoken with Cicilline regarding this?
Is this video about eliminating coronavirus infected people?,Is this video about shooting civirinically infected people?,Has the Government of China started eliminating coronavirus infected people?,Is this video related to the Coronavirus vaccine?,Is this video related to the coronavirus vaccine?
Are there dogs and cats that are still euthanized in the Texas shelters?,Does euthanizing dogs and cats using carbon monoxide have side effects?,Do the Texas shelters used carbon monoxide?,Does the Texas shelter use this product?,Are the Texas shelters that use the carbon monoxide product able to do so?
Did the Indian football team play with France on barefoot?,Did the Nehru government provide shoes for the team?,Is the Indian football team part of the team that had to play the 1948 Olympics on barefoot?,Do any of the Indian football team members play football?,Did the Indian football team play with France on barefoot in the 1948 Olympics?
Is there any proof a French Magazine ran a cover mocking a Ukrainian fencer for not shaking hands with a Russian?,Was a Russian fencer pictured on the cover?,Did a French Magazine have any proof of the Russian fencer's refusal to shake hands with a Russian?
Did Trump and Democrats say that 109 people out of hundreds of thousands of travelers were affected by Trump's immigration executive order?,Did Trump say that 109 people out of hundreds of thousands of travelers were affected by the Trump immigration executive order?,Did Trump say that 109 people out of hundreds of thousands of travelers were affected by Trump's immigration executive order?,Did Trump's announcement of this fact make a big deal about Trump's immigration executive order?
Is it illegal to go inside the Capitol?,"Is there a ""law"" against the Oath Keepers going inside the Capitol?","Does this statement also indicate that this is the legal definition of ""going inside the capitol""?",Is this statement true that a group of Oath Keepers had access to the Capitol on Jan. 6?
Did Soros survive the crash?,Did a plane crash in Hungary occur?,Did Soros travel in his business plan?,Was Soros on the plane in Hungary?,Did Soros travel before or after the crash?,Is Soros related to political causes?,Does Soros support neoliberalism?
Did the Biden Administration have any plan to stop migrants after Title 42 ends?,Did the Biden Administration have any plan to stop immigrants after Title 42 ends?,Did the Biden Administration have any plan to stop migrant caravans?,Is it true that the Biden Administration has no plan to stop migrant caravans?
Did the lecturer receive a reward of $100?,Did the lecturer know about the reward?,Did any students benefit from the reward?,Is the award in any university?,Is there any reason to believe that the students benefited from the reward?,Is the reward available in the US?,Is the winner a student in the US?
Did Mayawati support the BJP to defeat the Samajwadi Party in Uttar Pradesh elections 2022?,Did this support come from the public?,Is this graphic based on a true story?,Does this graphic show the exact day the graphic was created?,Did Mayawati mention a specific race in her statement?
"Did administrative workers at colleges and universities have ""more than doubled over the last 25 years, outpacing the growth of students by more than 2 to 1 ""?",Did the growth of administrators at colleges and universities exceed the growth of students?,Did the number of administrators increase at colleges and universities more than double?
Is it true that approximately $20 billion of the $21.3 billion money went to earmark projects?,Did some of the funding allocated to bridge inspection go to these projects?,Is it true that the $16.2 billion spent on this project would have been used for earmark projects?,Does the amount of money spent on this project outweigh that of earmark project funding?
What is the substance in the vaccines?,Does it contain graphene oxide?,Does it contain graphene oxide in a healthy form?,Does it contain graphene oxide in a virus-related form?,Does the graphene oxide in the vaccines undergo a transition into a supercomputer/superconductor?
Do only 56 people a day die from COVID-19?,Do COVID-19 and seasonal influenza cause similar disease occurrences?,Are COVID-19 and seasonal influenza rare?,Are COVID-19 and seasonal influenza the only diseases causing increased mortality?,Are COVID-19 seasonal influenza cases lower in the US compared to seasonal influenza cases?
Did Obama's approval rate increase 20 points in 2008 compared to 2010?,Did Obama's approval rate increase 20 points in 2008 compared to 2010?,Do a lot of Americans support Obama's agenda or his policies?,Are the majority of Americans on the same page after a re-election?
Did Trump win the Ellis Island Award for their work within the black community?,Was Donald Trump one of only 3 people to have won this award for their work with the black community?,Did Trump win the Ellis Island award for her work in the black community?,Do Trump's awards tend to be prestigious?,Is Trump one of the most influential individuals in the black community?,Is Donald Trump the only person to win this award for his work within the black community?,Is Trump one of the three most influential people in the black community?
Is Ronaldo in a higher position than scientists to develop cures for COVID-19?,Is Messi the highest paid soccer player?,Does this researcher think that Ronaldo and Messi could help make a cure for COVID-19?,Is this researcher confident that soccer players are the most qualified to develop a cure for COVID-19?,Is the Spanish doctor in charge of research for this project a scientist?
Did the funeral home in North Carolina advertise in September 2021?,Was the funeral home's advertising in North Carolina illegal?,Does the funeral home's advertisement in North Carolina say that getting vaccinated is the most important part of getting old?,Does the funeral home's advertisement in North Carolina specifically describe what people should not get vaccinated for?
Did the US release plans to force every citizen to get a COVID-19 vaccine in fall 2020?,Did the U.S. release plans to force every citizen to get a COVID-19 vaccine in fall 2020?,Was the U.S. government required to make the COVID-19 vaccine compulsory for citizens of any age in 2020?
Is it true that the government doesn’t pay 100% of employee benefits?,Does this answer imply that the government is still facing the cost of government employee benefits?,Can this answer be analyzed and analyzed with a more rigorous methodology?,Does this answer imply that the government has still not been able to fully implement this policy change?
"Did Wall Street Journal article mention Hitler's intent to ""disrupt"" Germany?",Did Wall Street Journal article mention other expectations Hitler might have?,"Did Wall Street Journal article report expectations that Hitler would not ""disrupt"" Germany?","Did Wall Street Journal article report the expectation that Hitler would not ""disrupt"" Germany?"
Do these videos have evidence of terrorist conspiracy against India?,Are these video examples of sabotaging tracks that are shared for evidence?,Is there video evidence of attacks by terrorists?,Is there evidence that some people are pelting stones on tracks or by themselves?,Is the video evidence of terror conspiracy against India?
Did Hylton speak at the Democratic National Convention in 2020?,Did Hylton speak at the Democratic National Convention before she was convicted?,Did Hylton ever give a speech after she was convicted?,Did Hylton speak at the Democratic National Convention in 2020?,Do any other people speak at the Democratic National Convention?
Was there one law enforcement officer killed in cold blood?,Was this count accurate?,Was it the majority of these deaths in the line of duty?,Did they die in mass shootings?,Did police officers in mass shootings have to be shot?,Did this number represent a significant amount?,Is this number higher than in any other year?
Is that information true?,Is the top 20% of income earners responsible for 75% of federal taxes?,Was it only true in 2014?,Is it true that the top 20% pay 70% of federal taxes?,Is it true that the top 20% of income earners pay 70% of federal taxes?,Is it true that high income earners pay 70% of federal taxes?
Did Dalila Jakupovic play in the Australian Open in January 2019?,Was Dalila Jakupovic injured during the Australian Open in 2019?,Did Dalila Jakupovic fall during the Australian Open in 2019?,Is there any evidence of a crash during the Australian Open in 2019?
"Did Massachusetts lose 18,000 jobs because of the health insurance mandate signed into law by Mitt Romney?",Did Massachusetts lose jobs because of the health insurance mandate signed into law by Mitt Romney?,Was the total number of jobs that Massachusetts lost impacted by the health insurance mandate?,Did the number of jobs in Massachusetts that were lost as a result of the health insurance mandate exceed the total loss?
Does the novel Coronavirus pandemic fit a pattern of viral outbreaks that occur every 100 years?,Does the new coronavirus pandemic fit a pattern of virus outbreaks that occur every 100 years?,Does the novel coronavirus pandemic fit a pattern of viral outbreaks that occur every 100 years?
Was this image taken before the earliest reported appearance of a Leopard 2 tank destroyed?,Did this alleged image involve a Wagner Group tank?,Was this alleged image associated with any other attack against the Leopard 2 tank?,Was this alleged image a photograph of the Leopard 2 tank?,Was this alleged image associated with any other attack on the Leopard 2 tank?,Was this alleged image associated with any other attack on the Leopard 2 tank?
Do all of these agencies have to approve pipelines in Florida?,Is there any evidence of the process being reviewed by all 6 of these agencies?,Does any of these agencies have any influence in approving the pipelines?,Is any of these agencies the only ones who reviewed the pipeline?,Is any of these six agencies involved in this process?
Have there been any photos of a woman holding a rifle on a bus for at least 2 years?,Are there any pictures of women holding a rifle on a bus?,Was this photograph released in the US?,Has this photograph appeared on social media since at least March 2020?,br>?
Is Maxine Waters ( D-Calif. ) more likely to win an election to Congress compared to King?,Is Waters'higher immigrant population' less likely to win an election to Congress?,"Is Waters'120,000 vote minimum'more than King?"
Does Miami-Dade County spend over $20 million per year on the education of recent immigrants?,Does Miami-Dade County spend over $20 million on the education of recent immigrants?,Did Miami-Dade County spend over $20 million per year in the education of recent immigrants?,Did Miami-Dade County spend any money in the school system for educating new immigrants?
Did the study cite a specific age range?,Do the results of this study support an older age range?,Does this study claim people should live longer than this age range?,Did the study claim longevity should be in a certain time range?,Does this study claim longevity is around the 60s?,Does this research claim longevity is around the 70s?
Did Kemp dismiss concerns about voter fraud in 2020?,Did the Democratic Senate elect two Democrat senators after widespread illegal ballot harvesting?,Did Kemp dismiss concerns about voter fraud in 2020?,Did Kemp say the problem of voter fraud continued after election day?,Do Democratic senators elect two Democrat senators after voter fraud?
Did Corona beer sales drop sharply in early 2020 because consumers mistakenly associated the brand name with the new coronavirus?,Did Corona beer sales increase because of Corona beer?,Did Corona beer sales increase because of Corona beer?,Is it true that sales of Corona beer dropped sharply in early 2020 because consumers mistakenly associated the brand name with the new coronavirus?
"Is it true that the Obama Administration allows waivers from welfare work requirements ""only if they had a credible plan to increase employment by 20 percent""?",Is it true that waivers from welfare work requirements only if they had a credible plan to increase employment by 20 percent is a valid criteria for granting waivers?
Did hundreds of inmates at Orleans Parish Prison disappear during Hurricane Katrina?,Did many of the inmates at Orleans Parish Prison disappear?,Did more inmates disappear after Hurricane Katrina?,Do any records of any missing inmates have been found?,Was there evidence of multiple missing inmates?,Would it be possible to retrieve data for all missing inmates at Orleans Parish Prison?
Have most of venture capital funds gone to California?,Does Massachusetts spend the same amount of venture capital as California?,Approximately how much California invests?,Does the prevailing theory support the claim that California invested 50% of all venture capital funds?,Does this figure apply to other countries as well?,Is there evidence of venture capital spending in other countries?
Was Trump exposed for raping a 13-year-old?,Is this incident in retaliation for police killing black people?,Did Trump claim to have been exonerated for raping a 13-year-old?,Did Trump claim to have had an affair with a 13-year-old?
Will Oil and Gas executives need to replace all vaccinated staff?,Will executives need to replace vaccinated staff within 3 years?,Is it necessary to replace all vaccinated staff within 3 years?,Will this policy take effect after three years?,Are executive staff required to be vaccinated before leaving the industry?
Is this a whistleblower video?,Was this a recorded video?,Was this a recorded video in the year 2020?,Has this person been arrested?,Did this person help with the creation of fraudulent military ballots?,Did this person do any research on the fraudulent military ballots?,Did this person knowingly make or attempt to create these forged ballots?
Did the department's response target people who believe in this election fraud?,Did the department respond directly to individuals who believe in this election fraud?,Did the department response directly to individuals who believe in this election fraud?,Have multiple people sided with DHS's response?,Have all citizens participated in this election fraud?
Was the video of the four doctors talking about COVID-19 vaccines accurate?,Was the video edited in a way to make it more accurate?,Did any medical professionals make mistakes in the video of the doctors talking about COVID-19 vaccines?,Does a doctor make mistakes in video interviews about COVID-19 vaccines?
Did Trump help stop 4 US deaths in Benghazi?,Did Trump help protect Americans from terrorist attacks in Iraq?,Has Trump managed to prevent American deaths in Iraq?,Is Trump making sure no lives were lost in Baghdad?,Does Trump have any record of acquittals?,Was Trump the leader defending the U.S. before Benghazi?
Would it be politically correct to deport a criminal alien?,"Do the numbers of criminal aliens returned in 2012 include 500,000 versus the 340,000 total in 2013?",Did the administration not deport criminal aliens in 2012?,Did the administration not deport criminal aliens in 2013?,Did the administration allow criminal aliens to return in 2012?
Did Duterte sign a memorandum cancelling classes for school year 2020-2021?,Does Duterte hold that he was responsible for putting the measures into effect?,Does Duterte think that these initiatives are in accordance with the budget?,Has the government made this determination?
Did the School Development Authority complete any school projects over the past two years?,Did these school projects include replacing boilers or roofs?,Has this school development authority completed any school projects over the last two years?,Are any of these school projects associated with major renovation?,Are the school renovation projects that the SDAA have funded to date consistent with what is in the past?,Are any of these school projects in the past two years successful?
Are there allegations of Biden blackmailing Ukrain and seeking to drop the investigation?,Is there any proof of Biden blackmailing Ukraine with a billion in tax dollars to drop the investigation?,"Is there any evidence Biden did this, if any, to take advantage of Russia's investigations in Ukraine?","Are Democrats calling President Trump a ""dodge"" to this investigation?",Is Biden a dodge?
Did Adolf Hitler control all of his political opponents before murdering them?,Did Hitler murder all his political opponents before confiscating all of his weapons?,Did Adolf Hitler receive any special treatment after he possessed all of his weapons?,Did Adolf Hitler take all of his weapons after he had taken them?
Do Filipinos receive their state pension at 40 years old?,Will Filipinos receive their state pension at 40 years old?,Do Filipinos receive their state pension at 40 years old?,Will Filipinos receive their state pension at 40 years old?,Does the state pension begin at 40 years old?,Does the state pension begin at 40 years old?
Did Rick Scott invoke the Fifth Amendment 75 times about his dealings as head of Columbia/HCA hospital chain?,Has Scott invoked the Fifth Amendment 75 times about his dealings as head of Columbia/HCA hospital chain?,Is Scott denying this allegation?,Are Scott and the Columbia/HCA Hospital Chain related?
"Did COVID-19 vaccines cause 17,503 deaths?",Have COVID-19 vaccines caused 1.7 million adverse reactions?,"Did COVID-19 vaccines cause 17,503 deaths?","Did COVID-19 vaccines cause 17,503 deaths?","Did COVID-19 vaccines cause 1,7 million adverse reactions?","Did COVID-19 vaccines cause 17,503 deaths?"
Did all the candidates that Obama campaigned for in 2018 lose?,Did any of the candidates that Obama campaigned for in 2018 lose?,Did any candidate lose because of the lack of support for the campaign?,Did any of the candidates that Obama campaigned for in 2018 lose because of the lack of support?
Is there a 20 percent increase in murders in New York City as a result of the mayor?,Is there a 45 percent increase in subway delays under de Blasio?,Is there a 20 percent increase in subway homicides under de Blasio?,Is de Blasio responsible for most of the increases in subway homicides?
Is the sign real?,Was the sign posted outside the restaurant?,Did the sign specifically mention the Florida governor?,Is this sign from a real restaurant?,Did the sign mention the Florida governor?,Is the sign true?,Is this sign the only vaccinated sign in Florida?,Is this sign accurate?
Did 54% of mass shootings involve domestic violence in 2009-2016?,Did domestic violence make up 54% of mass shootings in 2008-2016?,Did domestic violence make up 54% of mass shootings in 2009-2016?,Did everytown for gun safety make the claim?,Was the data from everytown for gun safety accurate?
Did some fans attempt sexual assault against anti nazi orchestras in Chemnitz?,Did certain fans attempt sexual assault against anti nazi orchestras in Chemnitz?,Was there a reported sexual assault against anti nazi orchestras in Chemnitz?,Were there any records relating to the allegation?
Did Rittenhouse's mother drive him to Kenosha in Wisconsin?,Was there any other information related to the shooting?,Did Rittenhouse get into an argument with another man during the shooting?,Does Rittenhouse have a lawyer?,Did Rittenhouse's mother have any knowledge of the shooting?
Did NHS Test and Trace hide the presence of ethylene oxide between December 2020 and February 2021?,Is there evidence that NHS Test and Trace changed its packaging during that time period?,Is there any evidence of Health Canada testing a product on a product containing ethylene oxide?,Were the manufacturers of the test products aware of the packaging change?
Did there take place any shedding in 2018?,Did any of the load shedding have a permanent nature?,Was there any shedding in 2019?,Are there any upcoming load shedding?,Are the following 2 years in the plan for the shedding?,Are there any other shedding dates?,a href=http://www.wxyz.com/au/wxyz.com/au/wxyz.com/au/wxyz-p/aus/asp/audx/audx_tuv/pdfs?
Did Nelson fund higher taxes on social security?,Did Nelson fund higher taxes on social security?,Did Nelson fund higher taxes on social security?,Was Nelson paid more money than is needed on social security?,Did Nelson pay more money to raise Social Security?,Was Tom Nelson paid a lower amount than is needed?,Did Nelson receive money for his taxation of Social Security?
Did the average household have access to water at 95% of its average income and how many household still needed to be provided for?,Does average income need to be met by these households to become comfortable and feel they have a right to drink water?,Have these households experienced higher expectations at 95% of the average income?
Has Last-Mile Connectivity brought electricity to 71% of households?,Has Last-Mile Connectivity brought electricity to 71% of households compared to 27% in 2013?,Has Last-Mile Connectivity brought electricity to 71% of households?,Has Last-Mile Connectivity brought electricity to 71% of households?
Does this photo depict Palestinians praying in the face of the 2021 conflict with Israel?,Is this photo of Palestinians praying in the face of the 2021 conflict with Israel?,Is this photo of Palestinians praying in the face of the 2021 conflict with Israel?,Is this photograph of Palestinians praying in the face of the 2021 conflict with Israel?,Is this photograph of Palestinians praying in the face of the 2021 conflict with Israel?,Is this photograph of Palestinians praying in the face of the 2021 conflict with Israel?
How many individuals benefited from Medicaid expansion?,Have these individuals benefited from Medicaid expansion in the past three years?,Do these individuals have access to health care for the first time?,Is the cost of health care a concern for these individuals?,Have these individuals already benefited from Medicaid expansion?,Do the individuals mentioned above have access to health care for the first time?
Did more oil and gas spills occur than the Exxon Valdez spill?,Was this the number of oil and gas spills in 2012 that were compared to the amount of oil and gas spills in the entire Exxon Valdez spill?,Was this the number of oil and gas spills that occurred in the state?
Are black-owned companies getting 2% of SAA’s procurement?,Are black-owned companies receiving 2% of all SAA procurement?,Have black-owned companies received 2% of SAA procurement?,Have black-owned companies received 2% of all SAA procurement?,Have black-owned companies received any part of SAA procurement?
Is a double amputee a single amputee?,Was the police pepper-sprayed against the amputee while he was protesting?,Was the amputee deprived of his prosthetic legs during the protest?,Was any damage done to the amputee during the event?
Was the photo taken in 1945?,Was the child carrying his dead sibling's dead sister?,Was the child a boy or was the child a girl?,Did the child carry his dead sibling's dead sister by herself?,Did the child have a taser placed on him at the time of the photo?
Did Scott take cash from a company that profited from pollution?,Did Scott pay for the polluting business using campaign contributions?,Did Scott spend any money on reforestation efforts for the polluting business?,Did Rick Scott take any money from a company that profited from pollution?
Did Ebsen play Tin Woodman in the Wizard of Oz?,Did Ebsen have a good relationship with the cast?,Did the metal made Ebsen sick?,Did Ebsen play Tin Woodman in the Wizard of Oz in any films?,Did Ebsen play Tin Woodman in any films during the 1930s?
Was Judge Cannon part of a political rally for former President Donald Trump in 2022?,Is Judge Aileen Cannon considered to be involved in the Donald Trump documents case?,Did Judge Aileen Cannon attend a rally for the former President in 2022?,Is Judge Aileen Cannon currently employed?
"Is the 2017 GOP tax overhaul plan part of the proposal to codify ""fetal personhood""?","Does this language intent to codify ""fetal personhood""?",Does this legislation explicitly mention the requirement that human embryos are protected?,"Has this proposal included any language relating to ""fetal personhood""?"
How many dollars did every dollar donated to the Clinton Foundation come from the Clintons?,How many dollars did every dollar go to some charitable recipient?,"Did every dollar donated to the Clinton Foundation end up with the Clintons, their staff, or their staff members?",Did 15 cents of every dollar go to some charitable recipient?
Did men and women of color work the same amount in the same job last year?,Is there a difference in income between white men and women of color?,Did the women of color work fewer hours compared to men and women of color?,Did most women in the study experience increased productivity in their job?
"Did the video purporting to show a post election clash in Lagos, Nigeria date to at least October 2022?",Did there exist a post election conflict?,Did the video date to at least October 2022?,Did this video actually happen?,Has this video been distributed widely?,Will the video be released as a public record?
"Did Biden ask a reporter, ""Are you a junkie?",""" Did Biden ask a reporter, ""Are you a junkie?",""" Are there any other versions of the question?",Did Biden say that he was a junkie in question?,"Did Biden ask the reporter: "" Are you a junkie?","""?"
Was the 11-year-old girl charged with mistreating a woodpecker?,Did the 11-year-old girl fail to file a report with the FBI?,Was the 11-year-old punished after the investigation?,Did the 11-year-old girl receive a fine?,Did the 11-year-old girl take any responsibility for the mistreatment of the woodpecker?
Did Obama create the debt in this period?,Did Obama not cancel the debt?,Are there other ways to pay off this debt?,Is this the first time that a president has lied about the debt?,Did Obama give an account of his finances in this period?,Did the debt amount exceed the total amount owed?
Can the repoll be conducted at a polling booth that records more than 14% tender votes?,Is it required in this polling booth that a majority of voters voting in the poll must vote for candidates who won in their own election?,Can the repoll be conducted at a polling booth that records more than 14% tender votes?
Is the top 1 percent a larger group than the top 50 percent?,Are the top 10 percent tax payers more powerful than the top 50 percent?,Did the top 1 percent pay 36.7 percent of the tax?,Does the top 50 percent pay more than the top 1 percent?,Is the top 1% paying more of the tax than the top 50 percent?
Did Trump ask supporters to forward a message about the Congressional Reform Act of 2017?,Is Trump asking supporters to forward a message about the Congressional Reform Act of 2017?,Are there any other issues?,Is the Congressional Reform Act of 2017 available for supporters to support?,Is Trump offering any suggestions about the Congressional Reform Act of 2017?
Did Democrats reject Trump’s request for troops around the Capitol?,Was Trump asked for the troops to keep everyone safe?,Did Trump request troop escorts?,Is the response to Trump’s request similar to Democratic opposition to the request?,Did Trump call for support for a militarised Capitol?
Was Quaden Bayles 18 years old when he was discovered to have lied about being a 9-year-old boy with dwarfism?,Is Quaden Bayles a person?,Were there any medical records associated with this story?,Did someone in the news report contradict this story?
Did the Indian soldiers die in the deadly border clash?,Did a live video show the resulting exchange of bullets?,Did the resulting incident lead to another Indian soldier death?,Did any Indian military personnel escape the fatal border clash?,Did any of the killed Indian military personnel travel?,Was the fatality of any Indian military personnel an unspecified nationality?
What health care reform has an effect on Medicare spending?,How many unelected Medicare rationing board members are there?,Did the president's health care reform restrict Medicare spending?,Is the health care reform aimed at limiting Medicare spending?,Are there other restrictions?,Is the Medicare rationing board governed by a democratic organization?
Did Sudi mention churches burning during post-election violence?,Did Sudi say churches burning during post-election violence should be rebuilt?,Did Sudi say any other items during a post-election violence episode?,Did Sudi cite any other events in this alleged post-election violence incident?
Was there any truth to the questions the republican senators asked about impeachment trial?,Was there any evidence that remanded questions regarding the impeachment trial were elicited from two republican senators?,Did any republicans say they thought impeachment trial was legitimate?
Is this meme accurate?,Is there evidence that the meme accurately depicts the treatment of white and Black suspects?,Was the meme posted around the world?,Is the content accurate?,"Did this meme change following the events of October 15, 2017?",Did the meme share widely on social media?,Was the meme posted at the end of 2017?
Did the 1940's Milwaukee YMCA brochure have a carnival game?,Did the 1943 Milwaukee YMCA brochure have a carnival game?,Was the 1943 Milwaukee YMCA brochure violent or racist?,Are the 1942 Milwaukee YMCA brochures from this decade known?,Did the 1938 Milwaukee YMCA brochure have a carnival game?
Is this chapter the title of the book Trump was writing?,Is this chapter of the book Trump was writing about 'Never admit defeat'?,Is this chapter of the book Trump was writing about 'Never admit defeat'?,Was this chapter of the book Trump was writing about 'Never admit defeat' not a part of the book?
Would the “20-minute neighbourhoods” policy confine residents to their area?,Does the 20-minute neighbourhoods policy affect more than 200 people in Scotland?,Is it estimated that more than 200 people could live in a 20 minute neighbourhood if implemented?,Is it expected that the 20 minute neighbourhood policy will require homes to be maintained for a total of 20 minutes?
Did Scott claim to be trying to get waivers under the federal health care law that would deny Florida consumers the right to receive 60 million in rebates from their HMOs?,"Was Scott attempting to void his own HMOs, or use any of the money they were given to pay their healthcare costs?"
Is it true that 30 cr have been spent on PM Modi's Morbi trip?,Was the money spent on government expenses?,Is it true that PM Modi's Morbi trip took place on the first of every month?,Are these expenditures reported by RTI?,Is the report accurate?
Do the Wisconsin Economic Development Corp. have any numbers indicating job creation?,Did the Wisconsin Economic Development Corp. make any calculations for job creation?,Did any economists estimate job creation from the Wisconsin Economic Development Corp?,Did the Wisconsin Economic Development Corp. include in its data any sex comparisons with other economic development organizations?
Did Rahul Gandhi say Pakistan can be bought for less than $1 billion?,Did Gandhi tell people about the possibility that Pakistan could be bought for less than $1 billion?,Did Gandhi say Pakistan could be bought for less than $1 billion?,Did Gandhi ever say that Pakistan could be bought for less than $1 billion?,Did Gandhi ever claim that Pakistan could be bought for less than $1 billion?
How much do cancer drugs cost today?,"Was it $10,000 a year 15 years ago?",Has it increased since 15 years ago?,"Is it $10,000 a month now?",Is there an average monthly cost of cancer drugs?,Is there data showing a monthly cost of cancer drugs?,Is it clear if these costs have increased in the past 15 years?
Did James Mattis say that people who burn the American flag would spend two years in the military?,Did Mattis say that people who burn the American flag would spend two years in the military?,Was there any evidence that Mattis said this?,Was this statement taken from James Mattis's speech?,Did any of the statements Mattis made about a burning American flag substantiate this claim?
Has Mike Pence openly referred to God's request to sacrifice a grandchild?,Does Mike Pence recognize that God would not ask him to sacrifice a grandchild?,Has Mike Pence explicitly referred to God as asked to sacrifice a grandchild?,Has Mike Pence publicly referred to God's request for sacrifice a grandchild?
Did Bayern Munich form a number 8 on the field after their 8-2 win over Barcelona?,Did Bayern Munich make a statement in response to Barcelona's 8-2 win?,Are the 8 - 2 scores a record in the Champions League?,No Answer>No Answer>No Answer>No Answer>?
Did Zimmerman die within two years of a Twitter controversy involving Trayvon Martin's body?,Did Zimmerman die within two years of a Twitter controversy involving Trayvon Martin's body?,Were there additional reports involving Zimmerman's death?,Was Zimmerman found dead in January 2017?
Did the New Jersey State budget include balanced budgets?,Did the state budget include no new taxes for anyone?,Is the new jobs growth the best in the state's history?,Did New Jersey's jobs growth increase over the past twelve years?,Are the jobs created by the government funded from any one source?,Are there any programs funded from a state budget?,Is Merit pay offered to teachers?,Did the state's schools get the most education funding ever?
Did a study in 2014 show that nasal flu vaccines can cause strep A infections?,Were nasal flu vaccines manufactured by the FDA or another entity?,Does this vaccine have the same effects that other vaccines have on humans?,Do any children's nasal flu vaccines still contain the same ingredients?
Did Allen ever face cocaine charges?,Has Allen ever faced cocaine charges in any significant capacity?,Has Allen ever received a mug shot?,Did Allen ever receive a mug shot during his time on probation?,Has Allen ever had a mug shot?,Did Allen appear in a drama?,Did Allen appear in a film or a television series?
Did Russia's attack on Ukraine in accordance with Article 106 and 107 of the Charter of the United Nations give the 'Operators' of the Second World War the right to intervene against the countries that fought them?,Did Russia's attack on Ukraine in accordance with Article 106 and 107 of the Charter of the United Nations give the 'Operators' of the Second World War the right to intervene against the countries that fought them?,Was this right not explicitly in the Charter of the United Nations?
"Did the SNP vote last night to close 545,000 jobs?","Did the SNP vote to close 545,000 jobs?","Has the SNP ever taken a step towards closing 545,000 jobs?",Is SNP a very old political party?,Is the SNP a well established political party?,Are there any other major political parties associated with the SNP?
Was a Nigerian election staffer caught thumbprinting ballots in 2023?,Was a Nigerian election staffer caught thumbprinting ballots in 2023?,Was the Nigerian election staffer caught thumbprinting ballots in 2023?,Is the Nigerian election staffer named in this article currently at a prison?
Was the criminal caught after cutting off man buns?,Was the criminal caught by police after cutting off man buns?,Was the criminal punished for attempting to cut off man buns?,Is there a criminal record that could be used to prove criminal behavior?,Was the criminal caught by police after cutting off man buns?
Is Ruehlemann related to Corona?,Did Ruehlemann die unexpectedly?,Was Ruehlemann related to Corona?,Has Ruehlemann ever been charged with any crime?,Has Ruehlemann ever been charged with any crime?,Does this make the death of Ruehlemann seem like a 'confounding' event?
Did Blasey Ford ever call a friend on a cellphone after being assaulted by Brett Kavanaugh?,Was cell phones first manufactured in the 1980's?,Are cell phones still manufactured today?,"Was Blasey Ford referred to as ""a cell phone nut""?",Did Blasey Ford call a friend on her cell phone in 1982?
"Does the phrase ""call #77 or 112 on your cell phone"" mean there are no emergencies in the area?","Does the phrase ""call #77 or 112 on your cell phone"" mean if there are no emergencies in the area?",Does this imply that in the area the phone would connect you to the emergency services?
Is there evidence that Bruce Rauner has lost 1 billion in total from budget crisis?,Does Rauner have a record of wasting millions?,Has Rauner also incurred a serious budget crisis?,Did Rauner attempt to avoid a recession?,Does Rauner have any other sources of income besides his income tax?
Did autopsies prove that COVID-19 is a blood clot?,Did the whole world have a wrong idea as to the pandemic?,Do autopsies confirm that COVID-19 is a blood clot?,Did the world really have a wrong idea when it came to treating the pandemic?
Are hospitals preparing for 96 million coronavirus infections?,Is this data in general?,Is this news based on information from multiple sources?,Did this information come from multiple sources?,Is there an exact date for this information to be released?,Does this data suggest any deaths related to this pandemic?
Was there a massacre by the Russian Armee in Butscha?,Was the massacre a riot?,Is the city where the Massacre took place still in Ukraine?,Was the massacre of a Russian Armee in Butscha after the Ukrainian forces had recaptured it?,Is this video from the Ukrainian police from April 2-10th?
Did hundreds of seats appear to have been vacated following the roll call vote at the Democratic National Convention?,Was this event a planned protest?,Did this event take place in 2016?,Did this event result in empty seats?,Are there any other recent history documents relating to this event?,Do these records help explain why this event occurred?
Did the 2019 coronavirus cause sudden death?,Has the coronavirus caused sudden death due to multiple factors?,Was the 2019 coronavirus detected through a CDC sample?,Is this CDC sample reliable or can this test result be obtained from other researchers?,Was this CDC sample used?
Did two ST category candidates who flunked Railway exams get called for appointment?,"Did the candidates get called for appointment under the ""Best among failed candidates"" category?",Was the selection process based on the individual candidates' abilities rather than their qualifications?,Did the candidates fail in the Railway exams?,Was the selection process based on previous candidate experience?
Do Canada's regulations regarding COVID-19?,What are the consequences for non-compliance with the guidelines?,Are there any potential consequences for omissions of COVID?,Is it worth paying for not wearing mask in a country that is subject to COVID-19?,Are there any other consequences for inaction in a country that is subject to COVID-19?
Will the post from ALDI stores actually be sent?,Will the post sent to those commenting be worth £3?,Will the post from ALDI stores really be sent?,Will ALDI's Facebook user in the post received a free food box?,Would ALDI store products used in the post be included in the box?
"Does the UN recommend 300 police to 100,000 citizens in Nigeria?","Does a similar report in 2015 say 400 police to 100,000 citizens?",Does this report state that in Nigeria the number of police are 175 or 400?,Does this report state that the number of policemen in Nigeria is 175 or 400?,Do any other estimates for police in Nigeria indicate a higher number of policemen in Nigeria than in the United States?
Did Texas Department of Public Safety statistics show that 1.6 percent of crimes are committed by unauthorized immigrants?,Did Texas Department of Public Safety statistics show that 1.6 percent of crime is committed by unauthorized immigrants?,Was Texas Department of Public Safety data accurate with respect to crime by unauthorized immigrants?,Will any crime by unauthorized immigrants result in increased violence in the future?
Was an infographic of 2020 Democratic presidential candidates that aired on MSNBC exclude Sen. Bernie Sanders?,Did an infographic of 2020 Democratic presidential candidates that aired on MSNBC include Senator Bernie Sanders?,Was the infographic of 2020 Democratic presidential candidates excluded from the entire list?,Are there any other statements that contradict this statement?
Did Manson die at the age of 83?,Was Manson known for serial killings?,Did Manson commit any mass killings?,Was Manson related to any other notable mass killings in the past?,Did Manson ever murder his victims in this way?,Was Manson murdered in a sexual way?
"Do medical exemptions exist for people who ""shouldn't get the [COVID-19] vaccine"", including those with a history of blood clotting or an adverse reaction to a prior vaccine?",Are there exemptions for certain people with a history of blood clotting or an adverse reaction to a previous vaccine?
Do about 25 Texas cities and 39 states ban texting while driving?,Is there a link to the database to see all texting bans?,Is there a link to the database to see all bans?,Are there any counties that have banned texting while driving?,Is there evidence that cities and states banned texting while driving?,Are there any cities and states that ban texting while driving?
"Did the State Department confirm that 42,000 jobs created by the Keystone XL pipeline were 'ongoing enduring jobs'?","Does the State Department state that 42,000 jobs created by the Keystone XL pipeline are 'ongoing enduring jobs'?",Do Keystone XL jobs provide jobs that will sustain the economy for many decades to come?
Did 5.1 billion people watch the funeral?,Did BBC report how many people watched the funeral?,Was the amount of television viewers in the United States higher than the number in the United Kingdom?,Did TV audiences in the United States watch the funeral?,Did it receive many votes?,Did any viewers report negative reactions to the funeral?
Did this work?,Did this project help people?,Did this work show people a secret image of pancakes?,Did this project lead to anything?,Was this work on paper?,Are these two examples from the movie?,Did this project come out on a different currency?,Have these bills had any other effects on people?,Does the film use real people?
Did the 1973 HMO Act come into effect before Richard Nixon?,Did Nixon act at that time to prohibit the profit from healthcare?,Did the 1973 HMO Act allow the profit from healthcare?,Did Nixon support the HMO Act?,Did Nixon vote for the 1973 HMO Act?,Does the 1973 HMO Act mandate profit from healthcare?
Is there any data to back up this claim?,Did hurricanes increase in frequency in the U.S. in the 2000s?,Has frequency of hurricanes decreased in the U.S. since 1900?,Are there any hurricanes that are greater than Category 2 power?,Was Hurricane Andrew a Category 2 hurricane or hurricane that was Category 1 power?
Did federal agents confiscate masks and other medical supplies?,Did the N95 masks show any COVID-19 positive result?,Did the N95 masks contain other things?,Did anyone test positive for COVID during the incident?,Did the N95 masks containing other supplies contain COVID-19?
"Does the Republican budget plan say that people over 65 who are eligible for Medicare will have to pay around $6,400 more than they would today?",Does the Republican budget plan include other proposals that make Medicare more expensive for older people?,Does the Republican budget plan include other proposals that make Medicare more expensive for older people?
Did the report list South Africa as a drug capital of the world?,Is there any evidence that South Africa's drug problems stem from a political/nationalistic view?,Was the report released in 2014?,Was the report about drug use in South Africa?,Does this report state that a certain type of sex and ethnicity constitutes a drug capital?
Did a large portion of Green Cards be based on job skills?,Was the majority of green Cards based on economic needs?,No one was authorized to issue Green Cards for jobs or economic needs. Is a large number of green cards based on economic need?,Is the percentage of Green Cards based on economic needs less than 20%?
Did the scuffle occur during the 2022 House of Commons vote on fracking?,Is there any evidence the scuffle occurred prior to the vote?,Is it possible that a scuffle occurred after the vote on fracking in the UK?,Is the date of the scuffle in the UK not known?,Is the picture taken in an area of the UK where the people are more likely to be involved in the scuffle?
Did the police in Denmark kill dogs due to animal cruelty?,Did the pheasants in the dungeons take pet pigs?,.. Did Denmark's police kill pet pigs due to animal cruelty?,Has Denmark's police towed pet pigs?
Are only 25% of Texas high school students prepared for college?,Are the percentages of Texas high school students who graduate prepared for college the same across Texas?,Is there any evidence of this?,Is there a need for an increase in Texas high school tuition?,Is Texas tuition higher than any other state?
Is there a printed flyer from Ireland that required girls to stay indoors after 6 pm?,Is this image from a flyer published by Ireland?,Is this flyer from Ireland?,Is this flyer from Ireland related to a movie?,Is the text of this flyer from Ireland relevant to this movie?
Are ICD-10 Z codes allowed to track those unvaccinated against Covid-19?,Are Covid-19 vaccines illegal?,Does the Covid-19 vaccine require a vaccine to be administered?,Did the vaccine against Covid-19 rely on ICD-10 Z codes?,Will the Covid-19 vaccine require ICD-10 Z codes to be administered?,Does the Covid-19 vaccine include ICD-10 Z codes?
Did OpenAI's ChatGPT technology not write a poem admiring Donald Trump?,Did the software write a poem admiring Joe Biden?,Did OpenAI's ChatGPT software successfully draft a poem for Biden?,Did OpenAI's ChatGPT software write a poem for Donald Trump?
Did the healthcare workers in India administer vaccines on patients without inserting needles?,Was the hospital system aware that the healthcare workers were making mistakes?,Is the hospital system concerned that the healthcare workers are making mistakes?,Were the healthcare workers in the hospital in a state of intoxication when injecting patients?
Did the student have to take a taxi home for 234 rupees?,Did the student have to take a flight home before she got her visa?,Did the student travel with a passport?,Did the Indian Embassy drop the student off in Mumbai to take her to the Indian Embassy?,Did the student stay with a family while she was in Mumbai?
Has Obama been spending money defending lawsuits about his birth certificate?,Did Obama spend money for defending the lawsuits?,Has Obama paid any of the lawsuits related to his birth certificate?,Has Obama spent money for defending lawsuits about his birth certificate?,Are there any other litigations related to his birth certificate?
Are abortions possible in Ohio right now?,Are abortions allowed in Ohio right now?,Do abortions in Ohio cause unnecessary harm?,Does Ohio have laws banning abortions?,Are abortions illegal in Ohio right now?,Do abortions in Ohio include legalizing certain health services?,Do abortions affect the unborn?
Were the scholarships underfunded from the 2012 HOPE scholarship?,Did the state actually wipe through the scholarship by fiscal year 2013?,Was the 2012 HOPE scholarship not available to the 2013 fiscal year?,Are the 2015 HOPE scholarship funds still available to the 2013 fiscal year?,Are the 2013 HOPE scholarship funds unused?
Did the online change of address happen in 2008?,Did the online change of address make it possible for voters to cast provisional ballots?,Was the estimated total number of voters that could have changed their address online the 2008 election?,Could this same number of voters cast provisional ballots in 2008?,"Were there an estimated 130,000 voters who could have changed their address and voted a regular ballot?"
Did Airtel offer 200GB data for 1 month?,Did Airtel promise to provide 200GB data for 1 month?,Did Airtel offer 200GB data for 1 month?,Did Airtel offer 200GB data for 1 month?,Do people claim 200GB data for 1 month?,Did Airtel promise to provide 200GB data for 1 month?,Did Airtel promise 200GB data for 1 month?
Has it cost £165 000 to rename Black Boy Lane as La Rose Lane?,Have other uses for Black Boy Lane changed as a result?,Have any other uses for Black Boy Lane changed as a result?,Were the cost of the renaming of Black Boy Lane different than other uses?
Does the average college student take 6 years to get a four year degree?,Does the average college student take fewer than 6 years to get a four year degree?,Are there any specific factors that contribute to this time span?,Does this time span mean that students are taking 6 years to obtain their four year degree?
Did the Governor have a deficit of 11 billion dollars?,Did Governor come to office with a deficit of 11 billion dollars?,Did Governor's deficit exceed 11 billion dollars?,Was the governor's deficit high or low?,Did Governor's deficit exceed 11 billion dollars?,Did Governor spend more money than the state would have wanted to?
Did the Census show that there were successes in extending basic services?,"Is the number of households with access to electricity at 12.1 million, which translates to 85%,?",Do 9 out of 10 households have access to water?,Are there other success stories with extending basic services?,Is it true that there are successes in extending basic services?
Have we used the general accepted accounting principles here in this building for two years?,Did we use general accepted accounting principles?,Are there any other general accepted accounting principles?,Did we use any general accepted accounting principles there?,Has this location used general accepted accounting principles at any of these locations?,Has this location used general accepted accounting principles in the past two years?
"Are there 300,000 babies born deformed every year in this country because of women who are alcoholics?","Is alcoholism related to 300,000 babies?",Do women who are alcoholics tend to have a higher chance of having babies deformed?,Are there women who are alcoholics that are not considered'sacrificial' women?
Did Lauren Boebert pose with AR-15 style guns?,"Was the shooting at the Boulder, Colorado mass shooting the reason behind Boebert's poses?","Was the shooting at the Boulder, Colorado mass shooting the reason for Boebert's poses?","Was the shooting at the Boulder, Colorado mass shooting the reason for Boebert's poses?"
Is it true that Mahatma Banerjee will make Hindus cry?,Are there any other sources on this subject?,Did Banerjee say he will make Hindus cry after winning 42 seats?,Did Banerjee do this on a positive note?,Do other media outlets also report on these topics?
Is Johnson the president of the 2020 RNC?,Did Johnson advocate for 'household voting' at RNC?,Have the RNC Republicans considered 'household voting' before?,"'As part of this change to RNC, 'household voting' would not require voter signatures.?"
Are there any confirmed cases of Ebola in the United States?,Have there been any confirmed outbreaks of Ebola in the United States?,Are there suspected cases of Ebola in the United States?,Does it say there are confirmed cases of Ebola in the United States?,Does it say there are cases of Ebola in the United States?
"Did Werner Herzog say ""Dear America: You are waking up, as Germany once did, to the awareness that 1/3 of your people would kill another 1/3, while 1/3 watches.""?",Would 1/3 of the U.S.'s population be on the verge of violence in the coming year?
Did Bush lift the ban on AR-15 guns after he lifted the ban on AR-15 guns?,Did Bush reverse the ban on AR-15 guns after his ban on AR-15 guns?,Did the number of AR-15 type gun massacres increase by 183% after Bush lifted the ban?,Did the number of AR-15 type gun massacres increase by 183% after Bush lifted the ban on AR15 guns?
Does the mayor of Minneapolis want a defunding of police?,Was it Obama who settled 1 million Islamics in Minnesota?,Did this move cause any rioting after this defunding?,Did the city support a rioting riot after this defunding?,Does the mayor want the city to do a reaffirming of police?
Is this a picture of an autistic boy?,Is this a picture of an autistic boy and a dog?,Has this autistic boy been missing for 8 hours?,Do these parents have this dog?,Has this autistic boy been in a stable?,Is this a picture of a puppy?
Has the Ninth Circuit had an overturned record of near 80%?,Does the Ninth Circuit have a high turnover of judges?,Does the Ninth Circuit have the best adherence to its overturned records?,Is there any evidence to support a large turnover of judges in the Ninth Circuit?
"Is COVID-19 vaccine being provided in India free of cost, while US & UK charging 5000 + 3000 per dose?",Has the US & UK increased the fee for COVID-19 vaccine from Rs. 5000 & 3000 per dose respectively?,Have all the US & UK countries increased the fee for COVID-19 vaccine from Rs.?
Did all of the unconfirmed claims about voting illegally or were all of those claims false?,Was there more illegal votes cast in the Wisconsin 2020 election than Biden's margin of victory?,Were all of the illegal votes in the Wisconsin 2020 election cast in a single day or did a day-long election?,Did Biden win by any more than Biden's margin of victory?
Did 85% of IDEA charter-school students come from low-income families?,Did about 99% of IDEA graduates go to college?,Did more IDEA students go to college than low-income students?,Does 85% of IDEA charter-school students go to college?,Have 95% of IDEA charter-school students gone to college?
Is the decision to hang Bhagat Singh made on February 14?,Is the verdict a hung judgement?,"Is the sentence of execution for the death of Bhagat Singh ""deliberate"" or ""intentional""?",Is the verdict a hung decision?,Is the execution likely to occur in any jurisdiction?
Did people die?,Did Pakistanis explode bombs in celebration of the win over India?,Are Pakistanis celebrating an 8-wicket win?,/does the Pakistani response constitute a terrorist attack?,Are there any official figures for the number of people injured?,Was any country named in any media?
Did owner admit that it was not brought down by 9/11?,Is there any evidence that this specific demolished building is based on 9/11?,Did this particular demolition happen on a day which was not 9/11?,Is this demolished building the sole responsible for the destruction of this particular building?,Are any other records of this demolition being reported?
Did the train carry chemicals banned in 1974?,Was the chemical on the train listed as being of significant danger to the public?,Did the train derailed in Ohio?,Did the train cause any other incidents at the time?,Was the train company responsible for the derailment?,Will another train crash in Ohio be avoided if the train was being considered safe?
Did Bush leave a note welcoming Clinton to the White House in 1993?,Did Bush leave a note welcoming Clinton to the White House in 1993?,Did Bush leave any notes welcoming Clinton to the White House in 1993?,Did Bush leave a note welcoming Clinton to the White House in 1993?,Did Bush leave any notes welcoming Clinton to the White House in 1993?
Did Christians go to the church that burned down?,Did Christians go to the churches that burned down?,Did Christians commit executions in India?,Is there any evidence to confirm that some Christians were executed in India?,Is there any evidence to show that in India Christians have been executed?,Is there anything to suggest that Christian missionaries have been executed in India?
"Did all soldiers that joined the Army after January 1, 2019 get promoted?","Did any soldiers that joined the Army after January 1, 2019 receive promotions?","Is there any evidence that shows all soldiers who joined the Army after January 1, 2019 were declared Agniveers?","Do all soldiers joining after January 1, 2019 receive promotion?"
"Did 72,000 people die from cancer in Nigeria?",Did some more people die of cancer in Nigeria than in the US?,Did it take a long time for Nigeria to have the cancer epidemic?,Did the disease worsen after the outbreak?,Does the Nigerian government have a plan to cure the disease?,Were any of the cases in Nigeria discovered by the US government?
Did the snake swallow the AK-47?,Is it probable the snake swallowed an AK-47?,Did the snake kill the AK-47?,Did the snake bite or choke AK-47?,Does the snake look much larger than a typical snake?,Can AK-47's be found in a wild?
Is this tax hidden?,Does each family health insurance policy include this tax?,Do most family health insurance policies subsidize uninsured health care costs?,Is every family health insurance policy the same?,Does each family health insurance policy have a $900 hidden tax?,Do some families have this tax?
"Did 1.5 million people participate in the ""freedom convoy"" in Australia?","Did this ""freedom convoy"" entail more than 1,000,000 people?","Did the ""freedom convoy"" entail more than 500,000 people?","Did this ""freedom convoy"" entail more than 1.5 million people?"
Did inflation affect Rich more than poor?,Did government statistics show inflation affeced poor in 2022?,Did economists claim that inflation affected Rich more than poor in 2022?,Is this inflation affeced rich more than poor in 2022?,Did IMF report on inflation in 2022?
Was wages going down for 20 years before the current wages are rising?,Did it take 18-20 years for wages to drop in general?,Was it after the election for wages to go up for workers?,Did this coincide with Trump's election?,Is this an accurate statement?,Are there any other sources that support Trump's claim?
Did Sri Lanka win the 2022 Asia Cup?,Did Sri Lanka's flag make a prominent presence in the city?,Did Sri Lanka win the 2022 Asia Cup?,Did the Sri Lanka flag leave the Burj Khalifa tower?,Was the Sri Lanka flag present on the Burj Khalifa tower after the 2022 Asia Cup?
Did Turkey issue a postage stamp featuring PM Modi?,Did the postage stamp recognize PM Modi as one of the greatest leaders?,Does Turkey issue stamps with PM Modi?,Has Turkey issued any other postage stamps with PM Modi?,Has the political party of Turkey supported PM Modi?
Do you have to vote to get it deducted from your account?,Do I have to vote to get it deducted from my account?,Do you have to give proof of vote to get it deducted from my account?,Will I have to pay back rs 350 in this case?,Would a Rs 450 donation affect my account?,Does anyone else pay this fee?
Did the deaths for Covid-19 relate to other factors?,Did some deaths count as Covid-19 related within 20 days of contracting the virus?,Did deaths for Covid-19 relate to other factors?,Did the CDC consider other factors associated with the Covid-19 outbreak?,Did the CDC determine other factors associated with the Covid-19 outbreak?
Did we lose more jobs in this Great recession than the last four recessions combined?,Did we lose more jobs in this Great recession than the last four recessions combined?,Were any of the jobs lost in this Great recession temporary?,Did this Great recession cost Americans more income in the year 2000 than in the year before?
Is there evidence that Justice Muralidhar's transfer was notified?,Is Justice Muralidhar's transfer mentioned in the SC collegium's recommendation?,Is the SC collegium's recommendation for the transfers public?,Is there any evidence of Justice Muralidhar's transfer being reported?
Did Trump authorize payments for seniors over 65?,Does this plan cover benefits for older Americans?,Is this plan administered in total?,Was there an executive order in place in this respect?,Were all of these payments in place prior to this order?,Is this plan mandated to cover all seniors over 65?
How many million work opportunities were created during the time period with the 6 million goals?,Did the 2 million workers created exceed the target by a significant amount?,Does the target exceed the target by a significant amount?,"Was the total increase in work opportunities in the year prior to the March 15, 2015 deadline significant?"
Did the Administration of Union Territory of Ladakh claim that it had achieved 100% vaccination with first dose?,Was 90% of the vaccine administered with the first dose?,Did the Administration of Union Territory of Ladakh claim that the vaccine was 100%?,Did any individual have to give the vaccine?,"Regardless of the success of the vaccine, did the Administration of Union Territory of Ladakh achieve 100% vaccination with first dose?"
Did the boys appear as being punished?,Did the video originate in Bihar?,Does the video exist in the United States?,Has the video already been viewed by another person?,Will more people be punished this time?,Is Gopalganj in the United States?,Would other cities be punished for similar crimes?
Is there a bill that would allow the French government to seize property if one isn't vaccinated against COVID-19?,Is there a bill that would allow the French government to seize property if one isn't vaccinated against COVID-19?
Does this estimate include labor costs as part of the cost?,Does this estimate include the costs of new facilities?,Is this cost estimate based on a real time estimate?,Is this cost estimate based on an actual time estimate?,Is this estimate based on a project plan and an actual time estimate?
Did the Obama administration respond to this letter?,Has the Obama administration responded to this letter?,Has the Obama administration responded to this letter?,Have any of these children ever crossed the U.S.-Mexico border?,Have there been any cases of unaccompanied children crossing the U.S.-Mexico border this year?
Is Barrett responsible for dumping 8.2 billion gallons of raw sewage into Lake Michigan?,Has Barrett dumped 8.2 billion gallons of raw sewage into Lake Michigan?,Has Barrett dumped 8.2 billion gallons of raw sewage into Lake Michigan since he was elected?,Has Barrett caused this waste to accumulate in Lake Michigan?,Has Barrett caused waste to accumulation in Lake Michigan?
Can Canadian authorities force people to get COVID-19 vaccines in Ontario?,Have the residents volunteered to get COVID-19 vaccines?,Do Canada authorities routinely force people to get COVID-19 vaccines in Ontario?,Do Canadian authorities have a policy requiring COVID-19 vaccine in Ontario?
Have they reduced the cost of fertilizers?,Are the prices of fertilizers higher than in 2014?,Do the fertilizers cost less than in 2014?,Does fertilizer cost less than in 2014?,Would the increased fertilizers make up for the difference?,Are fertilizers cheaper in 2014 compared to 2014?,Would the increase in fertilizers make up for the change?
Is the video a video of the lockdown?,Is there a video of the lockdown?,Were the police escorted during the lockdown?,Was the police escorted by helicopter?,Did the escorted police have guns?,Are these events reported in the media?
Is the video game footage in this clip from Ovidio Guzman’s arrest?,Does the clip show gun fire in Mexico?,Does the clip cover other cities in Mexico?,Is this clip from an official film?,Does this clip include any censored content?,Does this clip include any graphic material from Gun Fire?
Is this proposal focused more on infrastructure than most?,Is this proposal focused primarily on infrastructure?,Have any of Biden's proposals focused on this issue in prior White House efforts?,Are there any other projects Biden's proposal seeks to focus on?,Is this proposal focused primarily on this particular topic?
"Did this recall have an impact on 600,000 users?","Did this recall have an effect on the recall for 60,000,000 inhalers?",Did this recall affect any medical equipment manufacturers or government facilities?,Did this recall result in any medical equipment injuries?,Did this recall cause any deaths?,Can this recall have a positive impact on the overall economy?
Did Tennessee's students have the biggest single year jump in achievement?,Did Tennessee's students make their biggest single year jump in achievement in any other state?,Did Tennessee's students make their biggest single year jump in achievement in any other state?,Did Tennessee's students make their biggest single year jump in achievement in any other state?
Did Scott Walker re-establish state funding for education?,Did Scott Walker support restoring 2/3s of state funding for education?,Did Scott Walker try to restore some of state funding for education?,Did Scott Walker say he will restore some state funding for education?,Did Scott Walker seek re-establish two - thirds of state funding for education?
Are there estimates of GDP growth that would produce $2 trillion?,Is this estimate for a tax plan based on this estimate?,Is this estimate for GDP growth an estimation?,Does the tax plan address the issues discussed above?,Is there another estimate based on this estimate?,Does this tax plan cover the costs of this tax plan?
Has Ann Wagner ever held a town hall in the Second District?,Does Ann Wagner currently hold elections in the second district?,Has Ann Wagner held elections in the second district?,Does Ann Wagner currently hold elections in the second district?,Has Ann Wagner been elected in the Second District?,Does Ann Wagner hold elections in the Second District?
Is there any proof of how many people are out of work according to the expanded definition of unemployment?,Did the expansion increase the amount of people out of work?,Did this increase impact the number of people out of work?,Does this increase in the number of people out of work affect the number of people in need of help?
"Did this person chant ""Pakistan Zindabad"" during the rally in Chennai?",Did this person take part in the rally?,Was this person a member of this protest group?,Were protestors present during this rally?,Did this protestor wear a riot shield?,Has the protest group held a protest rally before?
Does this repeal change any state and local tax deductions?,Does the repeal change any school fund funding?,Is the 2017 tax reform bill intended to be an overall change to school funding?,Is this tax reform bill designed to provide tax breaks to private school families?,Is this tax reform bill related to schools in any way?
Did people greet Yohani at the airport?,Did Yohani greet people in the airport?,Was the airport full?,Did Yohani perform in the airport?,Is this event a local one or international?,Is this image related to the singer's personal image?,Is this image a representation of a recent event?
Did the UK offer immigration benefits that are larger than 250 pounds a week?,Is it true that immigration benefits in the UK are higher than 250 pounds?,Does a person in the UK receive an allowance that is higher than 250 pounds?,Is a person in the UK eligible for a governmental welfare program in which income is based on their race?
Do COVID-19 test patent applications come before 2020 in general?,"In general, what year is it stating that the COVID-19 test patent application was filed?",Was there a COVID-19 test patent application filed in 2015?,Did the COVID-19 test patent application filed in 2015?
Has this claim been confirmed?,Did Modi claim 1 crore patients have been treated for free in India?,Did the claim come out as a lie?,Did the treatment of the COVID-19 patient mean that there will be more cases if the disease is treated properly?,Was the treatment of the COVID-19 patient free?
Is there a history in the United States of a Presidential party called the Patriot Party?,Did Trump start a new political party called Patriot in late January 2021?,Has this election been documented on record as happening under Trump's leadership?,Will this election have a direct relation to the Patriot Party?,Is there evidence this election is connected to Trump's political party?
Does drinking water aid the new Coronavirus?,Is there any evidence that drinking water aids the new Coronavirus?,Is it possible for drinking water to help the new Coronavirus in removing itself from your throat?,Is there evidence that drinking water aids the new Coronavirus in removing itself from your throat?,Is there any evidence that drinking water aids the new Coronavirus in removing itself from your throat?
Can you reach the police by ringing 999 and pressing 55?,Is there any way to call for help using an app in the uk?,Can you contact police through the app in the uk?,Is there any way to get in touch with the police using an app in the uk?
Would this tax cut go to middle class families?,"Is it true that middle class families would have to pay $6,000 per year for this tax cut?",Are middle class families being stung by the tax cut?,"Would middle class families still be stung if they were to pay $6,000 per year for tax cuts for the wealthy?"
Was the cut-off for General Category 689?,Did Rashesh Tiwari score 643 on the Civil Service examination?,Did Rashesh Tiwari score high enough marks to get into the civil service exam?,Was Rashesh Tiwari older than 29 when he scored 643?
Did 34 families convert to Hinduism?,Did the converted families belong to any group?,Did the converted families have religious affiliations?,Did the converted families choose to follow other religions in addition to Christianity?,Did the converted families change religions?,Did the converted families choose different religions in addition to Christianity?
Is there sufficient evidence to show that 35.6% of children aged 36 to 59 months receive early childhood education?,Is there sufficient evidence to show that 35.6% of children aged 36 to 59 months receive early childhood education?,Is there sufficient evidence to show that 35.6% of children aged 36 to 59 months receive early childhood education?
Did Lowe's sell the emails in this sample?,Did Lowe's ever send the email in this sample?,Has Lowe's ever given the email in this sample?,Has the email in this sample included a link to take a survey?,Is the email in this sample using a Lowe's logo?
Did the medical equipment company have a record of 440.000 cases in 2021 with Impfnebenwirkungen?,Is it true that shaved snow has been reported in the Netherlands?,Is it true that in 2019 there were 430.000 cases of Impfnebenwirkungen?,Is it true that there were 63 million cases of Impfnebenwirkungen in 2020?,Is it true that there are 448 million cases of Impfnebenwirkungen in 2021?
Did one of the new Rafale fighter jets owned by India crash during the training session?,Was this new fighter jet's owner legally responsible for this crash?,Did this fighter jet crash occur in any other states?,Was this type of aircraft being used at the time of this incident?,Did this military aircraft belong to India?
Would that be in every house?,What percentage of consumption will be eliminated by solar tanks?,Would this be an effective solution for Florida?,Is this goal only for Florida?,Is this kind of technology available in other states?,Is this a viable solution for Florida?,Is this a viable solution for other states?
Is this the Clinton campaign's sixth concert?,Was Beyonce paid the Clinton campaign for the concert?,Did Beyonce and Jay Z perform at the Cleveland concert?,Did Beyonce and Jay Z perform at Cleveland's concert?,Were there other concerts during the Clinton campaign's concert?
Did a Boeing 737-800 crash that involved 132 people happen between 2022 and 2024?,Was the crash located in Mainland China?,Was there any evidence indicating the plane crashed from outside China?,Did the pilot of the plane have access to video of the crash?,Was the plane carrying passengers that were all passengers?
Are state and local elections required to test?,Are these tests mandatory for all children under age 4?,Did Abbott say that these tests would be standardized?,Did Abbott have an agreement with the U.S. Department of Education requiring these tests in Texas?,Did Abbott ever propose mandatory testing in this state for all children?
Does the U.S. Supreme Court have no current authority to overturn election results?,Has the U.S. Supreme Court voted to overturn election results?,Have courts in America ever voted to overturn election results?,Has the U.S. Supreme Court voted to overturn election results?
"Did corporate tax paid prior to the recession decrease by 5 percentage points, or is it the reverse of the case?",Is corporate tax paid for now 7 percent of the total?,Are corporations still 7% in the present day?,Is it true that corporations are still down by 2 percentage points since the recession?,Are individuals 7 percent in the present day?
Did the Baltimore Symphony Orchestra perform a piece of John Williams’ music?,Did Williams play his compositions?,Did a cellist for the Baltimore Symphony Orchestra perform the music in a stairwell for a security guard?,Did Williams conduct the performance in the stairwell?,Did Williams conduct the performance in the stairwell?
Are there any information about who airlifted 800 people from Kabul in recent times?,Are there any reports from the media detailing the reason that 800 people were flown to Kabul?,Is this image a picture of the airlift operations in Afghanistan?,Is this image a recent image?
Has the technology changed since the original photo was taken?,Does it make every 3D hospital obsolete?,Does this new technology have other features not found in previous photo?,Does this photo resemble the 5D bed model?,Does this photo feature 5D beds?,Does this photo feature the 5D bed model?,Does this photo feature all of the 5D bed models?,Does this photo feature all of the 5D bed models?
Is it possible for them to sterilize masks up to 20 times per mask?,Does this sterilization process mean they will order 20 times more masks than normal?,Is this sterilization process a good method to sterilize masks?,Do they suggest that this is a suitable method of sterilization?
Who was the man that insulted Buddhism?,Did the man receive any punishment under Thai blasphemy laws?,Does the man serve any type of prison term for this crime?,Were there any additional sentences after this arrest?,Are there any other examples of blasphemy charges in this area?
Is it true there were 91 people killed in the attack on the King David Hotel?,Did some people from Great Britain die?,Did British citizens die from the attack?,Did anyone from the UK die as a result of the attack?,Was any of the victims in the United Kingdom?,Would some British people be killed in this attack?,Did the attack cause any damage to the area?
Did Trump have paper stuck to his shoe while on board Air Force One?,Was Trump wearing a black shoe during his boarding on 4 October 2018?,Did Trump attend the Air Force One event at the Minneapolis airport?,Are there any other interesting aspects about this article?,Do you think Trump had paper stuck to his shoe when he was boarding Air Force One?
Did Thurmond propose to blocked Puerto Rican use of Chapter 9 bankruptcy protection?,Did Thurmond's proposed amendment impact Puerto Ricans in any way?,Did Thurmond's proposed amendment block Puerto Rico's use of Chapter 9 bankruptcy protection?,Are there any other potential reasons to block Puerto Rico's use of Chapter 9 bankruptcy protection?
Is the photograph in May 2022?,Did the photograph contain any mention of Margaret Thatcher?,Did the photograph show the Prime Minister in conversation with the Prime Minister of Canada?,Were the Prime Minister and Prime Minister of Canada together?,Did the photograph include Trudeau's first name?,Is the photograph considered accurate?
Did all 6 out of 10 people in this clinical trial suffer severe adverse effects?,Has DENGVX suffered severe adverse effects?,Does DENGVX have any other adverse effects?,Did DENGVX have any significant adverse effects in this clinical trial?,Do you think DENGVX should have more rigorous testing?
Do the food supplements restore perfect sugar levels?,Do the food supplements help with type 2 diabetes?,Does it get rid of the symptoms of diabetes with the food supplements?,Do food supplements work for people who need to take food supplements to treat diabetes?,Do the food supplements work for people who want to take food supplements to treat diabetes?
Did the New York buildings have any windows decorated with cross in 1956?,Are there any other buildings in New York that were decorated with crosses in 1956?,Did the buildings in New York have any other decorations for Easter in 1956?,Is there any other information regarding the display?,Are the buildings in New York decorated with crosses for Easter in 1956?
Would 99% of homes be torn down and rebuilt?,Would the new deal require that 99% of the country's homes be torn down and rebuilt?,Would the new deal require 99% of all homes to be torn down?,Would the new deal require 99% of all homes to be torn down?
Does the video show protesters looting a gun store?,Was the protesters involved in any other incidents?,Was the video recorded on their cell phones?,Is this video of protesters doing this illegally?,Did this protester have an accomplice?,Did this protester commit any offense?,Did the protesters attempt to rob any weapons?
Did Greene plant pipe bombs?,Did Greene send these pipe bombs to Democratic and Republican party headquarters?,Did Greene make these pipe bombs?,Did Greene give a verbal statement on the pipe bombs?,Did Greene make any statements about the pipe bombs?,Did Greene get a post-mortem analysis on these pipe bombs after releasing them?
Did Sohanpal declare that Singh is preparing to contest the election again?,Has Sohanpal made allegations about the upcoming election or the retrial?,Was the claim about Singh being preparing to contest the election correct?,Has Sohanpal made comments regarding the upcoming election before promoting his claim?
Would it be considered a felony to leave town for more than 7 days without leaving someone with your guns?,Would this bill make it a federal felony to leave a person with your guns without permission?,Will this bill be considered a felony when it is passed by the Senate?,Does this bill require any criminal activity from an offender?
Does 5G network activate the novel coronavirus?,Is this network being installed via Mislatel towers?,Is 5G being installed via Mislatel towers?,Does this network support the new coronavirus in one's body?,Does this network support 5G?,Is the 5G network being installed via Mislatel towers?,Is the 5G network being installed via a 4G radio system?
"If a teacher in Georgia makes $6,000 more than one in Texas, how will these additional dollars in income affect the overall standard of living of teachers?",Is there any evidence to support this claim?,Is the money in Georgia a more accurate reflection of the average standard of living for teachers?,Does this list of salaries reflect teachers that are referred to as good teachers in Texas?
Did banners demand restoration of Article 370 & 35A in Jammu and Kashmir and repealing UAPA Act?,Were banners in Jammu and Kashmir protests demanding restoration of article 370 & 35A in Jammu and Kashmir?,Do banners in Jammu and Kashmir protests demand restoration of article 370 & 35A in Jammu and Kashmir?
Is there any proof that the Facebook post was fabricated?,Did the post include pictures of a lion receiving a foot massage?,Did the Facebook post include images that supported its assertion that the lion was receiving a foot massage?,Did this post include photos of a lion receiving a foot massage?
Did Erdogan inspect housing for the 2020 earthquake survivors?,Was Erdogan present at this location?,Has Erdogan had any previous experience with this area?,Did Erdogan speak about this area at this event?,Would this area be a good location to hold other events in the future?,Would Erdogan be able to provide additional support for this area?
Did McDonnell create enough jobs to keep pace with population growth in Virginia in 2010?,Has McDonnell been criticized for not creating enough jobs for the state?,Has McDonnell been in power for a while?,Has McDonnell been in office for a long time?,Is McDonnell viewed by many people as a failure?,Is McDonnell considered a failure for creating enough jobs in Virginia?
Did COVID-19 have any effect on the population?,Was the COVID-19 pandemic a distraction to the population?,Is there evidence the COVID-19 pandemic contributed to the population's final days?,Did COVID-19 have any impact on the population's final days?
Did Democrats say the election was stolen?,Did Republicans and Democrats agree?,Did Republicans and Democrats endorse Trump?,Do Democrats support Trump in general?,Do Republicans support Trump in general?,Have Democratic political parties supported Trump since 2010?,Are there any other candidates running in the 2016 election?,Have any of these candidates supported Trump in general?
Does Twitter accurately portray the number of children who went missing in the United States in 2020?,Does Tweet have sufficient data to show the number of children who went missing in the United States in 2020?,Does Tweet give a reasonable estimate of the number of children who went missing in the United States in 2020?,Does Tweet overstate the number of children who went missing in the United States in 2020?
Is this recall of salmon burgers associated with metal?,Was this recall related to salmon?,Was this recall of salmon burgers related to metal?,Is this recall related to Costco?,Is this recall a nationwide recall?,Will this recall have implications for Costco?,Will this recall have any impact on the consumer?
Did the woman offer chickenpox-infected lollipops in an anti-vaccine Facebook group?,Did the woman sell the lollipops at a low price?,Was the seller a registered nurse?,Did the seller receive a donation?,Did the woman pay in person or via online donation?
Did Videh get angry at Nehru after Videh made this statement?,Did Videh actually slap Nehru after Videh made this statement?,Was Videh involved in any of these incidents?,Did Videh ever slap Nehru after Videh made this statement?
Did the money they made from these deaths injure anyone else?,Has there been any information about this incident?,Was this money derived for the purpose of selling organs?,Was there any publicized report regarding this incident?,Will the children with this information not be identified?,Will this info be made public?
"Will he randomly select people who use Facebook to donate $50,000 to the cause?",Will he give any money away?,Will he collect donations from a group of people outside the fund?,Will he select the people who donate to this cause?,Is it illegal to give away money with Facebook?,Is there any evidence or proof of a person receiving any money from this campaign?
Was the footage of the car lifted during a 2023 Texas storm?,Were other images of the vehicle lifted by storms?,Does the weather footage show the vehicle lifted by storms?,Did the car lift in these storms?,Would the footage be valid if the camera record stayed on the car?
Was there a positive positive test result in 9000 students?,"Was the positive positive test result positive in all of the 2,000 students that took part in the test?",Was there a false positive result after 1 test?,"Was there a positive positive test result in 4,000 students?","Was the test negative in all of the 2,000 students that took part in the test?"
Is there any evidence that UVA sexual assault rates are significantly higher for female students?,Is there evidence that UVA sexual assault rates are significantly higher for male students?,Are the statistics accurately recorded?,Is UVA a prestigious university?,Do UVA students have an increased risk of sexual assaults than other colleges?
Did Pope Benedict XVI die at age 95?,Was the upcoming death of Pope Benedict XVI an accident?,Has Pope Benedict XVI recently died?,Did Pope Benedict XVI have a child by birth?,Does Pope Benedict XVI have a father by marriage?,Did Benedict XVI have a baby at birth?
Is there any reason to believe Nigerian soldiers will face firing squads?,Is there any reason for Nigerian soldiers to face firing squads?,Is the firing squad a law that will punish Nigerian soldiers for their actions?,Would it violate any law that is required for any civil action?,Is it true that Nigerian soldiers are facing firing squads?
Do the instructions apply to ice cream and cold drinks?,Can they be used in 90 days?,Are there specific health risks associated with these foods?,Are the guidelines for these foods clear?,Has it been shown that these foods contribute to the coronavirus?,Has the practice of avoiding ice cream and cold drinks helped to reduce the risk?
"Did The Atlantic report this, or did it have a different report in June 2023?","Did the New York City Pride marcher exposed his genitals to a 6-year-old child, or has this person ever been reported to have exposed his genitals?",Did this person not have any criminal convictions for having sexual intercourse with children before?
Is there evidence these women were naked?,Did this election campaign take place in a city outside Washington DC?,Does this campaign specifically involve women?,Have these women also previously campaigned for Trump?,Have these women ever participated in any other campaigns?,Did this campaign take place in a city outside of Washington DC?
Did this 3G mast cause cancer in this school district?,Did 4 students with cancer develop 4G masts?,Did the 5G mast cause cancer in this school district?,Was 5G mast removed due to this school district?,Did this school district have the 5G mast removed after this case?,Does this 5G mast belong to this school district?
Did Office Depot have a promotion in early 2021 to offer free lamination of COVID-19 vaccination cards?,Was the promotion advertised in any newspaper?,Is COVID-19 a prohibited vaccination?,Did Office Depot offer free lamination of COVID-19 vaccination cards?,Was Office Depot promoting to have free lamination of COVID-19 vaccination cards?
Did all US voters turn out for 2020 election?,Was there 133 million registered voters in 2020 election?,Is there evidence of the total US voter participation in 2020 election?,Did the number of US voters in 2020 election have sufficient number of voters to qualify for 2020 election?,Was the number of registered voters in 2020 US election at least 50 million?
"Are there 60,000 fewer jobs in the state today than in 2008?",Did the state increase overall jobs in 2008?,Was the state doing well with jobs in 2008?,Are there more people in the state right now than in 2008?,Is there a general trend of less jobs in the state today?,Is there another significant increase in unemployment in the state?
Did Albert Bourla have an allergy to the vaccine?,Has he been vaccinated against COVID-19?,Was he vaccinated before?,Has he been vaccinated since?,Does Bourla feel he can avoid Covid-19?,Are there other instances of a COVID-19 vaccine-preventable illness?
Do the Taliban state that September 11 is a national day in Afghanistan?,Did the Taliban announce the upcoming day?,Do the Afghan government have any plans for the upcoming day?,Were the Afghan government members involved in the upcoming day?,Was a photo shot during the upcoming day showing a new Afghan national day?
Did Harrington have a government job when he filed this patent?,Did the mask have a CV19-N95 logo?,Is Harrington currently employed at DHS?,Are any of the mask features on the mask already used in DHS security?,Has the mask been used in DHS since before this filing?
Does this resolution require all residents of Texas to pay reparations to black citizens?,Do these residents have to agree to comply with this measure?,Was this law passed in any other state?,Is this resolution the result of a decision made by the House of Representatives?,Is this resolution in support of a previous state law?
Does Soros' name appear as a liberal tycoon?,Did Soros' name imply any political affiliation besides capitalism?,Did Soros do this to install liberal puppets into power?,Did Soros do this through his political influence?,Does Soros endorse any of his political candidates?,Is Soros' name synonymous with politics?
Is there any credible claim that Romney will run in all 50 states?,Will he not get as much support?,Is it safe to assume that Romney will get support for this cause in all states?,Has Romney's campaign had any public relations issues?,Will Romney's political ideology attract most voters?,Will the views of all voters be expressed in all states?
Did 117 lawmakers fail to take care of their businesses?,Did 71% of lawmakers get credit card declined due to bad credit?,Did 84 members of Congress arrest drunk driving?,Did 117 Members of Congress fail to take care of their businesses?,Did all Members of Congress fail to take care of their finances?
Has the Georgia Lottery Corp. ever paid out the agreed upon 35 percent of proceeds to the account which funds the HOPE scholarship?,Has the Georgia Lottery Corp. ever paid out the agreed upon 35 percent of proceeds to the account which funds the HOPE scholarship?,Has the Georgia Lottery Corp. ever refunded a portion of proceeds for an account associated with the HOPE scholarship?
"Did Moderna produce 100,000 doses of COVID-19 vaccines in 2019 before the pandemic started?",Did Moderna retune these vaccines?,Has Moderna changed the product lines to reduce production?,"Does Moderna admit any other vaccines, including COVID-19 vaccines, were produced in 2019?"
Is it true that holding your breath is a test for novel coronavirus and drinking water every 15 minutes can prevent the illness?,Is it accurate to say drinking water every 15 minutes can prevent the illness?,Does it mean drinking water every 15 minutes is a test for novel coronavirus?
Did Congress act to repeal the McCarran Warner Act of 1952?,Does the act forbid Muslims from holding office?,Is the act forbidding Muslims from holding office a very recent act or a fairly recent one?,Was Congress not able to repeal the McCarran Warner Act of 1952?
Did former Obama call the meeting?,Did the meeting bring together leaders from 17 countries?,Does the meeting include international leaders?,Did Obama call the meeting?,Did Obama's actions influence his predecessor?,Did the meetings at the U.N. Security meeting in support of terrorism be attended by US President Donald Trump?
Is it true that China torpedoed the sunken Indonesian submarine KRI Nanggala 402?,Was China responsible for the torpedo attack?,Was KRI Nanggala 402 the target of China's torpedo attack?,Did China destroy KRI Nanggala 402?,Did China attack KRI Nanggala 402 during the incident?
Was the message produced on social media?,Does this message have an authentic message?,Does this message have a valid political ideology?,Was there political manipulation in this message?,Was there any content in this message that would be considered incorrect?,Does this message have political legitimacy?,Does White Eagle have any other social media accounts?
Is the article factual?,Did Lindsey Graham attend a dinner with Joe Biggs prior to Biggs helping plan an attack on the US Capitol?,Is Biggs a prominent figure in the right-wing Proud Boys group?,Did Biggs speak at any gathering that Graham attended prior to the attack?,Is Biggs an actual member of the right-wing Proud Boys group?,Did Biggs speak at any gathering that Graham attended prior to the attack?
Did the wives of the 9/11 hijackers know exactly what was happening?,Did the wives of the 9/11 hijackers go back to Saudi Arabia to watch their husbands on television?,Did the wives of the 9/11 hijackers go to the United States to watch their husbands on TV?,Did any of the women of the 9/11 hijackers come back to the United States prior to the attacks?
Is it true that GSI claims that a gold reserves of around 222.88 million tonnes is present in the Jamui district?,Was this data sourced from a specific source?,Can it be inferred that GSI also has the reserves of other mineral-rich minerals in the Jamui district?
Are there any indications Twitter is closing down?,Did Twitter shut down due to cyberbullying?,Is Twitter shutting down due to cyberbullying?,Is Twitter shutting down due to cyberbullying?,Is Twitter shutting down due to cyberbullying?,Is Twitter shutting down due to cyberbullying?
Was 5% COVID-19 surcharge on a restaurant receipt?,Does the COVID-19 surcharge include a price increase?,Is the COVID-19 surcharge included in the current menu of restaurants?,Is the COVID-19 surcharge listed with the current prices of the food?
Did the crime rate drop by 30 percent when Said in a remark?,Did Said bring the crime rate down by 30%?,Is Said the mayor of Dallas?,Was Said elected as a minority mayor?,Is the crime rate in Dallas down?,Will criminals in Dallas increase in the future?
"Did MLK say, I will not rejoice in the death of one, not even an enemy?","Did MLK say, I will not rejoice in the death of one, not even an enemy?","Did the statement I Will Not Rejoice in the death of one, not even an enemy come after the death of one?"
Is the claim about Facebook claiming donations as a tax write off false?,Is it true that Facebook needs to deliver 15% of any donations it receives to a charity?,Is it true that if the corporation receives a 15% donation it will deliver that 15% back to the charity?
Has the Democratic health care bill collected higher taxes for 10 years?,Has the Democratic health care bill provided health care for only six years?,Does the Democratic health care bill include any tax increases?,Has there been a majority increase in the Democratic health care bill since its passage?,Has the Democratic health care bill included any health care expansions besides those mentioned above?
"Is it true that Article III, Section 4 of the Constitution states that a ""lame duck... candidate"" cannot seek to fill a Supreme Court vacancy?","Is it true that Article III, Section 4 of the Constitution lays out the legal definition of ""lame duck""?","Is it true that Article III, Section 4 of the Constitution holds that a ""lame duck... candidate"" cannot seek to fill a Supreme Court vacancy?"
Did NASA warn Earth that the Earth could be hit by an asteroid around Christmas 2019?,Was the warning taken from NASA's official spokesman?,Is there evidence that the Earth is already being hit by asteroids around Christmas 2019?,Is there any evidence that Earth is being hit by asteroid before Christmas 2019?
"Did the Obama administration release 196 murderers or 104,000 criminal illegal aliens?",Did these individuals have crimes that are felony criminals?,Is this percentage of the total released criminal illegal aliens inflated?,Is this percentage of the released murderers correct?,"Did the Obama administration release 104,000 criminal criminals or 196 murderers?","Did the Obama administration release 104,000 criminal illegal aliens or 196 murderers?"
Has Daugherty taken a pay cut?,Has Daugherty increased his salary for the 2016 term?,Has Daugherty taken a raise since 2014?,Has Daugherty voted to raise his salary for 2016?,Has Daugherty voted to raise his salary for the 2016 term?
Did Gandhi promise Rs. 5000 crore of loan to Pakistan for 50 years?,Did Gandhi promise interest-free loan?,Did Rahul Gandhi promise a loan for 50 years?,Will Gandhi's loan be a loan for 50 years?,Was Rahul Gandhi an anti-inflation candidate?,Does Rahul Gandhi plan to travel to Afghanistan again?
Has the United States Energy Information Administration (EEIA) stated that it supports alternative energy sources?,Does the EIA support the development of alternative energy sources?,Do the EIA officials agree that alternative energy sources are necessary for economic growth?,Did Bill Gates mention alternatives to alternative energy sources in his interview?
Is there any other information about the attack?,Did the whales eat all of the crew on the vessel?,Did the whales attack the whales on the ship?,Would the killer whales attack the Japanese whale on the same vessel if they attacked another whale?,Do the whales seem to be larger than the whales on the vessel?,Would larger whales be more likely to attack and eat the boat than a smaller one?,Is there any other scientific evidence of this attack?
Does the immigration service have to see people they detain within 24 hours?,Has the government been able to see veterans within months?,Is the immigration service required to see veterans within months?,Has ICE ever able to see veterans within a month?,Is this government liable for the cost of the service to veterans?
Does this walkout stem from the deadly attack on the Parkland school?,Is there any evidence of this planned walkouts happening at other schools?,Is there any evidence this planned walkouts were the cause of the massacre at the Parkland school?,Is there any evidence that this planned walkouts have anything in common with the incident that happened in the Parkland school?
Did this claim come from a government official?,Does this claim imply gun violence is not a problem in the United States?,Is it true that the number of fatal gun injuries in the United States is lower than any other country?,Is it true that the number of deaths due to gun violence in the United States is lower than any other country?
Was the New York Times article in 1922?,Did this report contain any facts in support of the claim?,Did the NY Times article in 1922 report that Hitler used anti-Semitic propaganda to catch masses of followers?,Did this article report that Hitler was only using anti-Semitic propaganda as a bait to catch masses of followers?
Did Biden leave this role to Obama?,Did Biden leave this position to Obama?,Did Biden leave this position to Obama?,Did Biden leave this position to Obama?,Has Biden ever been in politics?,Is there any evidence that Biden is involved in the firing of these judges?,Is there any other evidence indicating Biden is involved in firing judges?
Did Clinton claim money in exchange for her Iraq War vote was provided by the Bush administration?,Did Clinton offer any other cash to help rebuild New York City after 9/11?,Did Clinton receive any cash from the Bush administration to help rebuild New York City?,Did Clinton provide a total amount of money to help rebuild New York City after 9/11?
Did the Senate proposal for emergency unemployment benefits pay for full?,Was the Senate proposal fully paid for?,Did the Senate proposals have any restrictions on how long unemployment benefits can be provided?,Did the Senate proposals to restore emergency unemployment benefits fully pay for full?,Did the Senate proposals to restore emergency unemployment benefits fully pay for full?
Does the Kaiser Permanente study suggest that the shots are harmful?,Does this study show that shots prevent variants within 150 days?,Do the shots infect patients with variants?,Does this study demonstrate that the shots do not help in this case?,Do the shots infect people with variants?,Does Kaiser Permanente's study show negative efficacy?
Did the candidate in Jalandhar win 5 votes despite having 9 family members?,Did the candidate in Jalandhar get 5 votes even if he has 9 family members?,Was the candidate in Jalandhar unpopular due to his family members?,Did any of the voters in Jalandhar vote for this candidate?
Did both countries use DBM ballot counting systems for the 2020 US election?,Did the DBM machines in the US and Canada contain the same software?,Did the DBM machines in Canada have the same software?,Did any of the machines used in Canada utilize the DBM software?,Can both countries now use the DBM software?
Did the banner display the labourers-famers rule?,Did any of the farmers rally in 2020 display the banner?,Was it true that there was a farmers' protest?,Did other protests display the banner?,Did the protests occur over a period of time?,Did the protests result in a demonstration?
Was there a 35 km-long queue at the Russian-Finland border after Putin made a partial military mobilization?,Did the queue begin outside the border or outside?,Is there any proof that there was a queue outside of the border?,Did this queue have any political influence?,Is there any reason to suspect that there was a political influence behind the queue?
Did Paris protesters rally over the murder of a French school teacher in October 2020?,Did protesters rally in Paris in October 2020 after the murder of a French school teacher?,Was the death of a French school teacher a terrorist attack?,Has the death of a French school teacher been attributed to a terrorist attack?
Does the percentage of college dropouts exceed 60 percent of youth?,Does the percentage of college dropouts exceed 60 percent of youth?,Did the AFSCME forum on 6/19/2007 include a statement from Smith?,Did Smith make a statement about the AFSCME AFSCME union?
"Does Sheree do state audit, secretary of state, and lieutenant governor in Washington state?",Does she have more than two years in the position?,Does she spend more than a year in office?,Does she have fewer than a year to run for governor in Washington state?,Does she get paid less than one year of office in Washington state?
"Does every candidate for mayor of New York City who is Democrats believe that the cost of purchasing a house in Brooklyn is around $100,000?",Did these candidates incorrectly guess the cost of purchasing a house in Brooklyn in May 2021?,Does each mayoral candidate have an independent record in this matter?,Has any controversy arised due to this omission?
"Did WHO make any estimate of how many deaths could result from COVID-19 by April 15, 2021 in India?",Did the WHO have any other warning regarding India's COVID-19 epidemic in 2019?,Does this list include the estimated number of deaths?,Did India report additional COVID-19 deaths during the same period in 2018?
Was this actor involved in a stunt that went wrong?,Does this actor have any known relatives?,Was this stunt taken part in by this actor?,Was this stunt reported by News@7?,Was this stunt used for any other type of entertainment?,Are any other videos related to this stunt?,Does this stunt use multiple characters?,Was this stunt used for any other type of entertainment?
Did Trump resign a 1952 law?,Did Trump resign a 1952 law that made Muslamic law illegal?,Are there other laws against muslims other than muslim laws?,Is there evidence that Trump re-signed a 1952 law remaking Muslamic law illegal?
Did Americans spend $160 billion and 6 billion hours a year complying with the tax code?,Is there sufficient evidence to support the claim that Americans spend $160 billion per year to comply with the tax code?,Are there any estimates that the amount of time Americans spend complying with the tax code would be increasing?
"Has Ohio lost about 150,000 jobs since the Democrats’ stimulus was implemented?",Has this unemployment rate dropped after the Democrats’ stimulus?,"Compared to the previous year, has there been an increase in unemployment?",Did Obama and Romney spend the most money on stimulus efforts during this year?,Are there more job losses now than before the stimulus?
Do more people die of COVID after getting the vaccine?,Do more people die of COVID than the actual number?,Do these numbers support the actual number in the public domain?,Do these numbers differ from the figure in the newspaper article?,Is the actual number significantly lower than 3362?,Could there be other COVID vaccination deaths in the U.S.?
Did an average of 49% of learners who should have sat for exams drop out of school?,Did an average of 49% of learners who should have sat for exams drop out of school?,Did an average of 49% of learners who should have sat for exams drop out of school?
"Has his administration constructed 1,000 kilometres of tarmacked roads every year?","Is it true that his administration has built 1,000 kilometres of tarmacked roads every year?",Is it true that his administration has built 1000 kilometres of tarmacked roads every year?,Does the government fund the building of these roads?
Did any Ohio manufacturing jobs lose because of NAFTA?,Did some Ohio manufacturing jobs lose because of NAFTA?,Does NAFTA contain any of the benefits mentioned in this report?,Would NAFTA be beneficial for the health and welfare of Ohio's manufacturers if passed?,Will NAFTA benefit the economy of Ohio?
Is it true that £1 billion is lost to benefit fraud?,Is the current total of benefit fraud losses in the UK approximately £1.2 billion?,Is it likely that benefits fraud is linked to other economic activity?,Is the current estimated annual income for benefit fraud of over £1 billion?,Have other financial events contributed to the amount of this fraud?
Did 5.1 billion people watch the Queen’s funeral?,Did the funeral take place in one country?,Did many viewers watch the Queen’s funeral in several countries?,Did the BBC report 5.1 billion people watched the Queen’s funeral?,Did the BBC report 5.1 billion people watched the queen’s funeral in all countries?
Did Pew study found 14 percent of votes were noncitizens?,Was the 2008 survey reliable?,Did the study look at only the 18-19 age group?,Was the 2008 study based on a larger population?,Did the 2008 survey have more polling errors?,Was the 2008 survey unbiased?
Is the state first BJP-free state?,Has the state been made a party-free?,Have all of the party-free MLAs re-entered the state?,Are all the party-free MLAs from the state affiliated with the Congress?,Is the state a BJP-free state?
Did Pence see a widespread display of LGBT flags on the visit to Iceland?,Did the majority of people in Iceland rally around LGBT flags?,Did the majority of people in Iceland march around LGBT flags on the trip?,Have LGBT flags been seen during Pence's trips to Iceland?,Did Pence greet LGBT flags on his trip to Iceland?
Is the Providence pension fund insufficiently funded?,Did Taveras take office before the Providence pension fund was only 30 percent funded?,Does the pension fund in Providence have a surplus for some other reason?,Did Taveras take office before the Providence pension fund was only 30 percent funded?,Are there any other sources of funding in the Providence pension fund?
Was this in the text of a book published in 1981?,Were the symptoms of this sickness described in this book?,Were the illnesses named this book in the text of a book published in 1981?,"Were the diseases mentioned by this book named ""Wuhan-400""?",Were any of the illnesses mentioned by this book described in this book?
Does Pelosi plan to resign if Trump wins the November 2020 presidential elections?,Will Pelosi accept an offer from Trump for his presidential nomination?,Is Pelosi open to being reelected if Trump wins the November 2020 presidential elections?,Does Trump have the support of a majority of Dems to resign?
Did Biden and Donnelly give the same speech in 2021?,Did Biden and Donnelly receive similar responses in March 2020?,Did Biden give a similar speech in December 2021?,Did Biden attend both speeches?,Did Donnelly respond to the question by stating his own thoughts?
Did heavy rain cause a flood in Jaipur in 2022?,Did people and cars wash away in the flood?,Did heavy rain cause a flood in Jaipur in 2022?,Did the flood occur in Jaipur in 2019?,Has any disaster occurred in Jaipur in 2017?
Is it true that any legislation has taken away one gun in this country for 20 years - not one?,Has there been any legislation to take away one gun in the past 20 years?,Is it true that any legislation has taken away one gun in the past 20 years - not one?,Has any legislation taken away one gun in this country for 20 years?
Did Jeb Bush organize fundraisers for Ron DeSantis in September 2018?,Did the Tampa Bay Times report the name of the politician to whom the fundraisers were to be held?,Did the event take place in October or November 2018?,Was the fundraising event held in December 2018?,Was the tweet circulating in October or November 2018 a result of the tweet?
Have researchers discovered a fuel thousands of times more powerful than gasoline?,Is this fuel currently being distributed to other companies?,Has this fuel been tested to be thousands of times more powerful than gasoline?,Is this fuel currently the preferred fuel for other companies?,Is this fuel going to be used by other companies?
Has it been established that only 4% of rapes are reported?,"Does this estimate exclude the cases of ""reported"" rapes?",Are there any other estimated numbers for the number of reported rapes?,Are any estimates for the number of reported rapes based on a more general estimate?
Did Vladimir Putin's daughter die following her COVID-19 vaccination?,Is Putin's daughter the sole survivor of the COVID-19 poliovirus outbreak?,Is poliovirus the primary cause of poliovirus occurrence in Russia?,Was the COVID-19 vaccine administered in this outbreak?
"Was this video taken after the explosion at Karachi, Pakistan?",Did the explosion injure at least 17 people?,Did this video include the actual image from the explosion?,Did anyone witness this explosion?,Did this video contain video of an actual scene from the explosion?,Would this video be considered illegal by the government of Pakistan?
Did the county lay off a total of 48 people in 2011?,Was this the result of the lay offs?,Has the shortage of police officers contributed to the need for more officers?,Is it true that the police department has laid off more than 50% of its total law enforcement officers?,Does the lack of police officers result from these layoffs?,Is this the result of an increase in salary?
Are the average monthly wages in the country 8% lower than other nations?,Are the average monthly incomes in the country generally better than the other countries?,Is this situation associated with a massive population increase?,Were people more likely to earn income in the 1950s when the average monthly income was 7% more?,Are 80% of the population of America living paycheck to paycheck?,Is this population regressing?
Does the Taiwanese man have an open insemination?,Has the implant resulted in any negative side effects?,Does the transplant result in the original penis?,Is the transplant successful?,Has the transplant resulted in any negative side effects?,Does this Taiwanese man have a penis of this type?
Did all three art installations belong to the Chinese exhibition?,Did any of the installations cause any animal cruelty?,Was any of the installations for the Chinese exhibition considered to be cruel in nature?,Did any of the installations represent any kind of symbolism?,Did any of the installations for the Chinese exhibition include any animals?
"Did some attendees of the NYC Drag March chant ""We're here, we're queer, we're coming for your children?",""" were video of that event?",Did the event in question occur at a specific location?,Was any portion of the NYC Drag March pre-recorded or in live recording?
Would a public toilet without dividers cost P295 million compared to the entire rehabilitation of Manila Bay?,Did the Manila Bay rehabilitation cost P385 million compared to the P295 million?,Is the dividers in the public toilets P295?,Does the public toilet dividers include dividers?
"Is anyone earning under £25,000 considered to be unskilled work under the new immigration rules?",Is the government's new immigration rules untrue?,"Does the government's new immigration rules make people who earn under £25,000 deemed unfit for work?",Are the new immigration rules related to the economy?
Did Biden create only 2.1 million new jobs?,Did Biden’s first 30 months in office create 4.9 million new jobs?,Did Biden create 2.1 million new jobs?,Did Biden create more new jobs than Obama?,Was Biden’s first 30 months in office a better time to create new jobs than Obama's first 30 months in office?
Did two children in Guinea die after receiving a Covid-19 vaccine?,Did the vaccine cause deaths in the Guinea?,Did the vaccine prevent death?,Did the vaccine cause deaths in Guinea?,Did the vaccine cause deaths in Guinea?,Was the vaccine successful?,Did the vaccine prevent a death?,Is the vaccine effective in Guinea?
"Did China seek court approval to kill over 20,000 coronavirus patients?","Did China seek for court approval to kill 20,000 coronavirus patients?","Was China seeking court approval to kill 20,000 coronavirus patients to prevent further spread of the virus?","Was China seeking court approval to kill 20,000 coronavirus patients?"
Was Asha Degree ever found?,Was Asha Degree ever reported missing?,Was Asha Degree ever found?,Was Asha Degree ever reported missing?,Was Asha Degree ever reported dead?,Was Asha Degree ever convicted of killing a person?,Did Asha Degree ever go missing?,Did Asha Degree go missing after being arrested?
Did Hassan increase state spending in the middle of the great recession by 24 percent leading up to and following it?,Did Hassan not increase state spending after the Great recession?,Did Hassan increase state spending in the middle of the great recession following it?,Did Hassan not increase state spending in the middle of the great recession subsequently following it?
Are mRNAs in COVID-19 vaccines accumulating in the ovaries?,Are there effects on the immune response to COVID-19 vaccines?,Are COVID-19 vaccines immune to its own placental protein?,Do COVID-19 vaccines regulate menstrual cycle?
Did Jimmy Carter sell his peanut farm before the presidency?,"Did Donald Trump’s businesses make $24,8 million during his presidency?",Did Trump sold his peanut farm before the presidency?,Did Trump sell his peanut farm before the presidency?,Did Donald Trump sell his peanut farm before the presidency?,Did Donald Trump sell his peanut farm before the presidency?
Is it true that the video of people surrounding an ambulance does not relate to the Illinois 2023 shooting?,Is there information to indicate that these people are not connected to the 2023 shooting?,Is there any information to indicate that these people are not connected to the 2023 shooting?,Were any of the people who surrounded an ambulance involved in the 2023 shooting involved in the Chicago riots?,Did this information come from the police or the medical professionals involved in the shooting?
Was the girl traced within nine hours of the incident?,Was the girl a ‘Hindu Jain’ girl?,Had the girl been in a family or community?,Was the girl in a family or community?,Have any other incidents been reported regarding the incident?,Have any of these incidents been resolved before the allegations are reported?
Did Trump advertise a tower in Mumbai that has one way to live?,Did Trump ad the same way that homeless people lived?,Is Trump a tower that has only one way to live?,Is there evidence or evidence that Trump is trying to push people into buying his tower?,Is the image a fake advertisement for Trump tower in Mumbai?
What is the estimated amount of houses and pesos that the DSWD is giving away?,Is it for 200 families?,Is it a lottery?,Is it a raffle?,Is it a lot?,Is it going to be a successful one?,Is it a good idea?
Did Trump say he will be re-elected as president?,Has Trump made any announcement in relation to the date he will be re-elected?,Did Trump say he would be re-elected as president in 2021?,Are there any other significant dates associated with Trump's re-election?
Does the photograph authentically show a Harvard morgue employee charged in connection with trafficking in human remains in spring 2023?,Did this employee receive convictions?,Did this employee receive convictions for trafficking in human remains?,Was this person held accountable for their actions by a police or court?,Is this individual still charged?
Was Shetty killed by a Muslim man?,Was Shetty shot dead by Ashik?,Was Shetty a Muslim?,Was Shetty of Indian nationality?,Was Shetty originally from Karnataka?,"Did Shetty's death occur in mysuru, kerala?",Was Shetty a student?
Does the mRNA Covid-19 vaccine lower the risk of heart attack in people?,Does the mRNA Covid-19 vaccine increase the risk of a heart attack in people?,Has the rate of heart attack decreased after mRNA Covid-19 vaccine in patients?,Did the risk decrease after mRNA Covid-19 vaccine in people?
"Do 260,000 over 75s refuse to pay their licence fee?",Do any over 75s pay the licence fee?,"Were there more than 200,000 over 75s awaiting the fees payment?","Were there more than 200,000 over 75s unable to pay the fees?",Have the fees not been paid?,Are any over 75s trying to get a refund?
Has any other major party nominee released their tax returns?,Has any other major party nominee released any tax returns over the past 40 years?,Is Trump the only major party nominee to publicly release their tax returns?,Does any other major party nominee besides Trump release their tax returns over the past 40 years?,Is there any other major party nominee that has not released their tax returns over the past 40 years?
Did both Chinese and Obama agree on a total of over 100 things?,Did China and Obama agree on a total of less than 100 things in bilateral economic dialogues?,Did any of the 100 items that were agreed upon include cybersecurity?,Did any of the items discussed in the economic dialogues actually pertain to cybersecurity issues?
"Did a report by the Congressional Budget Office found that low income seniors in Florida will face ""800 percent premium increases"" under the American Health Care Act?",Did these premium increases include the benefits of health care?,Would these premium increases include all of the benefits?,Would this increase be in addition to the benefits of health care under the American Health Care Act?
Is California's prisons budget the same percentage as it was in 1970?,Is the prisons budget the same percentage of the general fund today?,Is the prisons budget the same percentage of the general fund today?,Is California's prisons budget the same percentage of the general fund now?
Was it the guidelines that made banks to treat scribbled notes as invalid?,Is there any evidence that it was the guidelines that made banks to treat scribbled notes as invalid?,Was the RBI aware that scribbled notes can be treated as invalid if they are illegible?
Did Pasch vote to cut school aid by nearly $300 million?,Did Pasch have a majority in the Senate prior to the 2014 recall?,Did Pasch vote on any legislation after he left the Senate?,Was Pasch involved in any legal proceedings regarding the school aid cuts?,Did Pasch's political allies claim to support his candidacy?
Would Texas need to increase state spending by 28 percent if it is going to reach the national average for spending per resident?,Would Texas need to raise state spending by more than 28 percent to reach the national average for spending per resident?,Would Texas need to raise state spending by an additional 35 percent to meet the national average?
Did the Channel Tunnel cost £12 billion to build in today's money?,Was the tunnel built through the Middle East?,Did the Channel Tunnel cost more than £16 billion to build in today's money?,Was the project on a pre-contracted basis?,Were other tunnels created after the Channel Tunnel project?
Did the CRPF upgrade its gear between 2011 and 2022?,Have the CRPF's new equipment been tested on the CRPF?,Does the CRPF upgrade equipment on a regular basis?,Did the CRPF's new equipment have any impact on its performance?,Would a CRPF upgrade likely be used in a different scenario next year?
Did the provisions get over 90 votes in the Senate?,Did there only have one senator in the senate for those provisions?,Was there a specific amendment for those proposals?,Did some provisions specifically focus on mental health in general?,Will the new bill deal with mass shootings?,Were all of the mental health provisions specific to mass shootings?
Is this policy change part of the Republican's plan to increase the amount of Medicare money paid to younger people?,Will this change change a lot of people's Medicare benefits?,Is this health plan in the same category as those on Congress's health plan?,Is this proposed change to medicare for the under 55's a change from the current medicare plan?
Is it true that Obama wants to raise the lowest income tax rate from 10 to 15%?,Was Obama's stated objective of reducing tax rates based upon a tax reduction in 2011?,Did Obama make a statement based on this tax reduction?,Has Obama's stated purpose of reducing tax rates based upon a tax reduction in 2011 been met with success?
Does Women receive 8.2% more than men in Texas?,What is the income disparity for both men and women in Texas?,Is it true that the majority of women in Texas make 82.1% more on average?,Do women in Texas earn less in general than men?,Are women currently receiving a greater share of income in Texas than men?
Did Moore refer to child labor as an issue in his comments?,Did Moore support removing child labor laws?,Did Moore support an 11-12 year age restriction for children?,Did Moore think child labor law changes would lead to more adult poverty?,Is Stephen Moore currently serving in the US House of Representatives?,Has Moore stated that he supports a higher age for children to work?
Is the HBO show My Secret Terrius accurate in predicting the COVID-19 outbreak in 2018?,Is the Netflix show My Secret Terrius accurate in predicting the COVID-19 outbreak in 2018?,Is this episode of HBO's My Secret Terrius accurate in predicting the COVID-19 outbreak in 2018?
Could eight cooler years be extrapolated to draw conclusions on long-term global warming?,Is there any evidence for this finding to be true?,Can there be any evidence for this finding to be false?,Are there any facts that suggest this finding to be true?,Can there be any evidence that this conclusion is valid?
Did Kyle shoot at and kill dozens of looters during Hurricane Katrina?,Did Kyle punch Jesse Ventura for his shooting spree after Katrina?,Did Kyle punch Ventura in the face for his shooting spree after Katrina?,Did Kyle shoot at and kill dozens of looters after Hurricane Katrina?,Did Kyle punch Jesse Ventura in the face for his shooting spree after Katrina?
Did a photo ID law pass in North Carolina?,Is it one of the most lenient voter ID laws?,Did North Carolina have a photo ID law that was more lenient than many?,Are there other photo ID laws that have more leniency?,Was the photo ID law passed by North Carolina an unregulated law?
Did Budd vote against the 2018 farm bill?,Did Budd vote against the Farm bill because it did not add work requirements for able bodied adults?,Did the 2018 farm bill have any policy limitations or aims for the state?,Did Budd vote against the 2018 farm bill because it did not include work requirements for able bodied adults?
Has the ONS admitted 6183 people died of Covid-19?,Did the ONS admit 6183 people died from Covid-19?,Is the number of people who died of Covid-19 known?,"Has the ONS acknowledged 6,183 people died of Covid-19?","Has the ONS claimed 6,183 people died of Covid-19?"
Did Ruto take office as Kenya's president in August 2022?,Has the video ever been manipulated?,Was the video taken from the oath of office taken in August of 2017?,Did the video appear to have been manipulated?,"Did Ruto say ""I will not change my mind"" in the video?"
Did farmers in the country protest laws against which they were campaigning?,Did farmers in the country protest the Indian national flag which was painted on a number of farm buildings?,Did farmers protest these three laws?,Are there any issues with these protest laws in the country?,Do any flags on farm buildings contain pictures of the national flag?
Did Attorney General Roy Cooper refuse to do his job by not defending House Bill 2 in a lawsuit?,Did Cooper rescind the restraining order against House Bill 2?,Does Cooper represent the House in any legal cases?,Has Cooper filed a record with the SEC for this year?
Did Cloonen get any money from these contracts?,Is there another $8.5 million in contracts?,Is Cloonen's salary $68k?,Is she working on state contracts with these funds?,Would Cloonen have need to make this additional salary?,Is Cloonen receiving public donations?
Is the 2021 letter written by the railroad industry lobbyists?,Is the letter drafted by the industry lobbyists?,Is the letter intended to reduce visual track inspections?,Are there any other comments to this letter?,Is there any other information regarding Rubio's 2021 letter?
Is Barrett planning to spend $100 million to build this?,Is this the only way to move people in this area?,Does this project involve going over two miles?,Can this project only be completed in the east side?,Will this project replace the current system?,Are there other locations that can benefit from this project?
Does about 95 percent of Ohio’s electricity come from coal?,Does Ohio use coal in electricity production?,Did Ohio have a nuclear power plant before 2013?,Are coal plants used in Ohio?,Are coal plants used in Ohio?,Are coal plants used in Ohio?,Are coal plants in Ohio?
Did protesters display signs indicating their opposition to Trump?,Did protesters receive injuries?,Was protesting on the freeway a cause for this death?,Are there other protests planned for the same day?,Did this incident occur in the same vicinity of Trump as this occurred?,Are Trump protesters known to be associated with this incident?
Will Southwest Airlines give the following to anyone who shares a page with them?,Will Southwest Airlines offer the following when you share a page on Facebook?,Will Southwest Airlines give any money to anyone who shares a page with them?,Will Southwest Airlines offer any money to anyone who shares a page with them?
Is there evidence that Sanders' proposals were never voted out of committee?,Is Sanders a senator and a teacher?,Is this the second time Sanders has voted to open pre-kindergarten to 4 year olds?,Does Sanders' proposal to expand pre-kindergarten to all 4 year olds fail to pass committee?
"Is it true that ""48,49 percent"" people support President Obama?",Does that number include people who pay no income tax?,"Does the number of ""48,49 percent"" support Obama refer to the percentage of people who pay no income tax?",Is that percentage true?,Has that percentage of the voting population in a state or country ever been lower than 54%?
Was Nora Jackson arrested on 26 hour battery charge or lesser charges?,Was the baby tased to a ceiling fan for 26 hours?,Was the baby tased to the ceiling fan for a total of 26 hours?,Did the baby sitter wear an eyeglasses or another protective device?
Has property taxes increased by 20% in a year because of governor's actions?,Has property tax increase due to governor's actions made real?,Are the property taxes affected by the governor's actions?,Is the property tax increase due to governor's actions for real or imagined?,Does a billion dollars in rebates go away because of governor's actions?
"Does this photo show Amish people who drove 2.5 hours with the ""Freedom Convoy"" to cook them food at their next stop?",Did the Amish drive these 2.5 hours?,Did the Amish drive 1.5 hours to cook them food at their next stop?,"Does the photo show Amish people who drove 2.5 hours with the ""Freedom Convoy""?"
Was many Southwest Airlines flights canceled owing to pilot protests?,Is the COVID-19 vaccine mandate the reason for all of the canceled flights?,Did Southwest Airlines cancel some flights on a daily basis for protests over the vaccine mandate?,Did Denver Airport cancel a large number of flights due to pilot protests over the COVID vaccine mandate?
Does the research highlight any evidence that lockdowns have improved COVID-19 mortality?,Does this study compare lockdowns to other measures to reduce death?,Is the research consistent with the findings in general?,Does the research show that lockdowns have an effect on COVID-19 mortality?,Were these lockdowns associated with reduced death from COVID?
Was the number of 7 days in question in higher impfogen concentrations than in low impfogen concentrations?,Is the high level of 7 days in question a sign of the high number of 7 days?,Is the low level of 7 days in question a sign of the low 7 days?
Was bomb making training being given in the mosque on the night of the massacre?,Did any of the terrorists escape after the blast?,Was there any evidence to suggest that terrorists fled after the attack?,Was there any evidence that terrorists came after the attack?,Did terrorists remain after the attack?,Did the terrorists escape after the attack?
Did migrants arrive at the US border in May 2023?,Was the incident documented in the media?,Does the date of the incident coincide with the year that the incident occurred?,Did any of the people pictured in the photo actually arrive at the US border in May 2023?,Does the article accurately describe the specific day of arrival for the migrants at the US border?
"Did Dickinson, Texas require applicants to not boycott Israel?","Does Dickinson, Texas offer repair grants?",Is there an alternative to boycotting Israel in Texas?,"Was the state of Texas in favor of a fix grant for Dickinson, Texas in October 2017?","Is there evidence that Dickinson, Texas offer repair grants for Dickinson, Texas?"
Was the man involved in a relationship with the biological daughter?,Did the man have sex with any other persons?,Was the man sexually involved with any other people?,Has it been proven that the man was physically involved in a relationship with anyone else?,Was the father of the biological daughter still alive?
Does a mask reduce oxygen up to 60%?,Is wearing a mask harmful to health if it is used in the air?,Are there any people who do not use masks?,Is any benefit lost with use of a mask?,Do the people who wear a mask have a higher risk of having lung cancer?
Was District 22 representative 80% of this district?,Was the area of District 20 representative 20% of this district?,Is District 22 representative about 20% of the entire district?,Was the district represented by District 22 in 2010?,Is this district representative of the entire state?,Do these numbers represent correct data?,Will any other congressional representatives be represented in this district?
Did the man with a woman's brain transplant crash?,Did the man who had a woman's brain transplant crash with an automobile?,Has the man who had a woman's brain transplant crashed in the past 2 weeks?,Did the man have a car crash in the past 2 weeks?
"Did pending claims increase from 391,000 to 890,000 under the Obama Administration?",Did the veterans benefits budget increase by over 40% under Obama?,Did pending claims decrease under the Obama Administration?,Did the upcoming election result in increases in pending claims?,Did the administration increase pending claims in the general election?
Are all individuals aged 20 years and above with no formal education or highest level of education less than Grade 7 included in the current study?,Are individuals aged 20 years and above with no formal education or highest level of education less than Grade 7 included in the current study?,Is the current study based on data from 2011 and 2013?
Was bed tax revenue in 2011 the highest in the Panhandle?,Was this the highest bed tax collection year in history?,Have bed tax revenues in 2011 exceeded other years?,Did the Panhandle have the highest bed tax collection year in 2010?,Does this increase reflect the increasing number of travelers on the Panhandle?
Are the EVMs being changed after May 19?,Will the BJP actually win the election?,Will a change in the EVMs affect voter turnout?,Will there be a change in election outcome in the next month?,Will the BJP be successful if the changes are made after May 19?
Did 61% of Virginia children fail to meet national proficiency standards?,Did the state need to do anything to help these children?,Did the state take any action to prevent this behavior?,Did this state provide any assistance to these children?,Did the state take any action to increase participation?,Did the state make any changes to the school system to improve these children’s performance?
Does Donald Trump start a policy of forcing detained immigrants to wear identifying wristbands and yellow bracelets?,Has the practice been enforced by any other president?,Did Trump implement this policy during the time period of his presidency?,Did identifying bracelets exist before or after the enforcement of this policy?
Are the blood bags red?,Are they from vaccinated people?,Are they of different color?,Are all blood donors in this photo from vaccinated people?,Does the photo show blood from different types of people?,Is there any evidence to link these different blood types?,Does the photo show blood from different cultures?
Does this trip of President Bush result in the creation of hundreds of thousands of jobs?,Did this trip result in $350 billion in military development and economic development?,Is the stated investment between this trip and this country a positive one?,Is it consistent with the stated mission and goals of the inauguration?
Is there such a survey?,Is the survey free?,Is McDonald's offering two free Big Mac Meals?,Is there a minimum of two votes needed to receive the coupon?,Is there a minimum of one vote needed to redeem this coupon?,Can users sign up for this survey?
Did Dangote ever thank Bola Tinubu for helping him set up a US$20 billion oil refinery?,Has Dangote received any recompense for helping him with the refinery project?,Are there any other companies that have been helped by Aliko Dangote's efforts?
Did Obama visit more countries in his first six months as president?,Has Obama met with more world leaders?,Have Obama's meetings with world leaders exceeded any previous president in his first six months in office?,Is it true that Obama's meetings with world leaders exceed any previous president in his first six months in office?
Does the IRS audit families who spend $ 28 per day?,Was this statement taken from the IRS?,Would a family's annual spending of $28 per day result in being audited by the IRS?,Did the CDC study the impact of taxation on families in the US?,Did this study use any data to support this claim?
Did the rise in pre-pandemic death levels be 40 percent increase in deaths?,Has the percentage of vaccine-related deaths gone down?,Has vaccine effectiveness declined despite the increase in deaths?,Has the percentage of vaccine-related deaths lowered in pre-pandemic years?,Is there evidence that vaccine effectiveness is dropping?
Did the Shirdi Saibaba Sansthan Trust donate money to the Hajj pilgrims?,Did the Shirdi Saibaba Sansthan Trust donate money to Hajj pilgrims?,Did the Shirdi Saibaba Sansthan Trust donate money to Hajj pilgrims?
Did Gandhi receive an allowance of Rs 100 monthly from the British government?,Did Gandhi receive this allowance from the British government?,Did Gandhi receive a monthly allowance from the British government?,Did Gandhi receive an allowance of Rs 100 monthly from the British government?,Did Gandhi receive an allowance of Rs 100 monthly from the British government?
Were the costs of expanding Medicaid at a high enough rate to bring in $100 billion?,Has the amount of Medicaid expansion in Florida been lowered under previous administrations?,Is it estimated that expansion of Medicaid would have brought in $100 billion in economic benefit to Florida?,Is expanding Medicaid at the current level significantly lowering the costs of health care for Florida?
"Is it true that the ""mega-rich"" pay 15 percent in taxes?",Are they in the 15 and 25 percent brackets?,Are their income taxes at a higher rate than the middle class?,Are they hit with more payroll taxes?,Are the median income tax rates lower than that of the high income brackets?
Does Screnock say that a rapist who preyed on an underage girl will go free after only an eight-month sentence?,Does Screnock support a child predator with a zero time sentence?,Does Screnock support a prey to a child go free after only an eight month sentence?
Was Josephine Myrtle Corbin born with a pelvis with two pelvises and four legs?,Did she ever have a pelvis with two pelvises and four legs?,Was it documented in a photograph?,Did the photograph show Corbin before she had a pelvis with two pelvises and four legs?,Did Corbin have a pelvis with two pelvises and four legs?
Did Taylor Swift humiliate a fan for wearing a Trump shirt to one of her shows?,Did Swift humiliate the fan for wearing a Trump shirt to a show?,Did Swift humiliate a fan for wearing a Trump shirt to one of her shows?,. Was Swift able to take the insults with grace or humor?
Was this campaign ad considered political?,Was this campaign ad taken down by Facebook and YouTube?,Has this campaign ad violated any rules?,Does this video have any other claims?,Did this campaign ad violate a rule?,Did this video receive a negative response?,Did this campaign ad resurface?
"Is the state's bond propositions ""without raising taxes""?",Can Austin voters approve all seven of the proposed bonds without raising taxes?,"Is this state's proposed bond proposals ""without raising taxes""?",Is Austin's proposed bond proposals constitutional?,Is there sufficient funding to cover all of the proposed Bond proposals?
Did Crist applaud Palin's election in 2008?,Did Crist support Palin's selection for president?,Did Crist criticize Palin's choice for president?,Was Crist approving of Palin's presidential candidacy?,Did Crist agree that Palin would do a great job?
Did Tu Youyou receive the Nobel prize in 2015?,Did Tu Youyou stay mostly out of the limelight in 2015?,Has Tu Youyou been mentioned in media?,::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::::?
Did the survey indicate that hydroxychloroquine was a good drug?,Did the survey show that hydroxychloroquine was a good drug?,Did the survey contain people that were in very bad shape?,Did there appear to be an underestimation of the effectiveness of hydroxychloroquine?
Did Obama hold a meeting with Ayers?,Have Ayers and Obama worked together?,Did Ayers work with Obama on certain projects?,Are Ayers and Obama both active in the Chicago community?,Has Obama held a meeting in Ayers's home?,Did Obama have a meeting in Ayers's home in the 1990's?
Was the family from Jind caught up in the Sudan crisis in 2023?,Did the family lose their house to the conflict?,Was the family from Jind in total control of the Sudanese war?,Was the family in total control of the Sudan war?,Did the family from Jind stay together at the house of the family in Sudan for years?
Do Republicans call for the elimination of 401(k)s entirely?,Do some Republican candidates think that 401(k)s should be replaced with governmental accounts?,Are any of these plans currently in force?,Does anyone claim that 401(k)s should be replaced by government-run accounts?
Is New York leading the nation in out-migration?,Was New York leading the nation in out-migration in 2010?,Did this list only include residents from New York?,"Was the year 2010 count a total of 126,000 people leaving New York?",Was the year 2010 count a total of over one million residents?
Did the newspaper clipping about a man not passing stool for 25 years contain any true information?,Did the man not pass stool for a period of time during this period?,Did the man pass stool for a period of time during this period?,Did the man pass stool for a period of time during this period?
Did the tennis player who died have received this vaccine?,Was the vaccine available during this time of life?,Did the tennis player die from COVID?,Have many other cases of COVID vaccine related deaths happened?,Has this COVID-19 vaccine been successful in the U.S. before?,Have many other cases of this COVID vaccine related deaths occurred?,Has there been any other similar cases of COVID vaccine related deaths?
Did Trump's administration boost U.S. exports to Canada and Mexico by about 50%?,Did these exports support about 2.8 million American jobs?,Did Trump increase U.S. exports to Canada and Mexico by about 50%?,Did Trump work to increase U.S. exports to Canada and Mexico?
Has the average maize yield stagnated at 8.5 bags per acre?,Has the average yield of maize fluctuated between 8.5 bags per acre and 30 bags per acre?,Does the average yield of maize reflect the very low yields among smallholders?,Was there a increase in the average average maize yield among smallholders?,Did the average average maize yield increase in the first year of farming?
Did the average American pay 22 percent of their income to federal taxes?,Did the richest 400 Americans pay 16 percent of their income to federal taxes?,Is the average American tax rate about 22% of their income?,Is the average American tax rate about 22% of their income?,Does the average American pay more for their income taxes than the richest 400 Americans?
"Was Clarkson forced to lose 30 pounds by the producers of ""The Voice""?",Did Clarkson lose 30 pounds on The Voice alone?,Were Clarkson's NBC producers involved in the loss?,Is the decision to lose weight made by the producers solely based on Clarkson's weight loss?
Is the bus accident that killed 12 BSF personnel pictured?,Is the picture taken of a specific bus model?,Is the photograph of an individual bus model?,Is a photograph of an individual bus model included in this report?,Is there a photograph that lists all bus models?
"Did this video show an elderly moviegoer giving a bad review to ""Brahmstra: Part One – Shiva""?",Do we know that this video was of an old man?,Is this video evidence that a video existed?,Was this video taken at a theater?,Does this video show a man abusing Karan Johar?
Can you show the effects of lockdowns in the five countries?,Can you show how many people are locked down?,Could you show more or less than five people locked down from all causes?,Can you give a reason for the countries who had lockdowns?,Can you show at least two examples of lockdowns in your country?
Did the tweet claim that India killed 180 Chinese soldiers in Ladakh?,Did the tweet claim that India killed the Chinese soldiers in Ladakh?,Have the Chinese military claimed responsibility for the incident?,Did the tweet claim that Ladakh has been completely destroyed?,Have any other media outlets claimed responsibility for the incident?
Does COVID-19 carry 251 times the load in the noses of unvaccinated individuals?,Did people who were vaccinated carry 251 times the load of COVID-19 viruses in their noses of unvaccinated individuals?,Are individuals who were vaccinated with COVID-19 more likely to have COVID-19 viruses in their noses of unvaccinated individuals?
Are the Israel Air Force preparing for an attack against Palestine?,Will Israel attack Palestine in 2021?,Are the Israeli Air Force planning for an attack against Palestine?,Does the image indicate any conflict between Israel and Palestine?,Would the Israeli Air Force attack Palestine?,Does Israel plan to attack Palestinians?,Is the image likely accompanied by a graphic?
Do federal agencies know that hydroxychloroquine and chloroquine “were very likely to be effective against COVID-19” based on 2014 paper?,Did federal agencies already know that hydroxychloroquine and chloroquine “were very likely to be effective against COVID-19” based on 2014 paper?
Does Georgia restrict the selling of a pint of beer to a patron?,Does Georgia allow brewery a six pack?,Does Georgia allow breweries to sell a six pack to people in Georgia?,Does Georgia regulate the marketing of alcohol for the purpose of consumption by alcoholic drinks?,Does Georgia regulate alcoholic alcohol for consumption in Georgia?
Did this doctor get his arm stuck in the patient's anus for 8 hours?,Are there records to establish whether he actually got his arm stuck in the patient's anus?,Did this doctor get his arm stuck in the patient's anus?,Was the doctor doing his job?,Did this doctor get a referral for a doctor that may have been responsible?
Was the border 78 percent down under previous administrations?,Is there any other evidence that the border went up under previous administrations?,Did Obama increase border security in 2010?,Was Obama promoting increased border security in 2010?,Are there any other evidence that the border increased under previous administrations?,Has Trump stated an increased border security in 2010?
Is the total number of individuals convicted of terrorism related charges of foreign-born?,Is the percentage of convicted foreign-born individuals based on the United States federal crime rate?,Is the percentage of individuals convicted of terrorism related charges of foreign-born the same?,Does the figure for foreign-born individuals by the United States Federal Crime rate make sense?
Does California Senate Bill 145 shield pedophiles from having to register?,Are pedophiles who rape children required to register?,Have California Governor Gavin Newsom signed any legislation protecting pedophiles from registering as sex offenders?,Is California Senate Bill 145 protected by any federal law?
Did the crew of Air Force One refuse to fly Obama 6000 miles just to play golf?,Do these comments directly support the obama administration’s refusal to play golf?,Is the tweet from Air Force One deemed to be true?,Did the tweet mention any actual violations in the flight?,Is the Air Force One crew still operating?
Did women account for 92.3 percent of the jobs lost under Obama?,Did women account for all of the jobs lost under Obama?,Did these jobs primarily belong to women?,Do these jobs primarily go to women?,Are these jobs located in areas of the country primarily occupied by women?,Do these jobs affect women?
Was this rocket launched into space in 2013?,Was the flight of this rocket in 2013 photographed by a frog?,Has this astronaut received any restraining orders?,Have the launch of this rocket been verified safe?,Has this astronaut faced any repercussions from this camera?,Has this frog caused any serious injury or damage to any other parts of NASA's mission?,Did this astronaut receive any restraining orders?
Was this measure approved by the House of Representatives last year?,Did this bill pass in Congress last year?,Can the bill have a negative impact on individuals with pre-existing conditions?,Can this bill have a negative impact on individuals with health conditions?,Does this bill provide a remedy for these problems?,Does this bill include the protection of these specific groups?
"Is this a ""pretending"" video?",Is this a live event?,Are these actors supposed to be victims of Russian Invasion of Ukraine?,Is this person acting like they are victim of Russian invasion?,Is this acting part of the Russian invasion of Ukraine?,Is the acting part of the Russian invasion of Ukraine?
Was the tax rate for employers 50th in the nation before Republicans took control?,Was unemployment higher than doubled under Democrats?,Did Democrats pass income tax cuts after taking control of the legislature?,Was the unemployment rate higher under the Republicans than under the Democrats?,Would the rate for employers be lower now?,Would the rate for employers be lower after the Republicans took control of the legislature?
Did income tax laws in a certain number of states affect job growth in the economy from 2001 to 2010?,Are income taxes always mandatory in these states?,Did this state's economy increase in employment between 2001 and 2010?,Do a majority of these 9 states have income taxes?,Does income tax income make up the majority of the economy in this state?
"Did four major hurricanes hit the United States on August 29, 2014 in a meaningful pattern?",Did the major hurricanes hit the U.S. on the same day each year?,"Has there been a pattern between the number of hurricanes hitting the U.S. on August 29, 2014 and how many?",Did any hurricanes hit the U.S. on the same day each year?
Was this a new report or repeat of the previous one?,Is it only the second report that has reported a two-wheeler hitting a car in Jammu?,Do any other reports that are related to this case exist?,Was this a random accident?,Does anyone have any evidence that suggests this was an isolated incident?
Did the manatee that appeared in 2019 with a bicycle tire make a different appearance in 2020?,Did the manatee that appeared in 2019 with a bicycle tire make a different appearance in 2020?,Did the manatee that appeared in 2019 with a bicycle tire make a different appearance in 2020?
"Did ""we have one charter school that for seven years has been rated unacceptable""?",Is this school a charter?,Did the school receive this report from the state?,Does this school need to undergo a curriculum change?,Is this school rated as ineligible?,"Do charter schools undergo an Advisory Committee, for a period of time, to make sure their education meets standards?"
"Did the number of participants exceed 12,600?",Did the event in DC affect a higher number of participants or less people?,Was the number of attendees over what the Park Service estimated?,Did more people attend the march in DC than in general?,Did the majority of attendees voted for MAGA?,Does the DC Park Service plan on holding more marches?
Did Ambedkar agree with Savarkar on the two-nation theory?,Was Kapil Sibal talking about Ambedkar?,Was Kapil Sibal associated with Savarkar on the two-nation theory?,Did Kapil Sibal support Ambedkar's work?,Does Kapil Sibal support the theory of the two-nation theory?
Is Bud Light offering 24-packs of beer to Facebook users?,Is Bud Light offering alcohol to Facebook users?,Would Facebook users enjoy the beer?,Will Facebook users be able to get a beer in return?,Is Bud Light giving away beer to Facebook users in exchange for Facebook users' birthdays?

Is it probable SARS-CoV-2 virus began mutating prior to mass vaccine rollsouts?,Is it possible SARS-CoV-2 virus began mutating prior to mass vaccine rollouts?,Is it possible SARS-CoV-2 virus began mutating prior to mass vaccine rollouts?
Was the event cancelled due to security breach of the PM’s convoy?,Was the crowd for the event in Punjab’s Ferozepur large?,Was there a security breach in the PM’s convoy?,Is the image from the image from Pakistan?,Were protests against the PM’s convoy related to the public meeting?
Did any patients go without needed care as a result of costs in 2007?,Was there a significant percentage of Americans without needed care as a result of costs in 2007?,Did any individuals go without needed care for costs?,Is there sufficient evidence to prove that this was the majority of individuals with a need for needed care?
Is this assertion supported by data?,Did Gillum ever resign from his position?,Did Gillum directly cause the murder increase?,Did Gillum act a total disaster at all?,Did the murder increase have anything to do with the crime rate?,Was the increase caused solely by Gillum's handling of murder?
Are there any laws in Eritrea regarding how much it is necessary to marry two women?,Are there laws regarding how much it is necessary to marry two women?,Will some men get incarcerated for being ineligible for marrying more than two women?,Will some men get incarcerated for being ineligible for marrying more than two women?
Was the man doing this on his two-wheeler?,Was the man wearing black?,Did the man wear black clothing?,Was the man's clothes black?,Does the photo show the man holding his dead body?,Is it true the man's clothing is black?,Does the man in the photo have a Muslim facial tattoo?,Is the man's clothing black?
Did Bahrain king arrive in Dubai with the robot bodyguard with 360 cameras and pistols?,Is the king in Dubai with a robot bodyguard?,Were all police officers in Dubai in attendance?,Were any police officers also injured during the king’s arrival?,Will it be long before the king arrives in Dubai with his robot bodyguard?
"Was there no employee deaths in Miami Gardens, Fla.?",Was it reported that the manager of a Checkers store killed 10 employees?,Are there records of this manager ever being charged?,"Did the store have a police incident in Miami Gardens, Fla.?",Are these employees listed?,Did these employees receive a disciplinary from the store?
Is it true that it will cost a single county $31 million to fix a single ditch?,Does this figure include a new federal regulation that says this cost will increase by over 9%. Will this increase in government spending increase costs in Pinellas County or will the state pay most of this funding?
Was there an incidence of fatality or death associated with the vaccination against Covid-19 in Oberhausen?,Did a doctor describe these events?,Did two reanimations occur in Oberhausen?,Did the vaccine prevent further deaths?,Did anyone suffer from these deaths or reanimations?,Was this vaccine administered in a senior hospital?
Has retail milk increased by 7% over the past year?,Has the price farmers are paid for milk dropped by 23%?,Is it true that retailers are receiving more money from their milk suppliers than at the same time last year?,Are the prices of these products dropping in the past year?,Are the retail prices for fresh milk in the US increasing?
Does Biles know of any other instances of sexual abuse?,Was Nassar involved in Biles' sexual abuse?,Did Biles say she should quit gymnastics before Tokyo?,Did Nassar assault Biles?,Does Biles think Nassar used Biles to sexually abuse?,Did Biles do any interviews on that subject?
Does the US have a higher annual loss in 2020 compared to 2019?,Did the U.S. lose “tons more lives in 2020” than in 2019 compared to 2019?,Is there a greater increase in the number of deaths from a US perspective than from a global perspective?,Does the U.S. lose a higher percentage of total deaths per year in 2020 than in 2019?
Has food imports increased from 10% to 17% of goods imports over the last decade?,Did this translate into a 2.5-fold increase from $1.2 billion to $3 billion?,Did this translate into a 2.5-fold increase from $1.2 billion to $3 billion?,Did this translate into a 2.5-fold increase from $1.2 billion to $3 billion?
Did McCollum raise his pay four times?,Did McCollum raise his pay more than one time in the past?,Has McCollum received a higher Congressional pension?,Does McCollum currently have a higher Congressional pension than the Democrat?,"Statements are made in this article on behalf of Aitkin & McCollum. This article has been updated on September 7, 2015. Citizen of the United States is a member of the Electoral College.?"
Do Lagos state have private schools?,Are there any registered public schools?,Are there any private schools in Lagos?,Do any other states have private schools in Lagos state?,Are any private schools in other states in the country?,Is the number of private schools in the country the largest?,Do other states have private schools in the country?
Is there any proof that Zelenskyy dressed in a high fashion look at Pride 1999?,Was Zelenskyy in the photo during this event?,Was this event prior to his election to the presidency?,Is there any proof Zelenskyy has ever been involved in an act of harassment?
"Did there occur a year with 12,500 millionaires living in Northern Ireland?","Was there a year with 12,500 millionaires living in Northern Ireland?",Did any of these individuals live within a mile of each other?,Are there any people in Northern Ireland that reside within 10 miles of each other?,Are any of these people considered to be wealthy?
"Did Utah governor Ben Carson create a flat tax that ""cut income taxes by 30%""?","Did Ben Carson work with the legislature to create a flat tax that ""cut income taxes by 30 percent""?","Did Ben Carson work with the state Legislature to create a flat tax that ""cut income taxes by 30 percent""?"
Did the Russian serviceman neutralize any other mines/bombs?,Was there any proof that the Russian serviceman neutralized these mines/bombs?,Did the russian serviceman do this on his own time?,Was the Russian serviceman involved in the operation?,Is this an accurate account of the Russian serviceman's actions in this operation?
Is the rate hike a benefit to taxpayers?,Is the rate hike related to inflation?,"Is the hike associated with rate increases, which have been announced previously?",Was there a rate increase in the budget of 2015?,Was the budget mentioned in the campaign?,Is the budget discussed in the campaign as being specific to the current fiscal year?
Was the GDP in those years the lowest ever?,Do these figures show a decline in the GDP?,Are these levels the lowest in the last decade?,Are the GDP numbers for the previous 3 years the lowest in the last 40-50 years?,Have these statistics been consistent?,Are these data for all of 2014 different than those from previous years?
Did the 1857 revolution become historic if Savarkar did not take part in it?,Did the 1857 revolution result in the assassination of Amit Shah?,Did Amit Shah say that Savarkar did not take part in the 1857 revolution?,Did Amit Shah claim that Savarkar is the reason the 1857 revolution became historic?
"Did the Western Cape's land reform audit find that the provincial government's pioneering commodity approach, and through innovative solutions like the share equity schemes, had led to the success of 62% of all land reform farms?",Has the success of 62% of all land reform farms in the Western Cape in the past year been attributed to the province's innovative land reform approach?,"Has there ever been a successful land reform farm in the Western Cape, according to the land reform audit?"
Was the Secret Service not officially debunked Cassidy Hutchinson’s testimony before the House Jan 6 panel?,Has the Secret Service debunked Hutchinson’s testimony since this date?,Was Hutchinson sworn in as a Democrat in January 2016?,Is Hutchinson an attorney for Donald Trump?
Does onions effectively suck toxins out of one’s body immediately after placing these under one’s feet?,Can onions be used for healing?,Does onion extract effectively suck toxins out of one’s body immediately after placing these under one’s feet?,Can onion extract effectively suck toxins out of one’s body immediately after placing these under one’s feet?
Did Melania Trump dig up the White House Rose Garden?,Did every first lady since 1913 plant roses in the White House Rose Garden?,Did every first lady plant roses in the White House Rose Garden?,Did Melania Trump dig up the White House Rose Garden?,Did Melania Trump plant roses in the White House Rose Garden?
Will the banks operate five days a week?,Is there a specific date in the bank's history that they will operate five days a week?,Would banks typically operate on Mondays?,Is the bank currently operating this day of the week?,Would there be a specific date when these bank will reopen?
Did the protesters have swastikas on their arms?,Was the photo taken in 2022?,Did the protesters have Trump flags at the protest sites?,Was the protest taking place in 2019?,Did the protesters imply a presidential inauguration?,Did the protesters hold Trump flags at the protest sites during the inauguration?
Are moderate Democrats opposed to bans on fracking in Michigan?,Would this ban destroy jobs and cut out more revenue?,Would this ban increase Michigan’s gross domestic product by $159 billion over five years?,Are all liberal Democrats in this political battle against fracking against a ban on fracking?
Did the NFL agree to give BLM $250 million?,Does BLM have a regulated political process?,Can these donations be tracked?,Did the NFL provide funding for a national terrorist group?,Did the NFL have a policy regarding non-profit groups or non-governmental organizations?,Did the NFL give this money to another civil rights group?
Was a video taken of the old woman?,Was the old woman alone for ten days by a couple?,Did the UP couple leave the old woman alone?,Did the elderly woman go to the Shaheen Bagh?,Have the UP couple seen the video?,Have they commented on the video?
Did these women send the PM a bra for the 20 soldiers killed in Galwan?,Did this incident result in any injuries or death of any Indian soldiers?,Did these women support the military effort in Galwan?,Did this incident directly cause any casualties?,Did this incident cause any problems within the Army?,Did any Indian soldiers die in the incident?
Did Woods use the Jaws of Life to avoid a car crash?,Have any other incidents led to the involving the Jaws of Life?,Are there any other events which have involved the Jaws of Life?,Have any incidents since Woods used the Jaws of Life to avoid a car crash?
Did Oregon have the second fastest growing economy in the nation in 2011?,Is Oregon the only state that had the second fastest growing economy in the nation in 2011?,Has Oregon experienced any recessions since the year 2011?,Are Oregon's liabilites more lenient with regards to liabilites on loan than any other state?
Did these voter registration groups register voters all at once?,Did a number of these groups participate in the entire statewide voter registration process?,Are these election groups representing various political views?,Were these voter registration groups required to vote?,Did the individual voter registration groups register all at once?,Are voter registration groups seeking to register all at once?
Did this episode add an anti Trump scene?,Did this episode have a long running script?,Has this episode been criticized for its political content?,Has this episode appeared in the last 3 seasons?,Does this episode have a positive or negative review?,Would this episode be considered favourable?,Is this episode rated PG-13?
Did Bill Gates give a waiter a $5 tip for being the'sons of a wood cutter'?,Did Bill Gates give a waiter a $5 tip for being the'sons of a wood cutter'?,Did Bill Gates make a $5 tip for being a'son of a wood cutter'?
Did Indian troops capture 150 Chinese soldiers?,Did Indian troops recapture and release Chinese soldiers?,Did this result in the release of Chinese soldiers?,Did this event come after other talks between the two sides?,Did the release of Chinese soldiers occur after a command-level talks?,Did this event result in any other negotiations by the Chinese military besides the release of Chinese soldiers?
Did these changes change the way you paid for tolls?,Did this rule change the fees for tolls?,"Does the tax that cars pay at tolls affect people in cars, but those who do not pay at tolls?",Does this rule change apply to cars with a toll charge?,Does this toll tax change the total cost for tolls?
Did the grounds of Dodger Stadium flood in August 2023?,Was there rain that caused the flood?,Was the storm a tropical storm?,Was rain related to the flood?,Did the Dodger Stadium experience flooding?,Has this incident occurred again since the 2023 Flooding?,Did this incident occur after the 2017 Flooding?
Did Obama's report say 8 million Americans would join Medicaid over the next few years?,Is this projected increase in Medicaid enrollment based on actual numbers?,Did Trump's report say 8 million Americans would join Medicaid over the next few years?,Does Trump's report support Medicaid expansion to 8 million by 2020?
Did the person who enthusiastically supported Trump on stage in Las Vegas in October 2015 have their citizenship revoked?,Does the individual who supported Trump have proof that they are being deported?,Has anyone claimed their citizenship in the U.S.?,Can it be a false statement to say that a person has been deported?
Is Trump's only economic agenda imposing massive taxes on the American people?,Has Trump's only economic agenda been imposing massive taxes on the American people with a 40% tax hike of a giant tariff?,Is Trump's only economic agenda imposing massive taxes on the American people with a 40% tax hike of a giant tariff?
Was the bridge inaugurated by PM Modi three months ago?,Did the bridge collapse after the opening ceremony?,Did the bridge collapse after the opening ceremony?,- Did there come down one or more bridges after the opening ceremony?,- Has this bridge since collapsed before?,- Is this bridge the same bridge that did not collapse?
Did two videos portray naked men in Seattle Pride Parade?,Did anyone actively participate in the Seattle Pride Parade?,Did any naked men participate in the International Fountain?,Do people know whether the videos are true or fake?,Did the photos on the video of the naked men from Seattle Pride Parade include their families?,Did the video of naked men taking a bath in the International Fountain have parents present?
Did people do a fake Uvalde school shooting?,Did two different males play role as father of a victim?,Does there have to be a reason for fake Uvalde school shootings?,Is it true that a fake Uvalde school shooting was staged?,Did multiple men pretend to be father of a victim?
Do Elon Musk and Twitter agree on which political parties Trump will be representing?,Do Trump's supporters believe that Elon Musk lowered Trump's profile to avoid Trump's repercussions?,Does Trump have access to all of his Twitter accounts?,Will there be any legal issues for Trump's administration in Elon Musk's tenure?
Does the video depict the 163-year-old man in an active meditation?,Is it an active meditation practice?,Did the video depict a group?,Is there any information about the man?,Was there any mention of a specific technique?,Is the shoushinbutsu stance in this video used?
Do they intend to continue the use of the 2016 arbitral award to assert their territorial rights?,Will they continue to use the 2016 arbitral award to assert their territorial rights?,Will their use of the 2016 arbitral award result in any other decisions?,Does the 2016 arbitral award represent an enforceable legal requirement?
"Can British citizens make over $7,000 a day investing in oil through a specific scheme?",Is it true that a specific scheme allows for the investing in of oil?,Is there a specific formula for the investing in of oil?,Can a particular percentage of the investing in of oil be used for purchasing oil products?
Did the UFO on truck depict a truck with cargo or a crane?,Did the UFO depict a truck with equipment?,Did the truck have a promotion on the back of the truck?,Is the UFO on truck advertising a freight company?,Was the truck advertising a ship on a ship?
Do all departments receive this instruction?,Will this instruction be passed to any individual department?,Will this instruction affect the aging of all personnel?,Have government employees been forced to retire?,Will this instruction be effective after the end of the year?,Will this instruction affect the aging of the entire workforce?,Does this instruction exist at all levels of government?
Did the girl die in an English town?,Was there evidence of the child being killed in London?,Is it possible that the girl was killed in the United States?,Was the girl named Emily Jones?,Is there evidence of her being decapitated in the United States?,Are Somali migrants from the United States allowed into UK?
Do workers who pick produce in Georgia make $12 to $18 an hour?,Can workers who pick produce in Georgia work on farms for only a few hours?,Do workers who pick produce in Georgia typically work long hours?,Does the average hourly wage for workers who pick produce in Georgia be at least $15?,Would workers who pick produce in Georgia make less if they worked for less hours?
Was Olumide Oworu attacked while campaigning in March?,Did Oworu's team experience any injuries?,Is there evidence the attack took place on election day?,Was Oworu involved in the attack?,Was there evidence the attack was committed to any other candidates?
"Did ""Moody"" claim that he was banned from saying any political stuff about Ayers during the 2008 campaign?",Did the statement make reference to Ayers specifically?,Did Obama's statement specifically ban Ayers from speaking about his political views?,Did Obama's statement specifically ban Ayers from speaking about his political views during the 2008 campaign?
Has the tax code been subsidizing fast food and junk food companies over the past 10 years?,Does the tax code have anything to do with the marketing efforts of fast food and junk food companies?,Will the tax code subsidize the marketing efforts of fast food and junk food companies over the next 10 years?,Are fast food and junk food companies financially benefited?
Did Reagan raise the debt ceiling 18 times?,Did Bush raise the debt ceiling 7 times?,Is Reagan responsible for the debt ceiling raising in total?,Has Reagan raised the debt ceiling on 18 occasions?,Has Bush raised the debt ceiling on 7 occasions?,Is there evidence to suggest that Reagan and Bush raised the debt ceiling on multiple occasions?
Does AIDS have a link with a 20 times increase in cancer in COVID-19 vaccined patients?,Does the AIDS study in Idaho indicate that COVID-19 vaccines weaken the immune system?,Does this study link COVID-19 vaccines to a 20 times increase in cancer in vaccinated patients?
Did Energy Global make this claim?,"Does Energy Global have a total installed capacity of 12,500 MW?",Is this percentage accurate?,Does Energy Global currently operate nuclear power plants?,Is the amount of electricity that the company currently operates nuclear power based on this estimate?
Did the 2012 state budget that Democrats approved leave Wisconsin taxpayers in debt of $3.6 billion?,Did the state budget that Democrats approved leave Wisconsin taxpayers in debt of $3.6 billion?,Did Wisconsin taxpayers pay more in interest on their debt compared to what they did in the 2012 state budget?,Did the state budget that Democrats approved left Wisconsin taxpayers in debt of $3.6 billion?
Did The Washington Times headline Al Gore wins in 2000?,Did the Washington Times publish an election announcement in 2000?,Was the Washington Times responsible for the Washington Post announcement of Al Gore wins in 2000?,Did The Washington Times cover events following Gore's 2000 victory?,Did the Washington Times publish a 2000 article on Gore's 2000 win?
Did a tsunami occur in Turkey after the 2023 earthquake?,Was the tsunami caused by earthquakes?,Was the tsunami a result of the earthquake?,Did the tsunami occur prior to or after the 2023 earthquake?,Did the tsunami occur before or after the 2023 earthquake?,Did it occur after the 2023 earthquake?
Does Yang have a position on the health care system?,Did Yang say this in relation to a specific political statement?,Is Yang's statement about psychiatry related to the health care system?,Is Yang's statement related to a specific economic recovery initiative?,Was Yang's political statement prior to this statement?
Are there more than 250 million Americans who already have health insurance?,Will they keep their health insurance?,Is health care provided by the state's insurers?,Does the state have an obligation to give out medical insurance?,Would the state be liable for any fees associated with the exchange?,Does anyone in Washington have other jurisdictions that provide insurance under the exchange?
Did White work at the Clinton Administration?,Was White the boss of a business in Middle East?,Did White default on a loan?,Was White a member of a business in the Middle East?,Was White involved in business dealings in the Middle East?,Was White's business dealings in the Middle East a good match?
"Are 74% of people in Texas ""crammed into 4% of the land?",""" Are 74% of people in Texas ""crammed into 4% of the land?",""" Are there data on how many people are crammed into 4% of the land?",Are there other reasons people have to live in crammed versus uncrammed housing?
Did photos include any ballots that were dumped during the 2022 midterm elections?,Are there any images of ballots that were dumped?,Does any of these images show that there were any ballots dumped?,Did any of these images have images of ballots that were not dumped during the 2022 midterm elections?
Did DALveer Bhandari become Chief Justice of the ICJ ending a British hold over the position?,Did DALveer Bhandari have an appointment within the first 72 hours following the completion of the first day of the new term?,Did DALveer Bhandari previously hold that position?,Did the first 72 hours of the new term include new cases or existing cases?
Does Malaysia waive electricity bills for 6 months during the coronavirus pandemic?,Was there any money given out by Malaysia during the coronavirus pandemic?,Are there any other benefits of the electricity bill waiver?,Is the money to be distributed among all people by Malaysia?,Is the money available to all citizens?,Is the money available for people under the age of 18?,Is it mandatory to pay for the electricity bill by Malaysia?
Did we lose jobs while Republicans had power?,Is there a correlation between jobs loss and conservative presidents?,Is this a general statement?,Is there a sarcastic tone?,Is there historical evidence to back up these claims?,Would there be any change if the Republicans took office if elected?
Does voting for any Democrat get you any of these things?,Are there any social problems associated with voting for a Democrat?,Is there any evidence to suggest that if you are a Democrat you will get all of these things?,Does voting for a Democrat get you any of these things?
"Did a Kentucky food stamp recipient have more than $5,000 in unused food stamp benefits?",Was the amount of unused food stamp benefits used to pay for tuition and housing more than the limit?,Are these numbers based solely on unused benefits?,Has there been evidence that the food stamp programs are abused?
Are state estimates for adopting Medicaid expansion correct?,Does Virginia support the Obamacare Medicaid expansion?,Will the Medicaid expansion cost taxpayers money?,Does the VA support Medicaid expansion?,Have state estimates shown this expansion would cost taxpayers more than $902 million?,Are state estimates for adopting Medicaid expansion correct?,Would the Medicaid expansion be more cost effective if not legalized?
Will the United States Postal Service stop selling religion based Christmas stamps in 2016?,Does the United States Postal Service plan to sell religious based Christmas stamps in 2016?,Will the United States Postal Service stop selling religious based Christmas stamps in 2016?,Is it true that the United States Postal Service will stop selling religious based Christmas stamps in 2016?
Is Argos selling Apple AirPod Max for £3 until the fine has been paid off?,Is Argos selling Apple AirPod Max at a discounted price for the period?,Is Argos selling Apple AirPod Max for a discounted price for the period?,Is Argos selling Apple AirPod Max at a discounted price for the period?
Does Trump believe that all black babies born today should be in jail if we do not change the system?,Is there evidence that Trump believes a black male baby born today has a 1 in 3 chance ending up in jail if we do not change the system?,Does Trump think we have a problem with police on black babies in the United States?,Is there evidence that Trump believes a black male baby born today has a 1 in 3 chance ending up in jail if we do not change the system?
Did the Democratic Party make this statement in their 1992 platform?,Did the Democrat Party support immigration reform after 1992?,Did the Democratic Party commit felonies during the period in 1992?,Did the Democratic Party support a number of changes in immigration law in 1992?,Have changes made in immigration law since 1992?,Did the Democratic Party reject any reforms in 1992?
Did this attack take place in Sagaing in 2021?,Did this attack occur in Sagaing?,Did the attack occur in Sagaing?,Was this attack in Myanmar?,Has this attack taken place in Sagaing in the past?,Did this attack take place in Sagaing in the past?
Is this claim based on unverified VAERS data?,Has this claim been refuted by any reliable source?,Does any credible source cite this as true?,Has this claim been refuted by any credible source?,Has this claim been refuted by any credible source?,Is this claim based on any credible source?
Did many lose their lives due to explosions at the place of firecrackers after defeating India by 10 wickets?,Was this incident attributed to people in Pakistan?,Is this event an isolated incident or are a large number of explosions worldwide reported in recent years?,Are similar incidents reported in other countries?,Did this incident involve a large number of individuals causing death or injuries?
Do these taxes save $816 per year?,Does the change over 4 years net $816 per year?,Does this compare to the amount saved in four previous years?,Did this amount save $816 in four previous years?,Do these savings amount to a total of $816?,Do these savings contribute to the local tax bill?
"Was a victim involved in a murder case in Atlanta, Georgia, in June 2020?",Did the victim have a traumatic event after he was assaulted?,Did the victim and his assailants get a chance to talk together?,No Answer>Yes?
Is this photo taken during the summer off Vancouver Island?,Are there any other whales off Vancouver Island?,Do these whales appear to be breeding off the island?,Did this whale sting or hurt this person?,Would an image of this animal be legal to release?,Is this whale a common sight off Vancouver Island?
Are poor people today at the same risk of staying poor 50 years ago as they are today?,Is there evidence to indicate that poor families are more likely to remain poor than they were 50 years ago?,Are poor families more likely to remain poor than they were 50 years ago?,Would being raised poor increase a person’s risk for staying poor?
Did LeBron James apologize to the Lakers fans?,Did LeBron James tweet the tweet in response to the Lakers fans?,Did LeBron James apologize to the fans for missing free throws?,Was the tweet posted for a specific game?,Did the Lakers apologize for the missed free throws?,Did LeBron James apologize to fans at the game during the tweet?
Would this move a decrease in health insurance dollars?,Does this move end the $100 billion per year in healthcare spending?,Would this be an impact on health care if voted upon?,"Considering that these health care costs are estimated to be $120 billion a year, would this change significantly affect them?"
Did the chairman of the party of Florida nominate 30 delegates?,Was the chairman of the party of Florida an avid and outward supporter of Marco Rubio?,Did the chairman of the party of Florida appoint delegates that were supporters of Marco Rubio?,Did the chair of the party of Florida appoint delegates?
Did the Senate's Democrats fail to pass a budget for 750 days?,Have Senate Democrats failed to pass any bills?,Are there other responsibilities that Democrats were neglecting?,Is it true that the Democrat-led Senate has failed to pass a budget for 750 days?,Does it mean that the Democrats have failed to pass any bills?
Did European virologists train global leaders in 2019?,Is this true of one of the people who were trained on the COVID-19 pandemic?,Can this person be identified?,Has this person been in the USA?,Can this person be identifying?,"Is this person from the US, and what country is this person?"
"Did Pawlenty eliminate health insurance for 33,000 to 35,000 people while governor?",Did this imply that health insurance had been eliminated for more people than originally estimated?,Does this imply that all the people who lost insurance had health insurance?,Is this a generalized statement about Pawlenty's health care choices?
Did the police officer in Austria face prison for this act?,Did the police officer get to post this photograph in April of 2021?,Did this post have any relation to Hitler?,Did the police officer receive a prison sentence for this activity?,Did the officer in Austria have a background in political or religious organizations?
Was the 1918 influenza outbreak a deadly second wave after the quarantine restrictions were lifted?,Was it due to the outbreak being a flu season?,Was the 1918 influenza outbreak an outbreak in which people died?,Was the 1918 flu outbreak a flu outbreak in which people suffered greatly from sickness and infection?,Was there any evidence that the 1918 influenza outbreak had a deadly second wave after the quarantine restrictions were lifted?
Are the 4 km long rack train engines running in a coal station?,Is the 4 km long rack train locomotive running at speeds of less than 3 miles per hour?,Are there any coal engines running on this train?,Is there one cab on this train?,Does this train have any power sources other than coal power plants?
Did Kaine reduce higher education funding by 25%?,Did Kaine reduce higher education funding by 25%?,Did Kaine reduce higher education funding by 25%?,Did Kaine impose a tuition increase on tuition?,Did Kaine reduce higher education funding by 25%?,Did Kaine impose a tuition increase on tuition?
Did the photo show Moinuddin at JNU?,Is Moinuddin from Kerala currently studying there?,Is Moinuddin a male?,Is JNU a college where male students study?,Is Moinuddin older than 47 years old?,Is this photo of Moinuddin's college photo in an insinuation photo gallery?
"Does Obama have to create 700,000 private sector jobs in seven years?","Did Obama promise to create 700,000 private sector jobs in seven years?",Was there a difference between the amount of private sector jobs per year and the number of private sector jobs per year?,"Was Obama's promise to create 700,000 private sector jobs in 7 years?"
Would a 15% pay rise for NHS workers from now until 2058 have been possible with NHS Test and Trace funding?,Would NHS workers at a higher risk of being underpaid because of poor test and trace funding?,Would a test and trace budget have funded the pay rise for NHS workers?,Did this funding come from a different source than test and trace funding?
Did this video surface in February of this year?,Do we know when the video was made?,Did this woman cradle a baby while sitting between carriages of a train?,Is the baby in this video a live birth?,Is this baby born in February of this year?,Have any other recent videories shown this baby being held?
Did Shiraj Ahmed and Bhujouli Kurd both kick the food served to them by a Dalit cook at a quarantine centre?,Has Dalit food been served to a Muslim person by a Dalit cook at a quarantine centre?,Is this the first time that a Dalit chef has served a Muslim person at a quarantine centre?
Did a 12-year-old girl come in contact with the drug dealer?,Did the victim meet with another person?,Did the drug dealer have contact with a 12 year-old girl who he tried to kidnap?,Did the victim call 911 while waiting for the drug dealer?,Did the victim report the drug dealer to the police?,Did the drug dealer leave any information for police to review?
Did Alex Rodriguez work with a cosmetics company in May 2021?,Did Alex Rodriguez have a partner in the cosmetics company?,Did Alex Rodriguez develop a makeup product in the period after the 2020 Olympics?,Would Alex Rodriguez have been involved with any other makeup companies?,Will this makeup product be produced by Alex Rodriguez?
Did Sinha tweet that Muslims should raise their voice for Bhatt?,Did Sinha have anything to say in relation to Bhatt's political work?,Have there been any attacks against Sinha's political activity?,Did Sinha directly encourage Muslim voters to vote for Bhatt?,Did Sinha ever receive any endorsement in relation to Bhatt's political work?
Is there any evidence to suggest that the government in the historical record has never created a job?,Is this claim unsubstantiated by history?,Is this claim based on current knowledge?,Is this claim based on specific data?,Is this claim based on information from a single source?
Did Cruz say Trump had a consistent pattern of inciting violence?,Did Cruz also use the same phrase in 2016?,Did Trump use the same phrase in 2016?,Did Trump use the same phrase in 2016?,Does Cruz still use the phrase in 2016?,"Does Cruz still use the phrase ""Trump has a consistent pattern of inciting violence""?"
Did she overdose on fentanyl?,Was the dollar bill laced with drugs?,Was she in McDonald’s bathroom?,Was this woman from an addiction?,Does fentanyl have a negative effect on your heart?,Have more patients overdosed on fentanyl than people in general?
Did 75% of Egyptians vote no in the Gallup poll last year?,Did 75% of Egyptians vote no in the Gallup poll in 2017?,Did 75% of Egyptians vote no in the Gallup poll in 2013?,Are the poll results from Gallup surveys?,Is this information inaccurate?
Did Koster vote against the bill?,Did Koster vote against a bill end the practice of making rape victims pay for their own rape kits?,Was Koster one of the only four senators to vote against a bill ending the practice of making rape victims pay for their own rape kits?,Did Koster oppose protecting the women of Missouri?
Was there tear gas fired at protesters in the 2021 photo?,Did the protesters in the 2021 photo receive a direct blow to the eye from the tear gas?,Has this image been shown to be a specific date?,", Are a specific number of people in the 2021 photo?",",?"
Is there proof of higher rates of COVID-19 vaccine injuries than COVID-19 deaths?,Are there other diseases that have contributed to higher rates of injuries by vaccines compared to COVID-19 deaths?,Do COVID-19 vaccine injuries are more common than COVID-19 deaths?,"Lastly, do COVID-19 vaccine injuries and deaths primarily impact boys?"
Is the Republican Party trying to remove Obama from the Georgia presidential ballot in 2012?,Did Republican Party leaders vote against removal of Obama from the Georgia presidential ballot?,Did Republican Party leaders vote against removing Obama from the Georgia presidential ballot?,Is it true that Republican Party leaders voted against removal of Obama from the Georgia presidential ballot in 2012?,Is the Republican party attempting to remove Obama from Georgia’s Presidential Ballot in 2012?
"Who might be fined $1,000?",Who could be fined if they bring supplies to the protest?,What law would criminalize bringing supplies to protesters?,What law punishes people who are brought supplies to the protesters?,Can anyone be fined in Morton County?,Will anyone be arrested if they bring supplies to the protesters?
Is the arrest of the Indonesian MPs based on allegations of bribes from Ferdy Sambo?,Are there any other allegations related to the arrest?,Is it true all of the charges related to Sambo's murder are against three MPs?,Have any MPs been arrested before for receiving bribes?,Do any of the MPs know what their charges are?
Would a van have external locks that could be accessed by emergency responders?,Would a van with external locks have multiple people lock it?,Would 911 call emergency responders if a van with external locks is accessed by emergency responders?,Would 911 call emergency responders if a van with external locks is accessed by emergency responders?
Did VAERS reporting increase by 1.700% in Florida after COVID-19 vaccines became available?,Does this increase in Florida indicate safety concerns?,Does this increase in Florida indicate an increase in HIV/AIDS deaths?,Was this increase in Florida an indication of safety concerns?,"In general, can health agencies determine which vaccines increase the risk of HIV/AIDS?"
Was the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court ever involved in a vote fraud case?,Did the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court ever call on other justices to dismiss voter fraud cases?,Has anyone ever said that the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court would call on other justices to dismiss voter fraud cases?,Is the Chief Justice ever mentioned on this article in connection with a vote fraud case?
Did the statement Volodin made about the evacuation of Zelenskyy come from a press release?,Did the post go out in a national newspaper?,Was the post repeated on the Internet?,Did people outside the country rely on the post to validate Zelenskyy's evacuation?
Did eight justices in the Supreme Court ruling on campaign finance recommend that disclosure be required?,Did all justices recommend that Congress require disclosure of special interest money?,Did any justices in the Supreme Court ruling on campaign finance recommend Congress to require disclosure of special interest money?,Did the justices in the Supreme Court ruling on campaign finance agree that disclosure is necessary?
Is COVID-19 now completely disappeared or have more than 6% of africans been vaccinated?,Did COVID-19 disappear despite a 90% vaccination rate?,Did COVID-19 actually disappear but a high vaccination rate?,Are Africans vaccinated because of the vaccine?
Is 1984 and Maus banned in Texas?,Is Mein Kampf banned in Texas?,Are any other books banned in Texas?,Is there a way to determine the percentage of banned books in Texas?,Does Texas ban this books because it is racist?,Is there a clear rule on books banned in Texas?
Did 1 million international students participate in US universities in the 2018-19 school year?,Did the US students contribute 40 billion dollars to the economy?,Do US universities attract students from abroad?,Is a college in America a strong export sector for students from abroad?,Is higher education one of the strongest export sectors for international students?
Is there any evidence that people with COVID-19 do not actually have COVID-19?,Is it true that COVID-19 can be detected by a specific blood test or a saliva test?,Are people with COVID-19 who test positive actually have COVID-19?,Are people with COVID-19 who test positive actually have COVID-19?
Did the US government spend or borrow $12.8 trillion?,Did the US government contribute the majority of the amount?,Did the US government spend or lend the total amount?,Did the US government spend more than $10 billion to reduce the recession?,Does the CDC report support the CDC's conclusion that the CDC overstated its estimates of the economic impact of the recession?
Has he narrated the film?,Did he direct the film?,Does there have to be a previous title for this film?,Did it come out in theaters?,Does the film have a name?,Did the filmmakers have a director before this one?,Hopefully we will know the title?
Did the deficit increase over time in the next 30 years?,Does Trump plan to reduce individual taxes?,Is the deficit estimated at $129 trillion in the next 30 years?,Will the deficit continue to grow in the next 30 years?,Does Trump believe the economy can improve globally?,Has revenue increased a disproportionate amount in any of the years for which he has campaigned?
Did Obama increase the deportation of illegal immigrants by 70 percent?,Was Obama also responsible for a large increase in deportation of illegal immigrants?,Are the Obama administration's immigration policies a reflection of this change?,Are the Obama administration's immigration policies a reflection of this change?,Has the Obama administration increased the number of illegal immigrants by 70 percent?
Did Labour members vote to debate Palestine at the 2018 Labour Conference?,Did Labour members vote to debate Palestine in general at the 2018 Labour Conference?,Is the Labour Conference a major political gathering?,Did Labour members vote to debate Palestine on the 2018 Labour Conference?,Is it generally believed that Labour members voted to debate Palestine than Brexit and the NHS?
Did only 44 people get prosecuted for failed background checks?,"Did 80,000 people receive denied guns due to a failed background check in 2012?",Did more people with failed background checks go before a jury?,Did there ever be criminal prosecutions of gun users who failed a background check in 2012?,Does the government systematically prosecute people who failed a background check?
Is this quote from @GovEvers correct?,Is this quote from the committee that advises @GovEvers correct?,Is this quote from the committee that advises @GovEvers correct?,Are all of these people from this committee at least 65 years old?,Was this quote from the committee that advises @GovEvers correct?
Does each Amazon package delivery costs $1.46?,Does the United States spend a dollar ea per Amazon package delivered?,Does shipping from the United States to Amazon cost the US 1.46 cents per Amazon package delivered?,Do Amazon packages cost the US 1.46 cents per Amazon package delivered?,Did the US lose a penny per package delivered to Amazon?
Did the UPA government have a higher death rate than the NDA government?,Was the UPA government in power for 10 years or less than 4 years?,Did the UPA government die fewer soldiers under 4 years than under 10 years?,Did the UPA government have a higher death rate under 4 years compared to 10 years?,Did the UPA government have fewer soldiers killed under 4 years than under 10 years?
Did Queen Elizabeth II order United shirts?,Did Queen Elizabeth II request Ronaldo's autograph?,Are the United shirts Queen Elizabeth II purchased?,Has King of England specifically requested Ronaldo's autograph?,Do all United shirts that Queen Elizabeth II owns contain the Ronaldo signature?,Was King of England formally given the Ronaldo signature upon purchasing United shirts?
Is there any evidence that Dr Hadiyo Ali's picture of the wife and children is fake?,Does the picture of the wife and children from this picture show any signs of an early mutilation?,Does this picture show any evidence that Dr Hadiyo Ali had children?,Did Dr Hadiyo Ali have any miscarriages?
Did this video show a man jumping out of a window?,Is this video shot by an independant or governmental entity?,Did this man make the decision to jump out of a window in order to escape the earthquake?,Is this video related to the February 6th Earthquake in Turkey?
Was 200 tons of contraband collected from the coast?,Was 200 tons of contraband collected at the border?,Is there any evidence that the Coast Guard collected contraband at the border?,Is there any evidence of the Coast Guard collecting contraband at the border?,Is there any evidence the Coast Guard caught contraband at the border?,Is there any evidence that the Coast Guard confiscated contraband at the border?
Is CDC's data true about the percentage of COVID-19 vaccine doses in U.S. population?,Is the CDC's COVID-19 vaccine rate accurate?,Is this percentage of U.S. population over 50%?,Does this percentage of COVID-19 vaccine doses equate to the COVID-19 vaccine use in US population?
Is Trump awarding more than $50 billion in new federal contracts to companies that continue to shutter U.S. factories?,Has Trump benefited from companies that shutter U.S. factories seeking cheaper labor abroad?,Is Trump preventing companies from shuttering U.S. factories due to this policy?,Is Trump attempting to control the manufacturing practices in the United States?
Did Jordan run for Senate as a Republican?,Does Jordan support Trump's candidacy in the Senate?,Did Jordan make an official announcement in late 2019 regarding his intentions?,Did Jordan have an official campaign announcement in 2019?,Is Jordan likely to run in 2019?,Are Jordan's supporters from outside the GOP political community likely to vote for him?
"Did the seat held by the Republicans have ""more than thirty years"" ownership?",Did a special election occur in this district to elect a Democrat?,Did this election result in the GOP control of this district?,Did this election result in a Democratic majority in this Senate district?,Did this election result in this group's control of this district?
Did President Trump attend a wreath-laying ceremony at the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier in Arlington?,Has Trump attended a wreath-laying ceremony at the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier in Arlington since November of 2018?,Was Trump a sitting president during this time?,Does Trump attend the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier in Arlington before a Veteran's Day?
Did Queen Elizabeth congratulate Marcos for winning the 2022 Philippine presidential election?,Did Marcos win the 2022 Philippine presidential election?,Was it reported that Queen Elizabeth congratulated Marcos on winning the 2022 Philippine presidential election?,Did Elizabeth congratulate Marcos on winning the 2022 Philippine presidential election?
Did the basic 1040 form in 1935 have two simple pages of instructions?,Is the basic 1040 form today the same as the basic 1040 form in 1935?,Does the basic 1040 form today have 100 pages of instructions?,Is there a change in the basic 1040 form that changed the content?
How many more arrivals were there in January than November 2015?,Did there even increase in arrivals between the two years?,Did the percentage increase from January to November 2016 compare to other years?,Was the percentage increase higher from 2015 to 2016?,Does this percentage increase equal a 13 percent increase?,Is there an increase in tourism from January to November 2016 in 2017?
Did AIMIM win seats in Seemanchal?,Did AIMIM get 5 seats in Seemanchal?,Did AIMIM win any other seats in Seemanchal?,Did AIMIM win all seats in Seemanchal?,Was AIMIM the first party to win in Seemanchal?,Have any other parties also contested in Seemanchal?
Does the video show Queen Elizabeth throwing sweets?,Is the video a true story?,Is the video part of a marketing campaign?,Did Queen Elizabeth throw sweets in the video?,Was the video filmed entirely in Australia?,Is there any proof the video filmed entirely in Australia was filmed in Australia?
Is there evidence that the vast majority of terrorism-related offenses since 9/11 came from outside of the US?,Is there evidence that there have been many extradition proceedings for terrorism-related offenses since 9/11?,Is it true that the majority of individuals who were convicted of terrorist offenses after 9/11 came from outside of the US?
Did the mask last for 20 minutes?,Did the mask result in the formation of bacteria?,Did the mask have any bacteria in it?,Did this mask cause any illnesses?,Did this mask contain any other types of bacteria?,Did the mask contain any other types of bacteria?,Did the mask contain other types of bacteria?
"Did Isakson vote for a trade agreement, with China costing Georgia 93,000 jobs?",Was Isakson a republican?,Did Isakson vote for a trade deal with China?,"Did Isakson vote for the trade deal with China, with China costing Georgia 93,000 jobs?"
Has the U.S.-Mexico border had a total of 1 million legal border crossings a day?,Does the U.S.-Mexico border also have over 1 million legal crossings per day?,Is it true that U.S.-Mexico border is a U.S.-Mexico border?
Has it yet been proven that anyone under 20 could spread COVID-19 to an older person?,Is the death toll on COVID-19 among young people lowered after the death toll?,Does it currently appear any age group can spread COVID-19 to an older person?,Have any death records of people under 20 from COVID-19 been made public?
Did the Indian army use four Kashmiris as human shield to push back stone pelters?,Did the army use the human shield for an official ceremony?,Did the army need the human shield to push back stone pelters?,Did any Kashmiris infiltrate the Indian army?,Did the Indian Army use the human shield for an official ceremony?
Has India eased COVID-19 restrictions in any of the phases of its roadmap?,Have some of the stages of the roadmap been completed?,Will the roadmap be published in the media?,Will the roadmap be made public?,Is India expected to release the roadmap?,Is the roadmap a definitive statement?
Is this quote accurate?,Will Medicare end if a deal is not struck on Medicare?,Is the president's statement accurate?,Will Medicare end if a deal is not reached on Medicare?,Is there an unforeseen health-care crisis that could impact Medicare?,Would the loss of Medicare impact Medicaid?
Do the donations used by the group come from a majority of the population?,Were the individuals on the board involved with the group?,Have the donations made any major changes to the group?,Did the group hire people at an enclave to help them raise funds?,Have any of the contributors made any major donations at all?
Is Nigeria ranked as one of the top ten reforming countries?,Have a majority of Nigeria's country reforms taken place?,Is the Nigeria government doing a lot of reshaping to aid economic reform?,Is Nigeria known for reforming economics?,Did the United Nations accredit Nigeria with one of the highest reform rates in Latin America?
Did the federal gas tax not increase in 1993?,Did the gas tax increase after 1993?,Has the gas tax been raised since 1993?,Is there an explanation for the change that occurred after 1993?,Was the gas tax increased after 1993?,Was the gas tax in 1993 higher or lower than 1993?,Did the gas tax increase after 1993 occur?
Did 70% of those who die from COVID-19 in the United Kingdom receive full vaccines?,Have full vaccines prevented any people from getting COVID-19?,Are all the COVID-19 deaths in the United Kingdom due to not getting their vaccinations?,Are any people in the United Kingdom who are dying from COVID-19 vaccinated?
Did a video depict the moment the explosion occurred?,Did the footage include other parts of the incident?,Did anyone witness the blast of the explosion?,Did the footage depict the location or timeline of the explosion?,Did this video use a device that had a phone camera?,Did the person in the video take a picture of the aftermath of the explosion?
Has it been stated how many journalists have been killed in Mexico in the last decade?,Was the list in any country?,Has the number of journalists killed in Mexico in the last decade?,Was the list complete at the time of publication?,Was there a specific group of journalists killed in Mexico in the last decade?
"Is there a large number of college students supporting ""post-birth abortions"", including child as old as 4 years old?",Is there any evidence to back this claim?,Is there evidence to support this claim?,Is there sufficient evidence to support this claim?,Is this opinion consistent with the recent CDC survey?
Are the boxes taken from a warehouse?,Are the boxes from a warehouse related to the U.S. baby formula shortage?,Is the image from 2020 related to the U.S. baby formula shortage?,Is this image not related to the U.S. baby formula shortage?,Is this image based on a real image?
Did the police arrest two Muslim barbers?,Did the barbers spread HIV/AIDS to Hindus in Mumbai?,"Did the barbers perform acts of ""subversion"" in connection to this crime?",Did anyone die in this attack?,Did any persons get gang beaten or killed in this attack?,Was this attack a large part of this year's Mumbai terror attack?,Did any other attacks take place in this city?
Do most district receive the same funding prior to the budget cuts?,Do these funding reductions reflect the new statutory provisions?,Do most district receive the same amount of funding per pupil as before the budget cuts?,Would it be helpful to say that all school districts received less funding after the Budget cut?,Did these budget cuts affect the majority of school districts?
Have Nigerians been required to get a certificate for enduring the two terms of president Buhari?,Does the Nigerian government offer a certificate for enduring the two terms of president Buhari?,Have the certificate requirements changed over time?,Did the Nigerian government provide a certificate for enduring President Buhari's two terms in office?
"Is the President planning to bring in 250,000 Syrian and Iraqi refugees into the country?",Is the President stating that this will be the first time that any refugees will come to the United States?,Is this the first time that a president has said that he is going to bring in any refugees into the country?
Has this fungus been diagnosed and treated?,Have there been cases of this fungus?,Was this article published in the British press?,Is this research in the British press?,Have these cases of black fungus been successfully treated?,Is this new virus an easy source of bacterial infection?
Has Tillis cut 500 million from public education?,Is this a claim made by Tillis himself?,Is this a claim made by any other individual?,Are there any other estimates of Tillis's cuts?,Does Tillis provide any information about Tillis's actual cuts in this area?,Does Tillis have a policy regarding funding for public education?
Did this image include multiple witnesses?,Was this photo of gas company workers taken from this image?,Was this image of a gas company worker taken from this image?,Did the mugshot show any identifiable property on the men?,Did this mugshot depict a gas company worker posing as a gas company worker?
"Is a circular released to advisability CBSE Class 10 and 12 results will be announced on May 11, 2023?",Is the circular in accordance to the circular issued by CCE?,Do you have information about a test related to this?,"Is it true that the results will be announced on May 11, 2023?"
"If someone makes less than $15 an hour, is he living below the poverty wage?","If someone is earning less than $15 an hour, are they living below the poverty wage?",Are there instances where people are not living below the poverty wage?,Are there fewer people living below the poverty wage than other people?
Did Schwarzkopf say this about 9/11 perpetrators?,Is Schwarzkopf actually referring to 9/11 perpetrators?,Is Schwarzkopf implying he acted out the 9/11 attacks?,"Is Schwarzkopf the only one who says he ""Forgives"" those responsible for 9/11?",Does Schwarzkopf think it is a job for the nation as a whole to arrange a meeting between the perpetrators and God?
Is the govt. saying Obamacare will cost our economy more jobs than its edict?,Would the economy lose jobs due to Obamacare?,Will Obamacare cut government jobs in the future?,Is there any evidence that Obamacare would cut jobs?,Did the govt. say that Obamacare would cut jobs in the future?
Is there evidence that forwarding greeting messages can be exploited by hackers?,Does the act of forwarding greetings expose personal banking information?,Does forwarding greetings cause damage in some cases?,Is this a known scenario?,Do these events raise concerns about private banking information disclosure?,Has there ever been any evidence that this practice can be exploited?
"Did McCready support the bill that raised consumers ""$149 million a year in higher energy costs?",""" Did the bill increase the cost of energy by $100 billion annually?","Did McCready support the bill that raised consumers ""$149 million a year in higher energy costs?",""" Did McCready support the bill that increased consumers ""$149 million a year in higher energy costs?","""?"
Does the rule of separation of states apply to people living within 100 miles of the border?,"Is there any overlap between the term ""constitution exemption zone"" and the actual area of the ""constitution exemption zone""?","Is there any overlap between ""constitution exemption zone"" and the actual area of the ""constitution exemption zone""?"
Did Farrel die of COVID-19 complications in August 2021?,Was Farrel a radio host who advocated for COVID-19 vaccinations?,Did Farrel support COVID-19 vaccines?,Was Farrel unconcerned about COVID-19?
Was this demonstration in New York City?,Was the demonstration shown in any form with protesters or with non protestors?,Was this demonstration in New York City a one day demonstration or a longer duration?,Did this demonstration happen by any other name?,Was the protest held on a day when President Roosevelt was in power?,Was this demonstration in New York primarily focused on anti-war activities or political protest?
Did more people die from stabs to death in 2016 than from guns?,Was the average number of fatalities from stabs to death higher than from rifles?,Was the average number of fatalities from guns stabbed to death higher than from rifles?,Are most people killed by guns stabbed to death higher than with guns?
Could you track the people who receive the COVID-19 vaccine?,Is there any evidence of people receiving the COVID-19 vaccine being tracked via 5G cellular?,Is a hack into the COVID-19 vaccine data available to other organizations?,Is anyone using 5G cellular to track anyone?
Did the National Health Service announce the first trial for a new cancer-detecting blood test?,Will cancer detection be improved by this new blood test?,Do this test results suggest a cancer survival benefit?,Will this new blood test also help people identify underlying health issues?,Is the blood test widely available in the United States?
Did President Trump play golf during his first month in office?,Did President Trump play golf six times during his first month in office?,Did Trump criticize his predecessor's golfing habits?,Did Trump play golf six times after his election?,Did Trump play golf at all during his first month in office?,Did Trump play golf six times after his election?
Did Biden say Medicare recipients would get $2880 a year?,Did Biden say that he was referring to cash payments in their bank accounts this weekend?,Did Biden say that people would get direct deposits in their bank accounts this weekend?,Is this information still being verified?,Did Biden specifically say people would get direct deposits in their bank accounts this weekend?
Did the students of Uttar Pradesh College read Hanuman Chalisa instead of the Quran?,Were the Hindu students expelled from the college?,Was the college concerned about the lack of teaching Hanuman Chalisa?,Did the college expel the Hindu students?,Did the college give the Hindu students any education or punishment?
Was the suicide attributed to Akhilesh Yadav?,Was there evidence of any ill effect on Yadav's cause of death?,Was there evidence of any suicide from Yadav's supporters?,Was it a result of this election?,Are there any other allegations relating to Yadav's election?
Does this group support the DREAM Act?,Does Marco Rubio support this bill?,Are 91% of Latinos in favor of this bill?,Do 81% of Latinos in this group support the DREAM Act?,Is DREAM a bill related to immigration or to the economy?
Is this information accurate?,Was this change effective in reducing expenditures by 30%?,Was this change a successful one?,Did this increase in expenditures result in a larger increase in capital expenditure?,Is this change effective in reducing costs by 70%?,Have these changes been implemented in other areas?
Did unemployment increase more than 200 percent in Oregon high school graduates aged 18 to 20 between 2008 and 2011?,Did the U.S. average increase less than 30 percent between 2008 and 2011?,Did unemployment increase between the 2008 and 2011?,Did unemployment increase between the 2006 and 2011?,Did unemployed Oregon high school graduates experience a higher rate of job growth than the average U.S. worker in the same period?
Did NPR documents provide the information to withdraw money from bank accounts from 01 April 2020?,Did NPR documents require a withdrawal form from bank accounts from 01 April 2020?,Will people be required to provide a NPR document to withdraw money from bank accounts from 01 April 2020?,Were NPR documents required to be shown to withdraw from bank accounts from 01 April 2020?
Did Carter stop the tax increase?,Is Carter a big spender in the district?,Are there tax raises in any other districts?,Did Carter make money on tax increases?,Are any other schools in Dallas doing similar taxes?,Are any other schools in Dallas going through similar tax increases?,Is there any other controversy surrounding Carter's election?
"Did Jobs say Apple needed 30,000 engineers in China?",Did Jobs tell President Obama the company moved factories there?,Did the company relocate its manufacturing to China?,"Did Jobs say that Apple moved factories to China because it needed 30,000 engineers?","Did Jobs say that Apple moved factories to China because it needed 30,000 engineers?"
Did Spain's Health Ministry say the SARS-CoV-2 virus has never been isolated?,Was the SARS-CoV-2 virus isolated by the Health Ministry?,Did the Health Ministry say the SARS-CoV-2 virus has never been isolated?,Have all SARS-CoV-2 cases been isolated in Spain?
Has Texas cut funding for public schools by 25% under Perry's plan?,Did Texas cut funding for public schools by 25% under Perry's plan?,Does this quote have reference to specific funding?,Is this quote from an actual quote?,Is this quote from an actual source?,Is this quote from an actual publication?,Is this quote from a verified source?,Does the quote cite any government funding or public funding?
Did Obama reduce the mortgage deduction for families making over $250K under his budget plan?,Did families make over $250K lose their charitable deduction?,Is this change based on Obama's spending plan?,Are these changes retroactive?,Does the president plan to raise the ceiling for individual income taxes under his budget plan?
Is the video fake?,Was the video filmed in a country?,Were the fish involved in the video towed to the ocean?,Are people from the video being warned not to eat seafood?,Were the people in the video sick and died?,Was the video shot in the Mediterranean?,Did the video show a video of the death of a person?
Did this take place on a Saturday?,Is this the first time five nuclear-powered aircraft carriers have docked together since World War II?,Is this the first time five nuclear-powered aircraft carriers have docked together since World War II?,Is this the first time five nuclear-powered aircraft carriers have docked together since World War II?
"Has the WHO documented 650,000 annual deaths from respiratory illness?","Does the WHO report state that respiratory illness from seasonal flu results in up to 650,000 deaths per year?",Has the WHO reported a significant increase in the rate of seasonal flu deaths per year?,Do any of these studies support the occurrence of seasonal flu death rates?
Did this politician show the defect in government's tests?,Does this glass of Coke contain the virus COVID-19?,Will the government be required to test all Covid-19 products?,Will Coca Cola contain the virus COVID-19?,Does this person have a criminal record?,Have there been instances where this person has appeared before an independent agency?
Does this memo say the notes printed before 2020 will be demonetized?,Is this memo specific about the types of notes on which demonetization is scheduled to occur?,Do all bills printed before 2020 have to be demonetized?,Are demonetization notes currently issued to the general public?,Will this memo state the specific dates in which these bills will be demonetized?
Does Hagan have any hearings on a committee in 2014?,Has Hagan missed any committee hearings in 2014?,Has Hagan made any comments in 2014 regarding the issues on the committees?,Is Hagan a member of the Armed Services Committee?,Is Hagan on the Armed Services Committee?,Is Hagan any longer an official member of the Armed Services Committee?
Is it true Hitler did not kill 6 million Jews?,Is it true Holocaust did not happen?,Is the Holocaust the only thing that happened?,Is there proof that Hitler did not kill 6 million Jews?,Is it true that Holocaust was not what happened?,Is there any proof that the Holocaust happened?
Are many people in that country aged 16 - 19 killed?,Have many people died from influenza that is not caused by heat?,Has there been a sex or sexual conflict in people from that era?,Have many people died because of pregnancy?,Have any children or teenagers died of influenza that is not caused by heat?
Did this F-22 shoot down a spy balloon?,Was it made of the same material as the Chinese spy balloon?,Did the US Navy use a F-22 to shoot down a Chinese spy ballon?,Was there anything that distinguishes this F-22 from the Chinese spy ballon?,Was this F-22 making any kind of special markings?
Did Michael Sukkar say Coalition policies pushed first home buyers to their highest levels in 15 years?,Have there been fewer people buying first homes in 15 years?,Does Sukkar imply that first home owners are at their lowest in 15 years?,Is Sukkar talking about the current parliamentary term?
Would a FFP2 mask be sufficient to protect against viral infection and thus from SARS?,Would a FFP2 mask be adequate to protect against SARS?,Are there evidences that a FFP2 mask can be a contaminant or infectant to protect against viruses?,Does an FFP2 mask need to protect against viruses?,Are there evidences that a FFP2 mask would be inadequate to protect against viral infection?
Did officers pass George Floyd photos to fellow officers?,Has there been an investigation into George Floyd photo passing?,"Did police officers pass around a photo of George Floyd with the inscription ""You take my breath away?",""" Are there any allegations that police passed around a photo of George Floyd with the inscription ""You take my breath away?"
Did this claim have any basis in fact?,Are these statistics based on an actual report?,Is government in 41 states better paid than their supporters?,Do these states have a fiscal impact on a larger scale than other states?,Are these numbers accurate?,Are there any other data available to verify this claim?
Did India give Nepal 7100 acres of land in 2021?,Did Nepal occupie 7100 acres of land in 2021?,Did Nepal occupy 7100 acres of land in 2021?,Is Nepal considered a major player in the South Asian region?,Is the issue between India and Nepal centered around a single entity?,Is any information in this article accurate?
Were the mega dams included in the manifesto?,Is it true that they were all constructions for development?,Can we assume that these mega dams did not have constructions on a regular basis?,Were there any mega dams listed as part of the plan?,Are there any mega dams listed in the plan to build new dams in the area?
Would the $13.8 million funding cut be reflected by the proposed budget?,Would this funding cut be regressive?,Will this funding cut have any direct impact on public education?,Will this funding cut regressively to schools?,Did Berry vote for this funding cut?,Is this funding cut a permanent reduction to the school budget?
Does DA spend R18 billion on poor communities?,Did DA spend R11 billion on poor communities?,Was this DA funding distributed by the city?,Was this funding distributed evenly by city?,Are the poor communities being served?,Did this funding come from the city?,Did the City of Cape Town spend R11 billion on poor communities?
Are twins conjoined?,"Did the twins arrive in Surigao, Philippines in June 2020?",Is it the first time that twins were conjoined?,Is there any other information about twins conjoined?,Would the twins have been born in a specific region?
Did Barack Obama lose 2.5 million free enterprise jobs?,"Did the U.S. add 500,000 federal government jobs?",Did Obama have more federal government jobs that were created in his term?,Are these jobs being created within the free enterprise system?,Is Obama's administration responsible for the unemployment that the Free Enterprise system is experiencing?
Did Georgia say it is the best state to do business in for four years?,Did Georgia report a total of four years in a row as the best state to do business?,Did Georgia have the lowest average rate of job losses?,Did Georgia experience higher rates of unemployment?,Did Georgia have higher rates of overall unemployment?
Has Pelosi bought any other homes for $25 million?,Does Pelosi own the house with the home she bought?,Has the house the House Speaker bought been sold?,Does the house the House Speaker bought cost $25 million?,Do the sources for the images use the same data?,Did the source that the image is taken from use a different data source?
Is there evidence that lower age of consent is being considered?,Is there evidence that lower age of consent is being considered?,Does the state require at least 3 years of age of consent?,Do you think that it will not be as effective if less than 3 years of age are considered?,Is it a high priority that more 4 year olds be able to consent for sexual activity?
Is inflation increasing every month of Biden's presidency?,Has inflation hit another 40-year high in this time?,Is inflation likely to reach a 40-year high during Biden's tenure?,Has inflation risen during Biden's tenure?,Is inflation higher during Biden's tenure than previously?
Was the government deprived of $1 million in revenues from a misplaced comma?,Did the government lose any revenue from the misplaced comma?,Did the comma have anything to do with that loss?,Was the government able to get back $1 million from the misplaced comma?
Is this film a veiled threat to Muslim sentiments?,Have any films been filed against this film?,Is there any evidence the film is a veiled threat to Muslim sentiments?,Has this film been stopped by the Supreme Court?,Is it a known threat to Muslim sentiments?
Would it be possible for the Boston bomber to have the right to vote?,Does HR 1 allow a person to vote?,Does HR 1 allow an individual to vote?,Does HR 1 have anything in common with the Boston bomber?,Would the Boston bomber have a right to vote?,Is there a consensus on the importance of having a right to vote a constitutional right?
Are any polls held in UP that were conducted in years ending with 2?,Did any candidates from either UP party win in the 2019 polls?,Did any of the 2018 elections in UP be held after 2 years?,Did any of the 2018 elections in UP include any election that amounted to less than 2 years?
Does this vaccine currently have protection against this virus?,Is the variant Omicron the upcoming outbreak?,Is this vaccine currently available to replace this vaccine?,Is the vaccine currently available for this virus?,Is this vaccine still required for this virus?,Is this vaccine currently available for this virus?
Did the Bucks Arena make a state contribution?,Would the new Bucks arena be expected to generate income tax revenue for the lifetime of the lease?,Does the state contribute $80 million for the new Bucks arena?,Is the amount of new income tax revenue estimated to be over $600 million per year?
Does the House farm bill propose to remove 2 million people from food stamps?,"Will 210,000 children not receive school meals?",Is the House farm bill a total cut?,Would the House farm bill be included in the 2017 federal budget?,Is the House farm bill intended to be written specifically to address low income individuals?
Did Marcos author the New Central Bank Act of 1993?,Did Marcos sign the New Central Bank Act of 1993?,Did Marcos sign the New Central Bank Act of 1993?,Did Marcos author the New Central Bank Act of 1993?,Did Marcos sign a law that revised the New Central Bank Act of 1993?
Did a record turnout occur in 2012 in the US election?,Did a record turnout occur in 2012 due to absentee ballots or voting early?,Did voting before Election Day in 2012 result in a record turnout?,Is 2012 a record turnout in the U.S. elections in general?
Did Clinton suggest Trump did not speak with Vladimir Putin on the day of an attack on the U.S. Capitol?,Did Clinton suggest Trump didn't speak with Vladimir Putin during the attack on the U.S. Capitol?,"Did the attack on the U.S. Capitol happen on Jan. 6, 2021?"
Does Clinton want to raise taxes on African American owned businesses to as much as nearly 50% more than they're paying now?,Does Clinton believe African American owned businesses should be taxed more in general?,Does Clinton think African American business owners should be taxed more in general?,Has Clinton ever raised taxes for African American business owners?
Did the Australian government's Threatened Species Strategy try to kill 2 million feral cats?,Is the purpose of the sausage bait to kill feral cats a part of the Threatened Species Strategy?,Were the sausage baits used in the culling of feral cats a part of the Threatened Species Strategy?
Did R Kelly release a photo of himself in 2019?,Is R Kelly still in jail awaiting trial for sex crimes?,Is a photo of R Kelly released after child support case in 2019?,Does R Kelly have a record of felony abuse?,Is R Kelly in prison awaiting trial for sex crimes?
Are trains on Kerala's Railway System decorated for Onam?,Are Onam decorations typically seen on all the trains on Indian Railways?,Are there any Onam celebrations on the Eastern Railway?,Is Onam celebrated in the Northern part of the state?,Can rail stations in the southern part of the state decorate their railway system for Onam?
Is the survey image indicating that the SP is going to win upcoming Uttar Pradesh assembly elections in 2022?,Is it plausible that the SP would win the election?,Has this electoral map been polled before?,Is this poll taking place in 2018?,Has the SP won any previous elections?
Is solar activity increasing?,Can solar activity account for half to two-thirds of climate change?,Can solar activity account for three-quarters of climate change?,Will an increase in solar activity result in an increase in climate change?,Have these estimates been disputed?,Have these estimates been used as a pretext to limit climate change?
Was one plane crashed while on a training mission?,Did any pilots die in the crash?,Was the plane owned by Boeing?,Was the training mission over the Atlantic?,Did other pilots die in the crash?,"Was the plane crashing at a speed of over 18,000 MPH?",Was the flight time between the crash site and the runway controlled by a Boeing?,Was the crash located in the US or Mexico?
"Did the governor restore the rights of 18,000 individuals?","Has it been possible to restore the rights of 18,000 individuals over four years?","Has the Governor restored the rights of more than 18,000 individuals compared to the previous 7 governors combined?",Is the Governor more experienced than seven previous governors?,"Has the governor restored the rights of more than 18,000 individuals compared to the previous 7 governors combined?"
Did the girl’s body remain unecomposed for two years?,Was the girl’s dead body discovered when her body was being shifted to a new graveyard?,Was the girl’s body discovered after her father’s dream requesting that her body be moved based on the request in her father’s dreams?,Did the girl’s father request that the death of his daughter be attributed to her father’s dream?
What time of year was the body of the woman found?,Did the Clintons own the property in which the body was found?,Did Clintons own any of the Clinton property in which the body was found?,Was the Clinton property listed as owned by Bill and Hillary Clinton?,Was the Clinton property listed as owned by Bill and Hillary Clinton?
Did Trump say he would testify in the trial if he could travel to DC on Air Force One?,Did Trump say he would testify if he could travel on Air Force One?,Do Trump's testimony in the second trial have any other special circumstances or considerations?,Did Trump say he would testify in the second trial if he could travel to DC on Air Force One?
Did this woman accidentally record parts of the coup in Myanmar?,Has there been a repeat of this on other cameras?,Did this woman use a camera to record the coup in Myanmar?,Did the woman inadvertently record parts of the coup in Myanmar?,Does this woman plan to prosecute this person?
Was Malia Obama the highest-paid heir in 2017?,Is Obama's daughter Malia Obama an individual?,Is Malia Obama the highest paid heir in 2017 in total?,Is Malia Obama the highest paid heir in 2017?,Is this a rumor or reality?
Does Toby Carvery have a Facebook offer?,Does Toby Carvery offer a free meal?,Does Toby Carvery provide a drink for each free meal?,Does Toby Carvery provide other free meals?,Does Toby Carvery offer drinks?,Does Toby Carvery offer any of the food for free?
Did Trump lose as many jobs as Biden gained during his first five months?,Did Trump lose more jobs than Biden during his first five months?,Does Biden gain more jobs than Trump during the first five months?,Are there any statistics that substantiate this claim?,Does Trump lose as many jobs as Biden during his first five months?
Have 9 crore women been benefitted jointly from MUDRA and Stand Up India?,Is MUDRA and Stand up India the same organization?,Did the MUDRA and Stand up India organizations come together to make a common effort?,Are all of these programs different?,Can we use the number in general terms?,Can we get a total number for all the programs?,Does this number include the MUDRA programme?
"Does Lung Cleaner Tritydo treat asthma, pneumonia, and bronchitis within 7 days?",Does Lung Cleaner Tritydo work as a non-prescription product?,Does Lung Cleaner Tritydo contain any other medications?,Has Lung Cleaner Tritydo been reviewed by FDA?
Did PM Modi help Odisha CM Naveen Patnaik in procuring coronavirus testing kits?,Did PM Modi assist in procuring coronavirus testing kits within six hours?,Was the aid from PM Modi a public service?,Was the aid in question public service?
Did Hillary Clinton support and help release two black panthers accused of torturing and murdering Alex Rackley?,Are there other Black Panthers or black panthers that are suspected of torturing and murdering Rackley?,Did Clinton help free any of these two Black Panthers?,Did Clinton and her associates help free other black panthers?
"Does one-third of the health care dollar go to hospitals, clinics, hospitals, doctors, clinics or insurers?",Does this figure include people who do not attend healthcare services?,"Does the government contribute money to health care in general, or specifically to insurers?",Does the amount of money spent by insurers largely depend on the size of the health care budget?
"Did big banks invest $300,000 in Heck?",Did Heck sponsor a tax break for banks?,Have banks contributed to Heck's political efforts?,Has the majority of Heck's political actions focused on protecting certain large companies?,Have banks contributed to Heck's campaigns?,Did Heck's political strategy directly affect these banks?,Have banks invested a large amount in Heck's political campaign?
Did the Wells Fargo CEO admit to bringing people back?,"Were these people actually sick, or died?",Are there other possible reasons to bring people back?,Are people who were sick still unable to return?,Will the current COVID-19 pandemic keep on returning?,Did these people suffer a relapse?
"Is it true Texas General Land Office has awarded $451,932.89 to school children for wind leases?",Does the Texas General Land Office have any other records to back this claim?,Did the General Land Office have any other records to back this claim?,Did the Texas General Land Office award this money to schools?
Did Cheney receive any financial benefit from Halliburton when he left to join the presidential ticket?,Does Cheney receive any payment from Halliburton to support the presidency?,Did Cheney receive any benefit from Halliburton when he left to join the presidential ticket?,Did Cheney receive any payout from Halliburton when he left to join the presidential ticket?
Did the audio clip attributed to Dr. Trehan claim that COVID-19 situation would become very serious?,"Was Dr. Trehan referring to the COVID-19 situation from March 27, 2019, or previous events?",Did Dr. Trehan cite any evidence to support this claim?,Is Dr. Trehan directly credited for this audio clip?
Is Obama not afraid that white people will be blended out before Obama is 30?,Is Obama's speech an egotistical challenge to President Trump in resurrecting racial hatred and inequality?,Did Obama speak to a group at the midterm election that supports racial inequality?
Has this year been a year of severe depression in Germany?,Has this year's depression been higher than prior years?,Has this year's depression been higher than previous years?,Has this year's depression been lower than previous years?,Has this year's depression been higher than previous years?,Has this year's depression been higher than previous years?,Has this year's depression been lower than previous years?
Does Fox News report on “an energy-saving device that can save 90% of electricity” from Elon Musk?,Did Fox News report on this device?,Did Elon Musk ever offer this device?,Did the device help save electricity?,Did this device save any electricity at all?,Can this device save electricity?,Does this device include any other features besides energy efficiency?,Did Fox Reports mention this device in a story?
Have all of the funds allocated to education for the period been used?,Have there been a total of n3.5 trillion being remitted to education during the period?,Does education receive a total of the funds allocated to it?,Was less than 10% of the monies allocated to it during the period?
Is it true the enrollment declined in New Jersey?,Is it true the individual health insurance market rates increased in New Jersey?,Has the number of individual health insurance policies increased or decreased during New Jersey’s health policy changes?,Has individual health insurance markets in New Jersey been significantly smaller due to the increased demand for individual health insurance plans?,Is it true that when New Jersey adopted guaranteed coverage and cost provisions without a mandate individual health insurance market rates doubled or tripled?
Did the dna tests confirm his illegitimate child count?,Did the dna tests prove any other illegitimate children?,Did the dna tests confirm that one or more of his children had criminal convictions?,Did any of these children have criminal convictions?
Did Dr. Laibow confirm that WHO was working on COVID-19 vaccines to create permanent sterility?,Are the vaccines currently available?,Have they prevented the spread of COVID-19?,Can vaccines help prevent the spread of COVID-19?,Is it unsafe to use vaccines to prevent the spread of COVID-19?
Did McDaniel make the statement before referring to this question?,"Is the debt default a ""boode very well"" for the Republican field in 2024?",Are debt defaults not normally a issue for presidential elections?,Is the vote in the midterm elections in 2018 held in Texas?
Does snake venom cause COVID-19?,Does snake venom cause COVID-19 vaccines?,Is snake venom a virus in COVID-19?,Is COVID-19 caused by snake venom?,Does snake venom cause miscarriage?
Was ivermectin approved for treating COVID-19 at any point?,Did the FDA reverse course and approve ivermectin for treating COVID-19?,Was the FDA able to change its position towards the approval of ivermectin for treatment of COVID-19?,Did the FDA reverse their positions?
Was there more sanctuary cities when Bush was Governor than while Bush was governor?,Has Florida had any of these cities besides the five mentioned?,Does this city have a different name than the five mentioned in this post?,Does any of this cities have different names than the five mentioned in this post?,Has any of these cities had any negative consequences for Florida?
Did the US amass $100 million in debt per hour?,Did the US amass 400 million or 450 million in debt during this charade?,Can you say the US amassed 100 million or more in debt per hour during this charade?,Was there an error in the calculation of these amounts?
Did Handel support gay adoption in 2003?,Did Handel back gay adoption in 2003?,Did Handel support gay adoption in 2003?,Did Handel support gay adoption in 2003 as chairwoman of the Fulton County Commission?,Did Handel support gay adoption in 2003 during her run for chairwoman of the Fulton County Commission?
Did the Hells Angels Motorcycle Club head to Seattle in June 2020 to fight antifa?,Did the Hells Angels Motorcycle Club have a connection with Antifa?,Was the Hells Angels Motorcycle Club actively involved with Antifa?,Did the Hells Angels Motorcycle Club have an active connection with Antifa?,Did the Hells Angels Motorcycle Club have an active connection with Antifa?
Did Ayotte vote for tax breaks for big oil?,Do all states have tax breaks for big oil?,Was Ayotte an expert in tax law?,Did Ayotte vote for tax breaks for big oil?,Did Ayotte take tax breaks from big oil?,Did Ayotte vote for tax breaks for big oil?
Did the governor of Oregon issue a tax relief for Oregonians?,Did Wehby or Conger create or cause devastating consequences for Oregonians?,Did the governor and Conger have any conflict of interest between each other?,Did Wehby or Conger have an incompetence in state government?,Do any aides to Wehby or Conger have an income?
Did these leaders denounce Steve Watkins?,Did the leader denounce Watkins?,Was Watkins able to raise funds?,Did the leader denounce Watkins?,Was the leader directly involved in Watkins' campaign?,Was the leader directly involved in Watkins' campaign?,Was the leader directly involved in Watkins' campaign?,Did any of the leaders denounce Watkins?
Are people born before 1957 getting a $1728 bonus to their Social Security or Medicare checks?,Were there any restrictions on the bonuses?,Are Social Security and Medicare payments the same?,Is there any mention of a benefit that is different between 2017 and 2018?,Is there any mention of any taxes associated with the bonuses?
Is the image shown at some point in time?,Are the people who demolished the house from the picture related to the deceased people?,Are the house's remains still visible in a cemetery in a town nearby?,Does the buried house have any remains?,Does the house have any remains outside?
Would he push for the privatization of Social Security?,Will there be more than 4 years of his administration?,Are the promises for four more years of his administration?,Will this take place?,Will he use this time to make his plan clear?,Is this plan a proposal to push for the privatization of Social Security?
Was this incident reported in a newspaper or online?,Is this a reported incident in a magazine or newspaper?,Is this a reported incident in an online publication?,Can this event be attributed to other people?,Did this incident take place in January 2021?,Was the victim in a hospital?
Is this poster part of a protest?,Did this poster say a particular message?,Did the poster say this message?,Did this poster contain a picture of the person that held the poster?,Is this poster part of a protest against the PM?,Is this poster part of a protest against India?
"Did the ban have a period for the ""bad"" to enter the country during that week?",Did any of the bad come in during the period?,Were any of the bad men able to get through the border after the ban?,Is there any evidence that would support this argument?,Were all of the bad men able to get through the border during that period?,"Did this ban have a period for the ""bad"" to enter the country during that week?"
"Did 70,000 children lose their Head Start slots because of the sequester?",Did this increase in Head Start slots come from the sequester?,Did this increase come from the sequester?,Have these losses been entirely due to the sequester?,No Answer> Yes Answer> No Answer>?
Did Trump push through budgets that did not increase the tax levy from the previous year?,Did Trump push through budgets that did not increase the tax levy from the previous year after serving as Milwaukee County Executive?,Did Trump push through budgets that did not increase the tax levy from the previous year after serving as Milwaukee County Executive?
Does the military lockdown start Saturday?,Does Mumbai and Pune have any other lockdowns?,Will a police presence be required for the military lockdown?,Does the lockdown come into effect Monday?,Can the military keep Mumbai and Pune under a strict lockdown?,Are there other events besides the lockdown happening on Saturday in Mumbai and Pune?
Is Andrew Tate on a 14 year sentence for a crime?,Is it common for people to be sentenced to prison in general?,Is there evidence that Tate was sentenced to prison for a crime?,Is Tate currently serving this sentence?,Is it common for people to be sentenced to prison in general?
Did an estimated 5.7 million illegal immigrants vote in the 2008 election?,Did illegal immigrants not make their votes count as voting in the 2008 election?,Did illegal immigrants vote in the 2008 election?,Could 5.7 million illegal immigrants have voted in the 2008 election?,Did 5.7 million illegal immigrants have citizenship in their country?
Was there a large amount of people outside to hear the President speak?,Did the crowd get in any major snarls?,Was the crowd able to hear the President speak?,Did the crowd in general gather outside for the President to speak?,Did a photo of the crowd show them having snarled a lot?
Did the Trump administration help get the man next to Pompeo in a November 2020 photo out of jail in 2018?,Will the person in the photo be President of Afghanistan?,Is this man still in prison as of this writing?,Do other officials agree with this report?,Did the president in the 2020 photo help Trump get out of jail in 2018?
Have there been significant changes in the number of electricity connections in the last six years?,Did the increase of electricity connections occur primarily due to greater efficiency of electricity distribution systems?,"Are these improvements, or other changes, a result of this increase in electricity usage?",Do the new increases have any implications for the number of people that have electricity access in Qatar?
Have there been more active voters in the state of Wisconsin than in any other state?,Have there been more active voters than in any other state?,Have there been multiple registered voters in the state of Wisconsin?,Does Wisconsin have more active voters than in any other state?,Can Wisconsin voters be registered to vote after 100 years?
Are the 2 doses of the COVID-19 vaccine deadly for anyone?,Have the benefits and costs of the COVID-19 vaccine been studied?,Does the COVID-19 vaccine kill people?,"Have there been any research results indicating a relationship between the COVID-19 vaccine, a side effect of vaccinating against HIV, and the mortality and risk for people who receive two doses of the COVID-19 vaccine?"
Has the Democratic Party raised taxes 115 times in the past 10 years?,Does New Jersey attract jobs by not allowing for affordable education and work opportunities?,Is it difficult for New Jersey to attract jobs from neighboring states?,Does the Democratic Party actively discourage job creation in New Jersey?,Does the Democratic Party generally raise taxes?
"Did more than 100,000 women attempt to self-induce abortion in Texas alone?",Have more women attempted self-induction abortions in Texas in the past year?,Was there a significant decrease in fetuses attempting self-induction abortions?,Was there an increase in women attempting to fetuses attempting self-induction abortions in Texas over the past year?
Did the photographer cry after Dhoni lost his wicket in WC 2019?,Did Dhoni lose his wicket at Dhoni Stadium?,Did the photographer cry during ICC 2019?,Was there a photograph of the incident?,Did anyone else cry during the incident?,Did Dhoni lose his wicket at Dhoni Stadium?
Was it true that the photograph was fake or not?,Was the Las Vegas sphere display a Windows error message?,Is there any information about the Las Vegas sphere being displayed a Windows error message?,Is there any information available about the Las Vegas sphere being displayed a Windows error message?
Have 145 instances of suction entrapment in swimming pools and spas been documented since 1980?,Have 36 deaths of children occurred in pools and spas since 1980?,Have more cases of suction entrapment in swimming pools and spas been documented since 1980?,Are more deaths of children in pools and spas related to suction entrapment in swimming pools?
What two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity?,"Did Einstein think the universe was a ""good thing?",""" Did Einstein think humans were stupid?",Did Einstein say that the universe is infinite?,Did Einstein believe the universe is unintelligent?,Did Einstein disagree with someone about the universe?
Did the U.S. spend $53 billion in Ukraine aid?,"Would the U.S. pay five SWAT members $80,000 each and have them at every school front door?","Would the U.S. be able to buy five SWAT members for $80,000 each and have them at every school door?",Was the US able to buy five SWAT members at every school front door?
Did he help the Uline company to develop in the Kenosha area?,Did this generate 800 jobs in the Kenosha area?,Did this benefit the local economy?,Will this benefit the local economy of these jobs?,Was this success a success in the short term?,Was this success in the long term?
Has hate crime in the United States increased by 50% since 2010?,Has hate crimes in the United States in general increased by 50% since 2010?,Have the overall levels of hate crime increased since 2010?,Have the total rates of hate crimes decreased since 2010?,Is there evidence that hate crimes have decreased since 2010?,Is there evidence that hate crimes have decreased since 2010?
Has the U.S. government covered up evidence of UFOs since 1947?,Has Tim Burchett said anything about UFOs since 1947?,Has Burchett spoken about UFOs since 1947?,Has Burchett spoken about UFOs since 1947?,Is Tim Burchett an agent of the U.S. government?
Is Clarissa Ward a CNN reporter?,Is the Taliban taking control of Afghanistan?,Is Clarissa Ward wearing a head covering when reporting on Afghanistan?,Did CNN's reporters in Afghanistan have to wear head coverings during the Taliban's takeover?,Is Clarissa Ward a reporter in Afghanistan for CNN?
Did certain state employee contracts give workers $4 for bringing in their lunch?,Did any Wisconsin state employee contracts have these provisions?,Did the employees who took this advantage have a choice between paying the $4 or not?,Is there any record of these contracts for these individuals in this case?
Is the global economic collapse induced by the Coronavirus sufficient to halt a world economic collapse?,Is the global economic collapse induced by the Coronavirus sufficient to halt the death toll from tuberculosis?,Is there any evidence to show that the total number of deaths in the world from the Coronavirus is sufficient to collapse the global economy?
Is the death date in Isjum consistent with the Russian occupation?,Is the location of the Isjum town in which people were found ineligible to apply for a war crimes conviction in Isjum?,Would the Russian forces have been responsible for these deaths if they did not have more control over Isjum?
Did the House Democratic block the Republican effort to read the names of U.S. troops killed in Afghanistan in 2021?,Did the name of the names of U.S. troops killed in Afghanistan in 2021 be changed by the House Republicans?,"Did the House Democrats, and Nancy Pelosi, block the Republican efforts to read the names of U.S. troops killed in Afghanistan?"
"Did new documents show 158,000 adverse events after this vaccine?",Did the adverse events attributed to this vaccine match up with those of other vaccines?,Would other vaccines that are being tested be considered this vaccine?,Do all cases listed in these documents have an answer?,Has this vaccine been recalled?,Did this vaccine contain this question?
Is Jack Graham believed to be in need of medical attention?,Was Jack Graham last seen with his family?,Did he have a fawn?,Did Jack Graham have his photo taken with his family?,Is there anything else to know about Jack Graham?,Is Jack Graham a person?
Did the photo depict Bono on the wbtii with Schwab and Schwab?,Was the photo captioned as if the photo had something to do with the Ukraine war?,"Was Schwab, Bono, and Trump related to the Ukraine war?",Did the photo caption directly relate to the Ukraine war?
Are there fewer than 100 members of al Qaeda in Venezuela?,Is it in any way true that most US military strength is based in the country where few members remain of al Qaeda?,Is it true that the US amassing most of its military strength in a country where fewer than 100 members of al Qaeda remains?
Is Ethylene Oxide used in COVID-19 testing swabs a component of the drug?,Are COVID-19 swabs contaminated with ethylene oxide?,Are ethylene oxide samples used to confirm CIV-19 infection?,Does Ethylene Oxide alter the structure of the building blocks of the body?
"Is there a minimum health worker to population ratio of 23 doctors, nurses and midwives per 10,000 population?","Is a minimum health worker to population ratio of 23 doctors, nurses and midwives per 10,000 population recommended by WHO?",Is there a standardized minimum health worker to population ratio in the United States?
Did Mallya deposit a cheque for 35 crore in the BJPs fund?,Did Mallya go to London?,Did Mallya's cheque go in the BJP's fund?,Did the BJP collect the cheque from Mallya?,Did Mallya spend the monies in London?
Did Trump score a 73 on a IQ test administered to him while in high school at NYMA?,Has Trump ever been charged with sexual misconduct in connection with his IQ test?,Is it true that Trump is said to have scored a 73 on an IQ test administered to him while in high school at NYMA?
Was the gift given in Saudi Arabia?,Was the bike made of 22-carat gold?,Did the gift come in an unusual shape?,Was the gift considered a gift from Saudi Arabia?,Was the gift in Saudi Arabia a surprise?,Did the bike give Ronaldo his number in the race?,Did the bike gift to Ronaldo come with any other gifts?
Did Garland author an opinion that resulted in the release of 17 Guantanamo Bay prisoners?,Did Garland author an opinion that resulted in the release of 17 Guantanamo Bay prisoners who were part of a group of violent Islamist extremists?,Did Garland write an opinion that resulted in the release of 17 Guantanamo Bay prisoners who were part of a group of violent Islamist extremists?
Is the CDC not making a public announcement about the effectiveness of a vaccine?,Are there any published studies regarding the effectiveness of the COVID vaccine?,Is there a vaccine that could reduce the odds of developing COVID-19?,Is there evidence to suggest that Pfizer's COVID vaccine is not effective?
Are earthquakes predicted to strike both India and Pakistan in the next 15 days?,Have astronomers and geologists mapped out any possible effects of a massive earthquake in India?,Are there any other studies pointing to this as possible?,Is there any science confirming this prediction?,Will the quake in Turkey result in more damage than in Pakistan?
Does zinc supplementation help kill COVID-19?,Does zinc ionophores allow zinc to go from outside the cell to inside the cell?,Does zinc supplementation help with COVID?,Can zinc supplementation slow down the progression of COVID-19?,Does zinc supplementation prevent COVID-19?
"Is it true that poor people go to a payday lender and pay 300, 400, 500 percent interest?",Do poor people pay the same interest as rich people do?,Are there benefits to using payday lenders?,"Is it true that poor people will pay 400, 500 percent interest with a payday loan?"
Did the Affordable Care Act eliminate the number of children who had pre-existing conditions?,Is it true that 17 million children with pre-existing conditions were not insured under the Affordable Care Act?,Is there some evidence that this was the case before the Affordable Care Act was signed?,Has there been any research on this?
Did Sanders write an essay in which a woman fantasizes about being raped by three men simultaneously?,Did Sanders write an essay in which a woman fantasizes about being raped by three men simultaneously?,Did Sanders mention three men in the essay?,Is there any evidence Sanders used three men in the article?
Have over 25 million people living in Texas been licensed for concealed gun carry?,Are concealed handgun licenses available for only 2% of people in Texas?,Does Texas have a low population for concealed handgun carry?,Are there a large number of concealed handgun carryrs in Texas?,Do most Texas citizens have concealed handgun licenses?
Are there any government owned ballparks for Triple A baseball?,Are there any government owned ballparks for leagues in the United States?,Are all of these ballparks managed by government entities?,Is there any evidence that these ballparks are being privately financed?,- based on the amount of baseball stadiums in the U.S.?
Did this claim come from a false media source?,Does the quote claim an age for children to take sex-changing hormones?,Has this claim been proven to be true?,Has the claim been proven to be true?,Have these posts been posted by many people?,Have these posts been backed by any experts in this area?
Is it true that Trump’s impersonation would be the second impeachment?,"Would Trump lose a substantial pension, a travel allowance, Secret Service protection, and the ability to run in 2024?",Would Trump lose the ability to run in 2024?,Can Trump run in 2024?
Did Baldwin have an ad that would make people think her views were supportive?,Did Baldwin's opponent use the term positive ads to imply a candidate's views were supportive?,Did Baldwin have a negative advertisement in the campaign?,Did Baldwin's opponent's negative ad contain no positive information?
Did the Boston man sue Dyson for $2.3 million after being partially emasculated by their vacuum cleaner?,Does the Boston man allegedly work for Dyson?,Did Dyson not stop producing a vacuum cleaner?,Was Dyson responsible for this suicing?,Was the Boston man’s vacuum cleaner defective?
Is it true Barack Obama has played over 90 rounds of golf as president?,Has Obama played golf in all of his administrations?,Has Obama played golf in all of his presidential years?,Does Obama play golf in all of his presidential year?,Was Obama the one that first played golf as president?,Is this information correct?
Is there an ongoing competition for one iPhone on Valentine's Day?,Is Taj Hotel sending gift cards on Valentine's Day?,Is there a contest for an iPhone on Valentine's Day?,Is it known that there are other contests for Valentine's Day?,Is there a contest for one iPhone on Valentine's Day?
Did the total number of US troops killed in Afghanistan exceed 31?,Was there more than one person killed in Afghanistan?,Are there fewer than 7 US soldiers killed in Afghanistan compared to other nations?,Did the death rate of US troops exceed 10% in Afghanistan?,Are the US troops who were killed in Afghanistan above 10%?
Does diet suited to one’s specific blood type help alleviate symptoms?,Does a diet suited to one’s specific blood type help with weight loss?,Does a diet suited to one’s specific blood type help with weight gain?,Does a diet suited to one’s specific blood type help improve digestion?
Are all 17-year-old girls trained to become an astronaut?,Have all 17-year-old girls been trained to become an astronaut?,Do all 17-year-olds have an astronaut training background?,Do all 17-year-olds have astronaut training backgrounds?,Is all 17-year-olds trained to become astronauts?
Is there a vaccine for HIV after 40 years of research?,Are there vaccines for the common cold after 40 years of research?,Are there vaccines for the common cold after 40 years of research?,Are there vaccines for the common cold after 40 years of research?,Is there a vaccine for the common cold after 40 years of research?
Do coffee-based health plans cost $5 per day?,Does the health insurance match the purchase of a soy latte?,Is it true that health insurance is available at an affordable cost?,Is there a positive outcome to getting health insurance for a $5 vanilla soy latte?
Did 44% of pregnancy reported for the COVID vaccine trials end with miscarriages?,Did Pfizer release a paper detailing the data?,Did Pfizer provide documentation of the data?,Did Pfizer study the vaccines?,Did Pfizer release any other information regarding the data?
Does shedding between 7 pm and 10 pm help in weight loss?,Is crying during those hours associated with weight loss?,Is crying during those hours associated with weight loss?,Does the information provided about the time frames of shedding exist in this study?,Does shedding in these times of the day have a direct relationship to weight loss?
Did she call for cracking down on subprime mortgages?,Did she call for addressing risks of derivatives and cracking down on subprime mortgages at the same time?,Did this include cracking down on subprime mortgages as a result of the crisis?,Does she advocate for addressing risks of derivatives and cracking down on subprime mortgages at the same time?
Does a photo of the burning house in the article of the Kenyan politician referred to in a story about him in the media be from the same house?,Was the photo from more than a decade old or the previous year?,Is a photo of a burning house that was more than a decade old in the article?,Was this photo taken in a year or less before this article?
"Did 35,000 votes in Georgia in 2020?",Did Raffensperger win the election by placing a majority of votes in the Republican primary?,Did Raffensperger personally certify voter eligibility?,"Did Raffensperger produce a total of 250,000 ballots in 2020?",Was this number the same as the number of ballots that were produced in 2020?
Did the Kenyatta Administration cut off funds to the office of the deputy president?,Did it recur to previous budgets of the office of the deputy president?,Was the budget for the office of the deputy president cut off?,Does the office of the deputy president receive money from the public?,Did the Kenyatta Administration cut off funds to the office of the deputy president at any point?
Did he assert that all the programs were not stimulus programs?,Did Republicans make this claim referring to just a single program?,Did Republicans make this claim referring to all programs or just one program?,Did Republicans make this claim referring to all programs or just one program?,Does any specific program that is excluded by the stimulus plan contribute to the overall package?
Did the concrete slab break when the people fell into the drain?,Does the water in the drain have the same volume as the water in the drain?,Does the water in the drain have the same volume of water as the water in the drain?,Was there any other debris or debris present when this sink collapsed?
Did the weightlifter knocked out due to an injury in the Olympics?,Was the weightlifter injured due to an injury in the Olympics?,Did the weightlifter use a medical device to testify?,Was the weightlifter kicked out due to an injury in the Olympics?,Did a medical device testify that the weightlifter took no medication?
Did the men survive the 16 days in the hull?,Did these men die?,Was the ship destroyed?,Did the men die because of exposure to carbon dioxide?,Was the ship a target of the attack?,Did the men suffer a significant amount of dehydration?,Did they die of the heat of the hull?
Was there more workers for every retiree in the beginning?,Are there currently more workers for every retiree?,Will there be less workers for every retiree?,Are there any issues regarding the number of workers for every retiree?,Was the minimum of three workers per retiree a minimum requirement?,Has the number of workers per retiree stayed at the same level?
"Did Wisconsin count 3,239,920 votes but only 3,129,000 registered voters?","Did Wisconsin count 3,239,920 votes but only 3,129,000 registered voters?",Did Wisconsin count fewer voters than any other U.S. state that year?,Did Wisconsin have more votes than any other state in 2011?
Are these cat armours made by Henry VIII?,Are these cat armours made in England?,Have these cat armours been reproduced?,Is this type of cat armour made by Henry VIII?,Is this type of cat armour made in the United States?,Is this type of cat armour made in the United States?,Are the cat armours sold in this country?
Did Marcos say he could win a general election without campaigning or participating in debates?,Can Marcos participate in debates with other political candidates?,Are there other ways to win a general election in May 2022?,Does Marcos think he can win a general election even without campaigning?
Does the speeding ticket frenzy start in any state?,Is this a serious concern for the police?,Would this cause the state to lose a large amount of traffic?,Is this a serious concern for police in your state?,Will all roads be closed for 30 days?,Will any roads be closed in the event of a 30 day speeding ticket frenzy?
"Did income under Manmohan government increase after 50,000 in 2004?","Did income under Modi government increase after 50,000 in 2019?","Does income under Modi government increase after 5,000,000 in 2019?","Did income under Modi government increases after 5,000,000 in 2019?","Is 50,000 in 2004 same as 5,000 in 2019?"
"Did the government report on a 642,000-crime pattern?",Did the population of Texans consist primarily of immigrants?,Is this information accurate?,Has the report been retracted?,Has the government conducted an investigation on the number of crimes committed by criminal immigrants?,Do some findings conflict with this report?
Has the legal drinking age in South Carolina been lower to 18 years old?,Has any change in drinking laws in South Carolina reduced the drinking age?,Has any change in drinking laws in South Carolina decreased alcohol consumption?,Has any change in liquor laws in South Carolina reduced alcohol consumption?,Has any changes to South Carolina's legal drinking age made any difference?
Did Burke spend $12.5 million to buy a vacant lot for a company that said it had no plans to create jobs in Wisconsin?,Did Burke purchase a vacant lot for a company that lay off 800 workers in Wisconsin?,Did Burke say that she bought a vacant lot for a company that had no plans to create jobs in Wisconsin?
Did the video show a Moulavi publicly shaming a Moulavi who was caught while molesting a five year old girl?,Was the video posted on YouTube?,Did the video show the Moulavi publicly shaming a Moulavi who was caught while molesting a five year old girl?
Can marijuana and honey be eaten together?,Does marijuana have healing properties to cure 40 diseases?,Did the CDC test for these benefits?,Is there a consensus on how much marijuana cures a given disease?,Are other illnesses caused by cannabis?,Does Marijuana help cure 40 diseases?,Is honey and cannabis together safe to ingest?,Is the use of marijuana safe?
Is ivermectin associated with sterility in 85% of men who take it?,Is it true that it is sterile in 15% of men who take it?,Does it make men sterile?,Can Ivermectin cause sterility in men who are pregnant?,Does ivermectin cause sterility in men who are breastfeeding?,Can ivermectin cause sterility in women?
Did this research study include a population?,"Did the researchers use the word ""contest"" to describe this study?",Did this study provide the results from a clinical trial?,Does the information in this study support the previous research?,Was this research performed in a clinical trial?,Did this researcher conduct a post-test?
Are government spending 40% more than what we take in?,Do people say that the government spent 40% more than they took in?,Was this statement based on a source of funding?,Has this information been discussed previously?,Did this information come from a reliable source?,Does the government spend $40 more per capita than the state take in?,Does this data provide any information about the actual state budget?
"Was a Feb. 18, 2021, widely shared video accurate in portraying the Arabian Desert snowfall?",Did the video have a recorded snowfall?,Did the video actually capture snowfall?,Did the video specifically feature snowfall?,Does the video include snowfall as well?,Was there a lack of snow in the area of the video?
Was the number of asylum seekers/refugees by 2017?,Was the number of Flüchtlings/Refugees in 2017?,Was Nicolaus Fest's assertion substantiated?,Was Nicolaus Fests assessment accurate?,Can we determine who voted for Fest?,Does Nicolaus Fest agree with the statement he made on Facebook?
Did this family arrive in Australia three months ago?,Does this family receive a monthly benefit?,Is this family receiving government welfare payments?,Is this family receiving government welfare payments?,Is this family in a specialized area?,Is this family receiving government welfare payments?,Is this family receiving public benefit payments?
Did it ever occur to other cake mixes that required the addition of eggs?,Did the requirement affect other cake mixes that never required the addition of eggs?,Did the requirement cause the success of some cake mixes?,Did the food company issue a warning about the safety of their mix?,Was the cake mix resold well?
Does H.R. 4919 allow the microchipping of mentally disabled citizens?,Is the legislation clear on whether it is to microchip mentally disabled citizens based on medical symptoms?,Is H.R. 4919 clear on whether it allows the microchipping of patients with Alzheimer's disease?
Are the bodies of children retrieved from the debris following an airstrike in Yemen’s Saada on January 21?,Is the debris located in Saada Yemen?,Was the debris in Saada Yemen found after the January 21 airstrike?,Did anyone in Saada Yemen report the body retrieved from the debris?
Do General Motors car models contain 100% carbon-based fuels?,Does General Motors claim that 95% of the energy used to charge the electric car is from coal?,Do other car manufacturers use 95% of the energy from coal to charge their vehicles?,Does the energy used to power the electric car come from renewable sources or from gas companies?
Did Amazon Prime India Tweet that it will delete Swara Bhaskar's Rasbhari if the tweet got 5000 retweets?,Did Amazon Prime India promise that it would delete Swara Bhaskar's Rasbhari if the tweet got 5000 retweets?,Did Amazon Prime India promise that it would delete Swara Bhaskar's Rasbhari if the tweet got 5000 retweets?
Did the segment feature footage from the 1998 film Deep Impact?,Did TGCOM24 use footage from the 1998 film Deep Impact in a segment about people fleeing Kyiv?,Did the film Deep Impact have a theatrical release?,Did the film Deep Impact feature a documentary?,Did the film Deep Impact have a DVD release?
Did this mean that 34.5% of young women are not working or not at school?,Is there any correlation between employment and higher education status in this study?,Is there a link between a high unemployment rate and higher education status in this study?,Did this percentage increase from 20.9-9.9% of male and female youth?
Was there more affordable housing units in Madison than in any other city?,Did the construction of new affordable housing units cause any economic damage?,Was the City of Milwaukee able to create new affordable housing units for a third year in a row?,Did the City of Milwaukee receive any federal assistance for the creation of new affordable housing units?
"Did a total of 35,000 votes be added to each democrat candidate in Arizona?",Did this result in an increase in votes?,Did the vote surge occur in any other states?,Did there appear to be a net increase in votes in any of the states?,Did the Democratic candidates see their votes increase by any significant sum in Arizona?
Is Arabic writing still on the outside of police cruisers in Canada?,Is Arabic writing still on the outside of police cruisers in Canada?,Are police in Canada currently using Arabic written on the outside of police cruisers?,Was Arabic writing on the outside of police cruisers in Canada before 2016?
Did a Wisconsin Manufacturers & Commerce poll show that the majority of business executives were in favor of Right to Work legislation?,Did the majority of business executives in a Wisconsin poll say they were in favor of Right to Work legislation?,Did the Wisconsin Manufacturers & Commerce survey say that just 15% of business executives were in favor of Right to Work legislation?
Was this person photographed kissing this 15-year-old girl?,Does this person kiss a 15-year-old girl?,Did Biden kiss this 15-year-old girl?,Do Biden kiss people at an event?,Are there other photos of this person kissing someone else?,Does this person love to kiss?
Do the rate and magnitude of late twentieth century surface warming lie outside normal natural variability?,Do most of the late twentieth century surface warming reports fall within the normal natural variability ranges?,Does each year of late twentieth century surface warming have a rate and magnitude that are not outside of normal natural variability?,Are all late twentieth century surface warming reports within the normal natural variability ranges?,Do all of the late twentieth century surface warming reports fall within the normal natural variability ranges?
"Does GoI want to incorporate jawans, airmen and sailors enrolled after 2019 into Agnipath scheme?",Was there a letter from Additional Secretary to GoI asking to integrate the jawans/airmen/sailors enrolled after 2019 into Agnipath scheme?,Was there a letter from Additional Secretary to GoI asking to integrate the jawans/airmen/sailors enrolled after 2019 into Agnipath scheme?
Has every one person saved a life from the Covid vaccine?,Has every person died because of the vaccine?,Does every vaccine kill 2 people for every one life saved?,Does every vaccine kill at least 2 people for every one life saved?,Question: How many people can be saved per single vaccine dose?
"Did Harris lose 43,000 jobs since taking office?",Did the loss of jobs affect the economy as a whole?,Is there evidence that Obama's policies were causing Houston to lose jobs?,Did the loss of jobs impact the economy as a whole?,Were the losses in Houston because of Obama's policy decisions or from Obama's policies?
Does this initiative affect all schools?,"How many schools are in the planning, design, construction stages?",Are these schools being provided with any sanitation facilities?,Did this initiative save many schools from having to replace their sanitation facilities?,Can this initiative result in additional schools in need of sanitation renovation?,Are these schools able to provide facilities to meet international standards for hygiene?
Are visitors from the United States required to apply for visas in order to enter the EU in 2024?,Will EU visitors be required to apply for visas beginning in 2024?,Will the European Union provide a visa holder with additional protection in the event of an emergency?,Are visas required to travel to the European Union?
Is Musk the president of the U.S?,Was this statement made publicly?,Do Biden and Musk share the same religious views?,Is this statement the first time Musk has claimed Biden has one month left to live?,Did this statement come after Biden was killed?,Are there any questions about this statement?
Did Kejriwal say that return of Modi and Shah in 2019 would destroy Pakistan?,Did Kejriwal claim that his statements about the return of Modi and Shah were incorrect?,Did Kejriwal speak at a political event?,Did Kejriwal speak in response to an election controversy?
"Does Tim Tuggey donate over $41,000 to Democratic who support abortion and same-sex marriage?",Has Tuggey given a contribution related to both issues?,Did Tuggey support abortion based on who raised him?,Is Tuggey on the left end of this political spectrum?
Was the demonstration in Dresden on 13 March?,Did the demonstrators wear gloves?,Was the demonstration filmed?,Did the demonstration take place in cold weather?,Did it take place in the cold?,Did any police intervene?,Is this demonstration only in German?,Is this demonstration only in English?,Was the demonstration in German?
What was the name of the rogue team of U.S. veterans who banded together?,Did a rogue team of U.S. veterans band together to rescue Afghan allies in an operation dubbed pineapple express?,Did the U.S. veterans operate under Biden?
Do nigella sativa seeds have an hydroxy chloroquine content in excess?,Do nigella sativa seeds have a hydroxy chloroquine content?,Does the use of nigella sativa seeds have a relationship to prevent coronavirus?
Did this claim originally come from an anonymous source?,Is this claim 100% true?,Is this claim based on sources other than The Wall Street Journal?,"Were the Democrats responsible for $11 billion in federal spending on the war in Iraq, the war in Afghanistan and Hurricane Katrina combined?",Were Democrats responsible for $11 billion in federal spending on the war in Afghanistan and the war in Iraq combined?,Did this claim originally come from a source other than The Wall Street Journal?
"Is it true that 211,000 Floridians have lost their jobs since the governor campaigned on the stimulus program?",Is the data accurate?,Has the percentage of jobs lost since the governor campaigned on the stimulus program increased?,Is the rate of jobs lost increased over the past four years?
Was an unidentified 36-year-old woman killed?,Was an unidentified 36-year-old woman murdered in Düsseldorf?,Was an unidentified 36-year-old woman killed in Düsseldorf?,Did an unidentified 36-year old woman get killed in Düsseldorf?,Did an unidentified 36-year old woman get killed in Düsseldorf?
Is there a record of about 16 to 20 percent of children born in 2018 to 2020 having birth defects in South Korea?,Is the rate of birth defects more than in any other nation?,Is the rate of birth defects greater in South Korea than in any other country?,Is South Korea a country?
"Did Trump’s Oct. 31 rally in Butler, Pa. attract over 57,000 people?",Did Trump’s Oct. 31 rally attract overwhelmingly white people?,"Did Trump’s Oct. 31 rally in Butler, Pa. attract white people?","Did Trump’s Oct. 31 rally in Butler, Pa. attract white people?"
"Would drilling in the ANWR have a minimal impact covering only 2,000 out of 20-million acres?","Would drilling in the ANWR cover only 2,000 acres?",Would drilling in the ANWR have a significant impact covering more than 20-million acres?,Would drilling in the ANWR cover more than 20-million acres?
Did 47% of the total cost of 18 stadiums built from 2004 to 2013 come from public sources?,Did all of the stadiums built between 2004 and 2013 come from public sources?,Did all of the stadiums built in 2013 or earlier come from public sources?,Can I confirm if any of the stadiums built in 2004 have been funded by public sources?
Do some photos show farmer protests for Mishra's arrest?,Did the protests last through the week of Oct 18?,Was there a major police presence after the demonstration?,Has there been any violence or demonstrations in this region?,Would it have been easy to stop a demonstration in this region?,Was this protest on the day of Mishra's arrest?
Did Winfrey promote the campaign called #ShoutYourAbortion?,Did Winfrey participate in the campaign?,Was the campaign called #ShoutYourAbortion pro-choice?,Was the campaign endorsed by Oprah Winfrey?,Was the hashtag #ShoutYourAbortion the name of an article by Winfrey?
Did the town of Corcoran sink for more than a decade?,Was the city sinking all the way down?,Has Corcoran been sinking for a long time?,Has Corcoran had problems with flooding?,Has the town of Corcoran had problems with local residents?,Do residents report seeing underwater flooding?
Did Walker plan to cut 300 million from universities?,Did Walker announce an intention to spend $500 million on a basketball arena?,"Did Walker say that spending $500 million on a basketball arena was a ""back door option""?",Did Walker propose a new plan for funding universities?,Did Walker propose a new plan for funding universities?
Are all Shein clothing and accessories unhealthy levels of lead?,Are there all Shein clothing and accessories made with lead?,Are there all Shein clothing and accessories made with harmful levels of lead by August 2022?,'Is there a general pattern and cause of unsafe levels of lead in fast fashion clothing or accessories?,'Are there any other clothing or accessories made with lead or containing dangerous levels of lead?
Were the allocations made by parliament for the 2015-2016 budget based on the budget for the 2015-2016 year?,Are there specific policies in place to allocate this amount of money for the 2014-2015 budget?,Does the allocation for this year also include the amount for the 2015-2016 budget?,Were any provisions made for the budget allocation for this year?
Has the federation expanded their community works programmes by over 90%?,How many communities have their community works programs expanded in total?,"Has the number of participants increased from 100,000 to more than 200,000?",Is there a reason for this increase?,Were any other federations (i.e. federations of governmental organisations) involved in establishing community work programs?
Was the tower allegedly robbed?,Was the flag being hung by a separatist on the tower?,Is this rumor true?,Was it made up?,Are these reports true?,Do this group and others in this area have ties to Russia?,Is this rumor true?
Was 7 percent of illegal border crossings repeated?,Did the rate double or triple in 2019?,Are today's border crossings repeats the rate?,Are there higher illegal border crossings now than previously?,Does there seem to be a broader problem with immigration border policy?,Is there evidence linking increased Border security to increased illegal crossing?
Did the Russian Ka-52 helicopter shoot down by Ukrainian military in Kharkiv region?,Did the Russian Ka-52 helicopter shoot down by Ukrainian military in Kharkiv region?,Was the Russian Ka-52 helicopter shot down by Ukrainian military in Kharkiv region?,Did the Russian Ka-52 helicopter shot down by Ukrainian military in Kharkiv region?
Is this image of a well-equipped Taliban troop in 2021?,Does the image specifically show the Taliban troops?,Has this image previously been used?,Will this image later be used for a separate project?,Does this image provide a sarcastic depiction of the Taliban troops in 2021?
Did all 34 countries support India and Nupur Sharma after her remarks on Prophet Muhammad?,Did all countries support India and Nupur Sharma after her remarks?,Did all countries support India and Nupur Sharma after her comments on Prophet Muhammad?,Does the total amount of support for India and Nupur Sharma in total exceed the number of countries that supported India and Nupur Sharma?
Did the Marines retort children in the Pentagon daycare facility?,Did Marines enter and evacuate the daycare facility safely?,Did the Marines go through the daycare facility at a secure location?,Did the Marines use the cribs to secure the children?,Did Marines exit the daycare facility in a secured area?
Are Senate ROTC regulations mandatory for Grade 11 students?,Are House bills that mandate the ROTC program mandatory for Grade 12 students approved?,Are the laws related to school safety discussed in bill 8961?,Are the ROTC requirements for Grade 11 and 12 students known?,Have these bills been voted on by the House of Representatives?
Is it true that Ham was ejected from the theater?,"Did Ham shout ""WRONG"" every time the actors say 65 million years?",Is there any evidence this could be connected to the incident?,Did the actors say 65 million years?,Is this true?,Is this film a political statement?
Did 11 percent of the fatal car crashes in 2009 result in distracted driving?,Did distracted driving occur more frequently in 2009?,Is this a new report?,Did these fatal crashes occur in 2009?,Did the report focus on specific crashes only?,Was there any data supporting these claims?,Can we know for sure the reported statistics on distracted driving are accurate?
Is the protest depicted as violent or peaceful?,Does the protest take place in Utter Pradesh?,Did the protesters receive injuries?,Did any protests result in injuries?,Do any photographs show people suffering injuries?,Was the image of a police brutality?,Did any images depict police brutality?
Did this article refer to a mosque for Syria Muslims?,Is this area being occupied by Syrian Muslims?,Is this a new home project?,Is this new house project being funded by a tax payer?,Is this a specific religious issue?,Is this new house project funded by an individual?
Has this man been charged with infecting 240 people with the HIV virus?,Is this man's claim true?,Has this man been identified as the main culprit in this case?,Was this case investigated by an administrative law judge?,Is this person considered a potential threat to public health?,Were any of the individuals included in the complaint known to be HIV positive?
Can 47% of Americans afford $400?,Is 45% of Americans better off not spending $400?,Is 37% more than 50% likely to use credit cards?,Is 45% more likely to use credit cards for emergency expenses?,Is 47% less likely to have used credit cards in recent years?,Is the current amount of credit card debt high in a US economy?
Is De Niro's statement true?,Is De Niro's statement the same quote from a movie?,Was De Niro referring to the Village Idiot?,Can De Niro cite this quote from a book?,Did De Niro say his comments about the Village Idiot were accurate?
Is there any evidence that the IRS implementing these new provisions is a new policy?,Is there any evidence that the IRS is charged with implementing these new provisions?,Was this a claim based on evidence available?,Is the report directly referring to the new provisions or to an external reporting source?
Was Prosser prosecutor for a period of time before he participated in a cover-up by a priest?,Is Prosser ineligible for the post of judge?,Is it true that Prosser did not investigate or file charges for a period of time before he participated in a cover-up?
Did 90% of Americans have a raise in 40 years?,Did 91% of Americans have a raise in 40 years?,Did 91% of people have a raise in 40 years?,. Did 95% of Americans have a raise in 40 years?,. Did 90% of Americans have a raise in 40 years?
Did 20 colleges have athletic departments with revenue exceeding expenses?,Did all 20 colleges have athletic departments with revenue exceeding expenses?,Did any college do a survey to find out how many athletic departments had revenue exceeding expenses?,Did any college have any athletic departments with revenue exceeding expenses?,Did 20 college and university sports have a surplus in revenue over expenses?
Did Shinzo Abe mandate vaccination?,Did he send 1.6 million doses back?,Did Shinzo Abe give citizens ivermectin?,Do vaccines require mandatory vaccination?,Have vaccines always been mandated?,Do vaccines require mandated vaccination?,Did Abe give citizens ivermectin in Japan?
Does federal student debt cost $60 billion more to service than it brings in?,Does federal student debt provide more money to state governments than it costs?,Is federal student debt more of a burden to state governments than it brings in?,Are all federal student debt related expenses higher than income?,Is federal student debt more expensive to service than income?
Did it save over a billion dollars on welfare?,Did they have a new system?,Did this have anything to do with his alleged work?,Did this system include other programs that increased public safety?,Is the system known to have saved the world billions?,Is this system widely understood?,Is this system being used in schools?
Did the Children's Health Insurance Program help thousands of kids in New Hampshire?,Does the Children's Health Insurance Program help children in New Hampshire?,Did the children in New Hampshire have the health care they have?,. Has the Children's Health Insurance Program helped millions of kids in New Hampshire?,. Does the Children's Health Insurance Program help any other children?,". Does the Children's Health Insurance Program benefit more than 7,000 kids in New Hampshire?"
"Does coronavirus testing in India cost Rs 4,500?",Is it cheaper to do coronavirus tests in other countries than in India?,Is it an affordable method to perform tests?,Are coronavirus tests in India free?,Is it expensive to perform coronavirus tests in other countries than in India?
Did Trump specifically mention using excessive force in the 2017 National Security Advisor speech?,"Is it true Trump said police officers should ""rough people up more""?",Is Trump aware of the use of excessive force in determining the admissibility of charges?,Is the quote intended to promote using excessive force by police?,Is Trump's quote specifically targeting police use of excessive force?
Does Rick Perry agree to injection of 11 year old girls with HPV vaccine without parental consent?,Does Perry believe the HPV vaccine causes HIV/AIDS in girls between ages 11 and 12?,Does Perry agree that educating children about how to fight this disease is a good idea?,Did Perry think this vaccination initiative was a good idea?
Does Gardner have any known injuries?,Has Gardner ever tried to climb to the top of a crevasse?,Does Gardner have any injuries?,Is Gardner over 80?,Is Gardner wearing a life jacket while trying to climb?,Is Gardner above 100 pounds?,Is Gardner under 100?,Is Nick Gardner currently alive?
Has there been a significant increase in investigators from previous years?,Is the number of investigators expected to increase significantly?,Is this the first time a large increase has taken place at the IRS in over 20 years?,Are these investigators expected to begin work in 2017?,Is there an announcement of the total number of investigators by the end of 2017?
Did 90% of the people work in this country for companies under 100 employees?,Did 90% of the people work for companies under 100 employees?,Is it true that 90% of the people who work in this country work for companies under 100 employees?,Is it true that 90% of the people who work in this country work for companies under 100 employees?
"Did all cameras on the M1 and M25 go live recently, set at 72mph?",Did all cameras on the M1 and M25 change their speed limits at all?,Have all M1 and M25 cameras been set to 72mph since the beginning of the year?,Do all cameras on the M1 and M25 have a single camera that doesn't change speed?
Have the jobs created in Michigan more than in any other state?,Is the jobs created in Michigan more than in any other state?,Did Michigan create more than any other state combined in the area of jobs created?,Is any other state in the area of jobs created more than Michigan?,Did the jobs created in Michigan more than any other state combined in the area of jobs created in that state?
Did Reagan suffer from Alzheimer's disease while in office?,Was Reagan diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease five years after he left office?,Was Reagan diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease five years after he left the presidency?,Was Reagan diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease during his presidency?,Did Reagan actually suffer from Alzheimer's disease in his life?
Is Biden currently signigning on a capital gains tax?,Is Biden the person that signed this tax?,Is there any evidence to suggest Biden signed this tax?,Was this the specific type of tax Biden signed?,Did Biden primarily sign this tax after being elected?,Has Biden signed this tax before?
Did Corbyn wear an IRA t - Shirt in this photo?,Did Corbyn's shirt match the photo?,Can you enlarge the photo for a bigger view?,Is there more than one picture of Corbyn wearing the IRA t - Shirt?
Did Trump claim that there will be a tremendous stimulus package after the election?,Did Trump offer a full stimulus package after the election?,Did Trump provide his own stimulus package after the election?,Did Trump offer a full stimulus package after the election?,Did Trump endorse the stimulus plan for President Trump during a campaign?
Did more people die after getting the vaccine?,Has the vaccine caused more deaths than all the other vaccines?,Have all vaccines caused more deaths?,Does it have more mortality from COVID-19 than all other vaccines combined?,Has there been an increase in COVID-19 mortality rates?,Has the vaccine caused more death rates than any other vaccine?
"Has Rick Perry requested 1,200 earmarks as Texas governor?","Did Texas Governor Perry request 1,200 earmarks as Texas governor?",Does Rick Perry currently receive more earmarks than Governor of Texas?,"Is Rick Perry a governor who requests 1,200 earmarks per year?","Does Rick Perry request 1,200 earmarks as Texas Governor?"
Was the State of the Union address edited for use in the show?,Was this violation punishable by up to three years in prison?,Did Pelosi ever slam President Trump’s State of the Union address?,Did Pelosi intentionally tamper with the State of the Union address?,Does Trump know that he violated the article?
Did more than 1500 athletes die of cardiac arrest since COVID vaccinations began?,Did a previous average of 29 athletes die of cardiac arrest per year?,Did the COVID vaccine not help these athletes?,Did the COVID vaccine prevent the deaths of these athletes?,Is there a consensus between the two studies regarding COVID vaccines?
Is the picture of babies born at the IVF centre in India?,Was it a baby at the IVF centre in India?,Were there 10 babies born to the South African woman?,Were there any photos relating to the baby at the IVF centre in India?,Were the babies born in IVF?
Did Biden have a very low percentage of encounters with aliens at the border?,Have most encounters at the border been successful?,Will most of these encounters remain indefinitely after release?,Does Biden plan to release aliens before 2020?,Was Biden the only person to cite a count of encounters at the border?
Is the 2019 image of Nigeria's Buhari praying at Saudi Arabia's Grand Mosque linked to a 2023 trip to Saudi Arabia?,Has any other photos been released related to the 2023 trip to Saudi Arabia. Is the photo from the 2019 image of Buhari praying at Saudi Arabia's Grand Mosque in questionable circumstances?
Did Yadav win Bigg Boss Ott 2?,Did Yadav win Bigg Boss 2?,Did Yadav win big on ott 2?,Did Yadav's supporters travel?,Is Yadav in any other videos?,Did Yadav win Bigg Boss Ott 2?
Is the call started by +91140?,Is the call in the US?,Is this call made in the US?,Does the call contain information regarding the scam?,Did the caller offer to pay an additional fee for the call?,Is this call free?,Did the caller receive a tip?
Did any user compare this logo to Adolf Hitler's mustache?,Did people not like this logo?,Did this logo cause some controversy?,Is this logo still in use today?,Did this logo receive an update because of the comparisons?,Was this logo redesigned to avoid such controversy?
Did the COVID-19 pandemic affect Hurricane administrations?,Did the COVID-19 pandemic affect hurricane management efforts?,Was this incident part of the overall epidemic?,Did this situation cause significant disruption of hurricane operations in the U.S.?,Did this situation also affect other countries?,Is this incident related to the COVID-19 pandemic?
Did the tweet by Anjum imply that Anjum would leave journalism if the Adityanath government comes back to power in 2022?,Was this tweet from Anjum?,Did Anjum imply that Adityanath government would be in power again after 2022?,Is Adityanath a Republican?
Did 3.9 million jobs add since Trump was elected?,Did the economy continue its longest monthly streak of job growth in history?,Did the United States added 3 million jobs per month since Trump took office?,Did the United States added over 3 million jobs from Trump to 2018?,Are there any other factors that contributed to the American economy continuing its longest monthly streak of job growth in history?
Did President Trump and Queen Elizabeth make contact during the meeting in July of 2018?,Did the brooch given to Queen Elizabeth by former President Obama have a bearing on their interaction?,Did the brooch bear a bearing on the interaction with the president?,Did the brooch bear a bearing on the president's personality and relationship to the queen?
"Will ""The Hunt"" feature liberal or left-wing characters hunting supporters of President Trump for sport?",Will liberal or left-wing characters hunt supporters of President Trump for sport?,"Will ""The Hunt"" feature liberal or left-wing characters hunting supporters of President Trump for sport?","Will ""The Hunt"" feature liberal or left-wing characters hunting supporters of President Trump for sport?"
Is one in eight children in Oregon suffering from mental illness?,Are 18 adults in Oregon suffering from mental illness?,Is one in eight children in Oregon suffering from mental illness?,Is one in 18 adults in Oregon suffering from mental illness?,Is the number of children with mental illness in Oregon higher than the overall percentage?
Did Christie cut $1 billion in spending?,Did Christie provide 850 million in education funding?,Has Christie cut spending in his own states before?,Have any administrations in the state previously acted this way?,Did Chris Christie receive these appropriations prior to his own state's current gov't's term?
"Did these changes happen very quickly for the world, or were they slow?",Did global warming cause these trends?,Did this map have accurate information?,Did this map imply climate change?,Did this map contain any data or evidence that there have been global warming?,Did this map contain any data or evidence to back this up?
Are the Naval Forces reduced to the levels in 1917?,Is the Navy less powerful than in 1941?,Was Obama involved in the cutting of the Navy's naval fleet?,Is Obama's response to the cuts in the Navy consistent with those of other Presidents?,Are Obama's actions attributed to a specific president?
"Did the U.S. import 800,000 barrels of oil from Russia when this pipeline was not in place?",Could this increase have been prevented if the Keystone XL pipeline was not in place?,Would importing Russia’s oil be prevented if the Keystone XL pipeline were not in place?
Is this earthquake an earthquake that struck on the Richter scale?,Did this earthquake affect Mexico?,Is the earthquake a new one or has this earthquake affected much of Mexico before?,Is this earthquake more deadly than last year's earthquake?,Were other states affected?,Were there more earthquakes this year compared to the previous year?
Was Lebron James referring to people of color in an interview?,Did Lebron James discuss whites in the interview?,Did James make the statement in direct response to a specific person?,Has James commented on whites and white people in any other ways?,Did Lebron James say he wants nothing to do with white people?
Did the video show movers as Trump discussed election results?,Did the video show Trump's interview with Democrats?,Did Trump speak directly about election results during the video?,Did Trump give a comment to reporters after the video?,Did Trump address the people at the White House during the video?,Did the person who filmed the video also host an interview during the video?
Is the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau collecting financial information without the individuals' knowledge?,Will the consumer's information be stored for up to 10 years?,Are the individuals' financial information not being used to market products?,Are these individuals' financial information held in a secure database for privacy?,"Would information being collected be considered ""financial"" and stored in such a secure database?",Is the consumer's personal information being collected without the individuals' knowledge?
What is the current number of people living in extreme poverty?,Is there some overlap between current poverty and extreme poverty?,Do we have estimates for the actual number of people living in extreme poverty?,Have data been collected to estimate the actual number of people living in extreme poverty?,Is this data used in policy decision making by the government?,Are there other estimates available?
Did the helicopter of the Myanmar military shoot down by ethnic armed groups in March 2021?,Did the helicopter of the Myanmar military receive any damages from the shootings by ethnic armed groups?,Was the incident in Myanmar the first time that a helicopter was shot down by the ethnic armed groups?,Are there any other photographs of the helicopter that are related to the shootings of the Myanmar military helicopters?
Did Oxfordshire vote to test climate lockdown in 2024?,Did Oxfordshire vote to test climate lockdown in 2024?,Do climate lockdowns usually occur during times of high temperature and high humidity?,Would Oxfordshire have to use climate lockdowns in other parts of the country?,Do any other countries have climate lockdowns in general?,Does any other state have climate lockdowns in general?
"Does Jio, Airtel, and Vi provide free recharge?",Is there an age limit for three month free recharge?,"Is Jio, Airtel, and Vi providing free recharge?",Would all these providers offer free recharge if the age of users is less than 18 years old?,Would free recharge for these three providers not be available in other network provider's network?
Did Obama send Miller over to Iran to establish a back channel?,Did Miller send Miller over to Iran to establish a back channel?,Did Miller send Iran to establish a back channel?,Is Miller connected to Iran or Obama?,Can Miller be seen in this film?,Did Miller meet and talk with Iran during this film?,Did Miller make contact with Iran prior to making these comments?,Is Miller associated with Iran in any way?
Did the stimulus fund $30 million to protect mice in San Francisco?,Did the stimulus fund allocate some of the money to other uses?,Has the mouse population of San Francisco increased significantly as a result of the stimulus fund?,Does the mouse population increase significantly in cities such as San Francisco?,Does the mouse population increase significantly in cities other than San Francisco?
Is it true that Fritz Kaegi managed a fund that invested nearly $30 million in private prisons?,Did Fritz Kaegi invest private prison funds from his fund?,Are any of these private prison investments in a state based jurisdiction?,Do these private prison investments violate any federal or state laws?,Did this fund invest private prison funds from its fund?
Is Trump confident that he'll win 100 percent of the black vote in 2020?,Can Trump pledge to win 100 percent of the black vote in 2020?,Is Trump's promise to win 100 percent of the black vote in 2020?,Is Trump willing to spend time polling to determine whether Trump will win 100 percent of the black vote in 2020?
Did Putin demand that Muslim immigrants speak Russian?,Did Putin have some issues with Muslim immigrants speaking Russian?,Did Putin demand any specific changes to Muslim immigrants' beliefs in terms of language or culture?,Did Putin claim Muslim immigrants' adherence to Russian culture was required?,Did the speech directly call for Muslim immigrants to behave Russian?
Does the policy specifically state that police will conduct a 30-day mask checking initiative?,Does the policy specifically state that police will conduct a 30-day mask checking initiative?,Does the policy specifically mention that UP police will conduct 30 days of mask checking?,Does the policy explicitly state that UP police will conduct a 30-day mask checking initiative?
Did six people alter the Hollywood sign?,Are there any known incidents of altering Hollywood signs?,Was this event of this magnitude in the United States?,"Did this incident occur on Feb 1, 2021?",Did this alteration occur outside of the United States?,Did any person leave the sign while changing it?,Were any individuals arrested?
Did smallpox vaccines trigger a reemergence of dormant HIV?,Did smallpox vaccines cause a reemergence of dormant HIV in recipients?,Did vaccines trigger the AIDS epidemic?,Did smallpox vaccines cause the AIDS epidemic in any way?
Do gun purchases contribute to 3 percent of crime?,Did this crime result in 3 percent of murders and crimes?,Has any type of criminal been arrested or prosecuted for purchasing a gun?,Have these people been prosecuted or prosecuted for selling guns?,"Have the police, or other law enforcement agencies, been held accountable for these crimes?"
Did the driver bounce the car off the roof of the two vehicles?,Did the driver bounce the car off the roof of any other vehicles?,Did the driver evade police by bouncing the car off the roof of two vehicles?,Was the video shot with a digital camera?,Was there any audio of the driver during the evasion?,Was the video recorded on a digital camera?
Are there reports of people legally coming to the US on a tourist visa or student visa disappearing from the population?,Has there been an analysis of this type of illegal immigration?,"Are these types of illegal immigrants the ""number one source"" of illegal immigration?",Does this type of illegal immigration create an increase in illegal immigration from Latin American countries?
Is it true that 30.000 people have been killed with seat belts?,Is there an average age for seat belt deaths?,Is it true that there have been 30.000 seat belt deaths?,Is this statistic accurate?,Is this the official number?,Are there any statistics regarding the percentage of seat belt deaths?,Is this figure accurate?
Is the Ohio Motion Picture Tax Credit used primarily to create jobs in Ohio?,Does the Ohio Motion Picture Tax Credit provide incentives for film production?,Does the Ohio Motion Picture Tax Credit provide incentives for film production?,Does the Ohio Motion Picture Tax Credit have an impact on job growth in Ohio?,Does the Ohio Motion Picture Tax Credit generate job growth in the region?
Would 70% of Georgia Republican primary voters vote for Trump in 2024?,Would 70% of all voters support Trump in 2024?,Did 70% of all voters in Georgia vote for Trump in 2020?,Did 70% of Georgia Republican primary voters vote for Trump in 2016?,Did 70% of Georgia Republican primary voters vote for Trump in 2017?,Would 70% of all voters in Georgia vote for Trump in 2018?
Has there been a growth in the number of countries that practice birthright citizenship?,Do fewer countries have a 5% birthright citizenship rate?,Has birthright citizenship been universally accepted?,Have birthright citizenship programs decreased in the number of countries?,Do there appear to be more countries that have this policy?
Is there a national sales tax currently being proposed for everything you buy?,Is there a national sales tax currently being considered for everything you buy?,Is there any evidence that John Boozman is considering putting a national sales tax on everything you buy?,Is John Boozman planning to put a national sales tax on everything you buy?
Did someone capture a video that shows a UFO in Irvine in May 2021?,Has this footage been released elsewhere?,Did this video contain any recordings of this sighting?,Do this videos of UFO sightings typically include images of the UFO?,Are UFO sightings in California typically rare?
Did the Obama administration review any regulation in the pipeline?,Did the Obama administration review any contract exceeding $1 million?,Did Obama order the review for all regulations or just a selected few?,Did the Obama administration recommend the review?,Did Obama order a review of any specific regulations?,Did Obama conduct a review for all regulations in the pipeline?,Did Obama oversee a review for any specific contracts?
"Did a study from January 2022, at least two other studies, show cannabidiol and related chemical compounds found in hemp may hold promise in the prevention and/or treatment of COVID-19?","Did a study from January 2022, at least two other studies, show that cannabidiol and related chemical compounds found in hemp may hold promise in the prevention and/or treatment of COVID-19?",Did one of the studies show that cannabidiol and related chemical compounds found in hemp may hold promise in the prevention and/or treatment of COVID?
Did Nevada electors vote for Trump in 2020?,Did Nevada electors vote for Trump in 2020?,Did Nevada electors vote for Trump in 2020?,Did Nevada electors vote for Trump in 2020?,Did Nevada electors vote for Trump in 2020?,Was Nevada electors voting for Trump in 2020?
Are the tax payments in this tax proposal higher than those in the current bill?,Is the increase in this tax proposal higher than that in the current bill?,Are there additional income payments in this proposal?,Is this increase based on income for the family of four?,Is this increase in this tax proposal higher than the cost of raising taxes?
Did the UK announcing its first Covid-19 death take 51 days?,Did the UK announcing its 2031st Covid-19 death take 51 days?,Did the UK announce 2031st Covid-19 death on any date prior to 1839?,Did the UK announce any Covid19 death on any date prior to 1839?
Did Trump pay Southwest Key $458 million to run immigrant child detention centers?,Did the CEO of Southwest Key earn a salary of $1.5 million?,Did the CEO of Southwest Key receive funds from Trump?,Did Southwest Key receive funding from Trump?,Is the Trump administration paying Southwest Key to run immigration detention centers?
Are there more jobs created from eliminating regulations than during Obama’s term?,Have job-killing regulations been eliminated as a result of Obama’s actions?,Have any job killing regulations not been eliminated by Obama?,"Have the average Americans spent more on a $3,000 monthly budget than during Obama’s term?"
Was Feingold the US Senator who voted against military authorization?,Did Feingold vote against military authorization 11 times in his senate tenure?,Does Feingold support military use by all governments?,Does Feingold support military use by all countries?,Is the statement about Feingold's military usage correct?
Can California's Senate Bill 107 be taken from the custody of a child that does not affirm gender-reassignment surgery?,Does California's Senate Bill 107 allow the reintroduction of children born after birth without gender-reassignment surgery?,Can a child born after birth in California now be removed from the custody of a parent who does not affirm gender-reassignment surgery?
Did Hackman say that Trump could be one of the best presidents America ever seen?,Did Hackman say that Trump could easily turn out to be one of the best presidents America has ever seen?,Did Hackman say that Trump could easily turn out to be one of the best presidents America ever saw?
Are leisure and hospitality jobs the highest in growth?,Are many restaurant and bar jobs low-paying?,Is there a lower proportion of workforce in these industries receiving minimum and sub-minimum wage jobs?,Is leisure and hospitality one of the highest growth industries?,Is this industry one of the shortest for any type of occupation?
Is there evidence of migrants blocking a US road in 2023?,Is it a good idea to block a US road in 2023?,Is there evidence that migrants blocking a US road in 2023 are a threat?,Is there evidence to suggest that migrants blocked a US road in 2023?
Did the people found eaten alive are all homeless people?,Did this community have a large amount of these rascals in the area?,Did many people eat their way through the area?,Did anyone leave any footprints?,Do the homeless people live in NYC?,Is this a new type of infestation?
"Was this event advertised, publicized and/or announced?",Will this free coupon be good to all families who have been loyal customers for years?,Will the coupon be valid at all locations?,Was this event announced in any way prior to this date?,Will the coupon be valid at all locations that are located at the same time as this event?,Will each family receive one free coupon?
Did 95% of the time police officers were not charged for killing the youth of color?,Did the young people of color die from fatal gunshot wounds?,Did the young people of color die from fatal gunshot wounds as often as 95% of the time?,Is the rate of police killing young people of color higher than 99%?
Was debris found at the Australian beach?,Did debris from the Chandrayaan-3 launch stage appear on an Australian beach?,Was debris found in a beach from the Chandrayaan-3 launch stage?,Was debris located on an Australian beach?,Was debris associated with the Chandrayaan-3 launch stage?
Did Barack Obama say he would halve the annual deficit in the 4 years following his first term?,Is it true that the deficit is the biggest contributor to the country's debt?,Did Obama say that the deficit was to be halved by the end of his first term?,Was Obama's pledge a pledge that happened throughout his first term?
Did the video clips of this event share widely?,Was this particular confrontation with Russia reported in the video clips?,Was this incident shared in any other locations?,Are other clips that included this action widely shared?,Are these other videos?,Did this incident take place in 2022?,Was this incident reported in any other media outlets?
Does the Texas state have a significant dependence on wind energy?,Has the state subsidized the wind industry?,Has Texas increased the use of wind energy in energy distribution systems?,Are there any other state/national examples of the importance of wind energy in energy distribution systems?,Has any other state been able to triple their use of wind energy in energy distribution systems?
"Is the retailer offering the chance to ""win"" a Samsung microwave for £1.78?",Does the retailer currently have an offer for the microwave?,Has the retailer offered a promotion previously?,Are the microwaves for sale in the store?,Does any media mention a potential deal?,Is the amount that the winner of the microwave will receive for the microwave less than the advertised price?
Did Taliban have access to the video?,Did Taliban know the video existed?,Did Taliban force Afghan to dance?,Did Taliban have access to the video during Kabul takeover?,Are there video's illustrating this takeover?,Did Taliban force Afghans to dance?,Does video in this video exist?,Did Taliban force Afghans to dance?,Did Taliban have access to the video?
Is Andrew Tate in custody and being swatted outside of his home?,Has Tate been charged with a crime?,Was Tate arrested for a crime?,Has Tate been charged with anything?,Was Tate swatted outside of his home?,Has Tate been arrested for any crime?
Was it true that Hagan voted to kill the equivalent of 2.5 million jobs by voting for Obamacare?,Is Hagan's vote to support Obamacare a violation of the American Declaration of Independence?,"Ultimately, Is Hagan's vote to support Obamacare a violation of the American Declaration of Independence?"
"Is it true 60,000 factories have closed in the US over the last 30 years?","Is this true for all 60,000 factories that have closed in the US?",Does this statement reflect the overall number of factories closed in the US?,Is this a true estimate of the loss of this number of factories?
Does Brown veto a bill contributing to the prevalence and risk of wildfires?,Did Brown veto the bill that contributed to the prevalence and risk of wildfires?,Did Brown directly contribute to the prevalence and risk of wildfires?,Did Brown directly contribute to the prevalence and risk of wildfires?
Did Americans actually favor the Federally Imposed Mask Mandates for Travel?,Are there any other statistics you can look at on mask mandates for travel?,Does the majority of Americans agree with the federally imposed mask mandates for travel?,Do many Americans support the federally imposed mask mandates for travel?
Does frequent masturbation decrease the risk of prostate cancer?,Does the risk reduction of massuarbating reduce the risk of prostate cancer?,Does massuarbating reduce the risk of prostate cancer?,Does a higher dose of spermicide reduce the risk of prostate cancer?,Is it believed that taking spermicide reduces the risk of prostate cancer?
Did anyone get their first check?,Did Social Security take seven years to begin?,Was Social Security started in 1945?,Did Social Security actually take seven years to start?,Was Social Security only in existence from 1942 to 1945?,Did Social Security start in 1945 before or after any major war?,Did Social Security get its start in 1945?
Was the second dose of coronavirus injected into a nursing home in Cádiz following the first dose?,Did the second dose in this nursing home kill more than 46 people?,Did the second dose of coronavirus injected in this nursing home lead to the deaths of 46 people?
"Are there any stores that have an ""expensive theft penalty""?",Is it illegal to steal $950 worth of items from stores?,Is the penalty for carrying $950 worth of items from stores as long as it does not cost more than $50?,Is it illegal to bring $950 worth of items from stores into the State of California?
Was the railing broken?,Did the student fall off the floor?,Was there one person who was hurt?,Was there any other information relevant to this case?,Did any other students die?,Did any staff member die in the fall?,Was this a school-wide incident?,Will this school seek to hold a public inquiry to look into this case?
What is the fuel tax on $67 worth of fuel in Canada?,Does the government collect the fuel tax?,Do you pay income tax on a gas purchase after paying income tax?,Will the fuel tax be taxed along with income tax?,Did the fuel tax in Canada change between 2013 and 2014?,Did the Government raise tax from a gas purchase after paying income tax?
Did six of Paul Gosar's siblings appear in a political commercial endorsing David Brill?,Did all six of Gosar's siblings appear in the same political commercial?,Did all six of Gosar's siblings appear in the same political commercial?,Did all six of Gosar's siblings agree with David Brill's position in this advertisement?
Did Florida take the stimulus?,Would Florida have had a higher rate of teachers fired as a result of the stimulus?,If Florida did not take the stimulus did it cost the state more money than it did?,Did Florida's stimulus cost the state more money than it would have had?,Did Florida's stimulus cost taxpayers more money than it would have?,Was Florida considered to be a worse state for its teachers' unions than it is today?
"Has there been a ""mysterious ghost hand"" in a photograph from 1900?",Is the hand visible in the photograph from the 1930s?,Has the hand been seen since then?,Did the hand originate from this photograph?,Did the picture feature a ghost hand?,Was the hand in this photograph taken in the 19th century?
Was McCain appointed to be the Navy's liaison to the US Senate in 1976?,Is John McCain known to have begun his career in Washington as a lobbyist?,Is the senator famous for his role as a lobbyist?,Is McCain known for his role as a lobbyist?,Is McCain well known for his role as a lobbyist?
Does 3 tablespoons of coconut oil morning and night cause cancer to disappear?,Did the people who tried the coconut oil get cured?,Is the coconut oil effective?,Has anyone else tried coconut oil to help fight cancer?,Is coconut oil known to help with the development of tumors?,Does the coconut oil contain fatty acids that help reduce cancer growth?,Is there evidence to suggest that coconut oil might help decrease the risk of developing cancer?
Have 2.5 million passengers been travelling on Madaraka Express since its inception?,Have passengers been able to board this bus with an average of less than 15 minutes?,Has Madaraka Express been the bust of any company?,Do passenger numbers remain high or steady?,Does this bust relate to how large passengers are likely to use this system?
Is Elizabeth Warren likely to live in a $5.4 million mansion?,Is Warren known for living in a mansion?,Has Warren paid for a mansion?,Did Warren pay for a mansion in this campaign?,Are there other types of mansions in the area?,Was there anyone named after Elizabeth Warren in this campaign?
Are gas prices higher since Obama became president?,Has Trump made this claim about gas prices?,Has Obama made this claim about this past year?,Can the price increase of gas between Obama and Carter be compared to these price increases since Carter?,Can this resulting increase be compared to the increase between Obama and Carter?
Was the projected $1.8 billion state budget shortfall on an assumption based on zero growth?,Was this the hypothetical scenario used to project the state budget shortfall for 2015-'17?,Did this scenario also come in line with Trump's statements in this article?,Is there evidence that Trump used this scenario to project the state budget shortfall for 2015-'17?
Did San Francisco spend $750 million cleaning up human waste and drug paraphernalia this fiscal year?,Do there appear to be more drug users on the needle program than high school graduates?,Did San Francisco spend money on regulating the needle program?,Have drug users been on the needle program for a longer period of time than high school graduates?
Did Trump lobby against mandatory sprinklers for apartment buildings in New York?,Did Trump lobby against mandatory sprinklers for apartment buildings in NYC?,Did Trump lobby against mandatory sprinklers for apartment buildings in NYC?,Was Trump a Republican?,Did Trump lobbied against mandatory sprinklers for apartment buildings in NYC?
Was there an incident where a man sneaked onto one of the Titanic's lifeboats?,Was there any other casualties in the Titanic?,Did the Titanic sink?,Did any of the passengers in the Titanic die from a disease?,Did it become known that there was a man who wore a women's dress on the Titanic?
Is it reasonable to expect this vaccine to be ready in a year?,Does the vaccine require a large amount of time to develop?,Does this vaccine require years to develop?,Is this vaccine more likely to take multiple years to develop?,Is this vaccine required after eight to 10 months?,Is this vaccine more likely to take longer to develop than the other vaccines?
Is there an estimated figure for Medicaid fraud in Virginia?,"Was the number ""0.47 percent"" accurate?","Is the percentage of Medicaid fraud in Virginia ""fixed""?",Did a specific percentage not have to be verified?,Is the occurrence of Medicaid fraud in Virginia lower than the national average?,Is the percentage of Medicaid fraud in Virginia fixed?
How many times have police in Finland had a fatality compared to Norway?,What has the level of training in Iceland compared to Norway?,Has the number of police deaths remained the same in any of the countries mentioned?,Are there any other countries where cops have been killed?,Is training required in all countries mentioned?,Have any of these countries experienced the exact same death rate since 2001?
Are the photos from Syria in 2016?,Are the photos from Gaza in 2021?,", are these photos taken from Syria in 2016?",Are these photos from Syria in 2016?,Is the photo of a boy embracing covered in dust from Syria in 2016?,. Is this photo from a school in Gaza in 2021?
Is the total number of children involved in this rescue listed?,Is this rescue part of a broader effort to help those in the Bay Area?,Was the total number of children rescued?,Did this rescue help a large group in the Bay Area?,Is it clear that the rescue took place on the Barge located off of the San Francisco Bay?
Did he eat 10 lbs of dog food?,Does he own the dog food shop?,Did he buy the dog food in bulk?,Did the man have any friends in the shop?,Was there any damage to the shop?,Was the dog food shop damaged?,Was the dog food shop in need of repair?
Did Trump cite this statement when he called for Republicans to boycott the 2022 election?,Was Trump calling for Republicans to boycott the 2024 election?,Was Trump calling for GOP voters not to vote in the 2022 election?,Is Trump's advice to Republicans not to vote in 2022 or 2024 election a direct threat of Trump's presidency?
Can you listen to the Ghislaine Maxwell sex trafficking trial by dialing 844-721-7237 and entering access code 9991787?,Would you have to pay for the use of the 9991787 access code?,Would you pay for the use of the 9991787 access code?
Did patients with breast cancer have a change in color of their lymph nodes?,Did all tests show a change in blood color?,Were all 'brustkrebs' signs evaluated?,Are there symptoms of cancer in breast patients?,Do women with breast cancer have specific lymph node appearance patterns?
Did the Bush tax cuts create 8 million jobs?,Did the Bush tax cuts actually create 5 million jobs?,How many of the jobs in this recession were lost in the first 10 years of the Bush tax cuts?,Has the recession caused the loss of 8 million jobs in this economy?,Does the Bush tax cuts have a negative effect on other industries?
What is the weapon that Roosevelt would use to combat terrorism?,Did Roosevelt have any guns?,Was Theodore Roosevelt's gun purchase made through Winchester?,Is the weapon that Roosevelt was using to combat terrorism produced by Winchester?,Is Theodore Roosevelt's gun purchased through Winchester?
Have all women had this vaccine?,Is the vaccine effective before this period?,"If the vaccine is not effective when this period is present, is it safe to take it?",Did a CDC study of this vaccine provide any information about this vaccine?,Is the vaccine effective in this period of time?,Do the Covid-19 vaccine and Covid vaccine infect each other?
Did the 2013 Legislature decrease the number of tests in grades 3-8 from 17 to 8?,Has the 2013 Legislature implemented a waiver policy?,Were the 2017-2018 grades 3-8 tests still over-tasted?,Did the 2017-2018 grades 3-8 tests still contain overtesting?,Was the 2016-2018 grades 3-8 grades still overtached?
"Is it true that about one quarter of people are able to correctly recognize the most commonly used English version of the lowercase print "" G..""?","Is it true that only about one quarter of people are able to correctly recognize the most commonly used English version of the lowercase print "" G..""?"
Is NAFTA a cause for concern for US jobs?,Did NAFTA lead to job losses?,Was NAFTA a cause for concern for US jobs?,Did NAFTA lead to job losses under Trump?,Is there evidence that Obama signed a document causing a job loss?
Does this list only reflect veterans age 20 to 24 who cannot find jobs?,Did veterans age 20 to 24 that don’t have jobs report a higher unemployment rate?,Are veterans who are in need of a job better off when they are in civilian life than when they were in combat?,Is there a clear correlation between jobless veterans and the number of veterans who don’t find a job?
Has this image been shared thousands of times on social media?,Has this image been shared on social media during a lockdown?,Has this image been widely shared on social media?,Is this image currently under the control of the U.S.?,Has this image been shared by the U.S. on social media during a lockdown?
Is there any evidence that a postponement of the presidential election would be considered?,Is there any evidence the electoral commission may not postpone the election?,Have any Nigerian political sources claimed that postponing elections is a serious threat to their election?,Is there any evidence that postponing elections will make the election more difficult to win?
Has recidivism in this jail been on a decline?,Are states like Missouri comparable to Wisconsin in regards to recidivism rates?,Are Lincoln Hills juvenile prisons similar to Missouri's?,Is the recidivism rate similar in Wisconsin to Missouri?,Is recidivism a problem in Lincoln Hills?
Is the dose of an inflammatory molecule 10 to 100 times higher after vaccine-acquired myocarditis?,Is there evidence of an increased risk of tPO in the vaccine-acquired myocarditis compared to non-tPO?,Does this increase not translate into a greater risk of tPO recurrence?
Is it true that people making the minimum wage working full time can’t afford a 1-bedroom apartment in 99 percent of counties in America?,Is there proof that this is the case?,Is it true that people making the minimum wage working full time can’t afford a 1-bedroom apartment in 99 percent of counties in America?
Will WhatsApp become chargeable and deactivated at 6PM?,Does your WhatsApp account become chargeable after this?,Is your WhatsApp account getting charged for unused calls?,Is my WhatsApp account getting deactivated?,Will I be charged for calls after this?,Can I get my Whatsapp phone back from this company?
Did BBQ Becky call 911 on the police officer who pulled her over?,Did the police officer pull Becky over on race based charges?,Did Becky leave the area and not inform the police of the arrest?,Was Becky in the area when the police arrest was reported?,Did police arrest Becky on the basis of race?
Did Trump tell Fox that Democrats could subpoena him for 10-15 years?,Does Trump support his own conduct?,Does Trump support the Democrats' subpoenas?,Did Trump say the Democratic could subpoena him for the next 15-20 years?,Did Trump say that he will do what he please?
Did Johnson benefit his family's business by pushing through a tax loophole?,Did Johnson cash out of his family's business for more than $5 million?,Has Johnson doubled his wealth since taking office?,Did Johnson receive his monies from this loophole?,Has Johnson increased his wealth since taking office?
"Is someone with an income of £24,000 paying income tax of £180?",Did Sunak say this person was in the wrong?,Did Sunak say this person is in the wrong on income tax of £180?,Did Sunak say this person is in the wrong on income tax of £180?,Did Sunak say this person was in the wrong on income tax of £180?
"Would the average middle class family pay $2,000 a year in taxes to pay for the $5 trillion in tax cuts?","Does Romney plan to raise taxes on the average middle class family by $2,000 to pay for $5 trillion in tax cuts for millionaires and billionaires?","Has the tax policy center found that Romney plans to raise taxes on the average middle class family by $2,000 to pay for $5 trillion in tax cuts for millionaires and billionaires?"
Did 78 presidential nominees file filibuster in the United States?,Did all 86 presidential nominees file filibuster before Obama?,Did all 86 presidential nominees file filibuster in the United States after Obama?,Did all 86 presidential nominees file filibuster after Obama?
Did Trump rioters pepper spray police in a riot at the U.S. Capitol in 2019?,"Did pro-Trump rioters riot in a U.S. Capitol on January 6, 2021?",Was Trump rioters rioting in a U.S. Capitol during 2019?
Has the supply of oil reduced from the allocation given to us by Opec?,Has the oil production decreased from the allocation given to us by Opec?,Has the oil production decreased from the allocation given to us by Opec?,Does oil production currently have a higher production than Opec gave it?
Did the state move up 9 places... in a year?,Is it true that Missouri is a great place to do business?,Is Missouri currently the best place to do business in the nation?,Are there other reasons this would be a concern for people?,Was there any reason the economy in Missouri has been the best for business?
Did Texas prove in court that more than 200 dead people voted in the latest Texas election?,Did Texas prove in court that more than 200 dead people voted in the latest Texas election?,Was the estimated vote count of all deaths in the latest Texas election accurate?,Were the dead and absent vote count from that election accurate?
Was it ban on Bible in California?,Did this ban create another threat to the state?,Was this ban based on a personal opinion of the author?,Are this bans effects based on a political ideology?,Is this a legality?,Is the ban on Bibles based on a religious opinion?
Did Feingold vote over 250 times for raising taxes?,Did Feingold vote for raising taxes?,Does Feingold have the votes required for a VP seat in the U.S. Senate?,Does Feingold support raising taxes?,Did Feingold support raising taxes in the past?,Does Feingold support raising taxes?
Was the National Guard called to Kenosha ahead of the Rittenhouse verdict?,Did the National Guard call people to Kenosha for the Rittenhouse verdict?,Was the occurrence of the Rittenhouse verdict in the state of Wisconsin completely unnecessary?,Was there a trial in the state of Wisconsin due to the Rittenhouse verdict?
Are Russian soldiers expected to land in Ukraine in 2022?,Can Russian soldiers also be expected to arrive in Russia in 2022?,Are Russian troops likely to be welcomed in Ukraine in 2022?,Has Russian troops arrived in Russia in 2022?,Has Russian troops arrived in Ukraine in 2022?,Do Russia plans to attack Ukraine in 2022?
Did the COVID-19 vaccines that cause monkeypox produce the Pandemic?,Did the COVID-19 vaccines involved in the pandemic have all of the required ingredients?,Did the COVID-19 vaccines that caused monkeypox have all of the ingredients required to cause the pandemic?
Did he say Democrats were not entitled to bring expert witnesses to the House Ways & Means committee?,Was he talking about the ability of a Democrat to bring expert witnesses to the House Ways & Means Committee?,Was he talking about whether the House way & means committee was entitled to bring expert witnesses to the committee?
Did this article claim that the US military found evidence of election fraud in the 2022 midterms?,Was this article distributed widely?,Was this article based upon real facts?,Are these reports often debunked?,Was this article written by a US military official?,Are these reports from the oft-debunked website circulating?
Does Kavanaugh support a president decline to enforce a statute when the president deems it unconstitutional?,Has Kavanaugh's opinion been approved by any other Supreme Court's jurisdiction?,Is Kavanaugh's opinion contrary to 200 years of precedent?,Is Kavanaugh's decision against enforcing a statute contrary to federal law?
Did this image exist when this poster was created?,Did this poster show people wearing masks?,Did this poster appear in any other magazines?,Have these posters been deleted from the internet?,Are these posters still being produced?,Does this image have the same image?,Is the current image from this poster based on the 1920 version of this poster?
Did Israel target and accuse Malaysia of training a Hamas fighter?,Was it Israel who is now accusing Malaysia of training a Hamas fighter?,Is this a truthful and accurate description of Israel's role in the training of Hamas fighters?,Are all of the allegations in relation to the training of Hamas fighters made in this narrative?
Has the vaccine been tested for efficacy against e-coli?,Is the vaccine effective on e-coli?,Do the efficacy tests cover all cases?,Can the vaccine be tested for adverse effects in humans?,Was the vaccine unable to be tested if the e-coli serotype was infected or was not available?
"Did the store attack, forced to put an apology?",Did the staff apologize for their actions?,Did the staff apologize to the customers?,Did the employees of the store receive any punishment?,Did the store have any other threats against customers?,Will the employees of the store have to apologize for a future attack?,Would the employees have to apologize for the attack?
Did most people have two jobs?,Were these people able to afford the work hours required?,Does this economics question take into account other factors other than income or hours?,Did there seem to be a low level of unemployment due to the lowered number of jobs?,Are many people working 80 hours a week?
Is it true that Republicans made long lines and polls open for one day only?,Has the Republican party made attempts to reduce lines or other issues with the polls in Wisconsin?,Was it possible to have these things without long lines?,Does the Republican party make attempts to reduce long lines in Wisconsin?,Is the Republican party planning to push for long lines in Wisconsin?
Did the Immigration and Nationality Act ban Muslims from immigrating to the U.S. in 1952?,Did the Immigration and Nationality Act prohibit Muslims from immigrating to the U.S. in 1952?,Are there other laws that ban Muslims from immigrating to the U.S.?
Has terrorism in the U.S. decreased since Obama's term as president?,Are the number of jihadist attacks in the U.S. declining?,Has terrorism increased under Obama since he was in office?,Did Obama's campaign make a commitment that terrorist attacks would not occur during his presidency?,Has Obama's campaign made a pledge to eradicate terrorist attacks?
Are Florida's voter registration requirements enforced by the federal government?,Would it be impossible to meet the 48 hour deadline if someone had to work through the end of the week?,Would a work-through the end of the week workaround for voter registration requirements help to meet the deadline?,Is it possible to avoid voter registration requirements by working through the end of the week?
Did Mojo report on the video?,Did Mojo make up the story?,Did the police video prove the allegations?,Did Mojo report the incident accurately?,Did Mojo lie about the police in the story?,Was this story truthful?,Was Mojo a news outlet?,Did Mojo report the incident correctly?
Did Pfizer agree to pay $2.3 billion in a health care fraud settlement?,Did Pfizer pay $2.3 billion in a health care fraud settlement for COVID-19 vaccines?,Did Pfizer pay a large portion of the settlement?,Did Pfizer pay the settlement to cover the costs related to COVID-19 vaccines?
Did the World Cup in Qatar include children reciting the Quran?,Is this the same video that was shown when the Quran was recited by the Qatari children?,Was Qatar also hosting the 2022 FIFA World Cup?,Is the 2022 FIFA World Cup open to the public?,Is this a major religion?
"Is it true that a man using a pole to hold out a 44 inch cottonmouth snake in Lowndes County, Alabama?",Is the man doing this in a public location?,Is it true that the photo shows someone holding out a 44 inch cottonmouth snake?,Did this person have to carry the snake out?
Did Maharashtra and Delhi install just one oxygen plant each from PM Cares funds?,Did this plant cost more than USD 170 million?,Has the installed Oxygen plant been a success?,Has this plant been used over time?,Has the installed plant reduced carbon emissions in a significant way?,Has this plant reduced the health risks related to long term exposure to emissions of carbon dioxide?
Did Texas experience snowstorm in February 2021?,Did the roads in Arkansas get snowed during this storm?,Is this city not in Texas?,Is this image of snowfall in Arkansas?,Was this area snowed during this storm?,Is this city in Texas?,Is this image of snowfall in Texas?
Did illegal immigrant tax credits quadruple to $4.2 billion in 2011?,Does free tax credits in 2010 and 2010 cost $4 billion each?,Does 2010 and 2011 contain all the tax credits?,Do all tax credits in 2011 cost $4.2 billion?,Do the tax credits in 2011 have a similar effect as in 2010?
"Did Biden ever say ""you're one sexy kid""?",Does this video have any other information?,Was Biden ever filmed by anyone?,Do any of Biden's videos have this information on them?,Was this message originally used by someone?,Does Biden's video have this information on them?,Was this message used by anyone?
Did this Holocaust survivor survive the Holocaust?,Was this Holocaust survivor killed for being Jewish?,Did this Holocaust survivor represent the Jewish community?,Did this Holocaust survivor represent any Jewish religious denomination?,Did this Holocaust survivor live in a non-Muslim country?,Did this Holocaust survivor have any family or friends during this era?,Did this Holocaust survivor survive the Holocaust?
Will vaccinated individuals contract AIDS by February 2022?,Will vaccinated individuals contract AIDS by 2020?,Does the U.K. contain a large pool of data regarding the development of this disease?,Is the U.K. based on the USA data regarding the rate of AIDS development?,Is the US a large source of data on this disease?
Did the protests against COVID mandates take place in Italy between May 2021 and May 2021?,Was the video distributed before May 2021?,Was the government removed during the protests?,Did the protests occur prior to March 2021?,Was the government removed after March 2021?,Did the protests occur prior to March 2021?
Did the increase in Sudden Infant Death Syndrome in the US in 2020 stem from the cancellation of vaccinations?,Did the increase in Sudden Infant Death Syndrome in the US in 2020 stem from the cancellation of vaccinations?,Has the decrease in Sudden Infant Death Syndrome in the USA in 2020 resulted in the vaccine cancellation?
Did the tram have a ticket for 9 EUR?,Was the tram full?,Did the subway have a ticket for 10 EURO?,Does the metro have a ticket for 12 EURO?,Is the train still in use?,Is the ticket valid for only 10 EURO?,Does the train have a ticket for 12 EURO?
Did Attenborough claim that words failed him?,Was Attenborough also involved in the downing of another 300 year old tree for the HS2 service road?,Has the HS2 service road been built in any other town?,Has the HS2 service road ever used trees from the past 300 years?,Did Attenborough claim that Attenborough is still a scientist?
Can coconut oil be used as an antibiotic?,Does coconut oil prevent mosquito bites?,Are mosquito bites associated with coconut oil?,Do coconut oils have a high PG rating?,Can coconut oil be used to prevent mosquito bites?,Are coconut oils considered sterile?,Are coconut oils considered safe to use while in contact with skin?
Did this photo show Trump supporters protesting in DC on Jan. 5?,Is this photo consistent with previous photos showing protests in DC?,Are this photos from the same day?,Is this photo from the same day as this photo?,Did this photo show protests on this day?,Would these protests have occurred on this date?,Does this photo have any associated historical records?
Have 13 million South Africans not registered to vote?,Has anyone made a statement on this issue?,Do the statistics show that this amount is likely to increase after a political change?,Does this information accurately represent the percentage of people in South Africa who are not registered?,Does this information accurately reflect what may be the political changes?
Did the movie I Am Legend portray a zombie culture?,Are there other zombie stories based on the movie I Am Legend?,Does I Am Legend have a certain age of release?,Did I Am Legend take place in the future of 2021?,Have zombies caused all sorts of problems for humans?,Was I Am Legend based on a TV movie?
Is the funding estimate from Ohio based on an estimate of $5 million?,Does the funding estimate come from any other country?,Is the amount of money that Ohio could get for Medicaid expansion from China or other countries?,Is the estimated amount of money that Ohio could get for Medicaid expansion from China or other countries?
Can wind turbines generate enough energy to last four years?,Can wind turbines be used for heating?,Can renewable energy sources be used in wind turbines?,Is wind power sustainable?,Can renewable energy sources be used in wind turbines?,Is there a cost to producing wind turbines?,Is the cost of the Wind turbines an efficient use of renewable energy sources?
Is there an evidence that UK emergency services can't track your location if you dial 55 in silent 999 call?,Are there any evidence that UK emergency services can't track your location if you dial 55 in silent 999 call?,Can you track your location during a silent 999 call?
Do many children end up being trained to become terrorists?,Did the police rescue 63 of these children?,Did Kolkata police rescue children from these terrorist training programs?,Did the police rescue this particular children?,Did Kolkata police rescue the children after any kidnapping?,Did the police rescue any of the children?
Did Maharashtra re-impose a lockdown on June 15?,Was Maharashtra on the lockdown?,Did Maharashtra reinstate the lockdown?,Are all people in Maharashtra currently on the lockdown?,Has Maharashtra reinstated a lockdown?,"Is the reason for this lockdown under a state-controlled status, with no mention of a state-controlled status?"
Did the Belleville senior center get some money from the Federal government in order to assist in rebuilding?,Did the Belleville senior center receive any damages in the storm?,Did the Belleville senior center receive any federal aid?,Was the Belleville senior center damaged?,Was the Belleville senior center flooded?,Did the Belleville senior center receive any damages at the flooded center?
Did African Americans commit more drug crimes?,Are black African American criminals 3 to 4 times more likely to be arrested for drug crimes than other Americans?,Are black African American criminals 9 times more likely to be imprisoned?,Are African American drug offenders less likely to be arrested for drug crimes?,Does African American drug offenders have worse health than other individuals?,Are black African American criminals less likely to be arrested for drug crimes?
Are close to 40% of South Africans who need jobs unemployed?,Are there more than nine million people unemployed who need jobs?,Do many of these people have the ability to work?,Is the unemployment rate of 9 million people far lower than the unemployment of most South Africans?,Are there more unemployed people in South Africa than in any other country?,"Are more unemployed people in South Africa, who are unable to work, more likely to be unemployed?"
Did the new IRS agents only target the rich?,Are there now any IRS agents following waitresses’ tips?,Did the new IRS agents only target the rich?,"Are there currently a total of 86,800 new IRS agents?",Are all of the new IRS agents responsible for targeting the rich?,Was the IRS originally supposed to focus on the rich?
Did there appear to be any homicides in Virginia?,Did there appear to have been a mass shooting in Virginia?,Did dozens of people get injured or killed during the shooting?,Did a fatal attack take place in Virginia?,Was an investigation commissioned to determine the number of gun-rights protesters present during the event?
Was Hillary Clinton a co-sponsor of a bill to make flag burning a punishable offense?,Did Hillary Clinton support the flag burning bill?,Did Hillary Clinton co-sponsor this bill?,Was this bill passed at the time Hillary Clinton was a senator?,Was this bill passed at the time of Hillary Clinton being elected senator?
Is Trump's approval of the transition process indicative of Trump conceding the 2020 election?,Did the Trump administration approve the transition process?,Do all elections include the presidential transition?,Does the Trump administration accept Biden's bid for president?,Does Biden's bipartisan support for the 2020 presidential election logically mean Biden will win the 2020 election?
Was Mica voting to borrow $10 trillion?,Did Mica formally vote for this vote?,Has Mica consistently voted for this vote?,Can you get a sense from the text of the vote that Mica did not vote to borrow $10 trillion?,Are there any other records to support this claim?,Are there any other relevant articles to substantiate the claim?
Did this reporter burst into laughter after Pakistan lost to Zimbabwe?,Did this reporter bring his wife on the air?,Did this reporter bring his wife to work?,Did this reporter have an event with this country?,Did this reporter bring his wife to work?,Did this reporter perform in this event?,Did this reporter win by one run?
"Did Akshay Kumar tweet condolences at 5.21 am on June 14, 2020?",Did this tweet come before Rajput was killed?,Did this tweet come after Rajput's death?,Did Akshay Kumar tweet in respect of Rajput's death?,Was this tweet in response to Rajput's death?
Is Canada one of three countries in the world where paid vacation is not mandatory?,Is California one of three countries in the world where there's no paid vacation by law?,Is New York one of three countries in the world where there's no paid vacation by law?,Is New York a state where they don't have paid vacation?
Did the protesters arrive in an entirely new state?,Did the protesters leave state because they are upset?,Was this incident a complete incident?,Did any protesters leave because they are upset?,Did this event lead to many protesters?,Did this incident lead to any protesters leaving State?,Has this incident ever occurred in the past?
Did Indian techie receive Rs. 65 Crore for reporting bugs in google products in 2021?,Did Indian techie received Rs. 65 Crore for reporting bugs in google products in 2020?,Did Indian techie receive Rs. 65 Crore for reporting bugs in Google products in 2021?,Did Indian techie receive Rs. 65 Crore for reporting bugs in google products in 2021?,Did Google products receive Rs. 65 Crore for reporting bugs in 2021?,Did Google products receive Rs. 65 Crore for reporting bugs in 2021?
Are the rumors true?,Is the mother of Wing Commander Abhinandan begging for his son to be released?,Does Imran Khan have the authority to release Abhinandan?,Can Imran Khan agree to release Abhinandan?,Has Abhinandan's mom ever filed a complaint against the Pakistani PM?
Has Cassie Compton been missing from Arkansas since 2014?,Has anyone called 911 to report Cassie's location?,Has TikTok provided a link to a TikTok video showing Cassie's whereabouts?,Have any other websites confirmed that they've found Cassie Compton?
Has Christie led New Jersey to a record-breaking 9 credit downgrades?,Has Christie led New Jersey to a record-breaking 9 credit downgrades?,"Can Christie have the record for the most credit downgrades with a credit rating of ""AA+"" by a credit rating agency?",Have any credit rating agencies reported this as a record?,Is this record based on the credit downgrades?
"Does Trump's executive order address 2,000 children already separated from their parents?",Does this executive order change the fact that we would be jailing children with their families?,Does Trump's executive order increase the number of children separation from their families?,Does Trump's executive order alter the current status of children separated from their families?
Did BJP win MCD 2022 election with 154 seats out of 250 seats?,Did INC get 87 seats out of 250 seats?,Did AAP and INC have 87 seats out of 250 seats?,Did AAP and INC have 08 seats out of 250 seats?,Is there any evidence to indicate that INC got 87 seats out of 250 seats?
"Did Obama import 70,000 Somali immigrants and cluster them in Minnesota?","Did Obama import 70,000 Somali immigrants and cluster them in a single area?","Did Trump import 70,000 Somali immigrants and cluster them in a single area?",Does Trump have a positive relation with Somalis?,Did Trump make any statements about Somalis?
Did the Government of India decide to impose a complete lockdown?,Does the Government of India have other plans for 2019?,Does the Government of India have other plans for 2019?,Does the Government of India have other plans for 2019?,Is this a specific time period for India?,Was this the last time India had a complete lockdown?
"Was this order a record purchase for Boeing, and what is the estimated total price?","Did the deal generate a total of 450,000 jobs?","Are there any other large purchases for Boeing, other than this one?",Have any other large orders been issued for Boeing?,Have any other companies placed large orders for Boeing?
Are there records to support this claim?,Have studies on semen concluded that it cuts plaque and tartar by 77%?,Is there a source to support the claim?,Does this research imply that menstruation can treat diabetes?,Do women who use sperm have an increased risk of developing diabetes?,Is any drug with potential to cut sperm toxicity able to cut plaque toxicity?
Was this video filmed at national geographic?,Has this shark pulled down a helicopter before?,Was this video filmed at national geographic in the past?,Will this video be used for educational purposes?,Will this video help research a cure for a rare disease?,Was this video filmed at national geographic in the past?
Did the drug Glucosoft restore blood sugar to normal within 10 minutes?,Is the drug responsible for the normalization of blood sugar?,Are patients able to obtain Glucosoft without hospitalization?,Did CNN Philippines advertise Glucosoft before the announcement?,Was this advertisement in English?,Did these symptoms relate to the drug Glucosoft?
Did the citizens of Pinellas County elect me to be their chief financial officer / governor?,Did a majority of Pinellas County voters elect me to be the Governor of Pinellas County?,Was the majority of the voters in Pinellas County in favor of electing me as the Chief Financial Officer?
On what date did OnlyFans reverse its four-day-old decision to ban sexually explicit content?,"Is there any evidence that OnlyFans reversed its decision to ban sexually explicit content on Aug. 25, 2021?",Is onlyFans' ban on sexually explicit content based on a single date or a series of one day events?
Is the price of a fine for burning poppies?,Was there a penalty for burning poppies?,Did a man commit a graveyard crime at this time of year?,Was the penalty higher than for a graveyard crime?,Did this person be convicted of this crime?,Is there any proof of this crime taking place in 2017?
Do we spend $18 billion a year on immigrant enforcement agents?,Does DEA and ATF cost the federal government $18 billion a year combined?,Does any of these agencies charge $22 billion a year?,Does it take the DEA 128 billion a year to maintain immigration enforcement?,Is there any evidence that a DEA/ATF/FBI partnership has contributed to this amount of federal spending?
Did the state have a projected $11 billion deficit in fiscal year 2011?,Did the state have a projected $11 billion deficit in fiscal year 2011?,Were the projected deficits for all fiscal years or only some?,Did the state have more than one fiscal year?,Did the state have more than two fiscal years?
Did Francis say that he would replace the bible with a new book called bible 2000?,Did Francis say that he would replace the bible with a new book named bible 2000?,Did Francis say that he would replace the bible with a new book named bible 2000?,Did Francis say that he would replace the bible with a new book called bible 2000?
Does the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention research ways to prevent gun violence?,Did the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention find ways to prevent gun violence?,Did the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention find ways to prevent gun violence?,Did the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention find ways to prevent gun violence?
Did Stallone sell his dog for $25 or more before going on to sell Rocky?,Is Stallone a popular dog owner?,"Did Stallone buy Rocky back for $15,000.?","Did Stallone buy Rocky back for $15,000,000 after selling it for $25?",Are there any other relevant examples of Stallone's success with Rocky?
Does the homeopathic pill Gelsemium 200 help protect against Nipa virus?,Does Gelsemium 200 include any side effects?,Do any side effects accompany the use of Gelsemium 200?,Is there any evidence that Gelsemium 200 is associated with Nipa virus?
"Did over 48,000 people die within 14 days of receiving COVID-19 vaccine?","Did 48,000 people die within 14 days of receiving COVID-19 vaccine?",Was there evidence that any of the people who died were able to reverse their illness?,Did the vaccine cause a spike in mortality?,Does COVID-19 vaccine help in the treatment of HIV disease?
Did the Biden administration ask the U.S. Supreme Court to allow police to seize guns from homes without warrants?,Did the Biden Administration urge the U.S. Supreme Court to allow police to seize guns from homes without warrants?,Were any gun law amendments passed by the U.S. Supreme Court in 2021?
Did a classmate injured after the earthquake in Taiwan?,Did a student carry an injured classmate after the earthquake?,Did a student carry an injured classmate after the earthquake?,Did a classmate receive treatment after the earthquake?,Were all students injured in this video?,Are any students injured in this video?
Does this study find that the rate of heterosexual marriage has plummeted in countries that allow gay marriage?,Do these counties in northern Europe have the same percentage of first-born children born out of wedlock?,Has this evidence been independently verified?,Has the use of gay marriage contributed to the reduction in heterosexual marriage rates in these counties?
Did these last three presidents ever get re-elected?,Is it true that previous presidents in a row have gotten re-elected?,"Is it true that prior to the last three presidents, three people re-elected were reelected in a row?",Has this sequence been repeated in the United States before?
Did Whitmer's family break Whitmer's own stay-at-home orders?,Is it true that Whitmer's family were staying at her second home?,Is it true that Whitmer's family broke Whitmer's own stay-at-home orders?,Is it true that Whitmer's family stayed at her second home at some point during Whitmer's time in office?
Has the City of Cape Town tripled the number of houses delivered per year since the DA took office?,Are all new houses delivered by the DA under the DA's watch?,Does the DA govern Cape Town?,Did the City of Cape Town receive an additional $1.2 million in funding from the DA's austerity measures?
Did the Sena leave for Maharashtra with 1000 vehicles?,Did Kangana receive support from the Sena?,Did Kangana receive support from Sena members?,Is the Sena currently in Maharashtra?,Was Kangana attacked by the Sena?,Did Kangana receive support from Sena members in Maharashtra?
Did Modi live for 20 years in Jatland?,Did Modi ask for lassi from Jats?,Was there any evidence of this claim?,Did any part of this claim hold water?,Did there seem to be any evidence of this claim?,"Did Modi say in his statement that ""I have lived in Jatland for 20 years""?"
Did there ever appear to be any mouse traps in the 1880s that featured a loaded pistol?,Was there ever a mousetrap in the 1880s that was not loaded?,Was the gun in the trap considered an effective weapon?,Are there any other examples of guns in mousetraps in the 1800s that featured a loaded pistol?
Has this question been asked by every census since George Washington?,Does this question form part of the most private question on this form?,Do all census forms include this question?,Are questions like this asked by all censuses since the beginning of each census?,Is the question the most private question on any census form?
Did this Guinness record measure exactly 315.3 feet?,Did this Guinness record happen late in September of that year?,Did the giant charcuterie board hold any record during this time period?,Did this Guinness record happen during a specific period?,Was this Guinness record for this large charcuterie board made specifically for this region of the country?
Was the video authentic?,Did the video show people leaving Crimea?,Would the traffic jam have been shown by other media outlets?,Did the video show a traffic jam by a Ukrainian state?,Did the video show the traffic jam by Ukraine?,Did the video include Crimean Ukrainians in the scene?,Did the video show people entering Crimea from Ukraine?
Did Nathan Deal kill any pro gun bills?,Is Nathan Deal a man who could killed bills?,Can anyone else kill bills in the future?,Can we say with certainty that Deal killed any pro gun bills in 2013?,Can anyone else kill pro gun bills in the future?,Can we know that this event happened in 2013?
Did Trump establish a link between a possible Russia connection and Russian involvement in 2016?,Does Trump believe Russia set Trump up?,Did Trump say he think he was spied on in 2016?,Did Trump state that Russian involvement was involved?,Did Trump claim a Russian connection during 2016?,Was Trump's story about Russia truthful?
Imelda Marcos won all 986+ cases filed against her by the administration of Corazon Aquino?,Imelda Marcos won all 986+ cases filed against her by the administration of Corazon Aquino?,Was a lower court's decision in all of these cases?,Imelda Marcos won all 986+ cases filed against her by the administration of Corazon Aquino?
Are there more people on welfare than working?,Is there more people on welfare than working?,Are there more people on welfare than working?,Is there a difference between the number of people on welfare and the number of people working?,Is the number of people on welfare higher than the number of people working in 2013?
Are under 1 percent of Massachusetts kids uninsured?,Have all children in Texas been uninsured?,Does Gov Perry have a million kids uninsured?,Does the number of uninsured children in Texas compare to Massachusetts?,Can any children in Massachusetts get insurance?,br>?
Would 500 people who share and comment on this post have a chance to win the M&S voucher?,Would 500 people who share and comment on this post be in with a chance of winning the M&S voucher?,Would 500 people who share and comment on this post have a chance of winning the M&S voucher?
Did Betty White defend Big Bird on social media?,Did White insult Hawley in November 2021?,Did White support Hawley on Twitter?,Did White defend Hawley on social media in November 2021?,Did White support Hawley on social media in November 2021?,Does White maintain any role in political or other events?
Was the Lottery winner $13 million?,"Did the Lottery winner receive a $1,000 prize?",Did he win the lotto?,Did the lotto winner donate anything to the lotto winner?,"Did any of the people who received the $1,000 prize purchase anything for themselves?",Did the Lottery winner win any lottery games?
Was Thunberg in disguise as a member of the pro-Trump crowd that stormed the U.S. Capitol?,Did Thunberg storm the U.S. Capitol?,Are there multiple versions of Thunberg's face that are the same?,Was Thunberg in a mask?
Did Abe send 1.6 million COVID-19 vaccine doses back to Japan?,Is Ivermectin available in Japan?,Did Abe's administration offer Ivermectin to citizens in Japan?,Did Abe resend the COVID-19 vaccine back to Japan?,Did Abe offer Ivermectin to Japan citizens?
Was there a myth about the war mentioned by the article?,Was the claim based on real facts or simply an opinion from the left?,Did the claims about Bush and the war lead to any real deaths?,Did the attack in a major city result in civilian casualties?,Did the claims that Bush lied about his involvement in the war lead to any real death?
Do Monitor potatoes remain in air-controlled sheds for 6 weeks after harvesting?,Do monitor potatoes need to off-gas chemicals after harvesting?,Are monitor potatoes stored for 6 weeks in sheds after harvesting?,Are monitor potatoes inedible for the same amount of time as normal?
Would Trump be financially secure if impeached?,Would Trump lose money on his pension if impeached?,Would Trump lose his travel allowance if impeached?,Would Trump be able to run for president in 2024 if impeached?,Would Trump lose any ability to run for president in 2024?
Did a bill receive one vote in the Legislative Assembly prior to passage?,Did the bills become law prior to enactment?,Did any of these bills pass?,Did any of these bills reach legislation?,Did any of these bills pass in the legislature before this passage?,Did all of these bills pass in the Legislature during this time?,Did any of these bills go into law in the general session?
"Did Hubner say that Hitler was a ""blusterous man?",""" in 1929?",Has Hubner made statements about Hitler in the past?,Has Hubner ever thought that the rise of Hitler dumbfounded educated people?,Has Hubner ever been investigated in connection with the rise of Hitler?,Has Hubner ever had any conflicts in relation to Hitler's rise to power?
Has Kenya's education minister announced the students will rewrite high school exams?,Did Kenyans of any age report having no difficulty passing their school exams?,Will this rewriting of high school exams occur?,Will the new exam reflect the changes in test takers?,Did the new exam actually result in a change in test takers?
Are there 50% in Medicare cuts as a result of health care reform?,Is there other funding for Medicare?,Are there any other cost implications for Medicare?,Is there some financial burden for Medicare in the event of a health care reform?,Can we estimate these costs and responsibilities from health care data?
Would a tiered CPI save $1 trillion off the federal budget debt?,Does CPI make up a large portion of the national economy?,Is there an implied cost to CPI tiered?,Are the US government spending cuts all of the CPI?,Do the US federal budget deficits come from the CPI tiered system?
Has Scott Walker ever omitted events where people are required to pay or be on an approved list?,Is there any evidence to show this has happened since 2015?,Is there any evidence that Scott Walker hasn't omitted events in which people have to pay to attend?,Has Scott Walker ever refunded admission costs or waived registration fees?
Was the woman babysitting a 14 month old?,Was the toddler stuck in her vaginal cavity?,Was the toddler able to suffocate through the toilet?,Did the infant require hospital treatment for its injuries?,Does Cincinnati have an official maternity leave?,- Am I the only pregnant adult who has babysitting work?
Was the video released in November 2021?,Did the video feature a man or a woman?,Is it believed to have been committed in the United States?,Is it widely believed that the woman was stoned to death?,Is it believed that the women was stoned as part of a scheme to remove the US from the country?
Did the vaccine help with COVID-19?,Would the vaccine help with COVID-19?,Can people who are immunized still get COVID-19?,Can someone who is immunized die from COVID-19?,Can anyone who is vaccinated lose their immunity from COVID-19?,Can someone who was infected with COVID-19 still get COVID-19?
Does ivermectin cause 70 percent less death than Remdesivir?,Did the study claim that ivermectin causes 70 percent less death compared to Remdesivir?,Did this study specifically claim that ivermectin was involved in 70 percent less deaths than Remdesivir?
"Did 25,000 Soldiers return Shaurya Chakra Medals to support farmers?","Did 25,000 Soldiers return Shaurya Chakra Medals for farmers?","Did 25,000 Soldiers return Shaurya Chakra Medals for farmers?",Was the amount of Shaurya Chakra Medals returned to farmers?
Was Rutgers' graduation rate the best?,Did Schiano receive any recognition or awards for his achievements?,Did Schiano receive any recognition for his achievements on this subject?,Was the College grading rate of Rutgers highly respected?,". If Schiano had lowered the rating in general, what might he have done to create a greater grading rate for the college?"
Is drinking wine more important than exercise for living past 90?,Are these results based on scientific research?,Do people need to keep drinking wine to live past 90?,Are these results based on any other research?,Are there any other studies showing the benefit of drinking wine versus exercising?,Have researchers looked into more nutrient-based research stating that drinking wine is more important than exercise for living past 90?
Is Souter the only pro-choice Justice?,Is O'Connor the only pro-choice Justice?,Is Kennedy the only pro-choice Justice?,Are the three pro-choice justices from Republican presidents?,Would any of the three members of the Planned Parenthood oppose any of the Republican nominees on the basis of being pro-choice?
Do Russian scientists plan to launch the COVID-19 vaccine by mid-August 2020?,Is the COVID-19 vaccine made at least a year after it was originally invented by Russian scientists?,Is the COVID-19 vaccine currently being researched and manufactured in the United States?,Will the COVID vaccine be available in the United States?
Is this photo an official depiction of the room of the shooter?,Do any of the pictured flags bear the name of NATO?,Has there been any reported incidents with transgender and NATO flags on walls at a private school in Tennessee?,Does the room have NATO flags?
"Did the Congressional Budget Office report that Obamacare would cost 800,000 jobs?",Did the head of the Congressional Budget Office testify in Congress during this timeframe?,Is the Congressional Budget Office responsible for ensuring a successful implementation of Obamacare?,Was the Congressional Budget Office involved in drafting this report?
Are there any satellites in the Artic?,Are there any satellites that appear big and disappear in 30 seconds?,Are there any satellites that do not appear big in about 30 seconds?,Do they appear big in that sequence?,Is this clip of satellites located between Russia and Canada?,Is this clip of satellites located between Canada and Russia?
Are all three males tallest in Europe?,Does any of the males in the photograph weigh the same?,Did any men in the photograph play cards in 1919?,Does any of the males in the photograph eat anything besides burgers?,Are any of the males in the photograph short in length?
Is the number of faculty members who brought in enough to pay for salaries and overhead 3%?,Did less than 3% of the faculty contribute to the funds needed?,Did other staff members bring in enough money to pay for salaries?,Did other staff members bring in enough funds to pay for salaries?,Are the funds for salaries and overhead accounted for by the total?
Did the team-building seminar for Panda Express and Alive Seminars include sexual battery?,Did the team-building seminar for Panda Express and Alive Seminars involve sexual battery?,Did the team-building seminar for Panda Express and Alive Seminars involve sexual battery?,Did the team-building seminar for Panda Express and Alive Seminars involve sexual battery?
Did Dean Browning run and lose in the 2020 Republican primary for U.S. House Pennsylvania District 7?,Did Dean Browning tweet that he was a black gay guy?,Did Dean Browning write the tweet from his verified Twitter account?,Did Dean Browning post a statement on his LinkedIn account?,Did Browning post his response to his tweet on his LinkedIn page?,Did Dean Browning endorse his opponent in the 2020 Republican primary for U.S. House Pennsylvania District 7?
Were there 300 more police officers than residents in Seattle?,Is it accurate to say there were 300 more police officers than residents in Seattle?,Has this increase in police resources been linked to the population boom in Seattle?,Is this increase due to the city's reorganization of police forces?,Is it an accurate portrayal of the state's situation?
"Did 8,508 people die?","Did 8,508 people die from the Pfizer mRNA shot during the recent seven months?","Did 8,508 people die due to the Pfizer mRNA shot?",Did the U.S. health department report any death related to the Pfizer mRNA shot?
Did Republicans in all states refuse to implement state health insurance exchange?,Did Republicans in all states refuse to implement a state health insurance exchange?,Did Republicans in all states vote against a state health insurance exchange?,Did Republicans vote against a state health insurance exchange in every state?,Did GOP states vote against a state health insurance exchange?,Did all GOP states vote against a state health insurance exchange?
Did the Government have sufficient resources in tax evasion to employ 552 employees?,Are there more DWP employees examining benefit fraud than tax evasion?,Is the DWP more able to recruit more staff examining benefit fraud than tax evasion?,Is there more DWP staff examining benefit fraud compared to tax evasion?
Has a snatching of autonomy of millions of people been the purpose of the independence celebrations?,Is the independence of India under threat?,Is Mukherji celebrating his own independence?,Was Mukherji’s countrymen expecting him to celebrate his own independence?,Is Mukherji referring to the 15 August Day as a black day?
Does this company donate $1 for every photo of this puppy's tumor shared on Facebook?,Is this picture not available for purchase?,Is Facebook funding this cause for every photo of this puppy's tumor shared on Facebook?,Does this photo not have an expiration date?,Can this cause be attributed to any other foundations or charitable organizations?
"Are 600,000 to 97,500 affected by the expansion?","Will 257,000 people be forced into Medicaid?",Would the increase in coverage for Obamacare save the economy approximately $25 billion per year?,Will the expansion reduce the number of uninsured individuals?,Will putting people in Medicaid increase the uninsured rate?
Did West have the funds needed to raise this $2 million?,Are there plans for these funds to be used for relocating beaches?,Are any of these funds going to go to corporations?,Will the funds go to state governments?,Did West raise money to give corporations free reign?,Is West likely to receive any funding from this group?
"Are 20,000 Nigerian doctors practising in the United States compared to 50,000 practicing in the country?","Are the 20,000 Nigerian doctors practicing in the United States, compared to the 50,000 Nigerian doctors practicing in the country?","Are the 20,000 Nigerian doctors practicing in the United States, compared to 50,000 practicing in the country?"
"Did the appellate court find the Harris’ ""partially framed and prosecuted a man,"" after the evidence is alleged to have been flawed?",Did the panel say Harris was able to secure a clear defense for the prosecution of a witness?,Did the panel say Harris was able to obtain clear defenses in the case for the prosecution of a witness?
Is the retirement age set to age 70 as proposed by DeSantis?,Can it be safely assumed that the retirement age is set to age 70?,Is there any evidence to support this suggestion?,Are the current retirement age levels still in line with current state policy?,Do DeSantis and other Republicans have similar views on the current retirement age?
Is poverty rate higher than national average under Perry?,Did unemployment in Texas increase under Perry?,Is poverty rate higher in Texas under Perry than in any other state?,Has inequality increased under Perry?,Has Perry decreased government spending due to tax cuts?,Has poverty rate in Texas declined during Perry’s time as governor?
Was there a shark on the beach at Kitty Hawk?,Did this shark come from the ocean?,Did this shark have a neck?,Did this shark have a neck?,Did this shark have a tail?,Was the shark in question the same size as the shark in the photograph?,Did the shark leave the area of the beach?
Did Delhi Governor Arvind Kejriwal announce a limit of 20 people in buses at a time?,Did the ad mention any specific problems with Delhi's bus system?,Did a Delhi bus passenger report a lack of social distancing after a CM announced the limit?
Did Vitter skip a vote honoring soldiers who died in defense of our freedom?,Was there a prostitute’s call related to the vote honoring soldiers?,Was the vote honoring soldiers also honored by Vitter?,Does the act of cheating on the vote violate a senator’s sworn pledge to obey the law?
Has Florida issued more than 3 million concealed carry permits in the past 30 years?,Is it true Florida has revoked 168 concealed carry permits in the past 30 years?,Are concealed carry permits revoked a large percentage of the time?,Have Florida concealed carry permits been revoked a large percentage of the time?
Can we determine how many cents women earn for every dollar men get in the same job?,Will women receive 77 cents for every $1 men get for equal work?,Will men receive 77 cents for every $1 dollars for equal work?,Do men receive 77 cents for every $1 dollars for equal work?
Did a judge in 2019 ruled that girls in an Illinois school district must shower with boys or no right to privacy?,Do girls have the right to privacy in Illinois schools?,Did the judge rule that girls in Illinois had the right to privacy?,Does a judge rule that girls are required to shower with boys?
"Is it true that this video was posted on June 4, 2014?",Did the video contain any footage?,Did this video contain a link?,Was this video from JK Update?,Did the video include a date or time?,Did this video have the lyrics from JK Update?,Did this video have an audience within JK Update?
Did Obama policies result in higher gas prices between January 2009 and today?,Did Obama policies result in higher gas prices in January 2009?,Is the increase in gas prices as a result of Obama policies?,Is there any evidence that Obama policies resulted in a higher gas prices in January 2009?,Is there any evidence that Obama policies resulted in the increase in gas prices?
Did the Pentagon spend more than 50% of US discretionary spending?,Does the Pentagon budget take up half of US discretionary spending?,Does the Pentagon budget consume more than half of US discretionary spending?,Do all the Pentagon's spending accounts for 40% of US discretionary spending?,Is the Pentagon budget a cause of America's soaring debt and economic insecurity?
Do Labour plan to end the 25% discount on council tax for single householders?,Are they proposing to end the 25% discount on council tax for single householders?,Are any other discounts planned to stop under Labour's proposal for council tax for single households?,Do any other discounts are planned to end under Labour's proposal for council tax for single households?,Does this proposal change the current council tax tax for single householders?
Is McCain correct to claim McCain stood up to the president on global warming?,Is McCain correct to claim McCain was responsible for the global warming warning five years ago?,Is McCain aware of climate change and the threat posed by global warming?,Is McCain aware of climate change and the threat posed by global warming?
Has the reconciliation process been used 21 times since 1981?,Is most of the time used by Republicans?,Does the time used comparing Reagan's plan with Bush's is different?,Is the time used comparing Reagan's plan to Bush's plan different?,Are there different uses of the reconciliation process?
Did Katie Flynn wear a seat belt?,Did Kate Flynn die of her own accord?,Did the police force do anything after Flynn's death?,Did Flynn file a report for injury?,Is Flynn still in the hospital?,Did Flynn's family receive any compensation for her death?
Did Evers propose a 150 day shutdown of the state?,Is there any precedent for a 150 day shutdown?,Has Evers endorsed this plan?,Does this plan look reasonable in context?,Is there a political message that contradicts the statement?,Did Evers suggest any other plans for the state during the 150 day shutdown?
What is the hay bales part of the logo?,Does the logo resemble a penis?,Did the Iowa State Fair logo make reference to a pedophile?,Is the logo a silo?,Has the logo resembled a penis in the past?
Was this news release correct?,Did this news release incite an action?,Did this news release incite a crime or act?,Has this news release been used to promote crime?,Did this news release make any statements about the incident?,Have any of the actions of this leader been verified?,Have any other government officials been investigated?
Did Brown vote with Obama 70 percent of the time in 2011?,Did Brown vote in all 57 states in 2011?,Did Brown support Obama 70 percent of the time?,Was there a statistical correlation between Brown and Obama?,Did Brown vote against Obama 70 percent of the time in 2011?,Is there sufficient evidence to support these comments?
Is Jill Karofsky currently a prosecutor?,Did Jill Karofsky went easy on a Madison man in a 1999 sexual assault case?,Did Jill Karofsky have any other conflicts with this claim?,Are these allegations unsubstantiated?,Did Jill Karofsky provide specific details about this claim?
Did the matric pass rate increase from around 61 percent in 2009 to 78 percent last year?,Did the undergraduate passing rate improve each year?,Did the overall matric pass rate increase from around 61 percent in 2009 to 78 percent last year?,Did the undergraduate passing rate improve each year?,Did the student matric pass rate improve every year between 2009 and 2012?
Was the shutdown projected to result in $10 billion per week?,Did the shutdown have a negative impact on GDP?,Could the shutdown affect the economy in other ways besides costing $1billion?,Are the benefits of the shutdown estimated?,Have other states' actions contributed to the cost of the shutdown?,Is it a viable option to cut the spending during the shutdown?
Is it true that a federal judge has ruled that three items of Sharia law are now deemed to be legal in the state of Texas?,Is it true that a federal judge has ruled that three items of Sharia law are now deemed to be legal in the state of Texas?
Is there evidence that increased anti-Semitism occurrences in 2017?,Is there evidence that increases in anti-Semitic occurrences increased over 50 percent in 2017?,Is there evidence that anti-Semitic occurrences increased over 50 percent in 2017?
Did Italian artist Illustration design illustrations of the world in 2022?,Is Illustration a painting or an illustration?,Is illustration an artistic concept or movement?,Is Illustration part of the art movement?,Do Illusions draw inspiration from the work of other artists?,Is Illustration an unofficial image?
Is there more COVID-19 cases because non - vaccinated people don’t get tested?,Can the COVID-19 increase be due to non - vaccinated people?,Is the COVID-19 increase due to the vaccinated?,YES.?
Did Greene call for people to be searched for metal?,Was Greene referring to an election?,Did Greene call for the practice to be changed?,Did Greene call for all people to be searched for metal?,Was Greene's statement against metal detectors a form of voter suppression?,Did Greene call the practice of metal detectors a form of voter suppression?
Is the city of Milwaukee safer now because of the addition of 200 police officers?,Does the city of Milwaukee need 200 more officers?,Do the officers who serve in Milwaukee serve in communities elsewhere?,Is the city of Milwaukee safer now because of the addition of police?,Does this mayor think that the Milwaukee city is safer now because of the addition of police officers?
Did you have any emails classified?,Did any of them contain sensitive information?,Was the information on these emails classified?,Do you know for sure how this information was disclosed to the government?,Did he provide information about this email?,Is it accurate to imply that any of these emails contained sensitive information?,Has he revealed the specifics of any of these emails?
Did Dutton receive more money from small donations than anyone else?,"Did Dutton receive more money from contributions of $25, $50, and $100?",Was Dutton’s total fundraising of $100 donation greater than that of the other?,Did Dutton personally receive more donations than anyone else?,Did Dutton use small donors to make donations?
"Can Vitamin D, zinc, Ivermectin, and hydroxychloroquine cure hospitalized COVID-19 patients?","Does Vitamin D, zinc, Ivermectin, and hydroxychloroquine cure COVID-19?","Does vitamin D, zinc, Ivermectin, and hydroxychloroquine cure COVID-19?"
Did the government receive share in the bank at this time?,Did the government receive share in the bank at this time?,Did the government receive share in the bank at this time?,Did the government receive share in the bank at this time?,Did the government receive share in the bank at this time?,Did the government receive share in the bank at this time?
Did Wisconsin have five polling places in their largest city?,Did Wisconsin have 500 polling places in their largest city in this past week?,Was it only 5 polling places when this polling place was in effect?,Did this election happen last week or at this moment in time?,Was this a single or many-a-day election?
Is there a data point on this article?,Can a comparable source confirm this statement?,Has a percentage of disabled individuals ever made more on Social Security Disability than jobs?,Is 80% a percentage of people on Social Security Disability?,"Is 85,000 more people on Social Security Disability than jobs created in June 2012?"
Was this photograph taken in Washington state?,Does this photographer perform photographs for this purpose?,Was this photographer participating in protests against the brutal police force of Seattle?,Does this photograph belong to an antifa protest?,Is this protest zone known for its brutal police enforcement?,Is this protest zone known for its brutal police abuse?
Is the video footage produced by the police?,Is the video footage associated with the Muslim community?,Is the video footage produced by the police?,Is the Muslim community involved in this incident?,Whether or not the incident took place in a public park or a private residence. Is the footage produced by the police public?
Did this viral post include a fake picture of a Hindu victim?,Did this viral post include an old image that had a Muslim victim allegedly burnt?,Was this victim a Muslim?,Did this viral post use a recent incident of a Muslim youth setting on fire a Hindu?
Did the missing girl in Stralsund get back together after being arrested?,Was the missing girl found in the following three years?,Was the missing girl named or was a name associated with her?,Has the missing girl been found by anyone else?,Is the missing girl being reclaimed by anyone else after being found?
Did 2 percent of the total South African deaths due to transport be due to youth?,Does this ratio have any relationship with fatality rates for young people?,Did the mortality ratios for the teen population reflect the deaths?,Has youth involvement in transport contributed to the population deaths?,Have any young people in south africa died from accidents related to transport?
Did the ad have a billboard advertisement?,"Has a billboard advertisement appeared on Facebook shared more than 1,000 times?",Is the ad a link to any other content?,Is the ad promoting a novel vaccine?,Did any ads in the ads ask viewers to take the vaccine?,Is the ad promoting the vaccine endorsed by the FDA?
Is Whitehouse the one who got a secret closed-door briefing?,Did the briefings include a warning of the 2008 economic crash?,Was the briefing in a secret location?,Was the briefing limited to only white house staff members?,Did Whitehouse receive a warning of the 2008 economic crash during the briefing?
Is it true that women make 77 cents per dollar a man earns?,Is there a source that validates this claim?,Did this figure reflect actual data?,Is there an estimate of how many women make 77 cents per dollar a man earns?,Is the average wage for women 77 cents per dollar?
Did Trump vote for 60 tax increases in 2015?,Did these tax increases hurt the middle class and small businesses?,Did Trump vote for some other taxes in the 2014 elections?,Did Trump vote for the tax increases in the 2014 elections?,Did Trump vote for any other taxes in the 2014 election?,Did Trump vote for more tax increases in 2014?
Was a Navy Destroyer able to hit a building in Houston?,Did a Navy Destroyer crash into a building in Houston after Hurricane Harvey?,Was the Navy Destroyer able to hit a building in downtown Houston after Hurricane Harvey?,Was the Navy Destroyer able to hit a building in Houston after Hurricane Harvey?
Was the 2020 Olympic Games not cancelled due to COVID-19?,Did the 2020 Olympic Games be fully or partially canceled?,Did the 2020 Olympic Games show firework displays?,Was there a majority of spectators at the 2020 Olympic Games in Los Angeles?,Was the 2020 Olympic Games rescheduled because of COVID-19?
Did Trump order the imposition of martial law after Christmas 2020?,Did Trump order martial law after Christmas 2020?,Did Trump initiate the imposition of martial law after Christmas 2020?,Did Trump order the imposition of martial law after Christmas 2020?,Has Trump taken a stand on the imposition of martial law?,Did Trump order the imposition of martial law after Christmas 2020?
Was Obama saluting the flag during the playing of the national anthem during a 2009 Veterans Day ceremony?,Was Obama not saluting the flag during the playing of the national anthem during a 2009 Veterans Day ceremony?,Was President Obama honoring the flag during the playing of the national anthem during a 2009 Veterans Day ceremony?
Did opium production decline in Afghanistan after Bush left the State Department?,Did infant mortality decline?,Did Afghanistan's school enrollment rise by more than sevenfold when Bush left the State Department?,Was the education situation under Clinton at the time Bush left Afghanistan stable?,Did Obama's tenure as Secretary of State have any repercussions on Afghanistan's educational policy?
Does scientists understand how Antarctica hasn’t warmed for over 70 years?,Has any CO2 in this climate been rising?,Has this climate change been permanent?,Is there any evidence of temperature changes other than a CO2 rise?,Is Antarctica currently at a temperature over 3 degrees warmer than it was when the temperature was first recorded?
Did the GAC consistently audit voters in 16 elections?,Did the GAC consistently audit voters removing felons?,Did the GAC consistently audit voters removing felons from elections?,Did the GAC consistently audit voters removing felons from elections?,Did the GAC consistently audit voters to remove felons from elections?
"Are there any documents to prove that 3,000 bodies were recovered during the raids in Enugu, Nigeria?",Did any of these documents provide any information on the number of bodies that were recovered?,"Is the estimated total number of bodies recovered after the raids in Enugu, Nigeria?",Did this event occur before or after the raids in Enugu?
"Did U.S. Congress members earn over $100,000 during this time?",Was Congress raising money to pay for this relief?,Was Congress paying for this relief?,Are there any other relevant documents or estimates that the authors have questioned the accuracy of?,"Did all lawmakers receive at least $100,000 from the program they helped to fund COVID-19 relief?"
"Did Obama send $350,000 to anti-Likud, anti-Netanyahu groups for (the) election?","Is this claim about just one anti-Likud, anti-Netanyahu group?",Did Obama personally fund these anti-Netanyahu groups or did Obama’s funds originate elsewhere?
Did the Ukrainian Armed Forces infiltrate the Russian Army?,Did the Ukrainian Armed Forces capture or take territory from the Russian Army?,Did the Ukrainian Armed Forces infiltrate the Russian Army with no success?,Does the Ukrainian Armed Forces infiltrate Russia as a force?
Was West Virginia able to add the highest percentage of new construction jobs in the United States in 2017?,Did West Virginia have higher percentage of new construction jobs in 2017 than any other state?,Did West Virginia have the highest percentage of new construction jobs in 2017 or any other state?,Is the percentage of new construction jobs in West Virginia higher than any other state in the country?
Was the Cameron Highlanders battalion in the front line during 1914?,Was a battalion of the Highlanders returning to a town after the Armistice in 1918?,Did the Highlanders return to a town during the 1918 Armistice?,Was the Highlanders battalion disbanded in the 19th century?
Did US Maritime Executive not report this story on its website?,Did US Maritime Executive fail to verify the information reported by the US Maritime Executive?,Did the US Maritime Executive make this statement after the Kenyan deputy president made this statement?,Did the US Maritime Executive report this story on their website?
Was Iain Duncan Smith's bar subsidised?,Are all purchases in the bar subsidised?,Did the bar subsidize more than 5% of all purchase?,Would Iain Duncan Smith's bar be subsidised?,Have more than 5% of all purchases in the bar been on this subsidy?
"Did Ronald Reagan claim Democrats would restrict freedoms, restrict history and restrict safety?",Did Ronald Reagan call for a Democratic boycott of the 1976 presidential election?,Did Ronald Reagan call for a democratic boycott of the 1981 presidential election?,Did Ronald Reagan say Democrats would restrict freedoms?,Did Ronald Reagan use this quote in a political speech?
"Did Gavaskar say the BCCI let India down, after the India vs. Pakistan cricket match in Asia Cup 2023?",Did Gavaskar blame the BCCI for the letdown?,Are there any record of this incident in the media?,Can the record have been altered on this event?,Can we count the times that Gavaskar called the BCCI responsible for the letdown?
Is Anyang' Nyong'o still alive?,Are any other reports that Anyang' Nyong'o is still alive?,Is any other information that Anyang' Nyong'o is still alive?,Is any other person citing any other death news to be accurate?,Are other reports that Anyang' Nyong'o is still alive based on the stated intent?,Is any other evidence that Anyang' Nyong'o is still alive based on the stated intent?
Did the military ask for $2 trillion in defense budget?,Did Romney say he wants to add $2 trillion to the defense budget?,Did Romney say that this is what the military has asked for?,Has Romney said the defense budget has not been requested by the military?,Have Romney's statements on this point been confirmed by the military?
Did the Dominion lawyers try to stop the election audit?,Did Dominion lawyers oppose the election audit in Arizona?,Did the Dominion lawyers object to the election audit in Arizona?,Did Dominion lawyers object to the election audit in Arizona?,Did Dominion legal lawyers oppose the election audit in Arizona?
Was this video shared to social media in 2021?,Did this video show a nuclear bomb being tested in the South Pacific in the 1950s?,Is this video the first video of a nuclear bomb being tested in the South Pacific?,Did this video have large numbers of views?,Does this video show a nuclear bomb being tested in the South Pacific in the 1950s?
"Was Trump the last president to say Pence did not ""overturn"" the election in 2020?","Was Trump the last president to say Pence did not ""overturn the election"" in 2020?",Did Trump claim Pence failed to overturn the election in 2020?,Was Pence the last president to say Pence failed to overturn the election in 2020?
"Did Sanders want to raise taxes to 52% on anybody earning over $29,000?","Does Sanders want to raise taxes to 52% on anyone making more than $29,000?",Are there any other benefits to raising taxes to 52%?,"Is the reason for Sanders’ desire to raise taxes to 52% on anyone earning more than $29,000 entirely personal?"
"Did he say that if all of the tax cuts expire on schedule, the budget will be close to being balanced in 4 years?",Has this claim been repeated elsewhere?,"Did he say any of the tax cuts would expire on schedule, in general?",Did the tax cuts end with the onset of the economic downturn?
Did the U.S. and other countries spend more on Covid contact tracing app than the UK?,Did the UK Covid contact tracing app cost the United States more than £3 billion?,Was this app the only Covid contact tracing app to be developed?,Were there any other app that was developed for Covid?
Did 52 percent of Americans support the repeal of Roe v Wade?,Did 52 percent of Americans support the repeal of Roe v Wade?,Did 52 percent of Americans support the repeal of Roe v Wade?,Did 52 percent of Americans support the repeal of Roe v Wade?,Did 52 percent of Americans support the repeal of Roe v Wade?
Does this group have a specific political affiliation?,Are these lobbyists known for their zealous lobbying in favor of the state?,Does this group receive funding from other political entities besides the state?,Do a number of these lobbyists have the same political affiliation as the individual that is trying to be the first legislator?
Did Singh tweet about COVID-19?,Was there any indication of the tweet's purpose?,Was the tweet positive?,Did Singh tweet that COVID 19 is becoming a more common infection?,Did he tweet that COVID-19 is becoming a more common infection?,Did Singh tweet about the incident in general?
Did Jason Kander pass ZERO bills in his two terms in the Missouri General Assembly?,Did Jason Kander pass legislation at a lower rate than his predecessor?,Was there any legislation during his two terms in office that passed?,Did the bills that Jason Kander passed pass or veto a legislator?
Was there a threat at Walmart or Target stores in May 2022?,Was this threat made at one of these stores?,Is this threat at one of these stores specifically aimed at Black people?,Did this threat occur inside or outside of these stores?,Has this threat occurred since then?,Is the crime mentioned a crime?
Does Biden advise gay men to marry into families with 3 or 4 sisters?,Is Biden's advice not consistent with all sexual relations?,Did Biden tell gay men to marry into families with 3 or 4 sisters?,Did Biden endorse LGBT men's marriage to non-binary people?,Was Biden's advice consistent with sexual relations between LGBT men and non-binary people?,"Did Biden call LGBT men ""beautiful"" and ""happy""?"
"Did supporters of Trump rally in NYC on March 19, 2023?",Did Trump supporters show up at New York rally in NYC?,Did Trump supporters rally at New York rally in NYC?,Was the location of New York rally different from the location of the rally in NY?,0 were supporters of Trump rallying in New York?
Did Ron Johnson call climate change a bull---- while in office?,"Did Ron Johnson ""rake in over $700k in fossil fuel cash""?",Did Ron Johnson publicly call climate change a bull---- during a record heatwave?,Did the senator make donations in support of climate change?,Did the Republican U.S. senator claim to rake in funds from climate change?
Are the new road rules required in the Australian?,Do the new road rules include a ban on the horn and waving?,Will the new road rules affect other driving habits?,Will the new road rules be enforced in other states?,Have any drivers been barred from using the horn while driving?,Have any drivers been able to use the horn?
Did Real Clear Politics project Joe Biden to win Pennsylvania in the 2020 U.S. presidential election?,"Was Biden projected to win Pennsylvania despite the news of a lawsuit that could invalidate 300,000 or more Democratic votes?",Was Real Clear Politics planning on calling Biden to win Pennsylvania in the 2020 U.S. presidential election?
Has America ever accepted 1 million people into its legal immigration system in a year?,Does anyone else in the world receive immigration like America does?,Are there any other countries that can accept 1 million people a year?,Has the number of immigration-related deaths decreased in comparison to the previous year?,Has the number of illegal immigrants on the U.S. population declined over the past decade?
Did this attack have any significant impact on restaurant review websites?,Was this attack the cause of the cyber attack?,Are the numbers that were compromised by this attack accounted for?,Is the amount of data impacted by this attack significant?,Does this attack impact many users?,Was any information compromised?,"0 Responses to "" Zomato restaurant review site's data was hacked""?"
Did Romney agree with the 2014 deadline for leaving Afghanistan?,Did Romney agree with the 2014 deadline for leaving Afghanistan?,Is any of the following accurate: Mitt Romney and Obama said they agreed with the 2014 deadline for leaving Afghanistan?,Did Romney and Obama agree with the 2014 deadline for leaving Afghanistan?,Did Romney and Obama disagree with the 2014 deadline for leaving Afghanistan?
Did any of these boys dance to any Bollywood songs?,Does any Bollywood song have any burqa dances?,Has any other video of these Hindu boys ruffling burqas been released online?,Does this video belong to a particular political ideology?,Are these Hindu boys from America?,Did these Hindu boys live in America?
"Did the U.S. CDC warn the public about a shipment of Zika-contaminated bananas in 2017, 2018 or 2019?",Was this shipment an intentional and intentional contaminated shipment?,Was this shipment part of a larger outbreak of Zika?,Are this contaminated bananas still being sold?,Are there other cases of Zika-related infections?
Is there any evidence that Rohingya men are molested Indian women?,Was the video released publicly?,Has Rohingya men ever molested Indian women in the states?,Has any evidence been gathered that Rohingya men are molestation victims in states?,Is any of this video content public record?
Did the Obama administration spend more on stock than debt?,Did the stock market make more than debt?,Did debt get reduced due to the increased stock market?,Are the stocks a smaller portion of the debt?,Does Obama's debt reduce as a result of the stock market?,Are there any other positive aspects about debt reduction?
Did Bill Clinton ever advocate that the current tax system is terrible?,Are there any other recent examples of tax abuse against small businesses?,Is the average tax rate of small business in the world average for businesses?,Is the current tax system designed to be enacted in 1986?,Has this system changed since then?
Was the COVID-19 vaccine labeled as empty?,Was the FDA required to update the COVID vaccine labels?,Has the FDA conducted extensive investigation of this vaccine?,Did this vaccine experience safety issues?,Does any of this vaccine exist?,Do you think this vaccine's labeling is incorrect?,Do you think this vaccine has a history of safety issues?
"Did Bill Gates say the world should be depopulated by three billion people, starting with the elimination of Africans?","Did Gates say the world should be depopulated by three billion people, starting with the elimination of Africans?",Was Gates' suggestion based on his original assertion that the world was populated by three billion people?
Does chewing gum pass through the human digestive system within 7 years?,Does chewing gum contain a protein known as C3?,Does chewing gum have a protein named phospholipase?,Does chewing gum contain a protein named hydroxymethyl phosphoribose?,Does chewing gum contain a protein named phosphoproteidol?
Was this estimate correct in that illegal immigration is costing us $130 billion a year?,"Is the amount of federal money spent to house, feed and give benefits to people who shouldn’t be in the country?",Does this figure also include benefits to people who have not entered the country?,Is there any indication that this figure was calculated correctly in the first place?
Did video capture a bridge explosion?,Does video include a bridge explosion?,Is there a bridge explosion?,Is there evidence indicating the bridge explosion was due to another attack?,Is there a video demonstrating an explosion on the bridge?,Were other actions on the bridge prior to an explosion?
Did the Washington Post fact-check a charge he opposed pre-existing condition protections for health insurance?,Did the Washington Post fact-check a charge he opposed pre-existing condition protections for health insurance?,Did the Washington Post fact-check any other claims related to pre-existing condition protections?
Is it true that the BJP is winning between 130 and 142 seats in the 2023 Karnataka assembly election?,Is the survey from the BBC accurate?,Has the BJP been winning more seats than any other political party?,Is the BBC survey valid?,Have the polls proved that the BJP is winning enough seats to win?
Did the two monks kidnap children in Delhi?,Would the two monks have been in prison?,Did the two monks have criminal backgrounds?,Would people who were kidnapped by the two monks have criminal record?,Would this situation be worse for the kidnapped children?
Did the White House issue an official statement on July 28?,Has there been any media coverage of the White House's statements about critical infrastructure?,Is the White House official statement about critical infrastructure?,Is the official White House statement about critical infrastructure unfounded?,Does the White House have a stated position on critical infrastructure?
"Did Providence alone spend $50,000 a year notifying the school department about residents in the state's sex offender registry?","Did Providence alone spent $50,000 a year notifying the school department about residents in the state's sex offender registry?","Did Providence alone spend $50,000 a year notifying the school department about residents in the state's sex offender registry?"
Was the 23-year-old Florida university student arrested for marijuana possession and coerced into acting as an informant; was she subsequently murdered?,Did drug dealers who discovered the 23-year-old's wire kill her?,Was the 23-year-old University student subsequently murdered for drug possession?
Is the Bundesregierung responsible for closing these 20 hospitalized 330 bed hospitals?,Was the average capacity of these hospitals in May 2020?,Is the average capacity of these hospitals in November 2020?,Was the average number of beds in these hospitals?,Was the total capacity of these hospital beds in May 2020?,Was the average bed size in these hospitals?
Are the manufacturer's instructions for staying home after getting a live-virus vaccine specific?,Is it obtrusive to mention that children should stay home for up to eight weeks after getting a live-virus vaccine?,Is this instruction related to children staying at home following the live-virus vaccine?,Is this recommendation based on advice given by manufacturers?
Did NASA scientists fudge the numbers to make 1998 the hottest year to overstate the extent of global warming?,Did NASA scientists know they were changing the numbers to make 1998 the hottest year?,Did NASA scientists change any of the numbers to make 1998 the hottest year?,Did NASA scientists make a mistake during 1998 to change the numbers of 1998?
Did Obama determine Social Security would not send checks through the US Post office?,Was the USPS not secure in 2013?,Was Obama deciding whether or not to implement the requirement for social security checks to be sent through the mail?,Is this statement correct?,Was the USPS not secure in 2013?,Have other federal agencies decided not to utilize the USPS?
Are there records of how much money is saved in this administration from federal budget?,Are the total benefits of these spending decisions known?,Will the resulting saving increase in general state income taxes be greater than the savings for the entire state's budget?,Will these increases result in state income taxes being reduced in some ways?
Did the teen get a prison sentence for swatting?,Did it result in a conviction for swatting?,Was the sentence for swatting specific?,Did any other penalties come with the sentence?,Did the teen serve his entire sentence on probation?,. Did the teen receive any monetary damages?
Do some French governments want Pädophilia banned?,Does France have laws against sexual violence and beheading?,Does France have laws against sex violence?,Was there legislation in France preventing Pädophilia in general?,Has Pädophilia been illegalized in France?,Does France have legislation against sex violence and beheading?
Is it true that eagles retreat at age 40?,Is it true that eagles retreat at age 40 in order to grow new beaks and talons?,Are there multiple aspects of a eagle retreating?,Is there any evidence that eagle retreating varies at different ages?,Is there any evidence that the eagle retreats at age 40 to grow new beaks and talons?
Has Telangana State Chief Minister decided to decide for a 24-hour lockdown on 26 May 2020?,Has the coronavirus increased in numbers in India since the election?,Is the coronavirus associated with Eid?,Has the 24 hour lockdown been implemented prior to Eid in Telangana?
Did black unemployment increase at the same rate as Reagan's?,Was black unemployment lower during Obama's presidency?,Did black unemployment drop during Reagan's presidency?,Did black unemployment drop between Reagan and Obama?,Did black unemployment increase in Reagan's presidency?,Did Black unemployment decrease during Reagan's presidency?,Is there evidence black unemployment decreased during Reagan's presidency?
Was COVID-19 a disease caused by viruses circulating in the environment?,Are those without the vaccine experiencing zero or mild symptoms?,Are individuals who had not received the vaccine vaccinated experiencing symptoms of COVID-19?,Has there been a study on the use of vaccines against COVID-19?,Have any studies studied the effectiveness of vaccines against COVID-19?
Does it mean that a thousand dollars never has to be paid back?,Is it true that a thousand dollars never has to be paid back?,Do it seem likely that a thousand dollars never has to be paid back?,Has the idea for the company gone too far?,Has any alleged success ever been reported in the press?
Did paper products sell out in stores in mid-November 2020?,Did paper products sell out in stores in March 2020?,Did cleaning supplies sell out in stores in mid-November 2020?,Did paper products sell out in stores in March 2020?,Did the inventory of cleaning supplies in mid-November 2020 reduce to the same levels as the March 2020 levels?
Are hundreds of farmers in protest against reducing the amount of emissions?,Are there signs on the street stating these protests are protests?,Do these protests have the legal right to be peaceful?,:) Was the protest in Amsterdam on a Saturday afternoon?,:) Are the protestors from the Netherlands in general protesting the government's plan to cut emissions?,:)?
Was this price drop for gas overnight?,Is the price drop by 30% a gallon?,Was gas price going down after this price drop?,Did everyone join in the protest to raise the price of gas?,Does this price drop come as a surprise?,Has this price drop remained constant?,Has this price drop lasted beyond 1997?
"Did the federal government only order BP to pay ""for one of those six segments"" of sand barriers for Louisiana?",Did the federal government not order BP to pay to do all six segments of sand barriers in Louisiana?,Was the federal government only order BP to pay to do one segment of sand barriers for Louisiana?
Did NASA find Mars by using Curiosity rover?,Did humans and people from both East and West have contact with Mars thousands of years ago?,Did Hindus and Americans have contact with Mars thousands of years ago?,Did Buddhism originate from Mars?,Did Hindu people have contact with Mars thousands of years ago?,Did Hindus and Muslims have contact with Mars thousands of years ago?
Did the nurse vaccinate the first two recipients of the Covid-19 vaccine in the UK?,Did the nurse who vaccinate the first two recipients have a background in medicine?,Did the nurse vaccinate the first two recipients of the Covid-19 vaccine in the UK live in the same area?
Did Biden announce his plans to reopen in-person learning in public schools in January 2021?,Was Biden also clear on when he will open in-person learning in public schools?,Will public schools reopen in-person learning in January 2021?,Was Biden’s announcement of his plans to reopen in-person learning in public schools confirmed?
Do individuals on Medicare Advantage plan have a typical higher premium than others?,Are average premiums for individuals on Medicare Advantage going to increase between $50 and $90 per month?,Is there a comparison between Medicare Advantage plans and Medicare Part D?,Does Medicare Advantage cover more than just Medicare Part D?,Does Medicare Advantage cover any other coverages?,Are there any questions about this information?
Did Hatch co-sponsor the 1993 health care bill that had an individual mandate?,Did Hatch co-sponsor the 1993 health care bill that had an individual mandate?,Did Hatch co-sponsor the 1993 health care bill that had an individual mandate?,Is there evidence to suggest the individual mandate in this bill was effective?
Was the majority of Crimean citizens not prepared to keep their citizenship?,Did the Crimeans agree to keep their Ukrainian citizenship?,Was the majority of Crimeans prepared to keep their citizenship?,Is the statistic true?,Is it in the tradition that all citizens of Crimea will choose to keep their citizenship?
Did the United Nations help and coach the caravan?,Did the United Nations pay for the work of the caravan?,Did the United Nations provide support for the caravan?,Did the United Nations cite any documentation in support of the caravan?,Has the United Nations provided any proof that its actions helped the caravan?,Has the United Nations been accused of engaging in crime by the CIA?,Does anyone in this country have an opportunity to appeal to the UN's actions?
Did Sachin Tendulkar meet with Narendra Modi in order to show support for the BJP in the general elections-2019?,Did Tendulkar personally meet with Modi to show his support in the general election-2019?,Did Tendulkar and his wife meet for religious reasons?,Did Tendulkar personally meet with Modi on religious grounds?,Did Tendulkar and his wife make other religious connections?
Did the amendment make any changes to the Motor Vehicles Act?,Was Gujarat the only state to have reduced fines under the Motor Vehicles Act?,Has any state in India reacted to the reduced fines?,"Have any states implemented any type of penalties under the Motor Vehicles Act, 2019?","Does any state in India have increased fines under the Motor Vehicles Act, 2019?"
Does public school funding in Texas grow three times as fast as the rate of enrollment?,Do Texas schools receive more funding than other states?,Do Texas public school budgets reflect the size of the state's budgets?,Does the state's budget share of state education spending in 2012 differ from previous years?,Does the percentage of Texas public school budget in 2012 increase three times as rapidly?
"Is it true that there is a total of 300,000,000 guns in this country?",Is it true that there are almost as many gun people in this country as there are gun people?,"Is it true that there is a total of 500,000 people in this country that own guns?",Are there any guns more prevalent than guns in this country?
Did any new schools in the Eastern Cape replace mud schools?,Are any of the new schools in the Eastern Cape built at high cost to the government?,Does this figure include schools in all of the provinces?,Is there any evidence indicating that this figure will be inaccurate?,Is there evidence that this figure is accurate?
Did any of the kids who took the vaccine die immediately?,Is there a clear record of kids who died immediately due to polio vaccination?,Is this data accurate?,Is there any evidence linking polio vaccination to polio deaths?,Is there a consensus from a CDC panel on the effectiveness of polio vaccination?
How many Milwaukee police officers live outside the city?,Are there a high number of migrant police officers?,Does the 1% of migrant police officers live in Milwaukee?,Does the average percentage of migrant police officers live outside the city?,Does a 1% increase in migrant police officers increase tax collection for Milwaukee?
Did Lysol list this virus as a virus to kill?,Do Lysol products often kill viruses?,Did Lysol not put a virus in Lysol to kill it?,Did Lysol relist this virus for a virus to kill?,Were Lysol products ever recalled after this statement?
Does the loon image appear on the one dollar coin because the original dies were lost?,Did the original dies features different designs?,Does the loon image appear on the one dollar coin because it was lost in transit?,Did any of the original dies feature different designs?,Does the loon image appear on all Canadian ones?
Do both videos show a meeting in 2022 between Putin and Kim?,Did the clips date after 2019?,Does the clip show a meeting between Putin and Kim in 2022?,Was the clip released in 2019 or 2019?,Did the clips either show Putin and Kim meeting in 2022 or the clip shows Putin and Kim meeting in 2022?
Do any of these trade agreements have trade surpluses?,Are there any other trade agreements that are similar to these?,Do any of these trade agreements contain free trade agreements?,Are all of these trade agreements regulated in any way?,Are any of these agreements governed by any government?,Do these trade agreements have a positive effect on individual countries?
Did a real Detroit News article published in 1933 describe Frida Kahlo as a “Wife of the Master Mural Painter”?,Did the Detroit News article say Frida Kahlo “Gleefully Dabbles in Art”?,Did the Detroit News article write this story in regard to a specific artist?
Did four soldiers die during trials of the vaccine?,Has one of the soldiers died?,Did any of the soldiers test the vaccine in any other locations?,Has any of the soldiers tested any other vaccines other than the vaccine?,Is COVID-19 vaccine known to be dangerous?,Did anyone involved in the trial die?
Did Milwaukee spend more than $22 million on settlements with litigants accusing police of misconduct?,Did Milwaukee spend less than $22 million on settlements with litigants accusing police of misconduct?,Is Milwaukee a city that has been sued for sexual misconduct?,Does Milwaukee have a policy that would punish a person with an abusive relationship?
Did a family of 3 die before testing positive for coronavirus?,Were there more deaths causing more deaths of coronavirus than before?,Did more deaths occur in the days after the coronavirus test?,Are there any other factors that could have contributed to the death rate in this family?
Did this teenager sell his kidney?,Did this teenager receive any payment in exchange for the kidney?,Did this teenager purchase any electronics in exchange for his kidney?,Did this teenager buy an iPhone or iPad?,Have these two products caused anyone to raise a legal issue?,Have any other recent controversies or controversy resulted from this situation?
Did Foot Locker donate to Black Lives Matter?,Did Foot Locker donate to Black Lives Matter?,Did Foot Locker donate to Black Lives Matter for their second time in 2015?,Did Foot Locker donate to Black Lives Matter for their third time in 2015?,Did Foot Locker donate to Black Lives Matter for their fourth time in 2015?
Did Pelosi purchase this stock?,Is this a stock in the company?,Did Pelosi buy foreign oil stock prior to the shutdown of the American pipeline?,Did Pelosi buy oil in the United States prior to the shutdown of the American pipeline?,Was Pelosi in possession of this stock during this period?
Are there more adults in Oregon who have never been tested for HIV?,Are there more adults in Oregon who have ever been tested for HIV?,Are there more adults in Oregon who have ever been tested for HIV?,Does this study indicate that there are fewer adults in Oregon than in the other states?,Are there fewer adults in Oregon than in the other states?
Did Volodymyr Zelenskyy earn $11 million per month in the 2011 fiscal year?,Has Zelenskyy made any significant donations to Ukraine's military?,Is Zelenskyy currently worth $596 million?,Has Zelenskyy ever received any political donations?
Do Ivermectin and hydroxychloroquine essentially kill COVID-19?,Does Ivermectin and hydroxychloroquine prevent COVID-19 from reoccurring?,Are Ivermectin and hydroxychloroquine available over the counter?
Did Hitler use this phrase in the speech?,Was the speech in 1936?,Did Hitler use this statement in the speech?,"Did Hitler say that this speech was a ""correction of a wrong""?",Did Hitler say this speech specifically?,Do I think Hitler was correct in this assertion?,Did this speech involve a quote from Hitler?
Did America have the highest COVID-19 rates in the world?,Did American rates of testing for COVID-19 increase dramatically in 2020?,Did other countries test for COVID-19 higher than US rates?,Do more U.S. cities have COVID-19 testing than any other country?,Did other countries test more residents for COVID-19 than U.S. testing rates in 2020?
Did this girl in need receive a $1 donation every time her photo was shared on Facebook?,Did the girl in need receive the donation?,Did this girl's photo appear frequently on Facebook?,Was this girl in need of a kidney transplant a victim of a viral image?,Was this person in need of a kidney transplant a victim of a viral image?
Does Florida's decision involve schools also taking closed days?,Does Florida's decision involve closing schools for 2 weeks as a hazard?,Is there an indication of the nature of this hazard?,Do all workplaces with 10 employees or more need to have a mandatory leave policy?,Did the Florida State Department of Health determine these measures?
Is there a correlation between viral photographs and a 'nun moth'?,Does one photograph accurately depict a 'nun moth'?,Did the photographs exist in the year 2023?,Could one photograph be considered accurate?,Is it possible to determine accurately if one photograph depicts a 'nun moth'?
Have people under DREAM Act legalized parents?,Have people under DREAM Act legalized parents?,Can people under DREAM Act sponsor parents?,Do people under DREAM Act have to be a naturalized citizen for sponsor parents?,Does the DREAM Act require a 21 year old to sponsor parents?
Did these Sikhs march in support of farmers protest in 2020?,Are the Sikhs in this video wearing police uniform?,Did the Sikhs in this video chant at the protest?,Are there images of the march or demonstration?,Was there a protest against this group?,Did the march take place during the protest?
Does this outbreak of Polio take place in Africa in September of 2020?,Can this outbreak of Polio happen in any country?,Does this outbreak of Polio take place in a country with a large population of people that are exposed to vaccination?,Is this outbreak of Polio occurring in any country that is immune to vaccines?,Does this outbreak of Polio occur in a country that is infected with malaria?
Did Rauner mandate abortions during all nine months of pregnancy?,Did Rauner make abortion costs comparable to non-abortion abortions?,Did Rauner allow abortions during the first ten weeks of pregnancy?,Is there any evidence that Rauner would permit abortions during the first ten weeks of pregnancy?
Did the price of oil and gas increase in 2008 and March 2022?,Does this prove that oil companies are price gouging?,Has a survey conducted by the authors found any evidence of this claim?,Has there been research that shows the price of oil and gas in 2008 and March 2022 is higher than that of gas and oil prices?
Did the person responsible for the hazardous materials charge an undisclosed amount?,Does the individual responsible for the hazardous materials charge a certain amount of money?,Were there other charges resulting from his hiring the campaign manager?,Are any charges for hazardous materials in this specific year due?,Are there any other charges resulting from this hiring the campaign manager?
Did I wear a uniform at this time?,Has everyone else at this time wore a uniform?,Is there evidence that I was wearing a uniform?,Are there any other members of Team USA wearing a uniform?,Are there any other members of Team USA wearing uniforms?,Is there any proof that there has been any other member wearing a country flag on the field?
Is President Trump arguing $15 per hour minimum wage is too much for essential workers?,Is President Trump saying 15 per hour minimum wage is too much for essential workers?,Is the minimum wage a major issue for many low-income workers?,Is President Trump being supportive of the minimum wage?,Is Trump's position on the minimum wage a major issue in the workplace?
Does Ivermectin work for COVID-19?,Did the COVID-19 PCR tests show false positives?,Are there any reliable answers to these questions?,Did COVID-19 vaccines not work?,Does Ivermectin have to be administered intravenously?,Are COVID-19 PCR testing and vaccines a waste of time?
Did it state that an individual may face up to six months in prison for not wearing a mask in Indiana?,Has this criminal offense ever been convicted in any other states?,Has this crime ever been prosecuted in any other states?,Does this sentence apply to anyone other than those who are convicted of this crime?
Did the APGA thumb-print the ballots in the November 6 Anambra election?,Did the APGA administer votes on the ballots?,Did APGA officers thumb-print the ballots?,Did the video depict any officials printing ballots for balloting?,Did the video show anyone other than officials printing ballots?
"Is it true that Klaus Schwab stated that “at least 4 billion nutillose Esser” must be eliminated by war, disease and hunger by 2050, leaving the world population at 1 million people?",Is it true that remarriage for a billion people is required?,Are these numbers realistic?,Are remarriages necessary to accomplish the goals?
Has the WHO given money for sharing a message to 15 friends on Whatsapp?,Is the WHO giving people money for sharing a message to 15 friends on WhatsApp?,Is there any evidence to suggest that this is true?,Has anyone had positive experiences with the program?,Is the WHO funding this program?
Did a reduction to only five polling locations come days before the election?,Was the reduction to only five polling locations done without proper notice to voters?,Was the reduction to only five polling locations done without any specific notice to voters?,Did a reduction to only five polling locations occur in the state?
Did President Obama say that the United States deserved being attacked by terrorists on 9/11 because we didn't respect Islam?,Was President Obama correct that the United States deserved being attacked by terrorists on 9/11 because we didn't respect Islam?,Does Obama believe that the U.S deserved being attacked by terrorists on 9/11 because we didn't respect Islam?
Does the GDP of America increase by a significant amount in 2017?,Are companies reporting the GDP of the United States on their balance sheets?,Is the U.S. GDP number calculated from the United States GDP per capita?,Is the U.S. GDP number based on the growth of the nation?
Can people infected with COVID-19 still undergo anaesthesia?,Is it still good to do something after 4 weeks?,Is it good for people to prevent anaesthesia?,Does the COVID-19 vaccine make these people better off than they should be?,Does this recommendation apply to adults?
Does the Dow Jones fall over 1000 in a day?,Does this president deserve a shot into the sun?,Has the Dow fallen that much in a day?,Does this president deserve to go into the sun?,Is the current President currently president?,Would this President receive a shot into the sun by this gun?
Did Trump raise his middle finger during his meeting with Prime Minister Gentiloni?,Does Gentiloni accept the reference to Mr. Trump raising his middle finger?,Has Trump made any comments regarding the incident?,Did Trump raise his middle finger during his meetings with Prime Minister Gentiloni?,Has Trump ever raised his middle finger at a G7 summit?
Is Trump about to resign as president?,Are Trump's plans for his resigning based on information he is given?,Are Trump's plans for his resigning based on information he is given in the context of a public announcement?,Is Donald Trump expected to resign within a month?
"Did Boebert's tweet occur prior to or around June 4, 2021?","Did Boebert tweet before June 4th, 2021?",Was Boebert's tweet relevant to the 2016 gun control bill?,"Did Boebert make statements prior to June 4, 2021?",Has a gun law in the United States made Boebert believe guns should not be legal?
Did Romney contribute trillions to the deficit?,Did Obama cut the deficit by 4 trillion?,Did Obama's deficit reduction plan create a rift in the system?,Did Romney's deficit reduction plan create a rift in the system?,Does Romney's deficit reduction plan produce a rift in the system?
Was Durham Revealed As a Russian Plotter to Help Hillary Clinton in the 2024 Election?,Was Durham Revealed As a Russian Plotter to Help Hillary Clinton in the 2024 Election?,Did Durham Reveal As a Russian Plotter to Help Hillary Clinton in the 2024 Election?
Did the match between India and Pakistan in the Asia Cup 2023 be abandoned?,Did Gavaskar criticise the BCCI for abandoning the match?,Was Gavaskar critical of the BCCI's decision for not playing the match?,Do Gavaskar supporters of cricket boycott the Asia Cup?,Did Gavaskar support the BCCI decision?
Does the City of Milwaukee employee who pays toward his or her pension pay toward the pension?,Is the City of Milwaukee employee who pays toward his or her pension not the police officer or firefighters?,Does the City of Milwaukee employee pay toward his or her pension while they serve?,Does the City of Milwaukee employee pay toward his or her pension while they work?
Do three of the ingredients in the drink mix up together or blend together?,Is the drink drink mix made up of four ingredients?,Is the drink mix mixed with one of these ingredients a weight loss product?,Did the drink mix together contain a high percentage of sugar and honey?,Did the drink mix containing only one ingredient burn belly fat in 2 weeks?
Are there over sixty million Americans who depend on Social Security?,Is more than one third of all seniors depend on Social Security for 90% of their income?,Is 80% of seniors in America dependent on Social Security for 90% of their income?,Is the percentage of seniors in America who depend on Social Security highest for 90 percent of their income?
Did they perform better than the previous administration against ISIS during this time period?,Are there any statistics to suggest they've performed worse than this administration?,Does this administration have any significant accomplishments against ISIS compared to their predecessor?,Is it the case that Obama has done better than this administration in regards to defending ISIS in this time period?
Did Biden walk away from the lectern during his first presidential news conference?,Did Biden briefly walk away from the lectern during his first presidential news conference?,Has Biden walked away from a lectern at press conferences in the past?,Did Biden walk away from a lectern during his first presidential press conference?
Did Trump administration create more jobs in 2020 than Obama did during 8 years in office?,Did Trump administration create more jobs than Obama did during 8 years in office?,Was Trump administration more productive than Obama on the economy in 2020?,Did Trump administration create more jobs than Obama did during 8 years in office?,Was Trump administration better on job creation than Obama did during 8 years in office?
Did the Finance Ministry say that inflation affected the rich more than the poor in 2022?,Did the Finance Ministry say that inflation affected the rich more than the poor in 2022?,Did the Finance Ministry say that inflation affected the rich more than the poor in 2022?,Did the Finance Ministry say that inflation affected the rich more than the poor in 2022?
Did he cut taxes by more than $600 million?,Was he governor at the time this statement was made?,"Is it true that he ""cut taxes by $600 million"" while governor?",Were any of these taxes passed back and forth between government and private entities?,Did he enact any of these tax cuts in 2010?
"In Pennsylvania, 1.8 million absentee ballots were mailed out and 2.5 million were counted. Is this figure inaccurate?",Did most of the absentee ballots go to the mail?,Is the accuracy of the number of absentee ballots calculated a rounded sum?
Was the Philippines unemployment rate lower under Marcos?,Is Marcos still in power?,Is Marcos still in power?,Is Marcos still in power?,Is Marcos still in power?,Is Marcos still in power?,Are the Philippines unemployment rates higher than normal?,Do these factors affect Marcos’ performance in this election?
Was the 2019 coronavirus in Wuhan?,Did the 2019 coronavirus originate in Wuhan?,Is there footage of Wuhan?,Is the Wuhan coronavirus vaccine available?,Is the Wuhan coronavirus vaccine available for purchase?,Is the Wuhan coronavirus vaccine available for purchase?
What year was the My First Hookah toy released for Christmas 2021?,Is this toy for sale?,"Did the ""My First Hookah"" toy have any original manufacturer?",Did this toy have any other components other than hookah?,Is this toy made of plastic?,Does the My First Hookah toy have any other manufacturing components?
Did test scores increase steadily for 40 years prior to NCLB and Race to the Top?,Were test scores steady until then?,Do test scores continue to increase?,Is there any ambiguity as to when and if test scores were stable prior to NCLB and Race to the Top?,"Can a school be classified as ""good"" or ""bad"" under a different law?"
Did Bush release 10 percent of his emails?,Has this number been accurate?,Has Bush ever released emails?,Did Bush ever release emails after his resignation?,Are these emails accessible?,Are any of these emails not accessible?,Does Trump support Jeb Bush's releasing of emails?,Did he release any emails in response to the releasing of emails?,Has Trump released any emails?
Has the USPS issued new Christmas stamps for 2021?,"Does the USPS issue new Christmas stamps for Eid, Diwali, Hanukkah, or Kwanzaa?",Is there any current pending Christmas stamps for 2021?,Has the USPS issued any new Christmas stamps for 2021?
Did Marcos Sr. criticize Aquino for politicking and discontinuing the operation of the Bataan Nuclear Power Plant?,Did Marcos Sr. tell Filipinos that the country will fall after 20 years?,Was Marcos Sr. warning Filipinos that the country will fall after 20 years?
Did the plane crash take place in 2017?,Did the plane crash result in a disaster?,Was it in a major city?,Were any of the service members killed in the crash?,Do any of the dead service members appear in this photo?,Did any of the dead service members have a service member on their body?
Do people need to fill out a special form to exchange Rs 2000 notes?,Do people need to present identification for the exchange process?,Will people have to complete the exchange form before they can exchange Rs 2000 notes?,Will people need to bring identification proof for the exchange process?,Will people have to bring cash to exchange Rs 2000 notes?
Did the hackers get more than 8.2 million patient records and a total of nearly 36 million prescriptions?,Was the number of prescriptions obtained by the hackers larger than the amount of racked patient records?,Does the hacker have sufficient information to provide this information?,Did the hackers obtain more than 8.2 million patient records?,Was this hack a targeted attack on Virginia?
Is it necessary to verify the name on a voter ID card?,Can you vote on December 7 without having my name found in the voter register?,Can I vote without my name in the voter register?,Is this a requirement to obtain the voter ID in order to vote?,Does the voter ID require me to visit a polling place and verify my name?
Is there one Republican that I can trust who will support climate change?,Would there be anyone whose only responsibility is to create and fund renewable energy?,Will the Republicans vote to combat climate change?,Is there an example of a Republican that could be the best person to test climate change policy?,Would the Republican who believes climate change is real vote in favor of addressing climate change?
Is there sufficient evidence for the claim that Sen. Hutchison's concession speech came at a time of less than 20% of precincts having been counted?,Did Hutchison take more than 20% of the vote?,Was Hutchison concerned that the turnout was below 20% for the concession speech?
"Did more than 250,000 people write 'FREEDOM' in response to a question about religion on the 2021 census?",Has the response to this question ever been used by a person?,Has this answer been used for this question?,Did the answer become recognized?,Did the respondent experience fear in this situation?
Are illegal deportations by migrants strafbar?,Does the text referring to the verdict by the Amtsgericht in Dresden refer to an actual ruling?,Can an illegal deportation by an alien be strafbar?,Did the website reference an actual ruling by the Amtsgericht in Dresden?
Has the MP BJP president stated that there are women in UP who give 52 babies in a year?,Has the MP BJP president stated there are women in UP who give 52 babies in a year?,Has the MP BJP president stated there are women in UP who give 52 babies in a year?
Did the planes crash during a special flight designed to reveal the sex of upcoming births?,Did the planes crash while flying during the special flight?,Did the planes crash during the special flight designed to reveal the sex of upcoming births?,Did the planes crash in the middle of a rainstorm?,Did the planes crash during a winter storm?
Did Charlie Crist raise taxes in 2009?,Will Charlie Crist have to raise taxes again?,Has the Republican President raised taxes before?,Do most Republicans support increasing taxes in this context?,Did the Republican president raise taxes in 2009?,Are any Republicans currently opposed to raising taxes?,Have any Republican lawmakers raised taxes in this context?,Will Crist continue raising taxes?
Did the city manage to reduce its street population by 40%?,"Did the city manage to get 12,000 people off the streets?",Was the project successful?,Did the increase in street population not decrease crime rates?,Are any negative side effects of the project?,Have any negative side effects of the project been reported?,-?
Did this election take place in a county where Trump won?,Did Trump get 62k votes in this county?,Did the election take place in a county that Trump is a Republican?,Was this election considered a close race?,Was Trump the last vote in this county to vote for Donald Trump?
Are scents of rosemary able to affect memory?,Does sniffing rosemary cause memory boosts?,Is there evidence to support the claim that smells of rosemary increase memory?,Is the amount of memory boost attributed to the scent of rosemary based on research?,Is there any evidence indicating that smells of rosemary increase memory?
Was 15 lakh doses of PVC administered to children in 2017?,Is PVC vaccine highly effective?,Were the results of the launch comparable to similar vaccines before?,Is PVC vaccine recommended for children based on the study?,Is the PCV vaccine administered in large numbers?,Is PCV vaccine used in the treatment of children?
"Did the State Department order a total of 160,000 Hazmat suits for the virus?",Does this amount of Hazmat suits have a direct correlation to the spread of the virus?,Does the report mention any other cases in which there was a direct relation between the Ebola outbreak and the Hazmat suits?
When was the portrait of Gandhi replaced on Indian currency notes?,Was the portrait of Gandhi replaced when this currency note was introduced?,Did this currency note have a lot of money in circulation before this currency note was introduced?,Did this currency note have a lot of money in circulation before this currency note was introduced?
Is Lord Wilson one of the UK's Supreme Court judges that voted to remain?,Is Lord Wilson one of the UK's Supreme Court judges that voted to leave?,Is it true that a majority of the UK's Supreme Court judges voted to remain?,Is Lord Wilson one of the UK's Supreme Court judges that voted to leave?
Did Clinton say in 2013 that she would like to see people like Donald Trump run for office?,Has Trump ever run for office?,Is Trump honest and able to be bought?,Have there been multiple instances of Donald Trump being honest in this context?,Can Trump run for office easily?,Is Hillary Clinton still a Clinton?,Did Trump vote against Hillary in 2013?
Is there evidence that Esshaki would allow insurance companies to kick people with a preexisting condition off their plans in the middle of a pandemic?,Is it accurate that Esshaki would allow insurance companies to kick people with a preexisting condition off their plans in the middle of a pandemic?
Did Nehru publicly slap Swami Vidyanand Videh in 1962?,Was Nehru slapped by Swami Vidyanand Videh for telling the Aryans were refugees in India?,Was Videh aware of Nehru's remarks?,Did Videh publicly slap Nehru after he publicly praised Aryans for their contributions to Indian history?
Do corporate profit margins have the highest point in 70 years?,"Are they charging the same for gas, medicine and groceries?",Does corporate profit margin have the greatest amount in 70 years?,Are corporate profit margins a significant part of consumers' purchasing choices?,Does corporate profit margin benefit consumers' wallets?,Are corporate profit margins significant and a source of profit for the U.S.?
Did Hannah Chanpong tweet that Hillary Clinton was dropping out of the 2016 presidential race?,Did Chanpong tweet that Hillary Clinton was dropping out of the 2016 presidential race?,Did Chanpong mention Clinton by name in her tweet?,Was Clinton mentioned in a tweet by Chanpong?,Did Chanpong use a tweet to announce Clinton dropped out of the 2016 presidential race?
Can government pay Rs. 5000 to those who are vaccinated?,Do the government pay Rs. 5000 to those who are vaccinated. Does the government give Rs. 5000 to those who are vaccinated?,Does the government give Rs. 5000 to those who are vaccinated?
Did the footage of the aliens have an effect on ISRO?,Did the footage make it to the moon?,Are they presently exploring the moon?,Have any other observatories been discovered on the moon?,Has this discovery resulted in any major changes in astronomy?,Were the reports based on an official estimate?
Did the FDA remove THC from testing for drug use before August 30?,Was it announced that this decision was made by the FDA based upon science?,Does this move directly affect the testing process for the drug?,Did this decision affect testing for the drug?,Did this move eliminate the testing process for THC?
Did the tax credit for electric cars in Georgia decrease?,Are there any other facts that support this assertion?,Is the electric car tax credit in Georgia now abolished?,Did the imposed annual registration fee on electric cars in Georgia come into effect July 1st?,Has the tax credit on electric cars in Georgia decreased significantly since it was eliminated?
Did Biden say Joe Biden has suffered 3 strokes?,Did Biden claim Joe Biden is out of the running?,Did Biden quote Biden's statements in a book?,Is Biden's statement disputed by Biden's family and friends?,Did Biden and Biden's family and friends agree with Biden's statements?
"Was this man arrested for their ""cannibal diet""?",Did they claim to have lost this much weight with this diet?,Is this diet legal in Zambia?,Have they confirmed this claim?,Have thimze accused this person of being a nutritionist?,Was this person arrested for promoting his diet?
Did this sign warn motorists not to drive after five pints of beer?,Did this sign encourage motorists to have five pints of beer before driving?,Was this sign posted in Ireland at the time of this sign?,... Did this sign warn motorists not to drive after five pints of beer?
Can an ad campaign do 'fact-checks' about one's subconscious?,Can a beer advertisement attempt to 'hack your dreams'?,Does this claim inherently involve a specific type of technology?,Can an ad campaign attempt to 'hack your dreams'?,Does this claim apply to a particular type of technology?
Did the number of political arrests in Cuba increase between 2015 and 2010?,Did there more arrests in 2015 than 2010?,"Was the total number of political arrests in the year 2015 more than 2,000?",Was this trend at a level that was not seen in 2010?,Was the number of arrests in Cuba in 2010 lower than in 2015?
Was BJP expecting to be elected before 2014 general elections?,Did Gadkari make statements on a specific subject during the 2014 general elections?,Did Gadkari receive any honorific declarations prior to the 2014 general elections?,Did Gadkari make an attempt to address the issue of alleged wrongdoing in his statement?
"What percentage of these loans went to SC, ST and women borrowers?",Did most of these loans go to individuals with disabilities?,Did more loans go to all borrowers than individuals with disabilities?,"Was there a total of 54,733 loans under the Stand Up India mission?",Did the total number of loans reach the estimated count?,Was there a specific date for the completion of these loans?
Did the State remove Chris Schmitt Jr. from the board?,Did the state remove Chris Schmitt Jr.?,Did the state remove Chris Schmitt Jr. despite having the authority to do so?,Did Chris Schmitt Jr. remain on the board for an extended period?,Did the state remove Chris Schmitt Jr. at some point during this period?
Was Khalid Sheik Mohammed alone subject to waterboarding 183 times?,Did Khalid Sheik Mohammed ever meet the minimum waterboarding requirement?,Did Khalid Sheik Mohammed ever have to endure the egregious punishment of waterboarding?,Exactly how many detainees did Khalid Sheik Mohammed subject to waterboarding?
Did the Asian Development Bank give a development assistance to the Philippines?,Is the Asian Development Bank giving the Philippines a development assistance?,Have the Philippine officials received any aid from ADB?,Can the Philippine officials receive financial assistance from ADB?,Are the Philippine officials receiving any assistance from ADB?,Are there currently any ADB officials in the Philippines?
Is the age at which people in physically demanding occupations will receive benefits raised?,Does Doherty cite data indicating that a higher age would make people in physically demanding occupations not eligible for Social Security benefits?,Can a higher age in people working in physically demanding occupations still be eligible for Social Security benefits?
"Did the graphic mention ""One colony, One goat"" during the Bakrid festival?","Did the graphic mention ""One colony, One goat"" in the context of the Bakrid festival?","Did the graphic mention ""One colony, One goat"" during the Bakrid festival?","Did the graphic mention ""One colony, One goat"" in the context of the Bakrid festival?"
"Did the authors claim that ""vaccinated people under 60 in England are dying at twice the rate of unvaccinated people the same age""?",Does this claim directly affect vaccine compliance?,Did this claim apply to specific vaccines?,Is this claim related to the majority of deaths in England from illness related to a vaccine?
How many more expectant mothers would have delivered without the help of medical attendants in 2016 compared to the number of births requiring medical attention?,Is this amount of births by medical attendants likely to have doubled compared to previous years?,Are there a significant number of medical attendants employed by health care facilities?
Would a ballot measure in California extend abortions up to 9 months?,Would the measure be unconstitutional for women?,Would this measure affect a lot of women?,Would this proposal not affect a lot of women?,Does this measure look likely to pass?,Will this measure have any effect on abortion rates?
Has video circulated claiming to show Taliban jumping on trampoline?,Has video circulating claiming to show Taliban jumping on trampoline been released?,Has video of Taliban jumping on trampoline circulated?,Was video of Taliban jumping on trampoline released in March 2020?,Has video of Taliban jumping on trampoline circulated since March 2020?
Has there been an increase in the number of people that move to Texas every day?,Are these people not being illegally removed by federal immigration authorities?,Is this move part of a larger migrant problem or a larger migrant problem?,Does the average monthly population in this state differ from the average across the entire United States?
Is the rhino erected after teenagers feed it Viagra?,Was it erected for more than 96 hours due to the teenagers feeding it Viagra?,Does the rhino need to rest between feedings to erection?,Is this a rare condition for rhinos and is this an isolated incident?
Is the Black buying up to 50% of all voluntary transactions?,Did black buying up to 50% of all voluntary transactions occur in the US?,Would black purchasing up to 50% of all voluntary transactions occur in the United States?,Did black purchasing increase in the US a much greater rate than any other country?,Did the majority of white buying in the US happen in the 1990s and 2000s?,Did black buying in the US increase in the 2000s and 2000s?
"Did Kyiv cut off gas in territories of Ukraine that are controlled by Ukraine on May 23, 2022?",Did Kyiv cut gas off to Ukraine only?,Was the gas cut off by Kyiv limited to Ukraine only?,Did Kyiv cut off gas in territories of Ukraine controlled by Ukraine or both?
Would the number of Corona-Flalls in August 2021 be four times as high as in August 2020?,Is there a significant increase in the amount of Corona-Flalls during August 2021?,Does a greater number of Corona-Flalls occur during August 2021?
Was this a grocery store?,Did these products appear separately from each other?,Did all of these items belong to only one brand?,Was this a shopper's choice?,Did this shopper specifically purchase any of these items?,Was this a general store only?,Did this shopper specifically use these products for more than one purchase?
"Did Tim Cook tweet that ""now pay 30%"" in response to Elon Musk?","Did Cook tweet that ""now pay 30%"" in response to Elon Musk?","Did Cook respond to Musk's tweet with an original quote that reads ""now pay 30%""?",Did Cook reply to Musk's tweet in response to the original quote?
Did the video contain a caption?,Did the video contain a name?,Did the women receive any injuries?,Did the women travel by sea?,Did the video contain pictures?,Did the women ever return to their homes?,Did the women survive the incident?,Do you think people were swept away by waves during this incident?
Did the 8 Springboks not kneel for the BLM?,Did the 8 Springboks actually kneel in support of the BLM?,Did the 8 Springboks not kneel in support of the BLM after the incident?,Did the 8 Springboks personally fire their support to the BLM after the incident?
Would you be fined under the Equality Act 2010 if you disagree with someone?,Are there exceptions to the Equality Act?,Will challenging someone violate the Equality Act?,Are there other legal rules in the Equality Act?,Would anyone be fined if they disagree with someone?,Would the Equality Act apply to any circumstances?
Does eating fruit syrup every 15 minutes for an hour help with vomiting or diarrhea?,Is it necessary to eat fruit syrup every 15 minutes?,Does eating fruit syrup before a meal help with vomiting or diarrhea?,"Alternatively, is it safe to consume fruit syrup before meals?",Do people who are dealing with diarrhea prefer fruit syrup?
Do India have two vaccines that have been made in India?,Have either of the vaccines that have been made in India been tested on people?,Are any of the vaccines that have been made in India tested in the US?,Is there any other evidence that India uses a vaccine?,Can I get a vaccine in the US?
"Was there evidence that Hillary Clinton was forced to return an estimated $200,000 in white house china, furniture and artwork?",Did Clinton require her replacement of stolen items?,Did Clinton pay for these stolen items in the future?,Did the stolen items need to be replaced?,"Was the White House china, furniture and artwork stolen?"
Do elderly people with financial difficulties qualify for a Medicare Flex Card?,Does it apply to prescription medications and dental services?,Can people 65+ who have financial difficulties qualify for a Medicare Flex Card?,Can people 65+ who have financial difficulties qualify for a Medicare Flex Card?,Is it true that most people with financial difficulty can qualify for a Medicare Flex Card?
Are there greater chances of a motorcyclist aged 67 in Northern Ireland dying in a motorcycle collision compared to being affected by COVID-19?,Was there any evidence that COVID-19 will cause greater mortality for motorcyclists aged 67 in Northern Ireland?,Was the likelihood of an accident and the COVID-19 linked death higher in Northern Ireland?
Does Ausley vote to tax your savings?,Did Ausley vote to tax your savings six times in total?,Did Ausley vote for the income tax?,Was Ausley against any specific tax legislation?,Would Ausley vote to tax your savings?,Did Ausley vote against this tax legislation?,"Did Ausley vote for ""all"" tax initiatives?"
Did Biden leak the names of SEAL team 6 families to al-Qaida?,Is Biden in no way liable for the leak?,Did Biden leak the names of SEAL Team 6 families to al-Qaida?,Do you think Biden is inherently dangerous?,Has any previous controversy been noted for his actions?
Was widespread primary election fraud reported in multiple states?,Does this study imply widespread primary election fraud in all states?,Does this study support Hillary Clinton?,Was any primary election fraud ruled in this study?,Can this study be used as a defensible reason for voter fraud?,. Was this study based on the National Polling Act?,. Did this study use all the other primary election fraud data in the study?
Are there multiple groups that have spent more money against Baldwin than any other Democrat?,Do any other candidates have more money than Baldwin?,Have any other Republican incumbents lost money as a result of their race?,Do any other Democratic incumbents have more money than Baldwin?,Did any of these candidates lose more money to Baldwin than any of their other candidates combined?
Did Rajesh Pilot pilot the IAF plane that bombed Mizoram in 1966?,Did Rajesh Pilot pilot the IAF plane that bombed Mizoram in 1966?,Does this statement match the information given in the article?,Did Rajesh Pilot fly the IAF plane that bombed Mizoram in 1966?
Did Kang Kyung-wha win the ILO chief bid?,Did Kang Kyung-wha receive only one vote from Gambia?,Did Kang Kyung-wha receive votes from all countries in the ILO?,Did Kang Kyung-Wha lose the ILO chief bid?
Did Trump amend Executive Order 13223?,Did Trump amend Executive Order 13223?,Are there any records regarding what the new Executive Order 13223 is?,"Would Trump consider a ""mini draft"" after a withdrawal?",Are any of the retired Air Force pilots affected by the new Executive Order 13223?
Did television news coverage of the 2007 Malibu fire display risqué closed captioning?,Were the captioning techniques used in the 2007 Malibu fire satirical?,Were the captioning techniques used in the 2007 Malibu fire satirical?,Were the captioning techniques used in the 2007 Malibu fire satirical?
Do vaccinations constitute a cause of death if you die within 20 days of testing positive?,Do vaccines inherently cause death?,Are vaccines considered a cause of death in regards to COVID-19?,Has this comment been verified to be accurate?,Do vaccines have a link to deaths?
Would this money if used for other purposes be sitting in this account?,Is there a list of what uses this money may be used for?,Is the $1.5 billion available to the public at the moment?,Is this money not available to the public at the moment?,Are there fees associated with this account?
Is this a public announcement?,Will any other NFL teams televise the national anthem?,Will NFL broadcast any other NFL programs during the 2018 season?,Will any other NFL stations broadcast the national anthem?,Will NFL cancel any existing NFL programs to allow new teams to broadcast the national anthem?
Did the 'Seven Deadly Sins' reduce the violent crime rate?,Was the 'Seven Deadly Sins' enforced in Atlanta when the violent crime rate was higher?,Has there been a decrease in the violent crime rate in Atlanta since the 'Seven Deadly Sins'?
Was it the summer of 1540 the Bodensee was engulfed?,Was it at that time that aircraft and cars were becoming more efficient due to CO2 emissions?,Was it at that time that CO2 emissions were greater than usual?,Was CO2 more common in vehicles than in aircraft?,Did the number of passengers in private aircraft have increased significantly during this time period?
"Does inflation reduction act increase taxes for those making less than $400,000?","Does inflation reduction act increase the tax rate for those making less than $400,000?","Would the inflation reduction act increase the tax rate for those making less than $400,000?","Has inflation reduction act increased the tax rate for those making less than $400,000?"
Was the U.S. Coast Guard called to rescue three people who had been stranded for 33 days on a deserted Bahamian island?,Did the U.S. Coast Guard rescue the three people?,Did the people have life jackets?,Has the Coast Guard rescued any other people stranded on a deserted Bahamian island?
Has hate crimes against American Muslims and mosques tripled after Paris and San Bernardino?,Has the population of mosques increased as a result of this increase?,Has this increased mass violence been largely responsible for these incidents?,Has the number of crimes against mosques and other religious venues risen as a result of this increase?
Is it true that £37 billion was found to pay Serco for a failed track and trace system?,Was the failed track and trace system covered by the report?,Did the report identify any other causes of Serco's failure of the track and trace system?,Is the report sourced to the Government of the United Kingdom?
Is the number of jobs destroyed by BDO by revoking the permit?,Will the jobs be created from the termination of this pipeline?,Is the cost of destroying these jobs due to the closure of the pipeline outweighed by the estimated benefits to millions of Americans?,Does this pipeline threaten the very existence of the United States?
Does the bill extend the life of Social Security by 75 years?,Is the bill in line with the federal projections for the program?,Will Whitehouse's plan endow Social Security with assets sufficient to last 75 years?,Will the bill pass the Senate?,Did Whitehouse support the bill?,Was the bill introduced for a vote?
Do images of Palm Beach and Sydney show a global sea level rise?,Does the evidence support the argument that global sea level rise is a myth?,Does the evidence that a global sea level rise exists support the argument that global sea level rise is a myth?,Are there photographic examples of the argument that global sea level rise is a myth?
Did PHE release a report revealing 62% of Covid-19 deaths are people who have been vaccinated?,Did PHE release a report revealing 62% of Covid-19 deaths are people who have been vaccinated?,Did PHE release a report revealing 62% of Covid-19 deaths are people who have been vaccinated?
Did Miami-Dade Mayor Carlos Gimenez take a pay raise in 2016?,Did Gimenez approve a 67% raise in his salary?,Has Gimenez earned more money since 2016 than all other big city mayors combined?,Does Gimenez receive a pension increase?,Has Gimenez made a profit from his salary increase in 2016?,Did Gimenez's budget deficit have a negative impact on his salary raises in 2016?
Does the sea level haven’t changed?,Has the elevation of the Statue of Liberty changed since 1920?,Was the Sea level higher in 1920 than 2020?,Has the elevation of the Statue of Liberty changed since 1920?,Did the sea level change in 2020?,Has the elevation of the Statue of Liberty decreased in 2020?
Is there a claim that Perry advocated for liquidating the state rainy day fund in 2007?,Were Perry’s positions based on a statutory provision of the legislature that the rainy day fund should be liquidated?,Are Perry's positions based on an administrative policy regarding the state rainy day fund?
Did the jobs lost during Obama’s first term belong to women?,Did the jobs lost during Obama’s first term belong to women?,Did women comprise 92 percent of the jobs lost during Obama’s first term?,Did 92% of the jobs lost during Obama’s first term belonged to women?
Are Texas abortion statistics reliable?,Is Texas abortion rates above or on par with national averages?,Is Texas abortions reported in every state?,Is it true that Texas abortion figures are accurate?,Is there any evidence of a statewide abortion trend?,Is the evidence cited accurate?
"Did Obama give $60,000 to the Kenya opposition campaign?",Did Obama contribute a large sum to the Kenyan opposition campaign?,Did Obama support Odinga as an opponent?,Did Odinga donate funds to the Kenyan opposition campaign?,Did Obama support Odinga in the Kenyan election?,Did Obama receive any income from the Kenyan opposition campaign?,Did Odinga endorse Obama?
Is it true that PM Modi wears suits worth Rs 9 - 10 lakh?,Was the garment worn by martyrs wrapped in carton boxes?,Was the garment worn by PM Modi described in terms of its price?,Are the articles of worship wrapped in carton boxes?,Does the attire worn by the prime minister of India show that she is wealthy?
"Did the sperm bank make an assumption that Janitor fathered 20,000 children over 20 years?","Has Janitor ever been accused of fathering 20,000 children during the 20 year period?",Is Janitor currently married?,"Did sperm bank make the assumption that Janitor fathered 20,000 children?",Has the sperm bank been able to confirm this?
Did the video show the eruption of the volcano in June 2023?,Did the video show the eruption of the volcano in June 2023?,Did the video show the eruption of the volcano in June 2023?,Is there any evidence that the video shows the eruption of the volcano?,Has the volcano erupted since the video was recorded?
Did Melania Trump say under oath she graduated from college with a bachelor's degree in architecture?,Did Melania Trump lie under oath about her graduation in 2013?,Did Melania Trump lie under oath in 2014 when asked about her education?,Did Melania Trump lie under oath under oath in 2015 or 2016 when asked about her education?
"How many crores is planned for the recapitalization of PSBs by budget, recapitalization bonds and raising capital from market?",Is it expected to recapitalize PSBs by raising capital from market?,Do the new accounts of the recapitalized banks account for 5% of all GDP?,Are there any provisions in the new accounts pertaining to recapitalization of banks?,Are there any provisions in the new accounts pertaining to recapitalization of banks in general?
Is malnutrition so severe that it causes a disease or prevents elderly people from getting better?,Is over 50% of hospitalized seniors suffering from malnutrition?,Are some hospitalized seniors suffering from malnutrition?,Do there even exist stats on the malnutrition rate among hospitalized seniors?
Is there evidence that Texas is a higher unemployment than any other state?,Do a majority of these states have lower unemployment rates than Texas?,Are these states lower unemployment than Texas?,Is Mississippi one of these states with more minimum wage jobs?,Can all states have low unemployment?,Is Texas one of these states with lower unemployment rates?
"Did this ad offer to pay ""minority actors"" to hold signs at a Trump rally?",Was this ad advertised on Craigslist?,"Was the Trump rally in Tulsa, Oklahoma on June 20, 2020?",Are these events typically held at this location?,Did a majority of this rally have white speakers?
Was the debris part of a Chinese rocket falling to Earth?,Did the debris land on land?,Did China have a rocket this heavy during this incident?,Did this event not happen on Earth?,Were any reports of debris landing on a country's coast?,Would this event have required more testing?,Did a Chinese rocket fall to earth in early May 2021?
Is it true that most remittances sent back are from immigrants?,Is the amount of remittances sent back by the diaspora significantly greater than the amount sent back by the country as a whole?,Is there any evidence of an increase in remittances among immigrants in Nigeria?
Did $1 million go to the Clinton Foundation?,Did Hillary Clinton donate in excess of $1 million in 2015?,Did Hillary Clinton donate in excess of $1 million in 2015?,Did Hillary Clinton donate in excess of $1 million in 2015?,Did Hillary Clinton donate more in 2015 than in 2015?,Did Hillary Clinton contribute in excess of $1 million in 2015?
Did the letter refer to a specific amount of money in the settlement?,Did the letter show which services and procedures were followed for this relief?,Did it describe any specific damage caused by this relief?,Were the damages for this relief measurable?,Did any of the victims sustain serious injury?,Did this benefit affect any of the victims who had received this relief?
Did plastic bags filled with gas in Mexico in 2019?,Did plastic bags filled with gas in the U.S. in 2021?,Was this similar to the photo of plastic bags in Mexico in 2019. Would this photo in 2021 be different from the photo in 2019?,Was this comparable to a photo of plastic bags filled with gas in 2019?
Does the German Government plan to prosecute parents who do not want their children to immunize against Covid-19?,"Can children be protected against Covid-19 by paying fines, bullying, assault, and pathogen vaccination?",Does the German Government plan to prosecute parents who do not want their children to immunize against Covid-19?,Can children be prevented from immunizing against Covid-19 by immunize?
Is it true that Gov. Robert Bentley expanded participation in Virginia early childhood programs by nearly 40 percent?,Does it say he expanded participation in Virginia early childhood programs by nearly 40 percent?,Is it true that the governor of Virginia expanded participation in early childhood programs by nearly 40 percent?,Is the alleged governor of Virginia a governor of Virginia?
Was the video shot at Tinubu's London home in October?,Was Tinubu doing any training on October 3?,Was the workout a long or short workout?,Did Tinubu finish his workout the day of his interview?,Has Tinubu ever said he was working out at this time?
Did Ryan's plan have a plan to allow Romney to pay less than 1% in taxes each year?,Does Ryan's plan support Romney paying less than 1% in taxes each year?,Is Ryan's plan based on a tax reduction plan?,Would it be beneficial to Romney to pay less than 1% in taxes?,Would the plan also create a tax relief?
Is it true that Ukraine's president owns $35 million in a Florida home?,Is it true that President of Ukraine has $1.2 billion in a overseas bank account?,Are any of the properties owned by the president of Ukraine?,Did any of these properties ever close?,Is it true that Ukraine's president has a $35 million home in Florida?
Does the county have tax revenue from new development that costs more than half a percent more to provide services?,Is the increase in service costs associated with new development associated with the increased cost of new development?,"Did the County report this increase in service costs, in general?",Did the county's cost increase from new development directly translate to a decrease in services?
Did Typhoon Molave make landfall in Vietnam?,Did the landfall occur in October 2020?,Did Typhoon Molave have a direct impact on Vietnam?,Did Typhoon Molave make landfall in Japan?,Has Typhoon Molave caused any injuries?,Are there any other Typhoons currently making landfall in Vietnam?
Is Donald Trump’s latest set of sanctions against companies and countries benefiting North Korea include all countries but Russia making shipments to North Korea?,Has Donald Trump excluded all countries except for Russia from his sanctions?,Has Donald Trump excluded all companies except for Russia from his sanctions?,Does the Trump administration have any idea where the Trump administration has been based?
Did the SNP fail to spend the £139 million of funding?,Did the SNP fail to allocate any of the funding that was previously used?,Do the SNP budgets spend £449 million of funding in total?,Is the SNP responsible for most of the funding that is currently used?,Is there information relating to the allocation of the SNP funding?
Is there a photograph of Jonathan from 1886?,Does Jonathan have teeth?,Is there proof of Jonathan's age?,Can you name the shortest known land animal?,Can there be proof of Jonathan's age?,Has Jonathan ever been seen?,Will Jonathan die of old age in 2020?,Can people identify Jonathan's age from other records?
"Did Hillary Clinton illegally donate $700,000 to the political campaign of the wife of the FBI director whose investigation into her use of a private email server was underway?","Did Hillary Clinton illegally donate $700,000 to the political campaign of the wife of the FBI director whose investigation into her use of a private email server was underway?",Did Hillary Clinton illegally donate to the campaign of the wife of the FBI director whose investigation into her use of a private email server was underway?
Are there records of the number of people who died of heart related issues in Swindon?,Was the percent that died of heart related issues higher than the population average?,Was the population average for people who died of heart related issues in the town of Swindon in 2021?,Was the percentage of heart related deaths in the town of Swindon in 2021 lower than the average?
Did Section 1325 of U.S. immigration law take effect in 1929?,Was a segregationist responsible for the passage of the law in 1929?,Was the law passed before or after the abolition of segregation?,Did a segregationist draft the immigration law?,Was a segregationist responsible for passing the law in 1929?
Did Kenyans live abroad vote in Australia?,Does Kenya have a parliamentary representative?,Would this have impacted the election?,Were votes by Kenyans in this country conducted by a third party?,Will a fourth party participate in the election in 2016?,Would it impact the election in 2016?
Did Obama acknowledge that his immigration policies violated law?,"Did Obama use words like ""Immigration edict"" to reword the immigration policies?",Did Obama acknowledge that the immigration policy was unlawful?,Did Obama acknowledge that the immigration policy was illegal?,Did Obama acknowledge that the immigration policy was unconstitutional?
Did it increase in violence related to drone strikes in Yemen?,Did all drone strikes affect the population in Yemen?,Was the population level increased by drone strikes?,Does this have an effect on how U.S. will respond to an upcoming attack?,Does this effect differ by country?,Do any U.S. officials report any military action?
Was Rush Limbaugh receiving the Presidential Medal of Freedom in 2020?,Was Rush Limbaugh receiving the Presidential Medal of Freedom in 2020?,Did the Presidential Medal of Freedom previously be awarded to Rosa Parks and Maya Angelou?,Did Limbaugh receive the Presidential Medal of Freedom in 2020?,Did Limbaugh claim that receiving the Presidential Medal of Freedom was less of an honor in 2020?
Has the increase in jobs been attributed to the emergence of GM/Chrysler?,Are there any other automotive companies that are expanding?,Has the number of jobs created increased because of GM/Chrysler's return?,Is GM a major force in the US auto industry?
Was this teen sentenced for a crime?,Did this teen commit an offense?,Did this teen cross state lines to get abortions?,Did this teen go to jail for abortion?,Did this teen commit an offense for crossing state lines?,Did this teen get a sentence for a crime?
Did some democrats win in states with mail in voting?,Did the majority of democrats winning in states with mail in voting win by 11/09/09?,Does?
Are one in two college graduates unable to find a job right now?,Does one out of every two graduates need to find a job?,Was there a correlation between one out of every 2 graduates and job failure?,Is there data to support these claims?,Is there evidence to support this claim?
Would an HB ban making semi-automatic weapons legal?,Will the HB ban make a significant change to gun laws in America?,Would 150 million Americans be turned into felons after the HB ban takes effect?,Will the HB ban make an enormous impact on gun laws in America?,Will the HB ban turn 150 million Americans into felons after the HB ban?
Has there been any video of this execution?,Was the video of this execution taken before the infected man was executed?,Was the video on this post released?,Is there any evidence that the execution was planned?,Is there any proof of this fact?,Is the execution video available?,Do you have any evidence that the execution was planned?
Was the banner China erected in Ladakh in June 2020?,Was the banner China erected in Ladakh in June 2020?,Was this banner erected in Ladakh?,Was China's Fight To Win banner in Ladakh in June 2020?,Did the Fight To Win banner in Ladakh have any signs of Chinese origin?
Is it true that the USDA is not predicting that a dozen eggs will cost $12 by fall 2022?,Are there any additional factors that may be increasing the cost of eggs?,Has the government done a proper amount of research to determine exactly how much money is being spent on egg production?,Is it true that the USDA is not predicting an increase in the cost of eggs?
Did garbage piles occur after Donald Trump's rally?,Is there any evidence that trash arose from Trump's rally?,Is this video available for download?,Does Trump's rally cause any type of debris?,Is there evidence that garbage was left behind after Trump's rally in Orlando?
Is I-205 already carrying more traffic than I-5?,Does I-205 run through I-35?,Does I-205 already carry more traffic than I-5?,Are I-205 and I-35 separate?,Is I-205 located in my district?,Is I-205 a major highway?
Was a musket and 24 bullets a restriction?,Did the Second Amendment refer to a well-regulated militia in 1791?,Do any amendments provide for a restriction on a militia in 1791?,"If not, why was the restriction on a militia in 1791?",Is there evidence that a prohibition on a militia in 1791 was imposed?
Did Gaetz and Cruz vote to make paid sick leave illegal?,Did Gaetz and Cruz vote against paid sick leave in the senate?,Did Gaetz and Cruz take their payed sick leave to self-quarantine?,Did Gaetz and Cruz take their payed sick leave in total?
Can you say that the world's first anal birth was after a woman's ovaries were transplanted into a man?,Can you say that a gay couple celebrated the world's first anal birth after a woman's ovaries were transplanted into a man?
"Did Biden propose killing over 600,000 jobs from fracking?",Did Biden not say if he would kill these jobs?,Did Biden actually slam fracking as a major source of pollution?,Did Biden talk about eliminating fracking in an ad?
Has Holding voted to deny coverage?,"Has Holding voted to deny coverage to the 300,000 people in the district who have pre-existing conditions?","Is there sufficient data to infer that Holding voted to deny coverage to the 300,000 people in the district who have pre-existing conditions?"
Was a stuntman killed during the 1959 filming of the Chariot race scene?,Is a stuntman's death in the 1959 Ben Hur film left in the final cut?,Was the stuntman's death left in the final cut for this film?,Were there any other mentions of stuntmen in the 1959 filming of Ben Hur?
Was there a retrospective study that looked at blood levels in veterans that committed suicide?,Was 70 percent of the blood of veterans that committed suicide tested positive for THC?,Describe the research findings. Did the research findings lead to the finding that 70 percent of suicide veterans had THC?,Does THC present in plasma from veterans in the general population affect suicide rates?
Did 40% of the 100 House seats go uncontested every year?,Is the percentage of uncontested Senate seats high or low?,Does this percentage represent a significant amount of the seats that do not go uncontested?,Are all state senate seats uncontested each year?,Does each state house seat have a quorum for elections?
"Did 1 in 1,000 children with COVID-19 die?","Is 1 in 1,000 children vaccinated against COVID-19 in danger of dying?",Is there any evidence that the risk of death from COVID-19 vaccine is higher?,Are any other possible causes of death besides COVID-19?
Did the man collapse during the time period mentioned?,Did the man and his wife have children?,Was the man on dialysis during this time period?,Is there evidence of a coma?,Is there any evidence of a suicide?,Is there any evidence of suicide in this situation?
Did Ryan support banning fracking on public lands?,Did Ryan support banning fracking on public lands?,Did Ryan support banning fracking in general?,Did Ryan support banning fracking in public lands?,Did Ryan support banning fracking in general?,Did Ryan support banning fracking in public lands?
"Are people getting $8,400 to test solar panels?","Is there proof the government is giving people $8,400 to test solar panels?","Is the government giving people $8,400 to test solar panels?",Was the government funding the Solar Panel Testing Initiative?,Was the government funding the Solar Panel Testing Initiative?
Is Alaska the only state where Alaskan residents get a $200 a year benefit?,How many people in Alaska receive this benefit every year?,Is the amount that an Alaskan receives per year the same as the amount for felons?,Can Alaska residents with a criminal record receive these benefits?
Are the United States and China spending more combined than the 16 biggest military budgets in the world?,Do these 16 largest military budgets spend more than the United States?,Are all 16 largest military budgets in the world spending more than the United States?,Do all 16 largest military budgets in the world have more than the United States?
Was there a Democratic vote in this Congress?,Was the Social Security cost of living allowance at 2.8%?,Did the Democratic congressional majority vote against a 2.8 percent increase in Social Security cost of living allowance?,Did Congress have other Democratic votes?,Was a Democratic vote against a 2.8 percent increase in Social Security cost of living allowance?
Did the munchies gobble up more than 30 lbs of urinal deodorizers?,Is this munchies an example of a munchies binge?,Was the munchies a typical person?,Has this munchies binge been known to anyone else?,Has this munchies binge been compared to bulimia?
Did this report correct a major error in an older study?,Did this study identify a significant risk of spontaneous abortion?,Did this report find that there was a substantial risk of spontaneous abortion?,Did this report clarify the conclusion of an earlier study?,Did this report claim to be a new study?,Did this report provide any scientific information to the public?
"Was Walkers actions directly responsible for killing at least 15,000 jobs?",Did Walkers actions directly affect job loss?,Did Walkers actions directly affect the job loss?,Are there any other details that support this assertion?,Did Walker act alone or with others in this arena?,Were other steps in the administration of Walker influenced by this assertion?,Was the action of Walker direct or indirect in causing job loss?,Is this a general statement or a specific occurrence of Walker’s actions?
Did this video depict wildfires in September 2020?,Did video footage exist that included wildfires in September 2020?,Did video footage capture wildfires in September 2020 in the US?,Was there any video content that contained wildfires in September 2020?,Were wildfires in the US in September 2020?
"Was Parson’s administration responsible for removing 10,000 children from Medicaid?",Was the alleged population removed in a systematic way?,Did Parson's administration completely remove the children from Medicaid?,Did Parson's administration actually remove some children from Medicaid?,Does Parson's administration actually remove kids from Medicaid?
Did the Kindle Oasis launch in Black Friday?,Did the Kindle Oasis price drop?,Did Amazon's Black Friday promotion sell out quickly?,Did the Kindle Oasis sell out quickly?,Will the Kindle Oasis be sold out quickly after Black Friday?
Can restaurants serve children milk or water under this proposal?,Do any of these proposed restrictions come out of a nutshell?,Is it illegal to serve children milk or water in restaurants?,Does California's proposal mandate this rule?,Is this proposal a violation of federal law?,Is this proposal in violation of California's own regulations?
Was the photo taken in Barmer?,Has the photo ever been displayed?,Was the photo taken before Modi attended a refugee camp?,Did it help create a refugee camp in Barmer?,Was the image taken after the arrival of Muslims in the refugee camp?,Was the picture produced by a local photographer?
Is the photo a real photo of a 7-Eleven gas station?,Did the photo look like an actual sign of the store or some picture?,Does the photo specifically show a 7-Eleven gas station charging $7.11 for gas or is it an all around picture?,Did this post contain a description of the gas station?
Did the Justice Department conduct these investigations?,Does Sessions have information to reveal this?,Was the Justice Department aware of any investigations that were previously being investigated?,Did Sessions conduct these investigations during the Obama era?,Did Trump support these investigations?,Did Sessions personally launch these investigations?,Did Trump say anything about these investigations?,Is there anything else that Sessions may have done?
Did India incur a loss of Rs. 2600 crores due to scribbled notes?,Did the government incur a loss of Rs. 2600 crores as a result of scribbled notes?,Did this amount fall during the period between October-December 2014?,Is this amount comparable to the Rs. 2600 crores spent on scribbled notes?
Did Adityanath cry while watching The Kashmir Files?,Did Adityanath attend the screening of The Kashmir Files?,Did Adityanath experience any form of emotions during the screening of The Kashmir Files?,Does Adityanath currently serve as a Chief Minister?,Was Adityanath a regular viewer of The Kashmir Files?
Did Anne Hathaway ask Jon Stewart if there is a 6.9?,Was there a video in which Hathaway asked Jon Stewart about a 6.9?,Did Hathaway joke about a 6.9?,Did Hathaway joke about a 6.9 rhyming word?
Did U.S. spend $4 billion on research and development for energy in 2012?,Did U.S. spend $350 billion on oil from foreign countries in 2012?,Is the number of foreign nations involved in oil production consistent with the United States' expenditures on energy?,Are the foreign countries discussed by the author enemies or are they our enemies?
Did women still earn about 77 cents per dollar?,Did women still earn equal amounts to men for the same jobs?,Did women still earn that amount for work?,Does a woman typically earn the same amount for work as a man?,Did women still earn an equal amount for same jobs?,Do women still earn as much as men for the same jobs?
Was the ballot of an 118-year-old deceased man counted in Michigan?,Did any votes of this deceased individual counted in Michigan?,Was Bradley deceased during this election?,Did Bradley live before Election Day of this year?,Did William Bradley die during the 2016 election?,Was Bradley alive when this occurred?
Did the United States spend over $2 trillion to train and equip the Afghan military over the last 20 years?,Did the Afghan military fall in a week?,Did the United States spend more than two trillion dollars in total to train and equip the Afghan military over the last 20 years?,Was the Afghan military able to combat the Russians?
Did a video circulating online show the release of Trump's mugshot?,Did Trump personally release the mugshot in 2023?,Did Trump sign the mugshot?,Did Trump actually release his mugshot?,Are there any doubts that Trump was not the original author of this mugshot?
Did a majority of the members of Congress break the insider stock trading law?,Does the Congressional response to insider trading differ between Republicans and Democrats?,Do Republicans and Democrats have more insiders in Congress than Democrats and Republicans combined?,Does the Congressional response to insider stock trading differ between Democrats and Republicans?
Was there ever fraud during this election?,Did this election fall in the 2019 general election season?,Did this election have staffing issues?,Was this election conducted in a Republican state?,Did this election take place in a midterm election?,Did this election take place in any other states?,Did the 2018 midterm election take place in any of these states?
Is there evidence that 21-million Americans could have a four-year college scholarship for the money we squandered in Iraq?,Is there evidence that 7-million teachers could have been hired last year if we weren't squandered this money in Iraq?,Is there evidence that 21-million Americans could have a four-year college scholarship if we weren't squandered this money in Iraq?
Does this Portland school provide the prayer rooms to the Muslim students?,Are there prayer rugs provided to the Muslim students by this school?,Do these students get out of class to pray at least five times a day?,Have these students ever made use of their prayer space at the Portland school?,Are these Muslim students allowed to pray outside the classroom as much as they would like?
Do two nurses in ITU die today?,Is there a total of three nurses still in ITU in Swansea?,Is there a total number of nurses in ITU in Swansea?,Is there a specific unit where these nurses were at?,Has any of these nurses died?
Does this funding support the creation of a high-risk insurance pool to cover abortions?,Would the insurance pool cover abortions made legal in the state?,Does the Department of Health and Human Services support this high-risk insurance pool program?,Does this funding help to fund the creation of a high-risk insurance pool in Pennsylvania?
Did the Paycheck Protection Program save or support 50 million jobs?,Did the Paycheck Protection Program save jobs?,Was the Paycheck Protection Program a successful campaign?,Does the Paycheck Protection Program have a negative impact on the economy?,Has the Paycheck Protection Program prevented economic loss of jobs?,Has the Paycheck Protection Program prevented economic loss of jobs?
Does Olive Garden fund Trump's 2020 re-election campaign?,Is Olive Garden a political campaigning establishment?,Is Olive Garden a political group?,Does Olive Garden contribute to Trump's 2020 re-election campaign?,Do Trump's 2020 re-election campaign fund Olive Garden?
"Did Biden's niece plead guilty to charges related to a $110,000 credit-account theft?",Did Biden's niece receive 2 years' probation for the crime?,"Did Biden's niece plead guilty to charges related to a $110,000 credit-account theft?"
Is there a shortage of killer insects?,Is it possible that humans could be killed by killer insects?,Are all of the countries mentioned in this paragraph also affected by killer insects?,Is the lack of a shortage of killer insects due to China's growing population?,Can deadly insects kill humans if they bite?
Does the Supreme Court rule that the name of the country should be called Bharat in all of the languages spoken in India?,Is the text based on the Supreme Court rulings?,Is the text based on the Supreme Court rulings?,Was the text written in a language other than English?
Can a chef’s hat folds represent the 100 ways to cook an egg?,Can a chef’s hat folds represent 100 ways to cook an egg?,Can a chef’s hat folds represent any other number?,Is the answer to these questions unknown?,Did the number of ways to cook an egg represent the 100 folds in a chef’s hat?
Did any policemen fight with one another over money collected through traffic challans?,Was any money collected through traffic challans distributed to individual recipients?,Did any of the policemen involved fight over the distribution of money collected?,Was this incident of clashing policemen related to other incidents?,Has this incident happened in the past?
"Was the new ""Surge"" 8% alcohol by volume?",Is there any evidence that this new drink is in the same range as their previous drinks?,Does the increase in alcohol affect the taste of the drinks?,Was the new line launched in 2014?,Is there any evidence that this new drink is in the same range as their previous drinks?
Did the flight attendant slap the baby for crying?,Was the baby crying during the flight?,Did the baby cry during the flight?,Did the baby complain after the incident?,Did the baby do anything other than cry when the United Airlines flight attendant slapped the baby?,Is the United Airlines flight attendant's slaps lawful?
Did Kasich and the Republicans not forgo the option to close tax loopholes?,Did Kasich and the Republican dominated legislature oppose closing loopholes in their state?,Have all tax loopholes in Ohio been closed?,Has Kasich's legislature refused to close tax loopholes for this reason?
Did Raimondo pay money to hedge funds to millionaires?,Did Raimondo spend money on other projects besides hedge funds?,Did Raimondo pay money to multiple individuals?,Did Raimondo pay these individuals more than $1 million?,Did Raimondo charge these people anything illegal?,Did Raimondo pay the money to multiple individuals?
Did two electric vehicles collide and cause a massive explosion?,Did an EV crash caused a massive explosion?,Did there appear to be more than one accident?,Did either of the vehicles have a head-on collision?,Have there been any other accidents involving EVs?,Did the other vehicles have their injuries under control?
Did Facebook have any data leaks in the 2021?,Did Facebook allow users to access their data on a hacker forum?,Did some of the data that was leaked end up in the hands of hackers?,Did Facebook have any data leaks in the 2021?,Delete and add your answers if there are any.?
Did the Obama administration lie about COVID-19?,Did the U.S. government lie about COVID-19?,"Did Obama lie about COVID-19 numbers, treatments, natural immunity, and the origin of the virus?",Did the COVID-19 vaccine and control measures “didn’t work”?
Did Johnson say that Blair should not have been prime minister with no public vote?,Has Johnson said that Gordon Brown should not have been prime minister with no public vote in 2007?,Did Johnson say that Gordon Brown should not have become prime minister after Tony Blair?,Did Johnson say that Gordon Brown should not have been prime minister with no public vote after Tony Blair?
Can seniors be charged five times what anybody else is charged for health care for pre-existing conditions under the Republican health care bill?,Can senior citizens be charged four times what anyone else is charged for health care for pre-existing conditions under the Republican health care bill?,Can seniors be charged more than anyone else for health care for pre-existing conditions?
"Did Price take a $900,000 pay cut and raise the minimum salary at his company?","Did Price rent his house in order to make ends meet after taking a $900,000 pay cut and raising the minimum salary at his company?","Did Price rent his house in order to make ends meet after taking a $900,000 pay cut and raising the minimum salary at his company?"
Does the data released in October 2022 evidence that COVID-19 vaccines increase a person's risk of death?,Does the evidence presented in this study support these conclusions?,Is any part of the data available in this study consistent with these findings?,Can any part of the data be considered reliable?
Has Hanger voted for any of the largest tax increases in Virginia history?,Is Hanger the only Democrat in the Senate who supported any of these tax increases?,Has Hanger voted for any tax increase that is more than $50000 in total?,Did Hanger vote for any tax increase that is less than $50000 in total?
Does the federal prison system offer a much higher amount of time for contact with loved ones at Homestead?,Do children at Homestead receive more in a month than children in a federal prison?,Has the U.S. provided any federal time that would be as valuable as those given to children at homestead?
Did nearly 40% of undocumented workers enter the country legally?,Are undocumented workers allowed to stay in the country temporarily?,Did 40% of undocumented workers overstay their visas in the US?,Did the percentage of undocumented workers that entered the country legally increase?,Did the percentage of undocumented workers in the US increase?
Did Biden bring Republicans and Democrats together for the crime bill of 1994?,Did this crime bill result in an eight-year drop in crime?,Did Biden's role lead to a law that improved criminal justice?,Did Biden bring this crime bill into effect?,/Do criminal justice reforms in 1994 lead to crime reduction?
Did Democrats come close to defeating Pallone in 2010?,Did the 2010 election give Democrats an advantage for the third time in 24 years?,Were the 2008 elections considered to have made significant changes in our politics?,Did the 2010 election create a change in how our congressional delegates voted on issues?
Did Pedophile eat the 5 year old boy?,Was there any information about Pedophile that could help resolving the issue?,Did the child have a recurrence of the pedophile?,Did the pedophile try to steal the boy's genitals?,Did the pedophile kill the child for medical purposes?
Are the two Islamic Republics established in Bosnia and Albania after this date?,Are the Muslim population in Bosnia and Albania accounted for over 50% of total population?,Did Bosnia and Albania declare an Islamic Republic?,Are Albania and Bosnia regarded as having been recognized as Islamic republics?,Can Bosnia and Albania be considered a legal country?
Did an estimated 0.25 percent of all Texas legislators who have served draw benefits from their salaries?,Did an estimated 0.25 percent of all Texas legislators who have served draw benefits from their salaries?,Was an estimated 0.65 percent of all Texas legislators who have served draw benefits from their salaries?,Have the estimated 0.5 percent draw benefits from their salaries?
Was the video shot less than 24 hours after the killing of the actor's daughter?,Has this actor ever acted in a serious trial?,Did this actor acquit himself of the charge of attempted murder?,Was this actor credited for his testimony in this case?,Is this actor a current stooge or have other prior convictions for alleged murder?
Did Puerto Rico get 91 billion dollars for the hurricane compared to the previous year?,Has Puerto Rico got more money for a hurricane prior to this year?,Did Puerto Rico get more money for the hurricane compared to the previous year?,Did Puerto Rico receive more money for the hurricane compared to the previous year?
Would Atlanta Braves stadium require a tax increase?,Will the stadium provide $3 million in annual money to Cobb County schools?,Does the stadium provide tax income to schools?,Can voters in Cobb County pay no income tax on a stadium project?,Will taxpayers in Cobb County pay no income tax on the new stadium project?
Did China manufacture the first woman plastic?,Does the first woman plastic have a soul?,Do obscene quantities of plastic contain toxic waste?,Does China produce plastic products?,Do China's plastic products contain other dangerous substances?,Does China produce plastic products for food processing?,Will China produce more plastic products?
"Did Trump cancel his Costco membership in a letter dated Feb. 4, 2021?",Did Trump cancel his Costco membership in a letter on that day?,"Is it true that Trump cancelled his Costco membership on Feb. 4, 2021?",Is Trump’s letter from Costco contradictory to Trump’s letter from Costco?
Would the Nevada laws be stricter than the California laws?,Does the California law have stricter gun laws?,Would California gun laws be stricter than Nevada gun laws?,Does this state have stricter gun laws than Nevada?,Does this state have stricter gun laws than California?,Is this state more restrictive than California gun laws?
Did the video show the car accident?,Did the video show the car accident at a traffic signal?,Did the video show any other car crashes?,Did the video show the car crash in a busy area?,Did the video show the car crash happening in a busy area?,Did the video show the car crash happening outside the city limits?
Did the same 3 senators who had spent the last 3 years stumbling over Benghazi introduce a bill to reduce embassy security?,Did the senators also have three years of avoiding responsibility over Benghazi?,Has this bill been adopted by other state legislatures?,Is this bill the result of a decision by the Senate to stifle the movement to reduce embassy security?
Is it true that McCain has said he's okay for the U.S. to spend the next thousand years in Iraq?,Is McCain's statement consistent with other statements about spending the next thousand years in Iraq?,Is the passage quoting from someone else?,Does McCain have any political experience in Iraq?
Did any of these arrests occur in 2018?,Did any arrests occur in 2018?,Did any of these arrests occur in 2018 at any point?,Are these arrests all those arrested and the number is significant?,Has any arrests taken place on criminal record individuals before in 2018?,Have any of these arrests taken place in recent years?
Did the economy grow 3.2 percent a year between 1994 and 2012?,Did the global recession result in the loss of a million jobs?,Is there any evidence that this 3.5 percent growth has been average over the past 20 years?,Is this a record pace for growth of this nature?,Is this a record pace for growth of this type?
Has L K Advani been invited for the Bhoomi Pujan ceremony of the Ram temple slated to be held in Ayodhya?,Was L K Advani invited for the Bhoomi Pujan ceremony of the Ram temple?,Did the Ram temple function as a festival with L K Advani?
"Is the footage of a Yeti Airlines flight containing 72 passengers from Paharry, Nepal?","Is the footage from this crash of the Yeti Airlines flight from Paharry, Nepal?","Did the yeti airlines crash on Sunday January 15, 2023 in Pokhara, Nepal?","Did the Yeti airlines crash in Nepal on Sunday January 15, 2023?"
"Did Rubio try to insert ""$1.5 million for a rowing institute"" into the state budget?",Is Rubio's proposal related to the rowing program?,Is this proposal related to the state's funding?,Was this proposed funding part of Rubio's proposal?,Are these funds used for other purposes than rowing?
Did the 'anemone' live in a glass?,Did the 'anemone' live in a glass after that person threw it?,Did the 'anemone' live after that person threw it?,Was the 'anemone' alive after someone threw it?
Did a school principal in Richmond expel two children for wearing crucifixes to school?,Did the school principal not recognize the value of wearing crucifixes to school?,Did the school principal want the children to do this behavior?,Did the school principal have to justify the actions in writing?
Did the United States withdraw from Afghanistan?,Did the United States withdraw from Afghanistan after the U.S.-led invasion of Afghanistan?,Did the United States withdraw from Afghanistan after the U.S.-led invasion of Afghanistan?,Did the United States withdraw from Afghanistan after the U.S.-led invasion of Afghanistan?
Do Ohions with bachelors degrees gain an average of $2.5 billion in economic activity the next year?,Do Ohioans with a bachelor's degree spend an average of $2.5 billion each year after college?,Is there any evidence that these economic gains can be measured in dollars?,Would a higher degree increase mean that Ohions spend $2.5 billion more in economic activity?
Was this video evidence that an accused rapist was executed?,Did the video show the execution time for the rape alleged on record?,Were the prosecutor and witnesses in this video from the area where the crime occurred?,Was this crime alleged committed in a place in the United States?,Was this alleged crime reported to a law enforcement official in a country other than U.S.?
Did women call 1091 or 7837018555 to avail the free ride scheme?,Will this scheme affect the women who used to ride in the free ride scheme?,Did the free ride scheme start with a single number?,Would the women have to leave home during the free ride scheme?,Would this scheme have a gender constraint?
Did this sad story occur on a previous occasion in Shrek?,Did the Mama Bear character die in the movie?,Are there any other sad stories that happen in the movie Shrek?,Did any of these sad stories occur before the movie Shrek?,Did the movie Shrek have the scene that the Mama bear character is killed and turned into a rug?
Did the Eagle Scout build a nuclear reactor in his mother’s backyard?,Did the Eagle Scout build a nuclear reactor in the backyard of his mother?,Did the construction of the nuclear reactor result in a superfund cleanup?,Are there any other aspects about this story that would be relevant in assessing this information?
Is the Philippines only country to have given the Navy modern frigates?,Has there been any other notable president to have given the Navy modern frigates?,Has Duterte received funding for two modern frigates?,Is the Philippines only country that has given the Navy modern frigates?,Is Duterte alone in providing for these modern frigates?
Does foreign aid to developing countries account for 70 percent of all stolen aid?,Has foreign aid to developing countries helped eradicate xenophobia?,Have donations to developing countries decreased due to the global financial crisis?,Has aid to developing countries accounted for more than 70 percent of all stolen aid?,Has aid to developing countries accounted for more than 70 percent of all stolen aid?
"Has software developed by Ashton Kutcher's charity helped rescue 6,000 children from sex trafficking?","Has software developed by Ashton Kutcher's charity helped rescue around 6,000 children from sex trafficking?",Does Ashton Kutcher's charity use the same software developed by other charities?
Would the RESTRICT Act allow for the federal government to charge a felony and 1 million for a VPN?,Do VPNs require the user to connect to the VPN in order to be used?,Would the government be able to charge you with a felony and 1 million if you use a VPN?
Did anyone who shared a post receive a free meal for two?,Did anyone comment on a Facebook post?,Did anyone who commented on a Facebook post receive a free meal for two?,Did anyone who posted a comment receive a free meal for two?,Did anyone who posted a comment on a Facebook post receive a free meal for two?
Did 31% of Texas physicians accept all new Medicaid patients in 2000?,Was 31% of Texas physicians accepting all new Medicaid patients in 2000?,Is the number of Medicaid patients accepting in Texas higher in 2000 versus 2013?,Do the numbers in 2013 represent any data?,Is the percent of Texas physicians accepting all new Medicaid patients higher in 2013 or 2014?
Did Hillary Clinton win the six coin tosses that were awarded during the Iowa caucuses in the 2016 presidential election?,Does this event take place in Iowa or are they primarily in states other than the U.S.?,"Does this event occur prior to, during, or after the Iowa caucuses?","Did this event occur prior to, or during the 2016 presidential election?"
Did Biden give any money to Hamas?,Did Biden give Hamas $150 million in donation?,Did Biden pay for Hamas weapons of mass destruction?,Did Biden donate any money to Israel?,Did Biden donate to France?,Did Biden give $150 million to the Italian armed forces?
Is this 'road map' for easing Covid-19 restrictions?,Has this roadmap been approved by the FDA?,Is there a maximum limit set by the FDA in respect to eradicating Covid-19 in the United States?,Will the FDA be reviewing this roadmap to ensure effective regulation of this virus in the United States?
Did Hillary Clinton's speech to AIPAC include this line?,Did she address the Palestinians in a negative manner?,Did she mention the conflict in Palestine in this speech?,Did Clinton speak to AIPAC on the Palestinian problem in general?,/ did Clinton use this phrase in other speeches / remarks?
Did the state spend $5 billion on capital for people killed in state of California since 1978?,Is the cost of killing 13 people statewide the same as California?,Is it possible to compare the cost of killing 13 people statewide with the cost of killing another 13 people?,Is there evidence of a study that found that California spent $5 billion on capital for people killed in state of California since 1978?
"Did Rubio reduce taxes for high earners by $240,000?",Did Rubio reduce taxes for high earners by less than three times average earnings?,Did Rubio cut taxes for high earners by more than three times average earnings?,Do all of the tax cuts for high earners by Rubio come with provisions that would benefit both high earners and low earners?
Is there evidence that Obama's policies caused a 19 percent increase in unemployment in Pennsylvania?,"Did Obama's policies lead to the loss of 37,900 manufacturing jobs in Pennsylvania?","Is there evidence that Obama's policies caused 189,000 more people to be in poverty in Pennsylvania?",Is there evidence that Obama's policies cause more poverty in Pennsylvania?
"Is there any evidence that the ""Spending freeze"" would reduce government spending by less than 1 / 2?",Does the budget amount of the 'Spending freeze' reduce government spending between 2011 and 2020?,Is the 'Spending freeze' expected to reduce the amount of federal spending between 2011 and 2020 by less than 1 / 2?
Is there evidence that CNN reuses crisis actors in stories about a man dying in Afghanistan in 2021 and a school shooting in 2022?,Is there evidence that CNN reuses crisis actors in stories about a man dying in Afghanistan in 2021 and a school shooting in 2022?,Is there evidence that CNN recycles crisis actors in stories about a man dying in Afghanistan in 2021 and a school shooting in 2022?
Did Democrats vote on various pork projects including a $5 million scoreboard for the Milwaukee Bucks?,Did Democrats vote on various pork projects including a $5 million scoreboard for the Milwaukee Bucks?,"Compared to other pork projects, did the scoreboard for the Milwaukee Bucks sell well?",Will Democrats vote to put up a new scoreboard?
Did she vote against an honor for 9/11?,Was she a part of an organization that supported 9/11 veterans?,Did Baldwin vote against 9/11 victims who are still being honored?,Was there a specific reason why Baldwin abstained from honoring 9/11 victims?,Was there any other support for honoring 9/11 victims?,Did Baldwin vote against 9/11 veterans?
"Did 53 percent of young Republican voters under 35 in a poll say climate deniers were ignorant, out of touch, or crazy?",Was there a general preference of young Republicans for climate deniers?,"Does this poll suggest climate deniers are ignorant, out of touch, or crazy?",Have young Republicans viewed climate deniers with this view?
Was Russia kept the peace in Europe for nearly 70 years?,Is there any evidence the Russians are violating any of the treaties?,Was there some specific agreement for peace or coexistence between the Russians and Europe?,"Did the Russians have any other agreements, conventions, and laws that might support peace?",Is there any evidence the Russians would have acted in accordance with any of the agreements?
Did Mattarella help the White House in the 2020 election?,Did Mattarella help the White House in the 2020 election?,Was Mattarella arrested in an attempt to influence the 2020 US election?,Were other politicians involved in the 2020 election?,Did other political actors influence the 2020 US Presidential election?,Did Mattarella try to influence the 2020 US Presidential election?,Did anyone in the 2018 election attempt to influence the 2020 US Presidential election?
Did Plale get a pay raise?,Did Plale get more money?,Does the money in question belong to him?,Did his pay increase go to his workers?,Is this information accurate?,Did Plale receive the raise?,Did a major percentage of Plale's employees turn down the raise?
Does re-election for Obama reduce tax rates for a lot of people?,Are income tax rates for a lot of people more likely to increase with re-election?,Does raising tax rates increase the overall average income of a country?,Will income tax rates increase by less then 25% with re-election for Obama?,Does raising income tax rates raise taxes overall in a country?
Will Donald Trump declare the biggest drain of the swamp ever?,Will Donald Trump declare that there will be the biggest drain of the swamp ever?,Was Donald Trump's tweet true?,Did Donald Trump do this statement as part of a speech?,Did Trump tweet this tweet as part of a speech?,Did Trump's tweet come after a news conference?
Did COVID-19 come to the United States in 2019?,Is there any proof of the coming of COVID-19 in 2019?,Are there any reports of COVID-19 in the United States?,Did COVID-19 arrive in the United States in 2019?,Is there any proof of COVID-19 in the United States?
Did the CEO of this company donate money to Trump's re-election campaign?,Did this company own Pizza Hut?,Does this company make food for most families?,Has this company had significant political influence before?,Are there other examples where this company has donated money to Trump's re-election campaign?
Did CTV publish a headline saying 95% of suspected monkeypox cases in Canada were shingles?,Did CTV News merely post a headline about monkeypox cases in Canada?,Was the story directly referencing shingles cases?,Was the story widely shared?,Did the story contain a reference to monkeypox in Canada?
Did Biden and Harris grant millions of dollars to illegal immigrants?,Did Biden and Harris authorize $89 million in hotel room payments to illegal immigrants?,Did Biden and Harris authorize funds for homeless people?,Was Biden and Harris a part of the sex slavery scandal?,Did Biden and Harris authorize $89 million for illegal immigration?,Did Biden and Harris authorize $89 million for homeless people?
Have any of the jobs that are in the private sector been abolished?,Is there any evidence that South Africa is experiencing a job boom?,Would it be incorrect to say that this number is accurate?,Are there any negative factors that can contribute to the poorness of the private sector in South Africa?
Did Hass raise your taxes by $1 billion in a single day?,Did Hass raise taxes in any other year?,Does Hass claim there have been no taxes raised in any other year?,Was Hass's tax increase a single day?,Was Hass the speaker of the event?,Was Hass speaking at the event that day?
Did this process lead to the most open and transparent procurement process in the city's history?,Did this process happen in a controlled manner?,Was the process transparent and open?,Did any contract winners provide information regarding the background of their work?,"Was this process transparent, and open?",Does this process support the claim that this city has been the most open and transparent to date in the country?
Do Duterte's pledges towards this goal have been fulfilled?,Has the President of the Philippines fulfilled his 2016 promises?,Has this pledge been fulfilled?,Are these values the same as Duterte's promise?,Has the president maintained his promises?,Has Duterte fulfilled his campaign promises?
Did Sara Duterte deliver the Basic Education Report?,Did Sara Duterte abolish the K to 12 Program?,Was the K to 12 Program abolished after Duterte delivered the Basic Education Report?,Was Duterte responsible for the discontinuation of the K to 12 program?,Was the K to 12 Program abolished after Duterte delivered the Basic Education Report?
Did Modi promise to deposit Rs 15 lakhs in every account?,Did he promise to deposit Rs 15 lakhs into every account?,Did this promise have any legal basis?,Did this promise involve a tax break for everyone?,Did this promise have any legal basis?,Did this promise involve a tax break for everyone?
Did Hillary Clinton approve the transfer of 20% of America's uranium holdings to Russia?,Did the Clinton Foundation fund this deal?,Do uranium investors from this deal funnel $145 million to the Clinton Foundation?,Has the Clinton Foundation received contributions from any of the investors in this deal?,Were the nine investors in the deal part of the Clinton Foundation?
"Did Obama's administration release 36,000 criminal immigrants who had nearly 88,000 convictions?","Did Obama's administration release criminal immigrants who had hundreds of convictions for murder, rape, and kidnapping and thousands of drug-related crimes?",Did Obama say his administration released many criminal immigrants?,"Did Obama's administration release more criminal immigrants who had almost 88,000 convictions last year?"
Did the woman undergo 17 surgeries to look like a Barbie doll?,Were any of the surgeries successful?,Did the woman have the surgery to replace a tan and was she satisfied with it?,Does this person have a physical condition that warrants surgery?,Does the person have a medical history that would indicate an increased risk of surgery?
Was a concert of religious musicians in New Zealand during the Coronavirus pandemic?,Did the concert include performances in Arabic?,Did musicians from different religious backgrounds share a shared cultural background?,Did this concert happen during a pandemic?,Did the concert take place during the fictional Coronavirus pandemic?
Did the deficit include the land and houses?,What was the number of total homes?,Did the deficit include homes and land?,Did the deficit cover the homes?,Did the deficit include any houses or houses that have been destroyed?,Did the deficit include houses or houses that have been destroyed?,Did the deficit include any homes that have been destroyed in the past?
Did Bolduc join an elite group of American soldiers?,Was Bolduc born in the United States?,Was Bolduc involved in the military during 9/11?,Is Bolduc a resident of New Hampshire?,Did Bolduc perform with a group of american soldiers in Afghanistan after 9/11?,Did Bolduc participate in a war with Taliban forces in Afghanistan?
Is it true that the central government is providing Rs 1.5 lakh for every municipality for each coronavirus infected patient?,Is the amount of the government funding for each coronavirus infected patient at Rs 1.5 lakh per municipality?,Is this government funding a comprehensive response to coronavirus infected patients?
Do the hotels Chris stays in charge mini-bar?,Does Cris stay at a large hotel?,Does Cris only stay at the hotel for long periods of time?,Does Cris always pay his hotel expenses?,Are Cris' hotel bills always paid for by someone else?,Are Cris' hotel costs typically higher than average?
Is there a specific number of new IRS employees to administer Obama’s health care mandate?,"Does the IRS currently plan on adding another 19,500 employees to administer the Obama health care mandate?",Does the IRS plan on recruiting additional IRS employees for Obama’s health care mandate?,"Is the number of the IRS employees for Obama’s health care mandate limited to the 19,500 projected new employees?",Is the amount of the IRS workers in projected new jobs for the IRS based on the estimate?
Can you call 988 from this phone number?,Will my location be automatically routed to local authorities?,Is it mandatory to provide your location to the authorities?,Are there any other restrictions I need to know about calling 988?,Do all services listed on the 988 Hotline require an app to call?
Has any court ruled that Biden legally won the election?,Is there any evidence that Biden won the election legally?,Did any court make a determination that Biden legally won the election?,Did any court report that Biden legally won the election?,Is there evidence that Biden won the election legally?
Is Twitter collaborating with the protest to change the Like and Retweet buttons?,Was the Like and Retweet button changed in solidarity with the protest?,Is the like and Retweet button currently unchanged?,Is the like and Retweet button now similar to the Like and Retweet buttons?
Did Pennsylvania's court of appeals determine that mail in ballots were unconstitutional?,Did Pennsylvania's court of appeals decide that mail in ballots were unconstitutional?,Did Pennsylvania's court of appeals determine that mail in ballots were unconstitutional?,"Considering 2.6 million mail in ballots, does this mean Biden lost Pennsylvania?"
Was the photo taken at the Forum in Davos in 2022?,Was the event at the Forum in Davos in 2022?,Was the image taken from the event at the Forum in Davos?,Has any aviation-related images ever been publicly released?,Have other image-based photographs been released?
Did the vast majority of people convicted of terrorism come from outside of the country?,Did the majority of people convicted of terrorists come to the US from outside of the country?,Did the majority of people convicted of terrorists come from outside the country of origin?,Did the vast majority of terrorists come to the US from outside the country of origin?
Did any practitioners with ICD 10 codes enter the W17.9 to quickly register a fall from a milk crate?,Did any practitioners with ICD 10 codes enter the W17.9 to quickly register a fall from a milk crate?,Did physicians use W17.9 to quickly register a fall from a milk crate?
Did over 6 lakh votes polled in favour of Rahul Gandhi disappear from ECI records?,Was Rahul Gandhi responsible for removing more than 6 lakh votes from the Electoral Commission records?,Did Rahul Gandhi receive these over 6 lakh votes in the Electoral Commission records?,Did over 6 lakh votes polled in favour of Rahul Gandhi disappear from the Electoral Commission records?
Did the author appear on the two different beaches?,Did the photo show the same people?,Did the photo take place in Florida?,Are the people the same people?,Were the photo locations in Florida?,Did the writer have the same or similar background?,Did the author mention two places in Florida?,"Did the writer refer to Los Angeles County and Jacksonville, Fla.?",Did the writer mention any beaches in Florida?,Did the writer mention Jacksonville?
Did California acknowledge there were 1 million illegal votes during the 2016 elections?,Is there evidence that there were 1 million illegal votes during the 2016 presidential election?,Is there evidence that there were more illegal votes than real votes during the 2016 presidential election?,Is there evidence that the majority of votes were real?,Is there evidence that California used a large number of illegal votes during the 2016 presidential election?
Is Anitha married to her uncle?,Is the uncle 40 years old?,Is the marriage of Anitha to the uncle official?,Does the uncle have children?,Is the wedding happening in India?,Is the bride a 10 year old girl?,Do I need a marriage license in the US?
Has Nelson voted to raise our taxes 150 times?,Has Nelson voted to raise our taxes 150 times?,Has Nelson voted to raise our taxes 150 times?,Does Nelson have a history of voting to raise our taxes?,Does Nelson have a history of voting to raise our taxes?,Does Nelson have any prior experience voting to raise our taxes?
Did the number of people employed in the United States get higher from 1979 to 2014?,Did a significant decrease in the number of people employed in the U.S. in 2014 take place?,Did the numbers of jobs added by the U.S. in 2014 decrease from 1979 to 2014?,Is the current number of people employed in the U.S. the lowest since 1979?
Is the daily average for all suicides in the military a typical figure?,Is there a reason for the suicides to be in the daily average?,"Is this a ""really bad"" trend?",Is this the first time that VA officials have made this statement?,Is this the first time that Veterans Affairs personnel have made this comment?
Do these maps show how sea level rise will impact the US in 30 years?,Does this map show the magnitude of sea level rise?,Can this map be used as a reference map?,Would this map be useful for reference in studying a climate change scenario?,"if not, is this map the most comprehensive map out there?"
Is the US spending $150 billion total?,Was it Florida that sent $135 billion?,Did the US spend $150 billion in 2014?,Does Florida send more than DC?,Is the US spending 150 billion total?,Is Florida sending more than DC?,Are there any other states or countries that are sending $100 billion?
Did social distancing measures raise flu pandemics?,Did some cities remove social distancing measures in response to the flu pandemic?,Did cities lift social distancing measures in response to the flu pandemic?,Did many cities lower social distancing measures because of the flu pandemic?
Did the global cooling occur for both 2017 and 2018?,Did the global cooling occur for both years?,Would it be appropriate to label both times as record-breaking?,Does the record for both years be the same for either year?,Would the record amount of global cooling for the two years be the same for both?
Did more people die of Covid-19 in two months than died of overdoses last year?,Did more people die of overdoses in the previous year than the previous year?,Did more people die of Covid-19 in the second month than the first month?,Did more people die of Covid-19 in the two months of March than the first month?
Is it true that this project will required 50 crore rupees of investment?,Is this project only going to be financed by public money?,Are the funds going to be earmarked to finance projects to make this project viable?,Will the funding come from the private sector?,Would this project require major funding?
Is the number of Covid-19 cases per day increasing?,Is it true that there are fewer deaths due to Covid-19 than with Covid-19 within 28 days of a positive test?,Is the total number of Covid-19 cases per day decreasing?,Does Covid-19 affect less people with a more common cause of death?
Is Wisconsin creating jobs at a rate that is two times the rate of other states?,Is this rate similar to the rate created in Wisconsin under Walker?,Does this rate compare with the rate created in the general country?,Has this rate been equal to the rate created in Wisconsin under Walker?,Has Walker led this nation in jobs creation?
Did Texas pass laws that made it impossible for World War II veterans to vote by mail?,Did Texas pass laws that made it impossible for WWII veterans to vote by mail?,Did Texas law require veterans to have a registration number from the 1950s?,Was the 95-year-old World War II veteran deprived of the right to vote by mail?
Is there evidence that the vaccine rollout increased excess mortality by 84% for people aged 25-44?,Is it true that people in this age group had a 80% increase in excess mortality in relation to the vaccine?,Does it indicate that the vaccine led to these excess mortality increases?,Do any studies that investigate the incidence of HIV in this age group provide any evidence to support these data?
Did governor Walker purchase 80 new cars for the state?,Is this a real car?,Does this cars have any issues?,Has this car used by this politician been recalled?,Do these cars have any issues?,Has this car been recalled by the manufacturer?,Does this car have any problems?,Have these cars recently been in service?,Have these cars been recalled by the manufacturer?
Did the stimulus deliver 43 billion dollars in tax relief to families and businesses?,Is the tax relief in the stimulus tax relief?,Did the stimulus deliver this tax relief to families and businesses?,Is the stimulus a tax relief bill?,Did the stimulus provide tax relief for families and businesses?,Does the stimulus have an impact on American workers?
Did Biden admit voter fraud in the 2019 election?,Did Biden admit voter fraud in any other elections in the previous decade?,Did Biden admit voter fraud in any other national elections prior to 2020?,Was Biden aware of voter fraud in any other presidential campaigns prior to 2020?,Did Biden admit voter fraud in any other presidential candidates besides 2020?
"Did large ""ballot drops"" lead to Democratic victory in several 2022 midterm elections?","Did these gains due to large ""ballot drops"" involve a sudden spike in vote totals due to large voter dropouts?",Did large vote totals due to large ballot drops lead to Democratic victories in several 2022 midterm elections?
Did Obama cut $2.6 billion from veterans programs?,Did Obama give a similar amount to Syrian refugees?,Did Obama cut a similar amount from veterans programs?,Did Obama increase the amount of money being donated to veterans programs in the 2016 budget?,Did Obama's cut cuts from veterans programs have any effect on Syria?
"Did Sanders want voters to vote in 1978, or does Sanders only want voters to vote in 1978?",Did Sanders ever release any photographs showing the 1979 resolution?,Is this photograph considered one of Sanders' most widely-used photos?,Does Sanders' resolution actually have a number in it?,Is the image reproduction available online?
"Did the Titan submersible tragedy cover up a $1,300 monthly health credit?","Did the Titan Submersible tragedy cover up a $1,300 monthly health credit?",Is the Titan Submersible tragedy caused by an investigation of a medical researcher?,Is there a reasonable risk of an investigation of a medical researcher into the Titan Submersible tragedy?
"Are 40,000 American soldiers who fought in Afghanistan and Iraq forced to quit their military careers?",Did the majority of American soldiers resign during this time period?,Is the estimated number of American soldiers resigning at 40000?,Has the number of American soldiers resigning at 40000 decreased over time?
Did the Philippine government fully vaccinate 70 million Filipinos before the end of President Rodrigo Duterte’s term on June 30?,Was the target date achieved at that point in time?,Is the goal in place as of 2020?,Did the goal make the deadline by that time?,Did President Duterte achieve the goal in his presidency?
What is the name of the new EU law?,Does anyone who has an offshore bank account in 2020 have to come clean about it?,Is there already legislation related to this law?,Will any money hidden by overseas bank accounts be reported to the public?,Is the new EU law available for review now?,Did any U.S. laws prohibit obtaining offshore bank accounts prior to 2020?,Is this new EU law currently in effect?
Did South Africa's deputy transport minister say fuel prices have always gone up in past 25 years?,Did South Africa's deputy transport minister make this statement in person?,Is it true there have been several instances where fuel prices have never gone up in the past 25 years?,Was South Africa's deputy transport minister correct that fuel prices did not ever go up in the past 25 years?
Was it true that 2% of the Indian population has been infected by Covid-19 in the past 1 year 4 months?,Did Agarwal's claim come from the media or the official figures?,Has any Indian official claimed to have seen or hear this claim?,Did the data being used for the assertion come from a reliable source?
Since what year has the country built over 4.7 million houses?,Is there a reason to believe that more than 14 million people were benefitted by this project?,Is a reason given for the government building houses?,"Is this information relevant to the general debate on ""free houses in the US?","""?"
Are the Global Competitiveness Index scores based on specific country standards?,Is there any evidence of India improving in these rankings?,Have the rankings improved significantly over the past years?,Is there any evidence of India lagging behind in the last 4 years?,Have any other countries had similar improvements in Global Competitiveness Index rankings?
Did weapons taken in Russia in May 2022 show a Satan missile?,Did Russia take weapons in May 2022 showing a Satan missile?,Did Russia take weapons in May 2022 showing a Satan missile?,Did Priests bless weapons in 2022?,Did the Soviet Union in May 2022 purchase weapons?
Do those taxpayers pay these fees for corrections?,Is this compare to other countries or states?,Is this low in comparison to other countries?,Is the money spent on prisons not as cheap?,Are these prices relative to the rest of the country?,Did Smyth compare prices among other states in this regard?
Are customers obligated to pay $700 for a slower iPhone?,Does this deal have a time frame?,Is there any evidence of this deal being completed?,Can people still buy a slower phone?,Does this deal provide a specific reason to pay $700 for a slower phone?,Do customers have a choice whether to purchase the iPhone slower or faster?
Did a minor Hindu boy die as a result of the incident?,Did these Muslims kill the minor Hindu boy for a petty matter?,Was the incident in Madipur due to the death of a minor Hindu boy?,Was the incident related to a petty matter?,Is the incident a serious one?
Have oil companies not touched 68 million acres?,Do 68 million acres have drilling rights?,Does 68 million acres have drilling rights?,Have oil companies been forced to move?,Is 68 million acres the same as 68 million acres that already have drilling rights?,Is oil companies currently using 68 million acres to drill?
Is it true that Apple AirPods are dangerous to wear?,Are AirPods emitting more radiation than over-ear headphones?,Do Apple AirPods cause harm to your health?,Are Apple AirPods harmful to the environment?,Were there other wireless devices that cause health risks?,Has it been shown that Apple AirPods emit radiation higher than a microwave?
Did police arrest fraudsters in Cambodia or Myanmar in 2022?,Did the police arrest fraudsters in Cambodia or Myanmar in the year 2022?,Did these two countries experience a similar type of a financial system?,Are these countries the only places where financial reform is happening?,Is there evidence of fraudsters being arrested in Cambodia or Myanmar in the year 2022?
Is it true that Marcos will run for president in 2022?,Will Marcos want to run for the presidency?,Is Marcos likely to run for president in 2022?,Does Marcos have a presidential background?,Is Marcos likely to run for president in 2022?,Can we expect to see Marcos win?
Did Smith leave his own body on a judge's doorstep?,Was Smith decapitated and left on a judge's doorstep?,Was Smith murdered in September 2017?,Does Smith appear to have committed several other crimes?,Can one person be credibly asserted to have committed this crime?,Was Smith committed in the United States?
Did the submersible implode?,Is there any evidence of an audio clip in this clip?,Does the audio clip feature sounds of the final moments of the five passengers aboard?,"Did the submersible implode on June 20, 2023?",Did anyone aboard the Titan die in the implosion?
"Did Nelson vote to spend $144,541 to see how monkeys react under the influence of cocaine?",Is this the only item Nelson voted for?,Was the amount the Senate approved for this study?,Did Nelson say the money would be used to study monkeys?,Is there any proof Nelson approved this funding?
Is it true that asymptomatic carriers cannot spread COVID-19?,Is it true that masks are not needed to reduce COVID-19 transmission from asymptomatic carriers?,Were there other variables in relation to this fact?,Is it true that COVID-19 is not contagious?
Does this video show the white people being targeted by protestors?,Was this video produced by someone that had attended the protest?,Was the video taken between August 13th and August 22nd?,Are these protestors attacking white people during this time?,Does this video have images of the protesters attacking white people?
Did the Cleveland man who raped the girl actually survive?,Did Trump supporters beat the Ohio man after he raped a 13-year-old girl?,Did Ohio police say that it would be an escalation of violence in which the Muslim man was involved?,Would a Trump supporter fight the Muslim man?
Did Marcos launch the new bill?,Did Marcos present the new bill in video?,Was Marcos also a promoter of the new bill?,Are there other facts or information on the 5000 peso bill?,ndo ngayon na pagsala ng president Ferdinand Marcos?
Did “Republican state senators” who started an audit of 2020 election results in Maricopa County expose this fraud?,Will this audit expose this fraud?,"Will these senators, in turn, expose this fraud?",Is this audit in the process of exposing this fraud?,Is the outcome of this audit reported to be rigged?
Did the UK contribute £11 billion to the EU in 2018?,Did the UK receive £6 billion in EU funding in 2018?,Did the UK contribute £11 billion to the EU in 2018?,Has the UK contributed any more to the EU in 2018?,Are the EU funding figures for this year only correct?,Was the UK successful at getting an EU funding in 2018?
Was this project included in the plan for the City of DeKalb?,Did the project create enough jobs to be set aside exclusively for DeKalb residents?,Did this project contribute to the cost of the city?,Did the city of DeKalb not participate in the design of this project?,Did the project result in more than 4000 jobs per year during peak production of this project?
"Did a military vehicle run over protesters in Caracas, Venezuela?",Did the protesters lose their lives?,Did the protesters have a strong argument?,"Are there other protests pending in Caracas, Venezuela?","Is it true that a civilian vehicle has run over protesters in Caracas, Venezuela?"
Did GOP lawmakers avoid any budget spending this year?,Does the budget include any spending caps?,"Did the Democrats go without any budgets for over 1,000 days?",Is it true that the Democrats didn't vote on a final budget proposal?,Did a final budget plan fall through?,Would you agree that Senate Democrats don't need any budget spending this year?
Is 58 percent COVID-19 positivity rate the same as 58 percent of the population having COVID-19?,Is the prevalence of COVID 19 greater than 58 percent?,Do studies show that COVID-19 has no positive impact on the age distribution of the population?,Is the COVID-19 positive rate lower than 58 percent?
Is there a single billionaire billionaire who has a net worth of 2.5 trillion?,Does the net worth of a billionaire billionaire exceed $5 billion if it is confiscated?,Does the net worth of a billionaire billionaire billionaire exceed $5 billion if it is confiscated?,"If a billionaire billionaire billionaire is worth $5 billion and has a net worth of $5 billion, would this income cover the federal government for less than 8 months?"
Does a 3-year-old boy get gender affirming surgery in this map?,Is this map the only map showing states where it's possible for a 3-year-old boy to get gender affirming surgery?,Does this map contain all states where there is a female gender affirming surgery?,Is this map the only map showing states where a 3-year-old boy can get gender affirming surgery?
Did the FBI inform Clinton that she was not investigated?,Did Clinton inform Clinton that she did not have any investigations?,Is there sufficient evidence to show that Clinton was not investigated on multiple occasions?,Did the FBI explain what actions he was taking to prove that he was not investigated?,Did Clinton explain he was not under investigation on all of these occasions?,Was the FBI a liar regarding Clinton's statements?
Did the bird start a fire in the Americas as predicted in Islam?,Are there any scientifically based estimates as to the causes?,Did the bird set the fire in the Americas?,Do a few scholarly studies support this view?,Do zoo images typically show birds setting fires in an area?
Is Moore absent of all House votes in the second quarter of 2012?,Did Moore vote in all of the House votes in the second quarter of 2012?,Did Moore miss voting for many elections during the past 5 years?,Did Moore miss voting during the last 5 years?,Was Moore absent during the past 5 years?,Did Moore vote in 3 or 4 more legislative sessions?
"Does Biden say he has a contract with the immigrant negotiating group to pay $450,000 in pay?",Are Biden's talks with the negotiating group private?,Are the negotiating group's conditions confidential?,Are Biden's payments to illegal immigrants inherently a political one?
Has the state workforce been reduced 12.4 percent since 2008?,What are cost savings measures that are used to balance budgets?,Are some cost savings measures included in the program?,Are there other cost saving measures that are being used to balance budgets?,Did State of Oregon employees lose any money during 2008?,Was the state workforce reduced in 2009?
Did a building collapse in Abra?,Did an official earthquake occur in Abra?,Were any buildings destroyed in the aftermath of the earthquake?,Was there a specific time for an earthquake in Abra?,Were any buildings damaged?,Do photos show any damage in Abra?,Are there pictures from this earthquake?
Are 91% of DACA recipients employed?,Are 91% of DACA recipients in school?,Are 91% of DACA recipients in the military?,Do 91% of DACA recipients support public health?,Would the military be interested in working with immigrants?,Do 91% of DACA recipients have a family?
Did the robbers’ trick on South African roads in 2021 have any relation to the police?,Did the officers involved in the robbery method of justice?,Was the technique used on South African roads in the 2021 photographic?,Did there occur any cases of these crimes?,Did any officers participate in the robbery of this type of robbery?,Did police attempt to prevent the robbers from using the technique?
Was the 9-year-old boy bitten by light-up soles on his Skechers shoes?,Was the light-up soles on his shoes the cause of the burns?,Did the light-up soles cause the burns?,Have Skechers shoes in question used light-up soles?
Did Rauner delay funding for schools?,Did Rauner require local governments to raise property taxes?,Did Rauner impose a budget cut for a year?,Did Rauner have any power to impose a budget cut on a year?,Did Rauner impose a budget cut for an entire year?
Does Mamata Banerjee have any religious affiliations?,Will Mamata Banerjee teach a lesson to Hindus if given 42 seats?,Does Mamata Banerjee have any relations with religious groups that are not related to political ties?,Does Mamata Banerjee say she will teach a lesson to Hindus if given 42 seats?
Did the U.S. have 47 million people on food stamps at the time the current occupant of the White House took over?,Are there fewer people on food stamps than when the current occupant of the White House took over?,Are there fewer food stamps in the U.S. today?
Did Obama spend more than the recommended 25% of the total funding for education?,Did Obama receive all of the funding for education as governor of Kano?,Did Obama actually spend more money than the recommended 25% of the funding for education?,Has Obama spent the recommended 25% of funding for education in his own state?,Did Obama receive funding for education in another state under any other name?
Is the bridge inaugurated by PM Modi in 2013?,Was the collapsed bridge inaugurated in 2013 by PM Modi?,Did PM Modi inaugurate the collapsed bridge before or in 2013?,Did PM Modi inaugurate the collapsed bridge in 2013 or before?,Was the collapsed bridge inaugurated by PM Modi after 2015 or before?
Are 79 percent of people supportive of Roe v. Wade?,Are 79 percent of people supportive of funding Planned Parenthood?,Do 79 percent of people support funding Planned Parenthood?,Do 79 percent of people support funding Planned Parenthood?,Do 79 percent of people support funding Planned Parenthood?
Did Pelosi buy Tesla stock?,Did Pelosi receive any monetary benefit from buying Tesla stock?,Did Biden order all federal vehicles to be electric?,Was Biden the person who ordered electric vehicles?,Did Pelosi purchase Tesla stock before Biden signed his order?,Has Biden changed the order or modified the order?
Did the 'radical Islamic terror' increase occur in England and Wales?,Did the 'radical Islamic terror' increase occur in America?,Did the 'radical Islamic terror' increase occur in any other country?,Did the 'radical Islamic terror' increase occur in any other region?,Did the 'radical Islamic terror' increase occur in all countries?
Is it known that the Novel Coronavirus has a survival rate of 99.7%?,Can we estimate that in general the survival rate of the new Coronavirus is 99.7%?,Is the survival rate of the new Coronavirus 93.7%?,Is the survival rate of the new Coronavirus 99.7%?
Do you have to go into counseling before you can decide if you were really harassed?,Are you required to go into counseling before you can decide if you were really harassed?,Are you forced to come under the influence of the harassment law?,Does the law mandate people to have counseling?,Is the current law considered abusive?
Did the images depict elderly women with giant crocheted cats?,Does the images exist?,Is the images original?,Are the images from the 2023 album popular?,Would this be the first time this has been true?,Was this a popular image?,Did these images go viral?,Is this the first time this has happened?
"Did Fancelli donate 300,000 to the Jan. 6, 2020 riot?",Is Fancelli the heiress to Publix?,Was Fancelli the first woman to give out money to the riot?,Did Fancelli give away a large amount of money?,Is Fancelli from Florida?
Did this article cover both the contributions of automobile manufacturers to relief efforts and the contributions of the auto industry overall?,Did this article mention any specific specific contributions by a specific auto manufacturer?,Was this article specifically focused on the automobile industry?,Did this article address all types of donations made by automobile companies during the 911 incident?
Are state employees in Wisconsin earning about 8 percent less than in private sector?,Is private sector worker earning more than state workers in Wisconsin?,Does Wisconsin have a minimum wage for state employees?,Has the state's minimum wage in Wisconsin decreased?,Does the state have a minimum wage for state employees?,Has Wisconsin's minimum wage stayed the same?
Are there already funds in the rainy day fund?,Are $6 billion projected to accumulate in the rainy day fund used?,Is the rainy day fund projected to accumulate $6 billion?,Do the state's rainy day fund reserves currently exceed the amount spent?,Are there more funds to accumulate in the rainy day fund?
Does the Covid-19 vaccine have effectiveness as of 2015?,Is there any evidence proving this?,Are there any other medications for the illness the vaccine was a part of?,Do some vaccines not perform the same as other vaccines in these populations?,Have vaccines for a medical condition or illness been effective since 1999?
Has this result in a decrease in deficits?,Has this result in a decrease in deficits?,Has the deficits under Obama been cut in any way?,Have deficits under Obama actually decreased?,Do deficits under Obama still exist?,Is the deficit under Obama still present?,Do deficits under Obama still exist?
Have 58 million rounds been played in Florida every year?,Does Florida have more than 1200 golf courses?,Has tourism in Florida exceeded 5 million visits?,Has the percentage of travel golf in Florida decreased over time?,Does the percentage of travel golf in Florida increase in the following year?,Is the number of people from Florida who come for golf higher than the number of people from other states?
Did video footage of a ransacked Walmart occur in April 2023?,"Did the video footage of a ransacked Walmart occur in April 2023 in Fairfield, California?",Did the video footage of a ransacked Walmart occur in April 2023?,Was an incident reported for the Walmart?
Does the color scheme lock in 2007 on Twitter?,Does using the color scheme lock in 2007 on Twitter mean you can see the new scheme any time now?,Has Twitter changed their color scheme to keep people from accidentally switching their color scheme on Twitter?,Has there been any change to the Twitter color scheme to make this change permanent?
Are there 5 crore illegal Bangladeshi and Rohingya immigrants in India?,Is there any evidence to suggest the number of illegal immigrants is higher?,Are there any studies to support the claim?,Are there any studies to support the claim?,Are any studies to support the claims?,Do illegal immigrants live in India?,Do these individuals have legal residency?
Did Straus receive recognition from Planned Parenthood following the 2009 session?,Did Straus receive any acknowledgement from Planned Parenthood after the 2009 session?,Does Straus have any known contacts with Planned Parenthood?,Did Straus receive recognition from Planned Parenthood after the 2009 session?
Is the illustration shown in this article part of a larger article?,"Is it the ""moist"" version of the virus?",Is the article based on a specific scientific illustration?,Is this article in the official record of the WHO?,Is this illustration based on a scientific illustration?
Did 7 Marines die in this exercise?,Did 7 Marines lose their lives in this exercise?,Was this exercise conducted outside the United States?,Is this exercise related to combat training?,Did the Marines perform this exercise in any country other than the United States?,Is it possible that this exercise took place in the United States?,Is this training exercise part of an American military mission?
Did the mugshots show Trump wearing black clothing?,Did the mugshots show Trump in a red striped tie?,Was the mugshot of Trump wearing a red striped tie leaked?,Did the mugshots show Trump wearing a white striped tie?,Were the mugshots of Trump wearing a white striped tie leaked?
Have NASA confirmed the Earth will experience 15 straight days of darkness?,Did NASA confirm the Earth will experience 15 straight days of darkness?,Did NASA confirm the Earth will experience 15 straight days of darkness?,Did NASA confirm the Earth will experience 15 straight days of darkness?,Is it safe to assume the Earth will experience 15 straight days of darkness?
"Did 50,000 crore rupees spent on Vrindavan Chandrodaya Mandir and 50,000 rupees spent on 51,000 government schools be spent on other projects?",Are these other projects related to educational reforms in this country?,Did other government initiatives for education in this country come under a similar concept?
Would the federal government decide to send 425 refugees from Syria to Delaware?,Would they use the money they spend on that project?,Will Delaware approve or reject the refugees?,Was that part of the decision made by the federal government?,Did these people overwhelmingly agree with the stance of the federal government?,Did this passage address specific reasons the federal government made the decision to send refugees to Delaware?
"Did California's homeless population increase by 35,000 in 2005 from 189,000 homeless people in 2005?",Did California's homeless population increase by more in 2005 than in 2005?,Is California currently experiencing a homeless population crisis due to an increase in unsheltered people?,"Can California be considered ""hospitable""?"
Is the pain of testicles compared to producing 132 children or breaking 3200 bones comparable?,Is the pain comparable to if a man threw his testicles?,Is the pain comparable to breaking 3200 bones / 9000 del of pain in that process?
"Would more than 200,000 registered voters be prevented from voting?",Would voters in Wisconsin who had been banned from voting be unable to vote?,Does this plan include the counties of South Dakota and Oklahoma?,Will the state ban voters from casting ballots?,Is this plan considered to be a significant change in this state?
Did Zelenskyy's statement about election failures reflect a change in Ukrainian policy?,Will any new elections be held until the war with Russia ends?,Was Zelenskyy's statement about election failures consistent with a change in Ukraine policy?,Was Zelenskyy's statement regarding new elections consistent with a change in Ukraine policy?
Did Trump attack his rivals for President on Father’s Day?,Did the statements include anything about political rivals?,Is this statement a satire?,Is Trump's statement about political rivals a satire?,Is this statement related to a political event?,Is this statement a joke or satire?
"Did police say that if you see a dog locked in a car in hot temperatures, take a picture of the dog and the car?",Is it illegal to break a window in a vehicle when the driver is locked in a hot climate?,Do police consider breaking the window in a hot climate when a driver is locked in a hot climate?
"Have street vendors in Ahmedabad been evicted to prepare for the visit of the United States President Trump on April 24, 2020?",Have street vendors in Ahmedabad been evicted from their respective houses to prepare for the visit of the United States President Trump?,Did the Ahmedabad streets have the same amount of street vendors during Trump's visit?
Is the official White House Twitter account now a bit smaller than the John McCain Twitter account?,Is it true that the number of followers for the White House Twitter account is less than one million?,Is it true the number of followers for the McCain Twitter account is less than one million?,Is it true that the number of followers for the Obama Twitter account is less than one million?
Did Italy drastically reduce the COV1D-19 death count?,Has Italy drastically reduced the COV1D-19 death count?,Is there a difference between the death count of COV1D-19 and the annual season flu?,Is the total death count lower than the average seasonal flu?,Is Italy a country with a low COV1D-19 death rate?
Does Make-A-Wish deny certain wishes to unvaccinated children?,Did Make-A-Wish deny certain wishes to unvaccinated children?,Is there a way to delete a Make-A-Wish wish?,Is there a way to delete a Make-A-Wish wish?
Did singer Dolly Parton speak out against Trump or did both of them speak against Trump?,"Did both Dolly Parton and Michelle Pfeiffer say ""Trump in one year is already better than 16 years of Bush and Obama""?","Did either actress claim ""Trump in one year is already better than 16 years of Bush and Obama""?"
Did White say that she got boosted today?,Did White say that she die days before she died?,Did White say that she died on Dec 28?,Did White say that she dies days before she died?,Did White say that she got boosted today?,Did White have a serious health problem?,Did White declare her health problems at the time that she died?
"Did any of the 9,000+ students tested in the week to 6 December actually get tested?",Did any of the negative Covid tests that were found to have been false positives change after being reversed?,Was any of the positive Covid tests that were found to be false positives changed by being reversed?,Is there any evidence that any negative Covid tests were actually changed after being reversed?
"Did an award for a self-cleaning bathroom come with a price tag of more than $300,000. Did this public bathroom receive an award for America’s Best Restroom in November 2020?","Did the public bathroom have a price tag of less than $300,000?",Did the public bathroom receive an award in November 2020?
Does a video of Biafran protesters show a leader being arrested in 2021?,Was the leader arrested and is he still incarcerated?,Was the arrest of the leader in 2021?,Did the protesters show the leader’s arrest?,Whether or not there is a video of Biafrans protesting or not?
Did there exist any Facebook accounts that claim that Aung San Suu Kyi has been recognised as the mother of the world?,Are there any Facebook accounts that claim that Aung San Suu Kyi has been recognised as the mother of the world?,Are there any Facebook accounts that claim that Aung San Suu Kyi has been recognised as the mother of the world?
Is it true that Wisconsin women are paid 81% less than a man doing the same job?,Does this percentage compare to other states in the Midwest?,Does this percentage compare to other states in the Southeast?,Is this percentage comparable to other states in the South?,Is there a particular gender in this percentage range?
Are exit polls accurate?,Do most exit polls indicate Democrats get over 70% of LGBT votes in federal elections?,Have LGBT people in general voted?,Do LGBT voters have a negative effect on political power?,Are these surveys used as a means of sizing political power?,Have LGBT people voted for either Party more than once in each election?
Did Albert Bourla deceive customers on the effectiveness of the Covid-19 vaccine?,Did he take money from the company?,Did the company pay Bourla to take this money?,Is the company still paying Bourla for the covid-19 vaccine?,Does the CEO of Pfizer claim that Bourla was fired because of his behavior?
Did Cian O'Callaghan say that there are 16 empty homes for every homeless person in Ireland?,Could a vacant property tax have saved these homes?,Could a vacant property tax be implemented?,Are all vacant homes in Ireland safe?,Are all vacant houses affordable?,Has Cian O'Callaghan expressed a desire to bring these homes back to use?
Was the bird mentioned in Islam?,Does this bird cause American fires?,Has this bird been mentioned in Islam?,Is this bird currently present in the US?,Does this bird produce fires?,Is this bird still in use today?,Is this bird known by other groups?,Is this bird still in use today?
Would you pay for 12 hours if you return?,Would you have to pay for 12 hours if you go back within 12 hours?,Would you have to pay toll tax if you go back within 12 hours?,Can I use this method to come back within 12 hours at a toll plaza?
Is Morrison responsible for the use of public money on Palmer's lawsuit?,Is Morrison's alleged use of public money on Palmer's lawsuit a lie?,Was the $1 million payment made after Palmer filed an appeal?,Were the funds used before or after Morrison's settlement with Palmer?,Did Morrison fund Palmer's lawsuit?
Is there proof that government provides more than 4 million houses since 1994?,Is there evidence that government provides more than 4 million houses since 1994?,Is government involvement in the property sector still prevalent today?,Are there statistics for the number of houses?,Is government directly involved in the property sector today?,Are there any statistics for the number of houses?
Did Pakistan win in the T20 World Cup 2021 match?,Was there a video of Kashmiri people celebrating Pakistan's win?,Was a video posted of Kashmiri people celebrating Pakistan's win?,Did the video show multiple Kashmiri people celebrating Pakistan's win?,Did Pakistan win in the T20 World Cup 2021?,Did the video also show a number of Indian people celebrating the victory?
Did Robredo say her and Kiko's victory in the 2022 elections are guaranteed?,Did Robredo say her and Pangilinan's re-election in the 2020 presidential elections was guaranteed?,Did Robredo say the 2022 elections are very safe if their tandem fails?
Did this event take place to turn Maui island into a 15-minute city or smart city?,Was this event an attempt to turn Maui island into a smart city?,Did this event attempt to turn Maui into a 15-minute city?,Did this event attempt to turn Maui island into a smart city?
Was the 14-year-old invited to review proposals for the MSI Fellowship Programme?,Did this person represent a minority?,Is there a consensus of diversity in NASA's panellists?,Will there be further discussion of the MSI Fellowship Program?,Are there any other minority groups who could contribute to this discussion?,Will this person make a speech?
Did Ted Cruz and Marco Rubio call for Democrats if Donald Trump won?,Was this political stance shared between Cruz and Rubio?,Did Cruz and Rubio recommend voting for Democrats if Trump won?,Did this political stance share common values?,Did this political stance involve voting for Democrats after Trump was elected?
Does the Supreme Court of India (SCI) have ruled that 'India' should be called 'Bharat' in all languages after June 15?,Was the Supreme Court of India (SCI) in a position to rule on whether the term 'India' should be used in the whole of India?
Did the developer specifically say developers are forced to use the 195 land union contractor?,Are any construction projects in California required to have 195 land union contractors?,Is there any evidence that developers are required to use land union contractors?,Do developers need to use 195 land union contractors to complete construction?,Is there evidence that developers have used 195 land union contractors?
"Is India to soon have uniform power tariff as the Modi government is implementing "" one nation, one power tariff"" law?","Is India to soon have uniform power tariff as the Modi government is implementing "" one nation, one power tariff"" law?","Is India to soon have uniform power tariff as the Modi government is implementing "" one nation, one power tariff"" law?"
Did any presidential candidate ever release this tax information?,Was it typical for this report to be released if it was a Democratic candidate?,Is it uncommon for this report to be released if it was a Republican candidate?,Is this report typical for any Republican presidential candidate to release this tax information?
Did the state legislature vote to approve the bill?,Does the plan save 900 jobs at Twin River?,"Does this plan require the approval of the Associated Press, the WSJ and the New York Times?",Do these publications agree with the claims?,Are these statements consistent with the facts?,Does the proposed funding for this project support environmental protection or job growth?
Does Georgia have one of America's toughest ethics laws?,Is Georgia governed by ethics law?,Do Georgia's ethics laws place a high value on political involvement?,Is Georgia a country that provides ethics laws for candidates for public office?,Is Georgia a country with a high moral duty toward the public?
Did the page impersonating Odero claim to be Pastor Odero?,Is the Facebook page's claim false?,"Is the page's claim of ""Making prayer easier"" based on Odero being impersonated?",Is the page's claim endorsed by Odero?
Did Shah claim that he would change the demographics of Kashmir within four years?,Did Shah mention to VHP cadre that he would change the demographics of Kashmir in four years?,Did Shah's comments directly address this claim?,Is there evidence that Shah is attempting to change demographics in Kashmir?
Did Senator Hill support the 2008 rescue for Wall Street firms?,Did he support the rescue for Wall Street firms in october 2008?,Did Senator Hill say he supported the Wall Street rescue in october 2008?,Did Senator Hill say he supported the Wall Street rescue in October 2008?
Do FDA and CDC standards specify that COVID-19 RNA vaccine is not a vaccine?,Does RNA vaccine bind to a particular cell?,Do FDA and CDC standards specify that COVID-19 RNA vaccine interferes with transmission?,Does COVID-19 RNA vaccine alter the cell to become a pathogen - manufacturing site?
Can an 18-year-old adopt a 17-year-old person in the United States?,Is it legal to adopt a 17-year-old in the United States?,Are there regulations regarding the age of the people who are adopted by one person?,Can adopting older people in the United States be legal?
Do only five states have a hate crimes law?,Is Georgia the only state that does not have a hate crimes law?,Is Georgia the only state that does not have a hate crimes law?,Is Georgia the only state that does not have a hate crimes law?,Is Georgia one of five states not that does not have a hate crimes law?,Is Georgia a state that did not have a hate crimes law?
Did the attack on Paul Pelosi on June 5th of 2013 happen?,Was there any link between this attack and two other websites based on this attack?,Did these websites contain information related to the attack on Pelosi?,Did the attack take place between the day of Pelosi’s inauguration and the day of the attack?,Did these websites have links to the attack on Pelosi?
Does this suggest the eight nutrients can reverse ADHD?,Is this research directly scientific or is it based on speculations?,Does this research suggest any additional benefits from these nutrients?,Does this research support current conventional treatments for ADHD?,Were these studies conducted in a controlled setting?,Are these studies based on clinical studies?
Did the tax cut cause a revenue increase?,Was revenue greater than expected for the year?,Was the tax cut a general increase in revenue or a specific increase in revenue?,Was the tax cut an individual measure?,Have any other tax acts resulted in revenue increases in previous years?,Have any other states been affected by the tax cut?
Did average life expectancy for Americans have lower longevity in 1950 compared to today?,How many workers supported one retiree in 1950?,Are 77 years now the average life expectancy in the U.S.?,Is there more than one retiree support worker in 1950?,Is there a shortage of retirees in 1950?
Did 45 nations move to enforce travel restrictions with China before Trump?,Did Trump declare new travel restrictions prior to launching his policies?,Did Trump’s administration require a ban on China travel before launching his policies?,Is the ban extended to all travelers to China?,"Are restrictions implemented for China by others, including other nations?"
Was Sanders trying to tax churches?,Would churches have to pay this tax?,Did Sanders propose any tax cuts?,Does Sanders want to tax all churches?,Did Sanders propose any cuts?,Did Sanders propose any tax cuts?,Did Sanders introduce any cuts?,Has Sanders' tax policy actually worked?,Are Bernie Sanders' plans to tax churches more successful than planned?
Did Obama open new areas to offshore drilling?,Are the areas Obama announces to close to offshore drilling new?,Did Obama have to act to release these new areas to drilling?,Has Obama ever been known to authorize new drilling despite having never released these new areas?,Did Obama ever release any new offshore drilling lands?,Did Obama allow new drilling on these new areas before the 2009 moratorium was lifted?
Was there any video footage of shots fired in US street in June 2020?,Did a man shoot or get hit in any street that day?,Was any protest at that time banned in the US?,Were any shots in the video taken in a park?,Did anyone make any arrests at that time?
Does Georgia have these regulations?,Are these regulations related to lobbyists giving money to legislators?,Are there any regulations for lobbyists giving money to legislators?,Are Georgia's regulations related to lobbyists giving money to legislators?,Are the Georgia rules on lobbyists giving money to legislators consistent with the regulations in other states?
Is the 12.7 million people kicking off their insurance solely because of tax cuts to the wealthy?,Is the 12.7 million people kicking off their insurance solely because of tax cuts to the wealthy?,Has the 12.7 million people kicking off their insurance solely caused any tax cuts to the wealthy?
"Are small businesses that receive over $250,000. in sales going to get massive tax increases?","Are small businesses that receive over $250,000. in sales going to get massive tax increases?",Is the amount of a business's gross sales a big indicator of a company's revenue?,Is the amount of the business's gross sales a large indicator of a company's revenue?
Can vanilla ice cream be considered black in 1912?,Can white people tolerate eating vanilla ice cream as black in 1912?,Has vanilla ice cream been made in black since 1912?,Does vanilla ice cream contain black ingredients in the United States?,Did vanilla ice cream contain black ingredients before 1912?
"Did WV highways rank 16th in the country in a national survey of highway systems, up 20 spots from last year’s ranking?",Is this ranking affirms all the hard work they've done?,Are the state highways rated as excellent?,Has WV's traffic fatalities decreased over the past few years?
Do any border changes in April 2022 result in an increase in encounters at the southwest border?,Did these policies increase encounters at the southwest border?,Did the policies increase confrontations at the southwest border?,Is the increase in encounters due to some policy change?,Is there evidence of the policy change leading to increased encounters?
Did the woman killed on Jan. 6 belong to the Secret Service?,Did the Secret Service shoot the woman killed?,Were the Secret Service agents involved in the shooting?,Are the police involved in the shooting?,Do the police in question have a different relationship to the Secret Service than a Capitol police?,Was the woman killed by the Capitol Police?
Did PepsiCo give $100 million to Black Lives Matter?,Is the amount PepsiCo gave to Black Lives Matter less than $2 million?,Is the amount of PepsiCo giving to Black Lives Matter greater than $2 million?,Can someone give more than $100 million to Black Lives Matter?
Do people have private property under the Act?,What about land?,Does the Act require people to pay taxes on their own private property?,Can people not own private land under the Act?,Can people own private land without paying tax?,Are there legal restrictions on land under the Act?,Can private property be owned under the Act?
Have 10 of the top 100 Johannesburg stock exchange companies been owned by black South Africans?,Have any of the top 100 companies on the Johannesburg stock exchange been owned by black South Africans?,Is it true that a 10 percent portion of the top 100 Johannesburg stock exchange companies are owned by black South Africans?
Did Jennifer Lopez say Houston’s songs fit her vocal range?,Did Whitney Houston’s songs fit Jennifer Lopez’s voice?,Did Jennifer Lopez attend the 2023 Grammy Awards?,Did Jennifer Lopez attend the 2023 Grammy Awards?,Has Jennifer Lopez performed a Whitney Houston tribute at any awards events?,Does Jennifer Lopez have a vocal range of over 40?
Did the laws I sponsored have specific e-verify provisions?,Did E-Verify provisions appear in the legislation the senator sponsored?,Was the legislation passed in 2010?,Was e-verify required by legislation the senator sponsored?,Is this legislation still in effect?,Are any other laws that have similar e-verify provisions in place?
"Did Iceland pay $5,000 per month to immigrants who marry Icelandic women?","Is it true that Iceland will pay $4,000 per month to immigrants who marry Icelandic women?",Is this claim about a shortage of men factually based?,Is this claim about a shortage of men a myth?
Did TRAI recommend replacing 10-digit mobile numbers in India?,Was TRAI also a member of the ITU?,Is the TRAI still in power in India?,Is the TRAI still in power in India?,Is the TRAI still in power in India?,Does the TRAI have authority to decide what mobile numbers are to be replaced?
"Was a conspiracy theory about Clinton death published on May 6, 2021?",Was the interview about Clinton death written by a conspiracy theorist?,Did the interview claim Clinton died of kuru?,Did Clinton die from kuru?,Is there a study to confirm the claim?,Are kuru and cannibalism different diseases?
Is it true that there were 1701 terrorists killed in J&K during the 10 years of Manmohan Singh rule?,Does this compare to the 1701 that were killed under Modi?,Is it accurate to say there were less terrorists killed in J&K during the four and half years of Modi?
Did the local authorities of 43 states refuse to honor all requests from ICE?,Was it more rare to receive detainers in these states?,Are some detainer requests rarer than others?,Has the overall number of detainer requests for ICE in these states decreased?,Does this report take place only in certain states?
Did Pakistan pass a law that forced men to marry?,Did Pakistan pass a law that made one marriage for each of its males mandatory?,Was this law passed after the 2006 elections?,Did this bill allow for male couples to obtain a marriage license?,Did Pakistan ban marriages after 2006.?,Did Pakistan pass the law for a one man-only wedding in 2006.?
Is CO2-driven warming absent in satellite data?,Does satellite data show CO2-driven warming?,Is there evidence of CO2-driven warming in data from multiple satellites?,/d/d//d//e/d//e/d//e/e/d//e//e/e/d//e//e/d//e/d?
Did USDA wait for the notification of the computer breach?,Did the hackers use social security numbers?,Did the hackers release the Social Security numbers to the students?,Did the hackers release these information immediately following the hack?,Did the hackers release information prior to the breach?,Did the hackers notify the students of the breach?,Was there any documentation to suggest that the students had knowledge of this breach prior to the hack?
"Did the SSR account have a bank accounts balance of 19,183 crores?","Did the SSR account balances have more than 1,238 crore rupees?",Did this account balance have enough money to cater for every girl?,Has the SSR account balance contributed to the income of these girls?,Has the SSR account balance contributed towards the funding of their education?
Did the investment programme raise the total stated amount?,Does this amount include the actual capital raised?,Did this funding come from a specific source?,Did this funding come from the government?,Was this funding used to start this venture?,Are the funds in this venture from other sources?,Was the funding used by this company or other investors?
Does lack of oxygen kill cancer?,Does the Nobel Prize awarded Otto Warburg for proof of cancer cause?,Is there research or publications that support this claim?,Is the theory established in the context of Warburg's work and was a result of this research?,Is it clear from this research that warburg was awarded multiple Nobels for his research stating that lack of oxygen causes cancer?
Did Dominion Voting Systems delete any votes for Trump in 2020?,Did Dominion Voting Systems delete any votes for Trump in 2020?,Did Dominion Voting Systems delete all of Trump's votes in 2020?,Do the votes in question reportedly subsequently have a different name?,Are there any other questions relating to this matter?
Did Black Friday originate in 1904?,When were enslaved people sold for a discount?,Did slaves earn a discount for their labor?,Did the Black Friday discount involve slave labor?,Have enslaved people continued to buy goods on Black Friday for decades?,Did Black Friday originate in 1904?
Did USAID invest $8 billion in this public-private partnership?,Has the partnership grown as a result of this public-private partnership?,Has this public-private partnership generated more than $45 billion?,Has the public-private partnership reached out to companies to help with this public-private partnership?,Was the estimated cost of the public-private partnership?
Did the player get an additional payment when a statistical error was corrected?,Did the baseball player receive any compensation for the correction?,Did the baseball player receive any money for a correcting statistic?,Was the correcting statistic related to a baseball game?,Did the baseball player receive any compensation for the correcting statistic?
Has the border fencing closed in El Paso?,Has the fence significantly curtailed illegal crossings?,Have local crime and drug smuggling drastically decreased?,Did the border fence closure dramatically curtailed illegal crossings?,Does the border fence closure reduce crime?,Did smuggling of drugs increase at the border?
Is the COVID-19 virus cured by drinking hot water with lemon and baking soda?,Is baking soda used in the COVID-19 virus treatment?,Is the mug of hot water with lemon and baking soda used in the COVID-19 virus treatment effective?,Has the mug of hot water with lemon and baking soda been proven to kill COVID-19?
Did the unemployment rate actually go up last month?,Did the unemployment rate go up because the economy grew?,Did the number of people not looking for work increase last month?,Did the unemployment rate go up because the economy expanded?,Are there people not looking for work?,Is there evidence the labor market has been weak lately?
Was Obama the one who made the argument he is now criticizing back in November 2006?,Was Obama critical of the position that McCain was advocating back in November 2006?,Did Obama support the position Senator McCain was advocating back in November 2006?,Is it true that Obama made the same argument that McCain is now criticizing back in November 2006?
"Did Cowell say that he was leaving ""America's Got Talent"" to pursue a product line of keto weight loss gummies?","Did Cowell say that he was leaving ""America's Got Talent"" to pursue a product line of keto weight loss gummies?","Did the online article report that Cowell was leaving "" America's Got Talent "" to pursue a product line of keto weight loss gummies?"
Did New Jersey's state lottery fund 970.3 million dollars for classrooms in 2011?,Did New Jersey use federal money for education?,Did NJ use state money for schools?,Did New Jersey use public money?,Did New Jersey use state funding for education?,Does New Jersey use state funding for schools?,Does the state lottery support schools?
Has the Snickers chocolate been banned in 65 countries?,Does the video explain why Snickers are being destroyed?,Is the Snickers chocolate being destroyed a form of cancer?,Has the video aired to a general audience?,Did the Snickers chocolate cause cancer?,Is the Snickers chocolate being destroyed a form of cancer?
Can marijuana derivates ease symptoms during cancer treatment?,Do marijuana derivates contain many of the same side effects as alcoholic beverages?,Can marijuana derivates have any beneficial effects on a person’s brain?,Has marijuana been shown to ease symptoms during cancer treatment?,Is there evidence that marijuana derivates provide effective cures for cancer?
Did Trump have 170 short question-and-answer sessions through April 29?,Did Obama have 55 short question-and-answer sessions through April 29?,Did Trump and Obama both have similar high numbers of short question-and-answer sessions?,Does Trump do better at these type of questions than Obama?
Did Queen Elizabeth II knight Ruben in 2022?,Was Ruben knighted by Queen Elizabeth II in 2022?,Did Queen Elizabeth II knight Ruben in 2022?,Did Queen Elizabeth II knight Ruben in 2022?,Did Queen Elizabeth II knight Ruben in 2022?,Did Queen Elizabeth II knight Ruben in 2022?
Is it true that Rep LaTourette has sponsored legislation to increase spending by 551.6 percent?,Has LaTourette sponsored legislation in the past to increase spending by 551.6 percent?,Has LaTourette sponsored legislation to increase spending by 551.6 percent in the last five years?,Is there any evidence that LaTourette is the primary sponsor of legislation that would increase spending by 551.6 percent?
Did the city of Chicago receive the $221 million bailout?,Did Chicago receive any money from taxpayers in the rest of the state?,Did Chicago receive any money from the school district?,Does Chicago receive any money from the City of Chicago?,Did the Chicago Public Schools get a bailout?,Did the CPS receive this funding?
"Will this bill allow members of Congress to receive an additional $600,000 per year per year?",Is this bonus income available to current members of Congress?,Will this change affect former members of Congress?,Will this increase in income benefit current members?,Is this salary increase expected to be a large change in staffing?
Do South Africans view drugs as a major cause of crime?,Is there a statistically significant percentage of national crimes related to drugs?,Is it true that 60% of crimes national are related to drug abuse?,Can there be a statistically significant percentage of crimes related to alcohol/other drug abuse?
"Are there 55,167 Muslims born in India?","Do 3337 Indians, 1117 Indians and 1222 Christians originate in India?","Are there 55,167 Hindus born in India?","Are there 3337 Indians, 1117 Indians and 1222 Christians originate in India?",Do the numbers of these people differ?
Did wages fall in any quarter between the first and second quarters of 2018?,Is there evidence for a real wages increase after tax cuts?,Is it clear what this increase will be compared to before tax cuts?,Is this increase a result of a tax rate increase?,Is the tax rate increase not based solely on one quarter?
Did Schilling paint his socks bloody?,Did Schilling paint his socks bloody?,Did Schilling paint his socks bloody?,Did Schilling paint the socks bloody?,Did Schilling paint the socks bloody?,Did Schilling paint his socks bloody?,Did Schilling ever paint his socks bloody?
Did the majority of illegal immigrants in Florida come on an airplane?,Did 70% of all the people in Florida who overstayed a visa get in on an airplane?,Do these statistics include other Florida counties that do not have a large percentage of illegal immigrants?,Does Florida have low rates for illegal immigrants who are arrested?
"Did 65,000 deaths test positive for coronavirus within 30 days of their death?","Did 70,000 of the deaths that tested positive for coronavirus die from heart attacks, strokes, cancer, and cancer?","Was the cause of death for the 65,000 deaths tested positive for coronavirus within 30 days of their death?"
Did Obama and Kaine's stimulus fail to create jobs?,Did Obama's and Kaine's stimulus fail to create jobs?,Did Obama and Kaine use the stimulus to fund domestic and foreign operations?,Did the stimulus fail to create jobs in any country?,Do Democratic and Republican leaders support the stimulus?
Did the Society of Actuaries report that individual premiums in Wisconsin will increase by 82 percent under Obamacare?,Has the Society of Actuaries released any figures regarding the expected increase in individual premiums under Obamacare?,Were the Society of Actuaries estimates accurate in their report?,Did the Society of Actuaries' methodology for estimating the expected increase in individual premiums under Obamacare based on the study it conducted?
Is this the country the most vulnerable to the economy's crisis?,Is this a reaffirmation of Obama's position about the economy's crisis?,Is this a reaffirmation of Obama's position on the economy's crisis?,Is this the first time Obama has referenced how the economy's crisis is getting worse?
Did this spider bite five people?,Was this spider newly introduced in the United States?,Has this spider retrained to attack after the previous bite?,Has this species survived?,Are there additional factors that were involved in this spider bite?,Is this spider new to the U.S.?,Are there any additional risks associated with this spider bite?
Did this speech take place during his first days as President?,Was Trump giving his speech after Biden's inauguration?,Did Trump speak to his supporters following the video?,Did Trump speak to his supporters in the days following Biden's inauguration?,Did Trump speak directly after Biden's inaugural?
Do two cups of club soda kill the fire ant colony?,Is a single cup of club soda enough to kill the ant colony?,Does club soda contain a lot of chlorine?,Can soda be dipped into water as a means of killing fire ants?,Is drinking club soda associated with the killing of fire ants?
Would Obama impose a tax of 23 percent on the Medicare prescription drug benefit for low income beneficiaries?,Is Obama planning to implement a tax of more than 23 percent on the Medicare prescription drug benefit for low income beneficiaries?,Is this a plan Obama has announced?,Is Obama's plan for a tax on the Medicare prescription drug benefit for low income beneficiaries?
Does this deal remove any tariffs on American products and goods?,Does the agreement significantly affect the economy?,Do any of the proposed tariffs endanger US industries?,Does this agreement aim to reduce US trade deficits?,Would reducing US tariffs to the levels of other countries be desirable for economic growth?
"Is there an estimated 700,000 Americans on watch lists or something that would all be captured under the bill?","Is it true there are over 700,000 Americans on watch lists or something that would all be captured under the bill?",Does this bill contain a provision for tracking gun purchases by suspected terrorists?
Is Radonovic also being charged with crimes?,Was Radonovic charged with crimes for 18 days in 2015?,Is Radonovic actually running from the law?,Did Radinovich spend a lot of time being arrested?,Is this opinion from a Minnesota representative a true one?,Is this opinion supported by the actual facts?
Did Zuckerberg pay money to five Wisconsin cities?,Did Zuckerberg pay money for elections in Wisconsin?,Did Zuckerberg pay money in Wisconsin for elections in 2020?,Did Zuckerberg pay money for elections in Wisconsin?,Did Zuckerberg pay bribes in Wisconsin for elections?,Did Zuckerberg receive money from 5 Wisconsin cities in 2020?
Was bedeutet die Video?,Is there another media source in this matter?,Sollte der Video auch weiterhin in diesem Video folgen?,Can video-formatting and quality be guaranteed in a video-file?,Can the Video be used as a source of documentary?,Is there a sex in this video?
"Is OceanGate's plan for 1,000 people to Venus by 2050?",Is the plan in accordance with the Human Rights Campaign?,Did OceanGate announce this plan after publishing a memo?,Did OceanGate announce this plan after publishing an article?,Were there any controversies about this plan?
"Does Thompson opine that Medicare is ""nine years closer to bankruptcy""?",Does Thompson agree that Medicare has run to the ground?,Does Thompson claim that he ran Medicare into the ground?,Does Thompson assert that Medicare is in danger of collapse?,Has Thompson made any specific reference to this in any of his articles?
Did Central Texas river water sent to downstream rice farmers equal 3 years’ worth of Austin’s water use in 2011?,Are the rice farmers receiving a fair amount of water from the river?,Have the rice farmers received a large amount of water from the river in the last 4 years?,Are the rice farmers receiving a fair amount of water from the river in the last 3 years?
Does taking a hot five-minute bath at 41°C reduce the chance of infection with COVID-19 by 60%?,Does taking a hot five-minute bath at 41°C reduce the chance of infection with COVID-19 by 60%?,Does taking a hot five-minute bath at 41°C four or more times a week reduce the chance of infection with COVID-19 by 60%?
Did a list of principles shared on social media in late 2019 include a manifesto written by John Wesley?,Has John Wesley's manifesto been used as a reference in late 2019?,Have other authors published their manifestos?,Has John Wesley's manifesto been used as a reference in late 2019?
Did only 3.1% of black people over the age of 20 have university degrees compared to 13.9% and 18.3% for Indian and white people?,Did there exist separate percentages for black people over the age of 20 and white people?,Did this information come from a statewide survey?,Did other people who lived in the U.S. have a higher percentage of college graduates than people who lived there?
Is Article 61 of the Magna Carta still in place?,Does the Magna Carta permit lawful rebellion?,Does the Magna Carta permit businesses not to close down for Covid-19 regulations?,Does the Magna Carta allow lawful dissent or rebellion?,Is there any evidence that the Magna Carta is still in place?
Did the lab created and patent the virus?,Did the COVID-19 pandemic originate with man?,Did the lab created and patent the coronavirus sars?,Did the COVID-19 pandemic originate with scientists and government?,Did the lab create and patent the SARS-CoV-2 virus?
Did the professor ask students to create a list of US cultural sites that Iran should bomb?,Has anyone responded to this post?,Did the professor ever respond to this post?,Is this post a joke?,Are any of these sites cultural?,Is Iran's intent for the nuclear bomb to destroy them?
Are 23% of lead pipe leads in America in the Chicagoland area?,Did Chicagoland contribute in any way to lead pipe lead pollution?,Are Chicagoland pipe leads more common in other cities?,Are Chicagoland pipe leads more widespread compared to others?,Have Chicagoland pipe leads contributed to the worst lead pipe lead pollution?
Has this statement been proven?,Did the seven investigations have any outcomes concluding people were not guilty?,Did any of the reports accredit the findings of the three senate investigations?,Did any of the investigations result in any changes?,Has any of these investigations concluded a majority of Americans were not guilty?
Did the Oregon Lottery fund the construction of the NOAA Marine Operations Center-Pacific?,Did the NOAA Marine Operations Center-Pacific receive funding from a lottery?,Did the OR lottery funds support the construction of the NOAA Marine Operations Center-Pacific?,Did any of the money from the OR lottery fund the construction of the NOAA Marine Operations Center-Pacific?,Did the port of Newport have a record of landings from the NOAA Marine Operations Center-Pacific?
"Is ""Democrats almost have their lowest representation in about 100 years"" a statement about their representation in congress and governorships?","Is the ""Democrats almost have their lowest representation in about 100 years"" a statement about their representation in general?",Are the Democrats lowest representative in general in Congress and governorships in about 100 years?
Did Irene hit the US?,Did Irene cause any power outages?,Did Irene leave power outages in New Jersey?,Did Irene have any major impact on power outages in New Jersey?,Did Irene cause any major power outages in New Jersey?,Was Irene the second largest storm to hit the US?
Did this hospital ever have a fire?,Did this hospital have a fire in Yangon?,Did this hospital have a fire in Yangon?,Did this hospital have a fire in Yangon in March 2021?,Did this hospital have a fire in Yangon in March of 2020?,Did this hospital have a fire in Yangon in March of 2021?
"Is it true that a Rohingya girl, Sakhra, aged 14 years, has two children?",Are we told that Nitish Kumar is against population control measures?,Are there any other facts about this information that we should know?,Has Nitish Kumar taken any action to end this situation?
Does Gingrey have a record of supporting $155 billion worth of targeted cuts?,Has Gingrey presented a zero proposal on targeting cuts?,Has Gingrey been critical of Gingrey for committing a violation of his First Amendment rights?,Does Gingrey support targeting cuts to federal agencies?
Does it take 3 people looking for every job opening?,Are there at least two ways in which this affects the economy?,Are there multiple ways to find jobs?,Does it take three people looking for every job opening?,Does the economic recovery have three people looking for every job opening?,Are there any employment agencies?
Did a baby boomer retire every day?,Did the baby boomer retire every day as a result of aging?,Did a baby boomer retire every day as a result of sickness?,Did the baby boomer retire every day as a result of a change in economy?,Are there currently 10.000 baby boomers retirement daily?
Did Nike pay $1000 to every customer?,Has Nike paid out money before to customers that haven’t purchased products from Nike?,Do Nike employees make a lot of money selling their products to customers that don’t buy Nike products?,Did Nike charge consumers for products after they buy from Nike?,Is Nike forced to pay a settlement to each customer?
Is this picture related to the 2021 Hamas-Israel conflict?,Is this picture several years old?,Is this picture related to the 2021 Hamas-Israel conflict?,Is this picture from within the past year?,Does this image have a t -shirt or hat?
Did Biden use any staged sets in 2020?,Did Biden use any staged sets in 2020?,Did Biden use CGI in 2020?,Did Biden use any CGI in 2020?,Does Biden use CGI in 2020?,Did Biden use CGI in 2020?,Does Biden use staged sets in 2020?
Did volunteers attend the Hurricane Dorian relief aid event?,Did volunteers fly to Florida for hurricane relief?,Was the Hurricane Dorian hurricane a disaster?,Is the Hurricane Dorian hurricane a natural disaster?,Is the Hurricane Dorian hurricane a natural disaster?,Does the social media post reference a social media platform?
Did students crowd in train to give UP PET 2022?,Did the students give UP PET 2022 to the train's conductor?,Did students crowd in trains to give UP PET 2022?,Was there any activity involving the train conductor in the video?,Does UP PET 2022 require a specific train track to give UP PET 2022?
"Does Anthony Fauci have "" 4 U.S. patents for a key glycoprotein"" used to ""create the current COVID-19 epidemic ""?",Does Fauci have 4 U.S. patents for a key glycoprotein?,Is Fauci involved in any other patents for a key glycoprotein?,Is there any evidence a key glycoprotein was used to create the COVID-19 epidemic?
Did Smith introduce the Climate Change bill in 1987?,Did Smith introduce the Climate Change bill in 1989?,Was Smith among the first to introduce the climate change bill in the 1990s?,Did Smith introduce the climate change bill in any other years?,Have all climate change bills been introduced in the USA?,Are any climate change bills related to energy issues?
"Is the post from the BBC, and therefore fake, accurate?",Will this increase in refugees in Europe be caused by the sanctions?,"Would this increase in refugees, if there are sanctions, equate to 60 million in the EU?",Has the post come from a real BBC News news network?,"Is the post from the BBC, a verified news network, accurate?"
Does drinking water every 15 minutes prevent COVID-19?,Does drinking water every 15 minutes prevent COVID-19?,Is drinking water every 15 minutes preventative?,Is the goal of drinking water every 15 minutes preventative?,Has the method been proven to be effective?,Is it safe for non-smokers to drink water every 15 minutes?
Will the handshake emoji feature two hands whose skin tone can be individually modified?,Will the handshake emoji feature two hands whose skin tone can be individually modified?,Will any of the handshake emoji features include two hands whose skin tone can be individually modified?
Is there evidence of a rural hospital in Missouri closing every 8 months?,Is there evidence that the legislature's failure to expand Medicaid has brought crisis to Missouri's rural health care providers?,Does Missouri have many rural hospitals that fail to expand Medicaid?,Does Missouri have a rural hospital that closes every 8 months?
Was there a video of Kashmiri people celebrating Pakistan's win against India?,Did they celebrate the victory or defeat?,Did anyone in the video say anything about Kashmiri people supporting Pakistan in the match?,Did the video end with an X to show the result?,Was the video the first to document this type of celebration?
"Did Chinese soldiers are killed in the December 9 clash in Tawang, Arunachal?",Did the photo show coffins of Chinese soldiers killed in the December 9 clash?,Are the coffins of the Chinese soldiers in the photo taken by the photographer?,Are the coffins of the Chinese soldiers in the photo used in a promotional campaign?
"Is Amravati, Maharashtra a city with terrorists in it?",Did two terrorists carry bombs in the bus in Amravati?,Did the terrorists carry the bombs in the bus?,Was the bus carrying an explosive?,Did the terrorists use explosives in the bus?
Are they referencing any previous presidents in this context?,Is it true that the current president was one of the most vocal critics of the party?,Did this specific leader have any specific intentions in the current administration?,Does this president have other purposes aside from the current one?,Does this president have any other plans?
Is there a projected surplus nearing 7 billion in Wisconsin?,Is this projected surplus based on Republicans in 2010?,Is this projected surplus based on Democrats in 2011?,Do Wisconsin Republicans inherited a multi-billion dollar deficit in 2010?,Have Republicans previously inherited the same problem since 2010?
Do the bar codes that have prefixes of 729 and 871 mean that a product is made in Israel?,Did the Israeli government issue the barcodes with these prefixes?,Are the bars of Israel made by a company known by this prefix?,Does the barcode that has this prefix mean that a product is made in Israel?
Do they claim the amount would be a savings of $25 billion?,Would there be billions and billions saved if these pension buyouts were expanded?,Would the program be expanded even though it was already being used?,Does the program currently receive money in one form or another?,Can these retirement schemes be sold to people outside of the pension system?
Did Pearl Milling change the name of the pancake brand?,Are any of the products that are renamed by Pearl Milling included in the company's portfolio?,Can the renaming of the brand of pancakes be traced back to the first name of the brand?,Is the company still owned by Aunt Jemima?
Is it true that 1.8 million people benefited from the settlement of land claims?,Are there more settlements than land claims?,Is the settlement of land claims in the country of Ecuador estimated at $3 billion?,Is the settlement of land claims in the country of Ecuador based on a national census?
Does someone not vaccinated face any danger from people who have not been vaccinated?,Can unvaccinated people with COVID-19 be less likely to get sick than people who are vaccinated?,Did the vaccine eliminate the possible danger associated with COVID-19 from people not vaccinated?
Did the FL hospital receive a high number of unvaccinated COVID-19 patients?,Are there other COVID-19 cases pending in FL hospitals?,Did 75 FL physicians walk out of their offices?,Is it true that there were 75 FL physicians walking out of their offices?,Is this claim based on a real situation?,Is the fact that there were 75 FL doctors walking out of their offices a fact?
Are the minimum wage below $7.25 per person?,Are states in a class of states able to lower the minimum wage?,Are the minimum wage in a class of states a non-negotiable?,Are there any signs of Trump's approval of this position?,Is it endorsed by the Republican Party?
Was Obama's settlement of Somali refugees in Minnesota a planned development?,"Was there 43,000 refugees in Minnesota in 2016?","Were 80,000 Somali refugees in Minnesota during 2016?",Did Ilhan Omar run for office in support of Omar's asylum policies?,Do we know that Omar had been supportive of Obama's asylum policies in addition to establishing them?
Was a boy handcuffed at the Dulles airport in 2017?,Was this child's incident related to immigration restrictions?,Was this child's situation related to temporary immigration restrictions?,Did the photographer take this photo for a story?,Was this child's incident alleged in another story?,Did this incident result in any charges against the child?
Will Texas divide itself into multiple states?,Does Texas have a constitutional right to secede?,Can Texas split itself in five different states?,Can a Texas state re-establish itself as one?,Are there any restrictions to this decision?,Does Texas have a constitutional right to secede?,Can Texas divide itself into multiple states?
Is the video in Japan?,Was the video captured in Tokyo?,Was the video in Tokyo during the Feb. 6 earthquake?,Did the video occur in Tama?,Is it unlikely that the video would have filmed in Syria?,Did the video incident occur in Japan?,Is the video in Japan?
Did Luc Montagnier say that individuals vaccinated for COVID-19 would die within 2 years?,Did Luc Montagnier warn that individuals vaccinated for COVID-19 would die within 2 years?,Was Luc Montagnier ever convicted for a crime?,Was Luc Montagnier convicted for a crime?,Was Luc Montagnier involved in the murder of individuals who vaccinated for COVID-19?
Was Jason Smith 14 years old when he was discovered?,Was Jason Smith killed with his hands cuffed?,Did Smith have all of his organs removed before being found?,Was there any connection between Jason Smith and black teenagers in Charlotte?,Was Smith black in this area?,Was Jason Smith Black?,Have other reports of Jason Smith murders?
Do Congressional Budget Office estimates about 20 million people to lose insurance if Obamacare goes into effect in 2017?,Do Congressional Budget Office estimates about 20 million people to lose insurance if Obamacare goes into effect in 2017?,Is Obamacare expected to re-open the insurance market?,Would Obamacare re-open the insurance market?
Was this whale rescued and who was she thanking?,Did she make this offer before rescued?,Did this whale have any prior incident for attempting to rescue another whale?,Would the whale in this photo actually thank her rescuers?,Is this whale the first whale to be rescued?,Was this whale saved by rescuers?
Is it accurate to say that Clinton gave North Korea $5 billion and two nuclear reactors in 1994?,Did Clinton give North Korea nuclear weapons?,Did Clinton give North Korea nuclear weapons?,Did Clinton also give them $5 billion in 1994?,Did Clinton give North Korea nukes?,Did Clinton give North Korea nuclear weapons?
"Is it true that all animals used in Covid-19 vaccine trials died months later from immune disorders, sepsis and/or cardiac failure?",Did all animals used in Covid-19 vaccine trials died months later?,Are there any other factors related to mortality from the vaccine?,Was the vaccine effective against Covid-19?
Does Ireland's government and a local diversity nonprofit have a role in this issue?,Is this flyer in violation of Irish cultural norms?,Has any country/city had similar similar issues?,Was this incident related to immigrants?,Is this activity specific to any country?,Did the flyer contain any other information?
Did Russian airstrikes kill three hundred civilians in the first few hours of their attack on Ukraine?,Did Russian airstrikes kill civilians in the first few hours of their attacks on Ukraine?,Was the amount of civilian deaths in Russia's airstrikes higher than the number of civilian deaths in other nations?
Did Bush lower their income tax rates after they cut them?,Are there other tax cuts that result in increased money coming into the Treasury?,Did Bush's tax cuts create a booming economy?,Did the Bush tax cut provide an incentive to increase spending?,Did the Bush tax cuts contribute to the creation of more wealth in the Treasury?,Are there other tax cuts that result in greater money coming into the Treasury?
Does this person have any knowledge about transgender residents?,Is this person aware of the number of transgender people in this county?,Has this person been tested for transgender in this county?,Does this person have any knowledge about transgender residents?,Is this person knowledgeable of any other facets of transgender people in this county?
Is East Palestine a location within the Ohio River Basin?,Can you give me an estimate of where the Ohio River Basin population of the U.S. is located?,Is there a population density estimate for Ohio River Basin of the U.S.?,Is the Ohio River Basin an area with a population over ten percent?
Did Gwinnett County receive some of the $2.5 billion in sales tax revenue in cash?,Did Gwinnett County pay off the $2.5 billion of sales tax in cash?,Did Gwinnett County pay off the $2.5 billion in sales tax in cash?,Is Gwinnett County in a recession?
Did Jobs lose over this period?,Did jobs in Michigan and California experience jobs loss?,Did Michigan and California experience jobs loss in this period?,Did California and Michigan have jobs loss during this period?,Did Michigan and California have jobs loss during this period?,Did Michigan and California have jobs loss during this period?,Did Michigan and California have jobs loss during this period?
Did the tsunami hit India in early 2022?,Did this rain cause waves to crash on India?,Did the tsunami leave on the coast of India?,Did this cause waves to crash on India?,Did it rain heavily on the coastline of India?,Are these waves on the shore of India?,Have these waves happened in the past?
Was the photo of Trump dancing with a 13-year-old girl generated by an AI-generated picture?,Was the picture produced by a third party?,Did the picture involve a third party?,Were Trump and the 13-year-old girl dancing in this picture?,Did the picture include any background information?,Is the image primarily AI generated?
Is there only one insurer available in Missouri this year?,Did each county offer at least one choice?,Have most Missourians seen their premium increase?,Was the percentage of people seeing an increase higher than 40 percent in Missouri this year?,Is there evidence to support this claim?,2016 The Associated Press. All rights reserved.?
"Is it accurate to say Bank of America receipts indicate a ""Closed"" week has arrived in the US?","Did Bank of America receive receipts of special ""closed"" signs?",Did the closure of the U.S. banks happen by chance or intentional?,Have any other institutions closed down during the past year?
Did Time Magazine cover stories on global warming and a pandemic?,Did the magazine cover stories that included global warming and pandemic have warnings?,Were the magazine covers about global warming and pandemic made by any specific person?,Did the article about global warming and pandemic have warnings about a specific group of people?
Did the US reach its peak COVID-19 cases as of late October 2020?,Is there a steady decrease in positive COVID19 tests since late October 2020?,Is the U.S. presently experiencing a decline in COVID-19 cases?,Do COVID cases are declining at a rate similar to the CDC's predictions?
Was die Verteidigung der „Super“ im April 2020 von Rund 1.04 Euro gekostet?,Was der Vorbehalt von 70 Cent von 1 74 Euro in der Woche erhöht worden?,Was die Verteidigung der „Super“ im April 2020 aufgrund von 70 Cent von 1 74 Euro aufgehebt?
Did Armstrong flubbed his words?,Did Armstrong ever say 'one small step' on the Moon?,Did Armstrong ever take the first step on the moon?,Did Armstrong say 'one small step' in public?,Did Armstrong ever say 'one small step' during a meeting with the U.S. President?
"Did Congress pass a pay raise for themselves of $10,000 over two years?",Did Congress not vote to raise Social Security benefits for 2010 and 2011?,"Did Congress pass a pay raise for themselves of $10,000 over two years?","Did Congress pass a pay raise for themselves of $10,000 over two years?","Did Congress pass a pay raise for themselves of $10,000 over two years?"
Did Jackson give a lecture about critical race theory as part of a decision making process?,Was Jackson able to successfully explain the components of critical race theory in a lecture?,Was Jackson able to accurately describe the concepts of critical race theory in a lecture?,Did Jackson successfully provide a teaching exercise that included critical race theory?
Did Kavanaugh wake up in 1982?,Did Kavanaugh wake up in 1982?,Did the video in question depict Brett Kavanaugh holding a beer bottle?,Did Brett Kavanaugh wake up in 1982?,- did Brett Kavanaugh wake up in 1982?,- did Brett Kavanaugh wake up in 1982?
Did the religious movement say that all humans are of one race and made in the image of God?,Did the idea that all human beings are of one race and made in the image of God make it necessary to pull out bibles?,Were the books removed from shelves because they were outdated and racist in terms of teachings?
Did the FBI prosecute the boy's crimes?,Did the boy's hacking bring about any harm to the FBI?,Has any other young people been charged with hacking the FBI?,Was any FBI data breach alleged to be the sole source of the boy's hacking charges?,Is the 4-year-old boy charged with any criminal activities?
Was Fauci correct to say that many of the COVID-19 cases may arise from oversensitive tests?,Is Fauci correct to say that a large number of the COVID-19 cases may arise from oversensitive test results?,Is it likely that many patients may have been receiving false positive test results?
Did a GOP candidate lead for 2 months and lead every state?,Was there a Republican candidate who won the GOP nomination?,Did a Republican candidate lead for two months and lead every state?,Did a Republican candidate lead for two months and lead every state?,Has the Republican Party had a successful Republican primaries?
"Has there been a massive increase in mass shootings since 2004, when the assault weapon ban expired?",Are there any other evidence that there has been an increase in mass shootings?,"Did any of these incidents take place after 2004, according to the researcher?",Are there any other evidence that cites this claim?,"Would it be a coincidence to say that there was a mass increase in mass shootings after 2004, after when the assault weapon ban expired?"
Was Scott Walker paying his own salary a larger amount?,Has Scott Walker increased his own pay a larger amount?,Have all other Republican gubernatorial candidates increased their pay?,"Did Scott Walker raise his own pay to $50,000?","Did Scott Walker make $50,000 in his own pay in 2014?"
Was Ristroph's report on the solar eclipse racist?,Was Ristroph's report on the solar eclipse racist?,Did the solar eclipse cause racism?,Did the 2017 solar eclipse cause racism?,Did the solar eclipse cause racism?,Would Ristroph be the first law professor to write about the solar eclipse?
What was Karl Marx's prediction in the Das Kapital?,When did the 2008-1909 economic crisis occur?,Will communism be a consequence of these events?,Is Marx's prediction correct?,Is the economic crisis after this crisis similar to the 2008 economic crisis?,Will the 2008 crisis be similar to the 2008-2009 economic crisis?
Is there evidence that judges get the cheapest pensions in any public sector?,Are judges in Minnesotaneously underfunded?,Is the judicial system in Minnesota the most underfunded?,Can judges' money meet all its obligations?,Does the judicial system in Minnesota have the highest pensions in any state?
Did only 1 percent of species that were listed with the Endangered Species Act be delisted?,Did only 1 percent of the species that were listed have been delisted?,Did this percentage represent the entire total delisting rate?,Did this percentage represent the total delisting rate?,Did this percentage represent a large portion of the total delisting rate?
Is Johnson saying that there are too many lawyers in the Senate?,Was Johnson speaking about 57 lawyers in the Senate?,Would Johnson be the 70th millionaire if he was elected in 2020?,Is Johnson considered the third most successful Republican in the Senate?,Did Johnson vote for Donald Trump?,Would Johnson be 70th millionaire if he were elected in 2020?
Did Obama vote for this bill?,Did the Bush-Cheney energy bill provide much to big oil?,Did this bill increase in the pocket of oil & gas?,Did Obama support these bills?,Did Obama support these bills prior to this time of war?,Did Obama vote for these bills in 2009?,Was this bill passed with the Bush-Cheney energy bill?
Is the government providing this amount to overcome inflation?,Is this grant contingent upon inflation?,Will the government provide the amount for inflation?,Will this grant be for the entire year?,Does this grant apply to all of 2019?,Would this grant cover all of 2019?,Is this grant in line with the stated guidelines for inflation?
Is Detroit has 2 503 dead people registered?,Can an 1823 voter vote?,"Is Detroit's dead population higher than 1,300?",Is Detroit the only US city that has this population type?,"Does Detroit have some percentages higher than 1,300?","Is the population of Detroit higher than 2,000?"
How many employees go out on short term disability in Rhode Island?,Is the average short term disability outage near 12 weeks?,Do many employees take short term disability during the winter time?,Are there any workers in Rhode Island who take long term disability during the winter time?,Are there many workers who take short term disability during the winter time?
Did the Twitter handle that used the incident post a summary of the incident?,Did this incident take place in the past?,Did the tweet claiming this encounter come from an official account?,Did the tweet in this incident appear in a newspaper?,Did the Twitter handle use this account before posting this article?,Did the tweet in this incident take place during a certain period?
Did Leni Robredo cheat on Marcos in the 2016 elections?,Did Marcos have any other alleged cheating spouses?,Did Leni Robredo cheat on Marcos in the 2016 elections?,Did Leni Robredo cheat on Marcos in the 2016 elections?,Did Marcos cheat on Leni Robredo in the 2016 elections?
Has the Nigerian government given out N5 billion cash payouts?,Was the Nigerian government aware of the allegations on Facebook?,Is the Nigerian government not giving out N5 billion cash payouts?,Does Facebook provide accurate information as to the actual payouts?,Is this government putting money in the pockets of people who did not receive the money?,Is this government using this cash to fund schools?
Was California against invoking the sex right of pedophiles marrying children under the age of 10?,Does California support invoking the sex right of pedophiles?,Does California support invoking the sex right of pedophiles marrying children under the age of 10?
Has the national economy lost more than $ 300 million since 2008?,Has this loss sparked other economic loss?,Having an unstable electricity supply will drive investors away from manufacturing and reduce jobs?,Will these jobs be lost by the unstable electricity supply?,Does a stable electricity supply lead to the loss of jobs?
"Is it true that 43 died of heart attacks and 13 were hospitalized after watching "" IT ” in theaters?","Is it true that 34% of the people who died of heart attacks and 13 were hospitalized after watching "" IT "" in theaters died from heart attacks?","Is it true that the movie director, David Leitch, was arrested for attempting to ban the film "" IT "", on May 4, 2015?"
Did Ford call a friend after the attack?,Did Blasey Ford call her friend on her cell phone after the attack?,Is Blasey Ford's claim true?,Was Blasey Ford involved in an incident before or after the attack?,Did Blasey Ford claim to be the victim of the attack?
Did bicycle ownership in Rhode Island drop by half in 2012?,Did obesity in Rhode Island rise by 154 percent in 2011?,Are bicycling and obesity the same in Rhode Island?,Are all of Rhode Island's population below 30?,Is the percentage of Rhode Island residents above 30 overweight?,Are the percentage of Rhode Island residents over 30 obese?,Is the percentage of Rhode Island residents over 30 obese?
"Did a religious breakup report show 40% Hindus voted for BJP, compared to 90% Muslims for the TMC in West Bengal?","Did the religious breakup report show that in percentage, more than 40% Hindus voted for BJP, compared to 90% Muslims for the TMC in West Bengal?"
Has state workers had overall increases in six years?,Was there a total cut in state worker salaries in the last six years?,Would the increase in general salaries be the same as the average raise for a year?,Does the amount of the raise stricken by state workers represent the total raise the state has received in the past?
Was this a photograph of a rare Nagapushpa that blooms every 36 years?,Is this an image of a rare Nagapushpa that blooms every 36 years?,Did this image originate in Nepal?,Did this image have a large amount of snow on it?
Did the MH370 pilot reappear 2 years after the flight was missing?,Does the pilot have family in China?,Did the pilot live in Taiwan at the time of the disappearance?,Are the relatives of the pilot still in Taiwan?,Is the MH370 pilot still in Taiwan?,Are there any remaining pieces of evidence regarding the disappearance of the flight?
Does this video show moments before an airplane crashed in Malaysia in August 2023?,Was this video taken of an occupant of an airplane?,Is this video part of a larger project that was to cover the history of Malaysia Airlines?,Does this video show moments before an airplane crashed in Malaysia in August 2023?
"Did Trump get 12,000 new factories?",Did Trump initiate construction of plant and factories?,Was it through his administration that he built new factories?,Does Trump have control over the creation of new factories?,Did Trump's administration start assembling new factories?,Does Trump plan bringing in new factories from China?,Does Trump support the creation of new factories from China?
Is the potassium in a banana a deadly amount?,Is the banana a fruit that contains potassium?,Is eating multiple bananas a potentially dangerous way to kill yourself?,Is the potassium in a banana dangerous?,Is the potassium in a banana dangerous?,Is the potassium in a banana dangerous?
Did the earthquake occur in 2023?,Did the video depict a quake in Turkey?,Did the earthquake take place in Turkey?,Is the video about an earthquake?,Is there any other footage in the video?,Did the video contain audio?,Did the video have a qualm about what happened in Turkey in February 2023?
Does this message come from Nitin Gadkari?,Has this message been sent in response to a request by Gadkari for his return journey?,Has this message been posted in response to the appeal for his return journey?,Is the message specifically about the return journey?,Are there any other issues at issue regarding the return journey?
"Did Aquino bring 1,200 jobs to Texas by moving his factories there from China?",Was Aquino involved in importing goods from China?,Did Aquino pay for the imports of goods and staff?,Were Aquino and his employees required to report to work?,Does any evidence suggest that Aquino paid for the import of goods?,Did Aquino work at any factory outside of China?
"Did Evers say: ""it took the loss of lives before help finally came""?","Did Evers cite that ""it took the loss of lives before help finally came"" as a reason for the situation?",Did he describe the circumstances surrounding the Kenosha incident?,Is there any other evidence to support the claim?
Will the Alarm System go off on March 12?,Does the alarm system have to turn back on to conserve energy?,Will the alarm be armed to go off on March 12?,Will there be any reversing of the time change during daylight savings?,Is there any proof that the alarm is armed to go off on March 12?
Did 86 percent of children who received the vaccine report adverse effects during clinical trials?,Is it true that more children with Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine have experienced adverse events than any other vaccine?,Did all patients with Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine report adverse reactions?,Is there evidence that most children who received the vaccine in clinical trials suffered from adverse events?
Does the TCP poll on election nights increase voter preference?,Does using the TCP poll during elections increase voter preference?,Do voters' preference are misdirected when voting in this poll?,Is there a general rule that makes putting TCP a poor choice for the voter?,Do voters' preferences result in the same outcome in all elections?
Has California taken down a vaccine exemption?,Does this vaccination exemption only cover children under 12 in California?,"Does this exemption not cover children in daycare, preschool and K-12 schools?",Does California have a Personal belief exemption for any new vaccine?,Do a majority of California parents support this exemption?,Does California use this exemption when deciding which vaccines to provide to children?,Does California state that a person with personal belief exemption for any new vaccine in general will have access to all vaccines?
Is Texas in fact the state that created 70% of jobs in the US?,Did Texas create 70% of jobs in the US in the year 2007-2008?,Is there any proof or support that this claim is true?,Is this information supported by actual data?,Is this information based on published research?
Is it legal to possess thousands of indecent images of children?,"Is there any type of suspended sentence for possessing 10,000 indecent images of children?","Is it possible to get a suspended sentence if you possess 10,000 indecent images of children?","Does any type of fine or suspended sentence have a penalty for possessing 10,000 indecent images of children?"
Did Modi demolishe 50 temples to provide land to Ambani's project?,Does Ambani's project consist of a temple or temples?,Did Modi demolish any temples to provide land to Ambani's project?,Was the work of Destroying Temples for Ambani's project the only project which featured temple demolitions?
Did Putin's operation protect people?,Did Putin want to protect people for 8 years?,Have 8 years passed since the operation was launched?,Has Putin planned for a military operation since the operation was launched?,Has Putin targeted the United States to stop this type of attacks?,Have Putin's actions attracted attention from other countries?
"Did federal agents explicitly incite people on Jan. 6, 2021 to commit crimes on this date?",Did federal agents intentionally entrap people on this date?,"Did federal agents incite people on Jan. 6, 2021 to commit crimes on this date?",Did federal agents intentionally entrap people on this date?
Is Joe Biden's climate plan required to cut red meat by 90%?,Does Joe Biden’s climate plan require Americans to eat 90% less red meat?,Are any other food consumption policies involved in Biden's climate plan?,Are there other green initiatives that have been discussed in Biden's climate plan?
Did New Jersey's economy rank 47th in 2011?,"Does the economic performance of New Jersey rank below that of Alabama, Mississippi, and Wyoming?","Does New Jersey's economy rank below Alabama, Mississippi, and Wyoming?",Is the economy in New Jersey in a recession?,"Have higher-ranked states of all types of economy in the U.S., or are there other examples in the United States, than New Jersey?"
"Does Bharatiya Janta party, Delhi unit appeal to its members to resort to violence?",Was this movement a demonstration of repression?,Is this movement related to the repression against the farmers?,"Do these farmers plan to stage a tractor rally on January 26, 2021?"
Did Kasich's administration require the shutdown of all providers of safe and legal abortion in Ohio?,Did Kasich's administration authorize these closed abortion services?,Did most abortion providers that close in Ohio close between 2011 and 2016?,Does Kasich's administration have any authority over abortion services in Ohio?,Do any of these entities appear in the statement?
Did the Muslims disguised as Sikh during this protest?,Is this a real protest?,Did the Muslims disguised as Sikh protest in India?,Is this a real protest?,Is this a fake protest?,Is this an actual protest?,Is this the same as what was said in the video?
In 2011 did Mike Bloomberg say health care providers should not treat elderly prostate cancer patients in order to alleviate health care costs and overcrowding?,Did Bloomberg ever suggest that health care providers should treat elderly patients with prostate cancer?,Did Bloomberg suggest any changes to treatment for elderly patients with prostate cancer in 2011?
Does Scotland have a population of 8 per cent?,Does Scotland have a higher than normal percentage of refugees arriving from Ukraine?,Has Scotland taken in more refugees than any other nation?,Is Scotland at a higher population density than most countries for refugees?,Did Scottish population increase due to the influx from Ukraine?
Are these losses tied to those who enter this state?,Is this number included in the percentage of students effected by this action?,Does this figure include children from other states?,Does this figure come from the State of New Jersey?,Is this figure included in the average number of students affected by this policy?
"Are there more than 24,000 direct jobs created in the film and TV industry in Georgia?",Are local workers paid more than $1.68 billion in wages for their labor?,Is the employment growth in Georgia a direct result of the film and TV industry?,Does the film and TV industry pay local workers a salary?
Did companies formally announce plans to produce a sex robot that can cook and clean by 2019?,Is there evidence that the sex robot could cook and clean?,Is a sex robot designed to cook?,Is a sex robot designed to clean?,Is there proof that the sex robot can clean?
Did the boy date 14 girlfriends?,Did the boys girlfriends come to his home?,Did the boy's girlfriends come to his home after he was attacked?,Did the boy's girlfriends have any connection with him?,Did the girl that attacked the boy do so in the hospital?,Is the boy in a hospital?
Is it true that 90% of people in Gaza don't have access to water?,Is it true that 90% of people in Gaza don't have access to water?,Is it true that 90% of people in Gaza don't have access to water?,Is it true that 90% of people in Gaza don't have access to water?,Is it true that 90% of people in Gaza don't have access to water?
Did he raise most of his campaign funds from small contributions of less than $200?,Has he raised all of his campaign funds from small contributions of less than $200?,Was he responsible for raising most of his campaign funds from small contributions of less than $200?,Did he fund more campaigns with large or large amount of small donations?
"Are seven eradicated diseases (Whooping cough, the plague, and the TB) making a comeback?",What factors are contributing to the disease comeback?,Are the epidemics of these eradicated diseases the result of the illegal immigration policy?,Are these diseases eradicated diseases due to refugees?,Are the diseases of whooping cough and the bubonic plague eradicated?,Are the influenza outbreaks caused by refugees?
"Did Sanders say ""As we watch the news from Colorado with horror and sympathy for the families, we should remember that each day more than 80 Americans are killed by gunfire, unnecessary tragedies?",""" did he say this statement in relation to Colorado?",was this statement based on the facts of the recent shooting in Colorado?
"Did Slim Jims ""just recently"" cost 99 cents?","Did Slim Jims ""just recently"" cost $2.69?","Did Slim Jims ""just recently"" cost the same as $2.69?",Is the difference in price due to the increase in the price of the product?,Is the change in price related to a lower average price of Slim Jims?
Is there any evidence that Biden’s spending produced one job?,Are nonpartisan projections for job growth in 2021 higher than Biden’s?,Is there evidence that Biden’s spending produced one job?,Is there any evidence that Biden produced one job?,Is there any evidence that Biden’s spending produced more jobs than other presidents?
Did Woods celebrate victory before the 19 foot putt?,Did Woods win on the first shot of the round?,Did Woods celebrate in a video before the shot?,Was Woods in this video after the shot?,Does this video make any tidbits about Woods or golf?
Was it until Nixon that Nixon saw and received one dollar from China?,Did Nixon receive one dollar for his country from China?,Did Nixon receive any additional funds from China?,Did Nixon receive additional funds from China?,Did Nixon receive any funds from China prior to his time in office?,Has Nixon received any additional funds from China since 1972?
Was the estimated number of people killed by swine flu in 2016?,Was the estimated number of deaths because of the swine flu?,Has the estimated total number of people who died because of the swine flu been released?,"Has the amount of the estimated fatalities from the swine flu reached the 17,000 mark?"
Was it true that the stimulus was used for failed companies and offshore jobs?,Has the stimulus contributed to that?,Has the stimulus contributed to the success of these companies?,Has it contributed to the success of those companies?,Was the stimulus spending used for those companies?,Has it contributed to the success of these companies?,Are there any other factors that are mentioned in the statement?
Can strokes last longer than 20 seconds?,Does a stroke lead to decreased balance and movement?,Does a stroke prevent a person from standing on one foot for more than 20 seconds?,Can these types of strokes result in an inability to balance?,Could strokes have other causes besides balance and movement?
Is this tax cut the largest ever in Florida?,Is this tax cut targeted to property taxes?,Is the tax cut for property taxes a single tax cut?,Was this tax cut intended to be in three years?,Is this tax cut a single tax cut?,Is this tax cut a combined tax cut?
Would a tax on churches increase the tax rate?,"If the US taxed churches, would that tax increase raise the rate?",Would the tax increase on churches increase the tax rate?,Did taxing churches cause the tax rate increase?,Do churches need tax protection?,Would an increase in the rate help in economic growth?
Did Davis make a major political statement regarding the proposal?,Did Davis advocate gun control in Texas?,Did Davis use gun control in her speech?,Does Davis support gun control in Texas?,Was this specific gun control plan approved by the House of Representatives?,Have all of the provisions of the bill been enacted by the House?
Does Modi wear an embroidered dress during his visit to Meghalaya?,Did Modi wear a embroidered women's dress during his visit to Meghalaya?,Did Modi wear a embroidered woman's dress during his visit to Meghalaya?,Was Modi's embroidered women's dress worn during his visit to Meghalaya?
Was this policy issued in error?,Is this fine for'misinformation' intentional?,Was this policy released in error?,Does this policy apply to all customers?,Was this policy issued in error?,Did anyone take legal action regarding this policy?,No Answer>No Response>No Response>?
Did the administration estimate that 20 million people could lose coverage?,Would this impact seniors on Medicare?,Will this change impact seniors in other areas?,Do we know that people under Medicare could lose coverage due to this plan?,Are there any other consequences to this plan that will affect seniors?,Would such a change result in a massive loss of coverage?
Did Philadelphia have guns for sale in April and May 2021?,Did Philadelphia have a gun store whose sex toys were molded to look like Donald Trump?,Was Donald Trump recognizable in a Philadelphia gun store?,Did Philadelphia have weapons for sale in April and May 2021?,Was Donald Trump recognizable in a Philadelphia gun store?
Did Nicholson make over $1 million advising companies in Wisconsin?,"Did Nicholson make more than 1,900 jobs off of companies who shut down Wisconsin plant?",Did Nicholson help these companies lay off their employees?,Was Nicholson involved in any incidents of unemployment that resulted in the layoffs of workers at these companies?,Did Nicholson receive any of these payments?
Are Indian Railways deducting 20 rupees on every cancelled ticket?,Do Indian Railways deduct 20 rupees on every cancelled ticket?,Would Indian Railways deduct more on cancelled tickets?,Are Indian Railways deducting less on cancelled tickets?,Did India Railways deduct less on cancelled tickets?
"Is the cost of the legislative session $800,000?",Is there more than one year of the pill?,Is it cheaper to have a legislative session than it would be to have an informal legislative session?,Is the total number of condoms and other sexual health products covered by the legislature?
Is Willie Nelson currently incarcerated?,Is Willie Nelson still incarcerated after his drug offense?,Did Willie Nelson say something like that about his drug offenses in 2006?,Is Willie Nelson currently in jail?,Was Willie Nelson charged with possession of a controlled substance in 2006?
Was Gillespie paid a specific amount in 2007?,Was Gillespie paid $300k in 2007?,Did Gillespie promote the individual mandate?,Did Gillespie support the individual mandate?,Did Gillespie support the individual mandate as a policy?,Did Gillespie endorse any health reform policies?
Is the opinion statement from this article accurate?,Did this opinion statement cite more than 95% of the population?,Has this opinion statement come from this group in a specific way?,Did this opinion statement come from a specific group?,Is this opinion statement based on a specific poll?,Has this opinion statement been made by this group?
Did EPA employee number increase from 1972 to 2011?,Did the number of total Federal personnel decrease?,Was the increase attributed to economic recovery in the EPA?,Did the increase attributed to economic recovery in the EPA result in any significant employment gains for federal employees?,". In general, was there an increase in federal personnel in the EPA from 1972 to 2011?"
Did women make 77 cents for every dollar men make in 2014?,Did women make less than men in 2014?,Did women make equal pay for males and females in 2014?,Did women make more than men in 2014?,Was the percentage difference in 2015 in equal wages for male and female workers a liar's game?
Have the SNP MSPs observed a pay freeze since 2008?,Does the SNP MSP pay freeze go to public purse?,Does the SNP MSP pay freeze pay back government funding to public services?,Does the SNP MSP pay freeze go to private monies?,Does the SNP MSP pay freeze go to state governments?
Do the FIFA ban on people carrying and waving the Pride flag at the FIFA World Cup?,Will police arrest people carrying or waving the Pride flag at the FIFA World Cup?,Is the Pride flag a symbol used in religious beliefs?,Are gay people not allowed to carry pride flags at the FIFA World Cup?
Is the video true?,Does it show any recent earthquakes?,Is this video fake news?,Does the video actually show any earthquakes?,Is this video fake news?,Does this video include any earthquake activity on it?,Did this video exist before the 2023 Alaska earthquake?,Is this video fake news?
Did the US Air Force shoot down this fighter jet?,Is the photo from 2018 clearly a pro-Biafra wing aircraft?,Was this fighter jet shot down by a pro-Biafra wing military unit?,Is this the first time that a pro-Biafra wing has attacked an aircraft?,Is this the first time that a pro-Biafra armed wing has shot down a fighter jet?
Did he say that two and a half years ago he had no ammunition?,Did he state that his government had no ammunition in 2002?,Did he indicate that he had no ammunition in 2001?,Did the government have ammo in 2002?,Did Obama claim to have no ammunition in 2001?
Is Christie mentioned in this statement?,Did Christie veto any bill on equal pay for women?,Did Christie veto any bill when it became a campaign issue?,Was Christie vetoed over equal pay for women?,Are there any other informational sources about Christie's veto?
Does the Aphelion Phenomenon make the weather colder?,Does it increase the distance between the sun and the Earth by 66%?,Does the Aphelion Phenomenon affect the temperature?,Did Aphelion Phenomenon affect the temperature?,Did Aphelion Phenomenon cause cold weather?
Did a knife attack happen at a mall in Minnesota?,Did eight people die in the attack?,Did the attack involve multiple knife attacks?,Was this attack a targeted attack?,Are there any other similar attacks happening in Minnesota?,Did this attack occur at a mall?,Did the alleged perpetrator participate in a political campaign or in the media?
Did Biden limit meat consumption by 90%?,Does Biden's climate plan require that you eat one burger a month?,Is it reasonable to believe that Biden's climate plan could limit your burger consumption?,Are burgers the primary food in his climate plan?,Does Biden's climate plan require that you consume meat daily?
Is this image representative of Swamy Vivekananda playing?,Does this image include all his Calcutta Town Club memberships?,Is the image associated with any particular person or group?,Are there any other images showing Vivekananda playing?,Is this image related to any other photos?
Was Bloomberg right to say 3 bullets are enough?,Was the NRA in favor of firearms with nuclear bombs?,Was Bloomberg's comment on gun control true or false?,Are there any issues with the 3 bullet limit?,Are there other issues with the 3 bullet limit?,Are there any other issues with gun control?
Was it possible for the NZDF to enter homes in response to COVID-19 as of July 2020?,Did the NZDF have the ability to remove people from homes in response to COVID-19 before or following July 2020?,Did the NZDF allow people to leave their homes in response to COVID-19?
"Did Scott spend $800,000 of your tax dollars upgrading his Governor's Mansion?",Did Scott spend any other money on the governor's mansion?,Was Scott's mansion renovated before this incident?,Did Scott spend any other money on the governor's mansion before this incident?,Was Rick Scott responsible for any damage after this incident?
Have there been any ambulances sent by Pakistan?,Has Pakistan sent any ambulances to India?,Is there a Pakistani organization that has sent ambulances to India?,Has the Pakistani organization sent any ambulances to India?,Is there a Pakistani organization that has sent ambulances to India?
How did the cost to fund the search for the Titanic submersible impact the decision to deny a make a wish?,Will the Titanic sink in June 2023?,Will a make a wish gift for a cancer patient in Illinois?,Will a make a wish gift for a cancer patient in Illinois be in danger?
Does the image show a migrant caravan crossing a bridge?,Did the migrant caravan cross a bridge in October 2018?,Can anyone provide context for the image?,Are these issues common on migrant caravans?,Did the migrant caravan cross a bridge in October 2018?,Would a migrant caravan cross a bridge in October 2018?
Is it true that the time taken for environmental approvals has been brought down from 600 days?,Is it true that the time taken for environmental approvals has been brought down from 180 days?,Was the average time for environmental approvals 60 days?,Is there any other reason to consider that time taken for environmental approvals is a key factor in deciding approval times?
Did the Teen want to receive oral sex from Pornstar Teanna Trump?,Was this teen's final wish to receive oral sex from a porn star?,Did the Make-A-Wish Teen Request To Receive Oral Sex from Pornstar Teanna Trump?
"Are action plans to eliminate leprosy, measles, and TB by 2025 implemented?","Will action plans to eliminate leprosy, measles, and TB by 2025 be implemented?","Is action plan to eliminate leprosy, measles, and TB by 2025 implemented?"
Did this passage claim that a $300M revenue tax increase would pay for a rail system in Tampa?,Was this passage primarily about the proposed rail system in Tampa?,Has this passage supported the rail system as a concept?,Is this passage supported in part by a government entity?,Is this passage in the public domain?
"Did the girl seen with Rahul Gandhi shout "" Pakistan Zindabad"" at an anti-CAA rally in 2020?","Is the girl seen with Rahul Gandhi considered to be a ""model""?","Did the girl in the rally shout "" Pakistan Zindabad"" at the protest?",Was the girl seen with Rahul Gandhi not identified in the media?
Is Sheikh Rasheed hiding in a hospital to avoid arrest in 2022?,Did Rasheed's family file a missing person's report?,Did Rasheed have a lawyer?,Did Rasheed attempt to escape arrest in the year of 2022?,Did Rasheed's wife know Rasheed was hiding?
Does the plan include a restructuring of the education curriculum?,Are high schools being replaced by military training?,Do these changes change the nature of public school education?,Is there any debate about whether this plan should be used?,Is this program a response to the government?,Are these changes a result of a state-wide shift in the teaching of public school children?
Does pg 92 of the House bill say that people can't buy private health insurance after a certain date?,Does pg 92 of the House bill provide any kind of data on when people can buy private health insurance?,Is pg 92 of the House bill specific about when people can purchase private health insurance?
Has Disney opened pediatric transgender clinics before?,Will Disney be opening pediatric transgender clinics in 2023?,Will Disney be opening pediatric transgender clinics before?,Will Disney be opening pediatric transgender clinics after?,Are Disney plans to open pediatric transgender clinics before 2023?
"Did an earthquake rock Turkey and Syria on Feb. 6, 2023?",Did the earthquake leave debris for the entire day?,Was a child named Mary recovered?,Was the child from under rubble?,How long before Maria was rescued was she evacuated?,Was there a traumatic experience in rescue?,Did Maria be rescued from under rubble before or after a large earthquake?
Did Obama ever call for banning the display of Confederate and Tea Party flags on public property?,Has Obama ever called for banning the display of Confederate and Tea Party flags on public property?,Was Obama the one that called for banning the display of Confederate and Tea Party flags on public property?
Is it true that the share of the oil market controlled by speculators has more than doubled over the past 10 years?,Does this report indicate that the share of the oil market controlled by speculators has increased over the last 10 years?,Are these claims supported by data?,Do the estimates relating to this study accurately represent the current situation?
Has Virginia's crime rate dropped to the third lowest in the country?,Has Virginia's recidivism rate dropped 20%?,Are Virginia's crimes more likely to involve guns?,Was the criminal crime rate among the lowest in the country since the abolition of parole?,Is Virginia's crime rate among the third lowest in the country?
Did Cornilles get the endorsement of more than 20 mayors?,Have the mayors approved of Cornilles' candidacy?,Does Cornilles support the independents and Democratic?,Do the mayors approve of Cornilles?,Has Cornilles received endorsements from other mayors?,Does Cornilles have a majority support?
"Did Biden pay Biden $50,000 per month in rent?","Did Biden pay Biden $50,000 per month in rent?","Did Biden pay Biden $50,000 in rent in 2016?","Did Biden pay Biden $50,000 in rent in 2016?","Did Biden pay Biden $50,000 per month in rent in 2016?",Is Biden married?
Did San Antonio have a 67 percent growth in water customers during the last 25 years?,Did San Antonio have 0% more water used?,Was San Antonio's water usage decreasing with time during the last 25 years?,Has San Antonio experienced a 67 percent growth in water customers over the last 25 years?
Are other Secret Service personnel to use this designation?,"Does this designation have the same legal status as the name ""Broomstick One""?",Has there been any other official use of this designation?,Has any official used this designation in the past?,Did these designations ever occur in a presidential plane?,Are there any other civilian airplanes to use this designation?
Do African Americans receive a 75 percent more stop and search by law enforcement than Caucasians?,Do African Americans receive a 75 percent more stop and search than Caucasians?,Do black people receive a 75 percent more stop and search than Caucasians?,Are there any other factors that contribute to the larger drop in U.S. stop and search rates?,Do other factors impact the larger drop in U.S. stop and search rates?,Do a larger number of black people receive a stop and search than Caucasians?
Is Greene correct that Jesus performed his miracle of making a single day worth of bullets last 8 days?,Is Greene's statement true?,Does Greene not acknowledge the event that created the miracle of bullets last 8 days?,Is Greene correct that Jesus performed his miracle of bullets last 8 days?
Did the U.N. establish a New World Order by 2030?,Did the United Nations establish a New World Order by 2030?,Did the United Nations establish a New World Order by 2030?,Are the New World Order goals largely dependent on vaccinations?,Have the goals of the New World Order been proven?,Is the New World Order primarily centered on one government?
Was the incident in Idaho the result of a terror attack?,Did the victims have a known relationship to each other?,Was the attack the result of a terror attack?,Was this attack planned or is there no evidence of this attack?,Would someone from Syria kill a kid?,Would this type of attack be an escalation of the violence?
"Did Obama and Biden bring back 720,000 jobs in manufacturing?","Did Obama bring back 700,000 jobs in manufacturing after a resurgence in the economy?",Did Obama and Biden bring back anything in manufacturing?,"Does Obama bring back 700,000 jobs in manufacturing?","Does Biden bring back 700,000 jobs in manufacturing?","Did Obama bring back 700,000 jobs in manufacturing?"
Did the protestors accept 500 days to protest against CAA?,Did the protestors receive permission to attend that day's protest?,Did the protestors get paid for doing so?,Did the protestors receive donations for their contributions?,Did any protestors pay for any of the expenses associated with the protest?
Did Israel already have 50% of its population vaccinated?,Are people more prone to getting vaccinated in areas with a higher vaccine rate?,Does the number of people being vaccinated have to be much higher than 50%?,Is it true that 5 percent of the population is vaccinated in Israel?
Was the petition for the withdrawal of the advertisement public knowledge?,Did the petition specifically call for the withdrawal of the advertisement from Cadbury?,Did any groups from around the world oppose the advertisement?,Did the petition garner public attention?,Do any groups from around the world oppose the advertisement?,Did any entities from outside the US specifically have issues with the advertisement?
"Did the 911 caller laugh and call the man ""fudge packer""?",Was the 911 caller able to identify the victim and make the 911 call?,Did the 911 caller use the word fudge packer in response to the man's claims?,Was the 911 caller the only person in the 911 call to identify the male victim of the rape?
Could Bezos end world poverty?,Would Bezos have enough money for everyone?,Would the amount of money Bezos would receive be sufficient to end world poverty?,Is there a reason Jeff Bezos would still have enough money to end world poverty?,Are other companies whose profits Bezos could end world poverty likely to have enough remaining for the amount of money he would give each person?
"Was the photo taken by the people rioting on Jan. 6, 2021, re-taken?",Was this photo of the fire re-taken as well?,Did this photo of the Capitol fire re-take be posted on social media?,Did this photo of the Capitol fire re-taked have this same effect as the photo at the riot?,Was this photo taken from another side of the Capitol in New York?
Will successive tropical cyclones hit the Philippines in November 2020?,Will successive tropical cyclones bring rainfall?,Will persistent tropical cyclones cause economic damage?,Will persistent tropical cyclones hit the Philippines during the summer of 2020?,Will persistent tropical cyclones hit the Philippines in the spring of 2020?
Is flu shot paralyzing a 9 year old girl?,Was the girl paralyzed by the flu shot?,Is the flu shot likely to cause a paralyzed 9 year old girl?,Is this flu shot effective in paralyzing a 9 year old girl?,Is the flu shot effective in paralyzing a 9 year old girl?,Is the flu shot used to prevent pneumonia?
Is the apparent global temperature increase from 1910 to 2000 due to administrative adjustments?,Did global warming start to run out of steam over 2 decades ago?,Do administrative adjustments account for half the apparent global temperature increase from 1910 to 2000?,Is there any evidence that environmental changes did not go unnoticed from 1910 to 2000?
Did Oz grope Michelle Obama?,Is it true that Oz groped Michelle Obama?,Are there any other records indicating this?,Can Oz be a 2022 U.S. Senator?,Is there any evidence that the photo is genuine?,Do other records contain alleged sexual activity?,Do the records state that Mehmet Oz groped Michelle Obama?,Is there anything indicating this?
Does the Trump plan to repeal the estate tax mean Walmart Walton would get a $53 billion tax break?,Does the Trump plan to repeal the estate tax mean Walmart Walton would get a $53 billion tax break?,Does Trump plan to repeal the estate tax mean Walmart Walton would get a $53 billion tax break?
Has Warner stated this claim before?,Is this a fact?,Does this claim include multiple items?,Did Warner claim this claim against John McCain in 2013?,Was this claim made prior to 2013?,Has this claim been confirmed by others?,Is this claim true?,"Considering the claims of this reporter, was this statement authentic?",Is there a way to verify the claims in question?
Did the fish measure 42 inches?,Did the Fishing regulations prohibit keeping these fish?,Did Fisherman restrict fishing rights for the fish?,Did the Fishing regulations require you to keep the fish?,Does Fisherman have an excuse for not keeping this fish?,Did Fisherman claim this fish is legal in Ohio?,Did Fisherman specifically say he caught a 42 inch fish?,Does Fisherman have any information on fishing regulations?
"Did this incident occur on March 30, 2021?",Did this incident occur in Myanmar?,Did this incident occur in Burma?,Have other events in Myanmar this day in the past year contributed to this incident?,"Did this incident take place before, during or after the first day of the 21st century?",Did this incident take place in Burma?
Was Austin the fastest growing city in the country the last five years?,Did Austin lag behind other cities in acreage/urbanization?,Does Austin lead other cities in acreage/urbanization?,Did Austin have one of the fastest growing cities in the country in acreage/urbanization?,Were Austin's acreage or urbanization rates comparable to the national average?
Did anyone who was on either side of the Democratic nomination say that the Romney-Ryan Medicare Plan was not endorsed by anyone?,Is the Romney-Ryan Medicare Plan not being endorsed by anyone?,Was any Democrat supportive of the Romney-Ryan Medicare Plan?,Did any Democrat endorse the Romney-Ryan Medicare Plan?
Is Chant dismissive of vaccine caused deaths?,Has Chant publicly spoken out against vaccine-related deaths?,Is Chant's tweet about vaccines in general dismissive of vaccine-related deaths?,Is Chant an expert in vaccine-related deaths?,Does Chant have any other public duties?
Did the video claim to be an 'live encounter'?,Did the video say the incident was in Kashmir?,Was the video shared online?,Did the video claim to be a live encounter?,Did the video claim to be from the US?,Did the video claim to show people being attacked?,Did the video claim to be a live encounter?
Is it a factual statement that it is false that most Ukrainians do not want to vote?,Does the assertion that majority of Ukrainians do not want to vote necessarily occur to be true?,Is there data to confirm that most Ukrainians do not want to vote in the 2014 election?,Do all polls that have come up so far show a large majority ot Ukrainians do not want to vote?
"Was McCaskill named ""most likely to be the most unpopular senator in the United States for four months in a row?",""" is the question based on a survey. Did McCaskill actually answer the survey's questions correctly?","If the survey's answers were incorrect, are there other possible explanations?"
Did the library district receive support from a majority of Americans?,Are these people buying or selling their houses in the library district?,Is the library district approved by the vast majority of Americans?,Are these people able to pay for this library district?,Did the library district vote on this bill?,Did the library district vote on this bill?
Did five COVID-19 vaccines have lower efficacy than previously announced?,Did the new vaccines have better safety profiles?,Did all five COVID vaccines contain more COVID viruses than previously announced?,Are the vaccines available in multiple doses?,Does this increase the amount of COVID-19 vaccines available?
Would LePierre make this claim?,Does the NRA believe that all guns should be banned in schools?,Would the NRA say that all guns are banned in all schools?,Would the NRA rule that none of the guns should be banned in schools?,Do all guns in America's schools have to be banned?
Is Shah saying that India will become a Hindu Nation by 2025?,Was Shah speaking during an election campaign?,Did Shah say that India will become a Hindu Nation by 2025?,Is it a serious problem in India that people believe in the Hindu Nation?,Is there evidence that the Hindu Nation is a problem in India in the near future?
Has Trump been photographed holding an actual gold bill?,Has Trump's actual bill ever been plated?,Is the bill proof?,Is there any evidence that Trump owed Trump cash?,Is the bill gold-plated?,Is there any evidence Trump owes money to a Trump charity?
Did King of Bahrain have a robot bodyguard at Dubai airport?,Does the bodyguard have cameras?,Did the bodyguard have a firearm?,Did the bodyguard have the time in place to fire the pistols?,Does the bodyguard have weapons?,Has the bodyguard ever been questioned by police regarding the security of the person in charge of the bodyguard?
Are there 7.2 and 8 magnitude earthquakes possible?,Do these earthquakes seem to be most likely to strike Mindanao?,Did anyone in the area receive any warnings regarding this earthquakes?,Have the 7.2 and 8 magnitude earthquakes struck many other places in South America?,Are there any other earthquakes likely to strike Mindanao?
"Did the US military indict and detain a majority of Congress on January 25, 2021?","Was Congress made aware of the indictment on January 25, 2021?","Did the US military indict and detain a majority of Congress on January 25, 2021?",Does it mean all of the US military members are involved in indicting Congress in 2021?
Did the money left behind by former President Goodluck Jonathan support Nigeria for three weeks?,Is there evidence that the money left behind by former President Goodluck Jonathan can support Nigeria for three weeks?,Is the money left behind by former President Goodluck Jonathan for the people of the nation?,Is the money left behind by former President Goodluck Jonathan sufficient to sustain Nigeria for three weeks?
Is there evidence that this claim is true?,Is this claim based on data?,Have any Missourians been convicted of voter fraud?,Is this claim true or false?,Is this claim true or false?,Is any law in Missouri specifically requiring voter identification?,Have any law prohibits it?
Has the coronavirus recovery rate in Texas topped 99.9%?,Are coronavirus recovery rates higher than 99%?,Do most people recover 100% of the time from coronavirus?,Did the state record a 99.9% recovery rate for coronavirus in 2017?,Are coronavirus recovery rates higher than 99.9% for virus overall?
Has the MSMEs budget increased by 650% during the NDA govt?,Have the MSMEs budget under ECLGS increased by 3.5 lakh crores?,Are the MSMEs accounted under this group under any other government?,Is this budget only for MSMEs?,Copyright 2017 Business Insider. All rights reserved.?
Did Hermès run a free bag giveaway promotion on Chinese websites?,Did Hermès run a free bag giveaway promotion on Chinese websites?,Did Hermès run a free bag giveaway promotion on Chinese websites to celebrate the company's 184th anniversary?,Did Hermès run a free bag giveaway promotion on Chinese websites to celebrate the company's 184th anniversary?
Does Canada require a visa for Zimbabweans staying up to 90 days?,Did Canada open its borders to Zimbabwean visitors?,Was Zimbabweans' visa requirement waived for Zimbabwean visitors staying up to 90 days?,Did Canada require a visa for Zimbabwean visitors staying up to 90 days?,Is there any evidence of Canada opening its borders to Zimbabweans on an ongoing basis?
Did the BJP candidate's votes get the exact same number of votes in the 'EVM'?,Are there any allegations that the exact same number of votes was awarded to all candidates in this race?,Did BJP candidates get exactly the same number of votes in all contests?,Was the BJP candidate's vote count even in this election?
Is this bill in effect?,Did this bill pass?,Did this bill contain any changes to current law?,Are there any other factors concerning this bill besides those described above?,Did this bill contain any changes in health care coverage?,Did this bill have any legal problems in the state?,Did this bill have any negative effects on the state?
Did television sets already have a channel 1?,Did military use a channel 1?,Does the television industry still have channels 1 and 2?,Is there any more space reserved for the channel 1 in TV sets?,Is a channel 1 channel on a TV set currently in use?,Is a channel 1 channel in the television market?
Do opinion polls published by ABP News show the current status of the election?,Are all the polls being published by ABP News accurate?,Are all the opinion polls from ABP News accurate?,Are all of the opinion polls from ABP News not accurate?,Are all of the opinion polls from ABP News available online?
"Did 74,243 mail-in ballots go uncounted in Maricopa County?",Was there a clear record of the mail in ballots sent?,Was the total amount of ballots that went uncounted for Maricopa County in 2020?,Did the total number of ballots sent go uncounted or in any way decreased in AZ?
Did Ayotte vote for the budget containing these cuts?,Does the budget currently have these cuts?,Did Ayotte ratify this budget?,Did Ayotte vote in favor of these cuts?,Was there an overall impact to this budget?,Did this budget have a positive impact on student loans?
Did Lance consistently vote for allowing insurers to charge higher premiums to people over 50?,Did Lance vote against this policy at all times?,Was Lance's answer to this question unanimous?,Did Lance vote for this policy repeatedly during his term?,Did Lance specifically vote against this policy at one time or another?,Did Lance vote for this policy in a general election?,Did Lance vote against this policy in the state of New Jersey?
Did the vaccine kill children in Senegal?,Did the vaccine kill children in Senegal at all?,Did the vaccine kill children in Senegal at all?,Did seven children die in Senegal after receiving the COVID vaccine in April?,Did seven children die in Senegal after receiving the COVID vaccine in April?
Was the image of the Jat protests passed off as farmers protest?,Did farmers protest before this photo of protests was posted?,Did this photo of protests pass off as farmers protest prior to this photo of protests?,Did this video have any political content?,Has this video been deleted?,Will this video be deleted?
Did the match between Pakistan and India get abandoned due to rain?,Did Pakistani players celebrate in their dressing rooms after the game was abandoned due to rain?,Did the Pakistani players celebrate in their dressing room following the game?,Are there any other events that contributed to the cancellation of the match?,Did the India-Pakistan match get cancelled due to rain?
Was Pfizer's mRNA Covid-19 vaccine a plan to depopulate the world?,Does this study explain a reason for this explanation?,Did the vaccine temporarily impair semen concentration and total motile count amongst donors?,Did this vaccine also have an effect on reproductive health or fertility in humans?
Does air pollution have effects on humans?,Is air pollution one of the factors for respiratory ailments and associated diseases?,Is there conclusive data to establish direct correlation between health and air pollution?,Do health effects of air pollution involve multiple factors?,Are air pollution and other factors in the environment associated?,Is a direct relationship between air pollutants and health possible?
Did the Philippine government recover funds from the Marcos family?,Did the PIA report that this recovered funds were not stolen?,Did any of these funds come from the Marcos family or individuals?,Is the majority of funds recovered from Marcos family money stolen?,Is the money recovered from Marcos family a good source of funding?
Has Slain raised more money in any quarter than any other challenger in the nation?,Has Slain raised more money from any opponent in the nation than any opponent in the country?,"Is Slain's total fundraising to date, more than $800,000?","Does Slain's total fundraising to date, more than $800,000?",Does any other challenger in the country raised more than Slain's total?
Has Wisconsin had a larger state deficit than when Walker was elected?,Did Walker balance the budget?,Were there any deficits after Walker came into office?,"Did Walker’s campaign say he ""didn’t balance the budget""?",Were there any budget deficits after Walker came into office?
Did the $50 billion bill end up being filled with pork?,Did half of the bill not relate to Sandy?,Was this bill filled with pork?,http://www.washingtonpost.com/dissenters/sossum/contest/sandy-bill/story/view/5895767?,>?
Does the bill specify what type of counseling sessions people in Medicare would receive every five years?,Is the bill specific to the specific topic of end of life counseling?,Do I need to have this counseling if I am covered for Medicare?,Is this counseling required by the Medicare law?,Are these counseling sessions required?
"Did Boebert praise the Taliban for ""building back better"" in Afghanistan following the Taliban takeover?",Did Boebert have knowledge about the Taliban's takeover prior to the vote on 2021?,Was Boebert the speaker of Colorado's Congressional district during the Taliban takeover in Afghanistan?
Did he snort cocaine during the countdown?,Was he hospitalized?,Did he go to jail for cocaine possession?,Is he a celebrity?,Do any other celebrities smoke cocaine during the new year's countdown?,Is it likely that he smoked cocaine during the countdown?
Would people now have to pay 18% GST on renting houses?,Will 18% GST apply to renting houses in the next 15 years?,Is the GST applicable to people who rent houses?,Is there any information to suggest why it is being lowered?,Are people going to need additional time to find other places to rent homes?,Is GST a new tax rate?
Is the McCarran-Walter Act of 1952 the one that bans Muslims from holding public office in the US?,Is the McCarran-Walter Act of 1952 the only one that bans Muslims from holding public office in the US?,Is the McCarran-Walter Act of 1952 the only one that bans Muslims from holding public office in the US?
Did President Obama sign the massive spending bill?,Did the government approve this massive spending bill?,Did the government not approve this bill?,Did the government approve this bill?,Was the bill approved before it was put on the president's desk?,Did Obama approve of this spending bill?,Did the president not approve of this spending bill?
Does inhaling steam reach coronavirus hidden behind the paranasal sinus?,Does inhaling steam kill coronavirus hidden behind the paranasal sinus?,Is inhaling steam an effective treatment for coronavirus hidden behind the paranasal sinus?
Is it true that Hawaii will no longer accept out-of-state driver's licenses in 2023?,Did Hawaii announce in advance that it would no longer accept out-of-state driver's licenses?,Did Hawaii announce in advance that it would no longer accept out of state driver's licenses in 2023?
Have the vast majority of Jeanne Shaheen's votes been for the Republican party?,Do these votes constitute a majority?,Would this be the only event in her political career where she voted for the Republican party 99 percent of the time?,"If she voted with the Republican party more often than the Democratic Party, why?"
Did NASA fund research to determine how the effects of various drugs affect spiders spinning webs?,Are different drugs classified as having harmful effects on spiders?,Did NASA investigate the effects of sedatives on spiders?,Is the study funded by NASA?,Did NASA spend on this research?,Is this work based on reliable science?
Has Zoetis injected these vaccines into 100 million wildlife animals in the US?,Have these vaccines caused significant harm to animals?,Was this research published online in a respected scientific journal?,Would being injected into 100 million wildlife animals with the vaccines cause significant harm to those animals?,Can it be concluded that any animal subject could be exposed to mRNA vaccines?
"Ivermectin sterilizes 90% of men that take it, based on the data. Will Ivermectin also sterilize many others?",Is this claim based on a study?,Do men in general have similar experiences to those shown in this study?,Is there a link between Ivermectin and sexually transmitted infection?
Are there multiple emails with a Lowe's logo?,Can you use a lone survey with Lowe's in order to receive a $100 gift card?,Can the survey be used to earn money?,Could you earn $100 when doing a lowe's survey?,- Do all survey prizes have to be eligible for a $100 gift card?
Can one safely fly under a bridge?,Can it be done without a plane being stuck?,Can someone make a video to demonstrate a safety precaution?,Does this video show a military jet?,Did the drone pilot get a permit to fly under a bridge?,Did this pilot fly under a bridge in public?
Did the American Health Care Act have at least two CBO reviews?,Did the American Health Care Act go through 4 committees before a House vote?,Was the CBO's score of the American Health Care Act identical to the Senate's?,Did the American Health Care Act pass through any committees before being put on the House floor?
Did people on the strike in India get a video of their struggles?,Do these videos show the protests being televised?,Is there evidence that this will be the case?,Do the protests in India involve violence?,Do some protestors plan to protest in China?,Are the protestors using mobile phones or other public transportation?
Did the COVID-19 vaccine cause an excess death in 2022?,Did the vaccine caused the death in 2022?,Did there happen any COVID-19 vaccine-related deaths in 2022?,Did the COVID-19 vaccine cause an excess death in 2022?,Did there happen any COVID-19 vaccine-related deaths in 2022?
Is Trump's proposal for Social Security benefits to run out?,Could this plan change under Trump's proposed stance?,Will Social Security benefits run out in 3 years if Trump orders this plan?,Would a Trump proposal mean that Social Security will not run out in 3 years if Trump wants this plan?
Do these veterans tell President Obama things that he doesn't want to hear?,Would this be an effective response to the current military situation?,Did all of these veterans quit early?,Is this a strategy that would succeed in the next military scenario?,Would these veterans be able to continue in their positions?
Was Aaj Tak on the video when the incident happened?,Did Aaj Tak report anything in the video?,Was the video in a mobile device?,Was Aaj Tak’s video filmed on a smartphone?,Did the video of the Aaj Tak video report any animal?,Did the video of Aaj Tak footage end up exposing a pet?
Has Trump supporters protested the 2022 FBI raid at Mar-a-Lago?,Is Trump's 2023 indictment for indecency related to this incident?,Has Trump supported the 2022 raid?,Does this photograph include Trump supporters?,Was this photo taken after Trump supporters protest the 2022 raid?
"Does the teenager sue his parents for the $250,000?",Did this teenager name the child Gaylord?,Is this teenager suing his parents?,Is this teenager the son of the named person?,Is this teenager the son of someone named Gaylord?,Is this teenager an eligible teen?
Did the bill forwarded to her husband's company pass?,Did the bill award a $9 billion contract to her husband's company?,Is it possible that this is the only time this has been used on this issue?,Are the rules about the payment of contracts for large contracts often changed on a case by case basis?
Has state unemployment gone down almost 20% to 5% accretion since the beginning of the current legislative term?,Is unemployment declining significantly because of Republicans?,Does this percentage increase reflect a decline in the economy as a whole?,Is this a major reason for a reduction in unemployment?,Is reducing unemployment simply a natural consequence of Republican success?
Is the relief fund for the Bahamas in the wake of Hurricane Dorian contributed by any other politician?,Has this aid been used by other politicians?,Is Trump the only individual who has donated to the relief fund?,Has a different person donated to the relief fund than Donald Trump?,Has the United States government contributed to this relief fund in response to Hurricane Dorian?
Has anyone been able to provide any evidence that swastikas were a feature of this allegation?,Does this allegation have any verifiable support?,Is the allegation of swastikas based on evidence that is either inconclusive or is a stretch of fiction?,Was this allegation based on evidence that is not accurate?
Did Biden say he sold a lot of state secrets?,Did Biden say this statement in the context of the 2020 election?,Is the information Biden sold a lot of state secrets public?,Has Biden told other people that this was true?,Did Biden publicly reveal this information?,Will Biden announce the 2020 election before the 2022 election?
Was Hardy referring to people with disabilities as being a drain on society?,Did Romney agree with Hardy as to how many people with disabilities are a drain on society?,Did Romney quote Hardy as saying people with disabilities are a drain on society?,Are people with disabilities a drain on society?
Did Obama lie about 200 documented cases?,Are any of these cases documented in the media?,Does Obama commit a range of these lying claims?,Does Obama lie about any amount?,Is Obama aware of these cases?,Is this information publicly available?,Has this information been shared with other media outlets?
"Did Ilhan Omar ""party"" on 9/11?",Did Omar celebrate 9/11?,Did Omar take part in any terrorist attacks?,Was Omar involved in 9/11-related terrorist acts?,Did Omar act like she did?,Did Omar attend a rally focusing on 9/11?,Was Omar's protest on 9/11 related?
Have federal workers ever negotiated collective bargaining?,Are federal employees never able to unionize?,Are there at least two million federal workers who negotiate collective bargaining?,Is there evidence that a government can negotiate collective bargaining?,Does this claim reaffirm the stance of the American Federation of Government Employees?,Does this claim include the number of federal employees who negotiate collective bargaining?
Has the reduction in terrorist attacks as a result of the wall been made at the cost of a billion of dollars?,Has there been any reduction in the number of terrorists that have entered Israel?,Does Israel cite a 90% reduction in terrorist attacks attributed to the construction of the wall?,Does Israel say there has been any reduction in terrorist attacks due to the build of the fence?
Does COVID-19 vaccine increase the risk of SARS-CoV-2?,Does the ADE mechanism work as a predictor for SARS-CoV-2?,Does the ADE mechanism help to predict SARS-CoV-2?,Does ADE have a direct effect on SARS-CoV-2?
Was a funeral video of Diego Maradona available?,Is the funeral in Buenos Aires?,Did Maradona die in November 2020?,Is it possible to see an Argentine funeral video?,Is Maradona's funeral in Buenos Aires?
Did the JPOA give the regime an immediate financial boost?,Did the JPOA lead to the funding of terrorism?,"Was the JPOA a ""reward to the regime""?",Did the JPOA allow the regime to use the funds it gained?,Could this money be used to pay for terrorist expenses?
Does the video contain footage of Muslims attacking a bus in Delhi during the 2020 Delhi Riots?,Does this video contain footage of Muslims attempting to make it in a bus during the 2020 Delhi Riots?,Is the video of this attack recorded in a video site?,Does the video document the actions of the video subjects?
Did the clinical trial involve individuals with SARS-CoV-2 infection?,Did the clinical trial include non-control people who didn't have SARS-CoV-2 infection?,Did the trial study the effectiveness of surgical face masks?,Did the medical trial contain any negative clinical outcome?,Was the clinical trial funded?
Did any Democrat attend a border official's meetings at the border?,Is it true that this statement is true?,Was a Democrat at the border for that particular event?,Did this person speak at the border between New York and Chicago?,Did this person state this particular event happened at this location?,Does this person claim that there are not Democrat leaders at the border?
Is it true that Roy Cooper does not think diabetes is a health problem?,Is it true that this type of diabetes does not pose a health issue?,Do people with this type of diabetes have a risk of death as a result?,Is there a scientific basis for this claim?
Did this video prove there were no planes involved in the 9/11 attacks?,Has this video ever substantiated a conspiracy theory that planes were involved in the 9/11 attacks?,Can this video be safely used as evidence to establish a conspiracy?,Does this video support all prevailing conspiracies about the 9/11 attacks?
"In Wisconsin, does a woman earn 800 cents for every $1 a man earns?",Are there any data to prove this claim?,Are women only earning 80 cents for every $1 a man earns?,Can any information be used in support of this claim?,"If no data is available, is there any evidence of these estimates to back these claims?"
Is this song a controversial one?,Was this album a release hit?,Did CMT reinstate this video?,Did this video have this song on it?,Is the song a parody of a song?,Is this video controversial?,Is this track available for streaming?,Is the song and video associated with drugs?
"Did Lennon say that ""happy"" was the key to life at age 5?",Did Lennon believe in the value of happiness?,Did Lennon believe in happiness at age 5?,Did Lennon believe in happiness?,Did Lennon have any friends in high school who believed in happiness?
Does this image show a mysterious 7ft creature?,Is there a photograph that shows a mysterious 7ft creature?,Did this photograph contain the person who was terrorizing this village?,Have any other reports of this sort been made?,Is this beast an actual creature?,Did this creature are featured in this photograph?
Did the man fake being deaf and dumb for 62 years?,Did he do so to avoid hearing his wife?,Did the man do so to avoid talking to his wife?,Did the man fake being deaf and dumb for 62 years?,Did the man do this to avoid hearing his wife?
Was this list accurate?,Was this list broadly shared?,Was this list of failed Constitution amendments accurate?,Was the list of failed Constitution amendments accurate?,Are the 15 failed constitutional amendments listed as accurate?,Was this list accurate in 2021?,Is this list based on actual data?,Was this list accurate in 2021?
Is there any way to receive a tax credit for solar and wind energy?,Does Nancy Pelosi’s bill include retirement plans for community newspaper employees?,Is there any way to receive an additional $300 million for PBS?,Would that money go to climate change studies?,Can this bill be used to increase the number of people who receive pension benefits?
Is it true that 32 percent of all education spending goes to teachers?,Does this mean that education is expensive for school districts?,Does this mean that teachers are often the best of the best in schools?,Is it true that there is no increase in the salaries of schools?,Does this mean that schools have to spend more money on salaries than do parents?
Was the boy killed when two boys were from the Muslim community?,Was the boy stabbed and killed when two boys from the Muslim community were near the house?,Was the boy shot before the stabbed boys entered the house?,Were the boys from the Muslim community in the house when the stabbed boys entered the house?
Was Hansen arrested after meeting up with a 13 year old girl?,Was Hansen charged with first degree assault?,Was Hansen arrested for being a felon on a police arraignment?,Was Hansen in a custody remand?,Was Hansen arrested for child abuse?
Was Gadkari responsible for this false promise?,Is Gadkari responsible for this false promise?,Is Gadkari responsible for this false promise?,Is Gadkari responsible for this false promise?,Is Gadkari responsible for this false promise?,Is Gadkari responsible for this false promise?
Did the U.S. military record a 500% increase in new HIV infections since COVID-19 vaccines were introduced?,Is HIV infection in the U.S. military on the decline since vaccines were introduced?,Does the U.S. military record a 500% increase in new HIV infections since vaccines were introduced?
Has President Zuma stewarded South Africa's largest renewable energy program?,Has South Africa's renewable energy programme been among the top 10 in the world?,Is the renewable energy program of South Africa classified as one of the largest in the world?,Is South Africa's renewable energy programme on par with most advanced programs in the world?
Was the video taken after the US election loss?,Is this a joke that Putin can laugh at?,Was the video recorded in the course of a public speech?,Is Putin involved in this joke?,Are any other videos showing this joke?,Is this video part of a joke about the election loss?
Could the health care law cost up to $2 trillion?,Do Republicans expect the health care law to cost double what they promised?,Did they make a commitment to make changes to the health care law?,Was the health care law going to require the government to provide health care?,Do Republicans expect the health care law to cost double what it promised?
"Does the Titanic shipwreck lie around 2,500 metres below sea level?",Is the Titanic shipwreck a common sight in water?,Is the Titanic shipwreck located near land?,Are the Titanic shipwrecks found in land?,Are there multiple video reports that claim the Titanic shipwreck is near land?
Did the number of immigrants who were denied entry by immigration authorities increase since 2013 to 40%?,Does the figure change with regard to how many immigrants come by plane?,Are any of these immigrants who were denied entry by immigration authorities on one-way shipments?,Is the increase in travel by foreigners greater than the increase in immigration arriving by land?
Did the City of Paris hire too many women in senior positions?,Was the City of Paris fined for hiring too many women in senior positions?,Did any women in senior Paris administration positions work for the City of Paris?,Did the City of Paris pay a fine for hiring too many women in senior positions?,Did the City of Paris pay any fines for hiring too many women in senior Paris administration positions?
Did any additional suspects receive any arrests?,Was there any other victims identified in Buffalo?,Does CBS News report any additional info about these two new arrests?,Is this specific incident happening in the Buffalo region?,Is this incident being covered in news outlets around the nation?,Is this incident being reported to other news outlets?
"Did the GOP support the enforcing of this ""racist disenfranchisement""?",Have polls in Milwaukee been closed despite an election?,Did this election include only five polling places open?,"Has the enforcing of this ""racist disenfranchisement"" prevented the election in Milwaukee?"
Did the flag of the US flag are urinated on?,Did there appear to be a migrant caravan on the October 2018 flag?,Is there evidence that a migrant caravan was on the U.S. flag?,Can it be concluded that the migrant caravan was on the U.S. flag?
Was issue 2 illegal to negotiate for enough firefighters to do the job?,Would negotiating for enough firefighters to do the job have been illegal before issue 2?,Is there a reason for a policy to be illegal?,Would it be illegal to negotiate for enough firefighters?,Does negotiating for enough firefighters make sense?
Is there proof of this claim?,Is it true that the current tax code is so complex that complies with it costs millions of dollars a year?,Does this country’s current tax code cost $500 billion a year if it is a complicated system?,Does any one country have a more complex system than the U.S.?
Has the increase in firearm crime since 2000 been 40 percent or 70 percent?,Has gun ownership declined by about 60 percent since 2000?,Has the decline in firearm crimes in the past 20 years been more than 70 percent?,Has the decline in the firearm crime rate been more than 70 percent?,Has the overall reduction in the number of firearm crimes over the last 20 years been less than 60 percent?
Have MPs received a salary of over £100k?,Would MPs receive a salary of over £100k?,Does every MP receive a salary of over £100k?,Does each MP receive a salary of more than £100k?,Has this percentage fluctuated from year to year?
Was the debt of Kenya before Jubilee ever taken over?,Is the debt of Kenya now rising?,Is the debt of Kenya currently higher than the amount of GDP of China?,Is it true that Jubilee took over a nation with a debt amount of KSh1.5 trillion?
Was the COVID-19 vaccine manufactured by China's Sinovac?,Was the COVID-19 vaccine used in the prefilled syringe of a European pharmaceutical company?,Did Carrie Lam receive a vaccine in a prefilled syringe produced by a European pharmaceutical company?
Is the deficit of 3.2 million homes in Lagos?,Is the deficit of 3.2 million homes in Lagos significant?,Is the deficit of 3.2 million homes in Lagos a reasonable estimate?,Is this a realistic estimate of the deficit of 3.2 million homes in Lagos?,Do any sources contradict this claim?
Did the patient recover fully from infection?,Did the patient get better after treatment?,Has the patient been treated in Wuhan previously?,Did the patient experience any complications after the treatment?,Was the patient hospitalized?,Has there been a related situation?,Was the patient in a public hospital prior to the treatment?
Did the murders occur in Delhi?,Did the murders occur at a temple in Delhi?,Did anyone participate in the love jihad in Delhi?,Was the murder of one person in Delhi considered suicide?,"Does this video have multiple examples of ""love jihad"" in Delhi?",Does this video portray suicide in the context of love jihad?
"Did the results of the ballot audit in Maricopa County, Arizona still not be released as of July 2?",Did the ballot audit report reveal disputed voting?,Did the results of the ballot audit report reveal disputed voting in other counties?,Did the outcome of the ballot audit report reveal contested voting in other states?
Did deficits shrink at the fastest rate in 60 years?,Was the fastest rate of deficit falling in sixty years?,Does the current economic climate favor deficit reduction?,Does the current economic climate favor deficit reduction?,Is the current economic climate supported by the majority of people in the country?,Is it supported by the majority of the people in the country?,Is any negative aspect of the current economic climate a contributing factor in the deficits?
Did the photo appear in a published article?,Did the photo show the Japanese rising sun flag on a warship from Sept 2022 drills?,Was this event part of the USA's Exercises in Afghanistan and Japan?,Did the photo appear on social media?,Does this event take place in the future?
Was an 11-year-old girl shot and killed after they broke into her home in Montana?,Are there records of the incident in Montana?,Did the girl use a gun to kill her parents?,Did the police suspect the girl was under the influence?,Did the girl shoot her parents?,Did the teen have legal residence in Montana?
Is this photo of Susan B. Anthony or someone else?,Is this photo of someone else?,Was there any protests against this woman?,"Is this woman, or someone else, in this photo?",Was this woman attacked while they were protesting?,Was this woman assaulted by someone else?
Is Ann Landers's quote a common statement?,Is this quote from Landers accurate?,Are there multiple versions of this quote?,Has this quote been widely known?,Is Ann Landers's quote widely cited?,Is this quote also commonly attributed to Landers?,Is Ann Landers's quote specific to people in this age range?
Is Kyrzayda Rodriguez a fashion blogger?,Did she pass away?,Is Kyrzayda Rodriguez from the Dominican Republic?,Did Kyrzayda Rodriguez succumb to stage 4 stomach cancer?,Did Kyrzayda Rodriguez suffer from a heart attack or cancer?
Was there a consensus that human activity was cause of global warming?,Was there a scientific consensus on the extent of human actions to climate change?,Is there any way to measure the human impact on climate change?
Did the buses go to Alabama illegally?,Did the busloads of Blacks travel there illegally?,Are there any other instances of illegal voting in Alabama?,Is there any evidence that the busload of Blacks went to Alabama illegally?,Was there any evidence that some of the Blacks in Alabama were voting illegally?,Is any reason cited for the influx of Blacks from 3 states traveling to Alabama illegally?
Is it a double standard that former President Trump may be indicted over alleged hush money payments to a woman who accused him of sexual encounters?,"Was Bill Clinton never charged with money laundering or tax evasion for the alleged $850,000 he paid a sexual harassment accuser?"
Has National Geographic ever paid for an underwater shark attack video?,Did National Geographic ever pay for an underwater shark attack video?,Was a helicopter video taken for a shark attack?,Is a shark attack video from National Geographic a real shark attack video?,Is this video a real shark attack video from National Geographic?
"Did people protesting police brutality in Washington, D.C., lose mobile data coverage?","Did the blackout effect all cell phone users in Washington, D.C.?",Was this type of blackout a total loss of the phone network?,Did people protest during the blackout during a crowded area?
Will schools in Assam be closed due to COVID cases?,Does Assam currently have high rates of COVID?,Will there be high numbers of schools in Assam?,Has COVID been reported in Assam?,Is Assam located in India?,Did schools in Assam increase COVID cases in this state?
Did Republicans say it was impossible to balance a budget at the same time?,Did Republicans say it was impossible to balance a budget with an $11 billion deficit?,Did the GOP have a budget deficit of around $11 billion?,Did Democrats say it was impossible to balance a budget at the same time?
Do vaccines cause myocarditis?,Have vaccines caused more myocarditis cases than COVID-19?,Do the vaccines cause multiple myocarditis cases?,Do vaccines cause myocarditis more often than the virus itself?,Do vaccines cause a large number of myocarditis cases?
Did VD Savarkar attempt to rape an English woman in 1908?,Was Savarkar convicted of attempting rape of an English woman?,Did Savarkar receive a prison sentence?,Did Savarkar receive a death sentence after being convicted for attempted rape of an English woman?
Have a sufficient number of LED bulbs been distributed?,Has the government made a significant effort to spruce up the lighting industry?,Has the state governments made inroads into the lighting sector?,Have any state government initiated any efforts to spruce up the lighting industry?,Do these lights affect the electricity bill by consuming more electricity?
"Did a Boeing 747 consume about 220,000 liters of fuel?",Was a cow allowed to occupy the same size acres for 12 years?,Was the amount used by a farmer for 12 years the same as the amount used by a Boeing 747?,Was the amount used by a farmer for 12 years the same as that used by a farmer?,Was the amount used by a farmer for 12 years the same as the amount used by a Boeing 747?
Was this photograph taken by the Turkish imam?,Did this photo contain a photograph of the hero dog?,Was this photo taken after the earthquake in February of 2020?,Did this picture contain a photograph of the Hero dog?,Has this photo appeared before or after the earthquake?,Is this photograph of the Hero dog being featured in a gallery?
Did the image shows the wreckage of the Tara Air aircraft that went missing in Nepal?,Did any other aircraft crash on the same date?,Did any other aircraft crash on the same date?,Did any other aircraft crash on the same date?,Did any other aircraft crash on the same date?,Did any other aircraft crash on the same date?
Did Obama offer assistance to local governments to provide security at schools?,Does this funding amount to the largest investment in school safety in American history?,Was the increase in funding in the Obama Administration for school security a cost?,Was this funding made available to all local governments under the Obama administration?,Is it true that the government is providing nearly $2 billion in help to local governments to ensure school safety?
Is the Colonel resigning from the Army?,Did the General report Pakistan's killing of his own Soldiers?,Was the Colonel killed while on duty with the Army?,Was the General responsible for the death of his own Soldiers?,Is the Colonel of the Army actually an Indian soldier?,Did the Colonel of the Army commit suicide in the past?
Did Boccieri vote 93 percent of the time with Nancy Pelosi?,Did Boccieri vote for any other candidate than Nancy Pelosi?,Did Boccieri endorse any candidate other than Nancy Pelosi?,Did Boccieri vote against any other candidate other than Nancy Pelosi?,Did Boccieri vote in favor of any other candidate who is a Republican?
"Was there a judge that benefited over 300,000 people?",Does this judge need to sit for more than a month?,Does this judge need to serve for longer than a month?,Did the judge serve more than 24 months?,Was there a judge that was paid by the country?,Was this judge paid by the world?
Has Warren been on Risperdal since first being prescribed the drug in 2011?,Has Warren ever been addicted to Risperdal?,Does Warren regularly take Risperdal in any manner?,Did Warren have a medical condition before starting Risperdal therapy?,Do Warren and her family still have Risperdal?
"Did the most recent census data show that average American family spends over $13,000 a year for health care coverage?","Does the average American family spend over $13,000 a year for health care coverage?",Has health care coverage influenced American population size?,Do the factors that increase health care cost not affect the actual costs of healthcare?
Can this bill be enacted and given to the government and law enforcement during 2026?,Will it require all of these organizations to be authorized?,Will this bill require all of these organizations to be enacted?,Does this bill allow individuals to re-use the kill switch from vehicle to vehicle during those times?
Did Obama and Fauci have a photo taken at the Wuhan Laboratories?,Is Wuhan a different kind of company than the US institute?,Is this inferred from the image taken at the Wuhan Laboratory?,Is this the same astronomy center the Obama's visited in 2013 and 2015?,Is this the same building as the US Institute?
Is Baldwin saying she wants to mandate children in grade 5 to learn about gay sex?,Does Baldwin plan to prohibit children from having gay sex in grade 5?,Are there any negative aspects to the requirement that children learn about gay sex in grade 5?,Does Baldwin plan on requiring children in Grade 5 to be educated about gay sex?
Did COVID-19 vaccines cause fewer miscarriages and stillbirths in 2021?,Are miscarriages and stillbirths decreasing as a result of vaccines?,Does COVID-19 vaccine significantly reduce miscarriage and stillbirth rates?,Have COVID-19 vaccines prevented miscarriages and stillbirths for many years?
Is there a video showing recent recruits of an ethnic rebel group?,Has there been any controversy with regards to this video?,Is there a documentary available that depicts this video?,Is there any information to support this claim?,Do these events take place within this month?,Is there any evidence supporting this claim?
Was the temple covered by a road construction project?,"Is the 5,000 year old temple damaged by the road project?","Does the 5,000 year old temple contain any objects?","Is the 5,000 year old temple located in the city of Ayodhya?",Do the temples of the city are located near the city?
Can women earn less than men?,Is there a correlation between what women and men earn?,Are there specific gender wage gaps for these positions?,Have equal pay laws for these positions been adopted?,Has this information been publicly displayed?,Are women paid less for equal work than men in these positions?,Are these wage levels lower than other positions?
Did Salem spend every penny when the Legislature suspended the kicker?,Is the quote from this statement accurate?,Was there an occurrence of the Legislature suspending the kicker in 2007?,Did Salem spend every penny when the Legislature suspended the kicker in 2007?,Does this statement support any claim by Salem that the Legislature has lost control of the state's spending?
Is it true that the ratio of CEO pay to average worker pay in the U.S. is 475 to 1?,Is this ratio accurately portrayed by the median salary of CEOs?,Do economists agree with the statement that the average worker pay is 47% higher than the average CEO pay?
Will businesses have to pay more taxes under Cruz's tax plan?,Will businesses pay more taxes under Cruz's tax plan?,Will businesses be required to pay more taxes under Cruz's tax plan?,Did Cruz's plan include a tax surcharge?,Did Cruz's plan include a tax surcharge?
"Did this scientist jump 1,28000 feet off of the Earth and back into space?","Did this scientist jump 1,280 miles of space in total?",Were these jumps part of a larger experiment to demonstrate the safety and performance of a rocket that landed on Earth?,Did this experiment actually make it to the Earth?
Did Domino’s Pizza give out coupons for large pizzas?,Does Domino’s Pizza provide coupons to those who comment on their Facebook page?,Was this offer only available in California?,Was this offer valid in most states?,Does Domino’s Pizza offer these coupons on their websites?,Did Domino’s Pizza offer this offer on their Twitter account?
Did the Banking Committee vote a bill for 13536 pages?,Did the bill come to the House?,Did the bill have amendments?,Does the Banking committee normally pass a bill with amendments?,Was the Banking Committee willing to reach a bipartisan agreement?,. Would the Senate vote on the Banking committee bill?
"Did 50,000 Americans make their living on eBay?","Were 50,000 Americans making a living off eBay?","Did 50,000 Americans live off eBay in 2013?","Is there any information to indicate that 50,000 Americans are making a living off eBay?",- Do Amazon employees make money from eBay?,- Do other business people make their living off eBay?
"Are the cardboard beds located at the Olympic village in Tokyo, Japan designed to discourage intimacy and promote social distancing?","Do the cardboard beds used at the Olympic Village in Tokyo, Japan, provide additional reassurance about the health risks of intimacy?","Is the purpose of the cardboard beds in Tokyo, Japan, a reassurance about the health risks of intimacy?"
Did Virginia Democrats support a law that prohibits local sheriffs from using military equipment?,Could these military equipment make the I-95 traffic jam a lot worse?,Can military equipment make the traffic jam a lot better?,Were the local sheriffs not able to use military equipment?,Will a law like this be necessary in the future?
"In 1970, did the Oregon Department of Transportation attempt to dispose of a whale carcass by blowing it up?",Did the Oregon Department of Transportation try to throw up the carcass when they took it down?,Did the Oregon Department of Transportation attempt to throw up the whale carcass when they took it down?,Did the Oregon Department of Transportation attempt to throw the carcass when they took it down?
Does Ganguly have a grandmother?,Does Ganguly have any siblings?,Did Ganguly sing any tunes with her grandmother?,Have any of the other songs been released since the video was released?,Does Ganguly have any relatives or relatives that know about the video?,Is there anything else that Ganguly has done since this recording?
Did Holtzman send a letter of resignation to Homeland Security?,"Did the resignation letter contain a ""statement""?","Does the resignation letter contain a list of ""recommendations""?","Did Holtzman use this letter of resignation to say ""We have asked the Department of Homeland Security to consider a recommendation regarding the Homeland Security Advisory Council's nomination, selection, and responsibilities""?"
Did CDC release data showing that 7 out of 10 Americans are declining COVID-19 vaccine?,Do 7 out of 10 Americans have the COVID-19 vaccine?,Are 9 out of 10 adults who are receiving COVID-19 vaccine in a healthy household?,Is COVID-19 vaccine required for 7 out of 10 adults with COVID-19?
Did police find 11 human bodies at the clown's residence?,Did the police find the clown's residence safe?,Was the clown arrested for possession of human corpses?,Did the clown provide police with evidence?,Did the clown 'apologise' to the police?,Did the clown 'worship 'any church' as part of his alleged confessions?
What does this prediction mean for Texas?,Will Texas’ population double in the next 50 years?,Will Texas' water levels remain where they are today?,Are water resources expected to double in the future?,Would the Texas economy lose some of its economic growth in the future?,Do any of the people predicted to have a population increase in the near future work in the oil industry?
Did the mother of Fred Hampton babysit Emmett Till when he was killed by the FBI in 1969?,Was Emmett Till killed in 1955?,Did the mother of Fred Hampton babysit Emmett Till when he was killed?,Did the FBI kill Fred Hampton?,Did the FBI murder Emmett Till during the period prior to the 1960's?
Did Netflix agree to pay Barack Obama $90 million to produce a series about Trump's impeachment?,Did Obama have any prior production ties with Netflix?,Does Obama think Trump's impeachment was inherently political?,Did Obama get approval from Netflix to produce the series about Trump's impeachment?
Did this program directly impact on the poor?,Does this program cover the needy?,Are these people paid 7% of the salary in this program?,Are this people working to get money for their family?,Does this money support these people?,Are the poor paid 7% of this money in this program?,Is this money paid to these people in this program?
Did Celine Dion die or reveal new personal health developments in late July 2023?,Are there any known rumors of Celine Dion's death?,Has Celine Dion revealed any medical news regarding her health?,Has Celine Dion released any other medical news about her health?,Have any previous medical records regarding Celine Dion's health been released?
Did the Government reduce the Board Examination pass percentage criteria from 33% to 23%?,Did the Government reduce the Board Examination pass percentage criteria between 2012 and 2017?,Did the government reduce the Board Examination pass percentage criteria from 33% to 23%?,Has the government reduced the Board Examination pass percentage criteria from 33% to 23%?
Did this footage show poll rigging in a specific election?,Was this footage shot by a non-political person?,Is this video proof that this event occurred?,Was this video filmed by someone who is not a public person?,Did this video have a high-quality camera capturing the election?,Did the video footage show the election being rigged?
"Did the man in charge of the investigation of Hillary Clinton accept $675,000?","Did the man receive $675,000 from Hillary Clinton?",Is the man in charge of the investigation of Hillary Clinton still active in political matters?,"Was the person who accepted the $675,000 'in connection with Clinton'?","Did the person in charge of the investigation receive that $675,000 from Hillary Clinton for a wife?"
"What does it say about marijuana that it is not ""should not be researched""?",Is marijuana classified as a Schedule 1 drug?,Is it illegal to research marijuana?,Has marijuana been reported as a Schedule 1 drug?,Is it illegal to purchase marijuana?,Can marijuana be bought under federal government regulations?
Did all MPs receive £25 per day food allowance?,"Did £25 per day food allowance amount to £845,000 per year?","Did the food allowance amount to £855,000 per year?",Did each day's allowance for food have a daily amount of £25?,"Did the amount of food allowance for all MPs amount to £845,000 per year?"
Do you know whether there were 16 states that prohibited racial marriage during 1958?,Is there any evidence that there was a prohibition of racial marriage in 1958?,Was there an enactment of these laws in 1958?,Have racial marriages in America increased since 1958?,Did racial marriages in America increase during 1958?
Did the bird carry a bird away or get a bird out of trouble?,Did the hummingbird try to get a bird out of trouble?,Was this hummingbird demonstrating helpful behavior?,Was this video shared to Reddit in April 2021?,Did this hummingbird show any kind of sex or physical violence?
Is the support of Democrats and Republicans bipartisan?,Does this support mean that Sheila will continue to receive support?,Was this support voted in during the 2017 campaign?,Would this support translate into bipartisan support in 2018?,Does this support translate into bipartisan support for the 2018 legislative session?,Are there more elections in 2017 than 2018?
Did Antifa and Muslim organizations plan to police the streets of Minneapolis under Muslim rule?,Were these plans to police the streets under Muslim rule finalized?,Did these plans actually take place?,Did these plans result in violence?,Would this be the case for all Minneapolis neighborhoods?,Has this city been under investigation for violence since 2010?
Did the photo show three US troops crying and shaking?,Was the photo shot during fighting on the ground?,Are the three soldiers in the photograph talking as though they could stop this in 10 minutes?,Did they tell Trump that the US could not stop this in 10 minutes?,Is there proof that Trump refused to allow them to stop fighting in Syria?
Did the amusement park announce that it was closing?,Did the amusement park have a revenue of more than $60 million?,"Did Story Land have a population of over 2,000 people?",Do any related companies have interests in Story Land?,Are there any related businesses to Story Land?,Did the amusement park operate in New Hampshire?
Did McConnell make any comments about Trump's record as a candidate?,Is there any proof of McConnell's support for Trump in 2024?,Is McConnell currently serving in the United States Senate?,Exactly how far back has McConnell made his statements?,Exactly when did McConnell tell a reporter that Trump would be his nominee in 2024?
Did the Koch Brothers spend three times the top 10 unions combined?,Did the Koch Brothers spend this amount primarily on education and health care?,Did the Koch Brothers spend this amount primarily on health care?,Did the Koch Brothers spend this amount primarily on education?,Did the Koch Brothers spend this amount primarily on health care?,Did the Koch Brothers spend this amount primarily on education and health care?
Does this topical ointment reduce belly fat in 3 days?,Does this topical ointment cure belly fat permanently?,Do side effects of this ointment occur?,Did this ointment reduce belly fat permanently?,Does reducing belly fat by applying this ointment result in any permanent loss?
Did Cory Booker receive over $400000 from pharmaceutical industry as a politician?,Did Cory booker receive over $40000 from pharmaceutical industry as a politician?,Did Cory booker receive over $400000 from pharmaceutical industry as a politician?,Whether Cory booker received more than $40000 from pharmaceutical industry during his political career as a politician?
Did the US government release a report about the expected jobs that could be created in the US?,"Did the report mention that this project would be expected to create some 20,000 jobs in the U.S.?",Did this project have more jobs in California?,Did this project create more jobs in any other state besides California?
Is this diet formula available for babies?,Have any parents tried this diet formula?,Is the 1960 recipe for homemade baby formula free of side effects?,Do people have to buy this food in order to make this diet formula?,Has this diet formula been tested on human children?,Have any other people tried this diet formula?
"Was it true that the stimulus bill cost taxpayers $71,500 per job created?",Did the stimulus bill have a direct impact on job creation in the US?,Did the stimulus bill make any direct economic impact on the economy?,Did the stimulus bill have an impact on the labor market?,Did the stimulus bill cause jobs to increase?
Does Colin McGregor's call sign resemble that of Obi-Two?,Does Colin McGregor have any children?,Has Ewan McGregor ever used the call sign  Obi-Two?,Is Colin McGregor related to actor Ewan McGregor?,Is Colin McGregor the son of actor Ewan McGregor?
Did Obama have a larger percentage of his supporters opposed to his campaign than McCain?,Did Obama have more supporters in June of 2008?,"Did Obama hold out toward a ""yes"" vote from his supporters in June of 2008?",Was Obama's support higher than McCain's supporters?,Was Clinton's exit from the campaign due to his supporters backing Obama?
"Did we hit this coldest temperature since 10,000 years?",Will it continue to be colder or warmer than it has been?,Are there other factors we should not be panicking about?,"Is it true that 1 degree Celsius above the coldest temperature in 10,000 years is fine to be panicking about?","Is there evidence that this is the warmest temperature in 10,000 years?"
Did these shootings involve people who have extensive criminal records?,Did these shootings have a causal relationship to any other person with a criminal record?,Did there any incidents in Milwaukee where these shootings were linked to another person?,Did these shootings result in any injuries or injuries as a result of the shootings?
Did these dollars save American taxpayers a considerable amount?,"In general, were these dollars saved due to the ban on earmarking?",Is the number of dollars saved due to ban on earmarkings higher than a total of all costs of pork-barrel spending?,Was the cost of pork-barrel spending lower than the cost of earmarks?
Did India have a higher number of insured people than ever?,Did the number of people insured against life and accident risk rise or stay the same since 2008?,Are more than 19 crore people insured against life and accident risk?,"Are people insured against pension, pension from an accident, or both?",Did the number of insurance policy holders increase in recent years?
Are there any other related stories for this man?,Is there any other possible meaning for his children as a result of his naivety?,Did he make any statements about the validity of this?,Has he made any statements about his children at all?,Has he made any statements about the reliability of this man as a father?,Has any other similar stories been produced about this man as a father?
Did a baseball player cut the ball in two with his swing and knock half over the fence?,Did a baseball player use an axe as a bat and knock half over the fence?,Does this baseball player win the game by using an axe as a bat?,Is this baseball player from another country?
Did water rates in Manila be raised up to 845 percent when a subsidiary of the World Bank became a partial owner?,Did water rates in Manila stay the same as before the World Bank became a partial owner?,Did the water rates stay the same as before the World Bank became a partial owner?
Is Juneteenth a good holiday for toppling Confederate statues?,Is it easy for a person to be mistakenly infringing on Juneteenth?,Is the alleged misrepresentation based on a misunderstanding of the facts about Juneteenth and Confederate statues?
Is President Obama spending $2.2 billion giving away phones?,Is the Obama phone line a monopoly for distribution of phones?,Has Obama had any monopoly on sales of phones?,Is there any record of Obama making these blunderous statements?,Was there any evidence of the Obama phone line being a monopoly for distribution of phones?
Did Indian Nursing Council declare that all nurses will be addressed as ‘Nursing Officers’?,Will the Bachelor of Science Nursing be equal to MBBS?,Will all nurses be junior doctors?,Have any nursing schools been approved for this purpose?,Would all nurses work towards becoming junior doctors?,Did a new grad school be approved by the Indian Nursing Council?
Did the Supreme Court confirm the sentence?,Did the Supreme Court uphold Cheney's sentence?,Did the Court uphold Cheney's sentence?,Did the Court reinstate Cheney's sentence?,Did the Court uphold Cheney's sentence?,Did the Supreme Court award Cheney any more years in prison on war crimes charges?
Does Eskom generate approximately 95% of the electricity used in South Africa?,Is there any evidence that Eskom has increased their electricity use over the last several years?,Is the electricity used by Eskom currently below what the government estimates it will be in 2050?,Is the amount of electricity generated in South Africa under a government estimate?
Are there any specifics related to Trump's election interference sanctions?,Will Trump implement voter interference sanctions for any other controversies?,Will any other sanctions be imposed as part of Trump's election interference sanctions?,"Would Trump's election interference sanctions be ""tactically"" implemented?",Would Trump's election interference sanctions impose sanctions for any specific entities or categories?
"Does the USA Today headline that said Musk company killed 3,000 monkeys not come from actual research?",Has Musk been indicted for any illegal wildlife killings?,Has the U.S. Government deemed any incidents of this magnitude to have occurred?,"Is Musk's claim of having killed 3,000 monkeys a true statement?"
Do dead bodies that have been exposed to COVID-19 become 100 times more toxic in 72 hours?,Has there been a study that has found this occurrence?,Is it true that after 72 hours a person's body has been exposed to COVID-19?,Is it true that the mortality rate for COVID-19 cases remains around 1%?
Was there a harvest in Poland in 2023?,Did photos depicting a harvest occur in Poland?,Was Poland experiencing a harvest in 2023?,"Was the crop in Poland a ""semi"" harvest?",Did Poland produce a semi harvest in 2023?,Was there a harvest in Poland in 2023?
"Did the ""COV 19"" engraving on the circuit board exist in the first 5G communications networks?",Was this circuit board produced for use in 5G telecom?,"Are the ""COV 19"" engravings on this circuit board used for communications purpose?",Has any 5G communications network in the world been successfully installed with this circuit board engraving?
Did this author speak on any specific policy regarding going into Iraq?,Is this author a member of the Iraqi opposition?,Is this author in support of or against bringing the US into Iraq?,Did this author support the Iraq war?,Is this author in favor of supporting the Iraq war?,Has this author made statements about the war prior to 2001?
Is unemployment predicted to top 9 percent in 2013?,Is unemployment projected to top 9% in 2013?,Is unemployment predicted to top 9 percent in 2013?,Is unemployment predicted to top 9 percent in 2013?,Is unemployment predicted to top 9 percent in 2013?,Is unemployment predicted to top 9 percent in 2013?
Did Biden have racism in this context?,Did Biden use racial slurs referring to Black people in 1985?,Did Biden mention racial slurs for Black people in this context?,Did Biden use racial slurs referring to Black people?
Is it likely the Supreme Court will extend Trump’s term by up to 3 years?,Is it likely the Supreme Court will extend Trump’s term by more than one year?,Is it possible for Trump to be acquitted in the Senate?,Are there restrictions in the Supreme Court on Trump’s re-election?
Did the number of people receiving anti-retroviral treatment double from 1 million to 2.4 million in 2013?,Was there a decrease in the number of people receiving anti-retroviral treatment in 2013?,Is it possible that the number of people receiving anti-retroviral treatment has doubled since 2013?
"Did Melania take the taxpayer funded trips at $32,143 per trip?",Was the travel sex cost at taxpayer cost?,Did Melania take fewer trips than was reported?,Is it possible the total cost of each trip was more than the quoted cost per trip?,Is the average price per trip less than what is reported?
Will 3 million people from SNAP have to go?,Will the president want to cut children from SNAP?,Will the president want to cut veterans from SNAP?,Will any of these organizations actually be affected?,Are any of these organizations affected?,Are SNAP recipients at risk for being impacted by this reversal?
Did the daycare owner breastfeed the toddlers in public?,Did the daycare owner smoke crystal meth while breastfeeding the toddlers?,Did the daycare owner smoke crystal meth while breastfeeding the toddlers?,Was the daycare owner located outside of Chicago?,Did the daycare owner smoke during the breastfeeding session?
Would someone from Capital One be chosen to receive the $500 Capital One Gold Card?,Would someone who received this card already have the $500 Card?,Did the email tell me the person who received the card had been selected?,Would someone at Capital One not receive this card?,Is the $500 card valid for all purchases on this card?,Is this card valid for all purchases on Capital One?
Did ICE hold a small boy in a cage in 2018?,Did ICE hold a small boy in a cage in 2018?,Did ICE hold a small boy in a cage in 2018?,Did ICE hold a small boy in a cage in 2018?,Was ICE holding a small boy in a cage in 2018?,Did ICE hold a small boy in a cage in 2018?
Was an inflatable Christmas costume in the emergency room at a California hospital?,Was there any medical treatment for COVID-19 in the hospital?,Was there any investigation into the occurrence of COVID-19?,Did employees of the hospital come in contact with COVID-19?,Did any other employees come in contact with COVID-19?
Did Ryan actually propose three bills?,Was each bill a bill that became law?,Was each bill the only one passed in Ryan's career?,Did Ryan ever propose another bill?,Have any of Ryan's bills made it to the floor?,Did any of Ryan's bills ever pass on their own?
Is it true the Ohio Consumers’ Council office employs 74 lawyers?,Is the funding of lawyers wasteful?,Is there a dividing line between the number of lawyers employed by the office and the number that is paid by Ohio Consumers’ Council?,Is there any evidence that suggests funding was wasted on lawyers by Ohio Consumers’ Council?
Do social media users get eight coupons for a free sausage roll and a drink at Greggs if they share and comment on a Facebook post?,Did this coupon feature a coupon for a free sausage roll and drink?,Can social media users get eight coupons for a free sausage roll and a drink if they share and comment on a Facebook post?
"Did Hillary Clinton ever say ""This planet might be able to support perhaps as many as half of a billion people who could live a sustainable life in relative comfort""?",Did Clinton state humans must be greatly diminished in order to limit further environmental damage?,Was Hillary Clinton's statement clear?,Did Hillary Clinton agree with this assertion?
Does this pension plan pay a retirement to widowed women?,Did this program originate under the PM's previous administration?,Will this new pension plan meet the needs of widowed women?,Will this retirement plan be paid by the government?,Is the PM’s latest administration a part of this new program?
Did COVID-19 mean certificate of vaccination identity?,Did the vaccine effort result in weakening the immune system?,Have any vaccine studies shown the effectiveness of COVID-19?,Does the vaccine effort increase the chance of contracting a strain of COVID-19?,Do all vaccines have the same effectiveness?
Did this person leave a cycle behind in 1914?,Was this person a young boy going to war in 1914?,Did the cycle leave behind a boy to go to war in 1914?,Was the cycle embedded in a tree?,Did this person care what the cycle was left behind in 1914?,Was this person a cyborg or a human?
Did a Google Maps Street View car hit a hare?,Was the hare in the photos taken by the Google Maps Street View car?,Did the image of the hare in the photos show that it was a rabbit?,Was the hare seen in the photos as an object in the street?
Was the National Rifle Association poll consistently supporting requiring background checks for all gun sales?,Did the National Rifle Association poll consistently support requiring background checks for all gun sales?,Was the National Rifle Association survey consistently a supporter of background checks?,Is it true that the National Rifle Association members are opposed to background checks for all gun sales?
Did Bihar voters have an expectation of Modi to return?,Is the graffiti work in Bihar specifically referencing the 2020 elections?,Does the graffiti work include images of other politicians?,Did Bihar voters have an expectation of Modi to return?,Do these elections loom large in Bihar?,Is this graffiti work a specific reference to 2020 elections?
Is it true this picture shows DePape filming the Jan. 6 U.S. Capitol riot?,Did the photo include any images claiming to include footage from DePape’s home invasion of Congress?,Is there any evidence supporting a claim to contain a picture including photos from DePape’s home invasion of Congress?
Are there any published research papers that support the BBC's assertion that monkeypox is an airborne form of herpes that is capable of infecting anyone within 15 feet?,Is the BBC's assertion that monkeypox is an airborne form of herpes that is capable of infecting anyone within 15 feet based on the nature of the information provided by its sources?,Are any published research papers supporting the BBC's assertion that monkeypox is an airborne form of herpes?
Was Fort Detrick lab able to get the virus?,Did the virus leak from the lab?,Did the Fort Detrick lab shut down?,Does the Fort Detrick lab support coronavirus research?,Does the CDC have scientific support for the coronavirus in the United States?
Did Florida Senate Bill 2A provide immediate relief to homeowners?,Does Florida Senate Bill 2A increase insurance rates?,Will the additional insurance charges increase property insurance rates?,Is Florida Senate Bill 2A a solution to property insurance rate issues?,Is the impact of a florida senate bill to homeowners' property insurance rates negligible?
Was it a Dingo eating a shark?,Was it two snakes mating near the shark?,Was the snakes a stray animal in the scene?,Is there a shark swimming nearby in the photo?,Is there a shark shark swimming nearby in this photo?,Are snakes eating sharks?
Is Antarctica warming and the extent of sea ice has been increasing for over 40 years?,Are the levels of arctic ice changing?,Is the number of arctic ice islands a non-determinate factor?,Does the number of arctic ice islands change over time?
Did any one in 9 rapes have to be reported?,Is this information accurate?,Is this information representative of the number of rapes happening every year?,Has this information been taken from official sources?,Do more than one in nine rapes report?,Is the amount of rapes that happen every year accurately reported?
Has the dietary restriction on hydroxychloroquine for COVID-19 been changed?,Is the U.S. government recommending hydroxychloroquine for COVID-19?,Does the U.S. government have a policy against using hydroxychloroquine?,Is the dietary restriction on hydroxychloroquine for COVID-19 unchanged in 2021?
Did the National Childhood Vaccine Injury Act of 1986 restrict lawsuits against vaccine manufacturers?,Is there no law that requires lawsuits against vaccine manufacturers?,Is a lawsuit against a vaccine manufacturer a serious legal issue?,Is it illegal to sue a manufacturer if the vaccine has harmed someone?
Did the American economy experience a decline in infrastructure?,Has the economy experienced a major decline in infrastructure?,Did the United States lose its competitiveness in infrastructure?,Are a number of areas in the U.S. that could have improved upon a number one position in the global infrastructure?,Can the United States benefit economically from improving its infrastructure?
"Did the jubilee day of 2198 occur before, after or during the year 218?",Was there a 1 in 1000 chance of the jubilee day occurring on the 2198 date?,Did the jubilee day occur on an event that occurs once every thousand years?,Did the 2198 date on the 2198 day occur?
Did Biden take a picture of the deputy marshal checking on him before the address?,Was the deputy marshal part of a secret police operation?,"Was the deputy marshal wearing a yellow, purple, and gray uniform?",Are there any other noteworthy facts about this specific event?,Are there any other related events happening during this meeting?
Is it true that 3% of the world's health workers reside in sub-Saharan Africa?,Do there are any countries with a higher percentage of health workers?,Is it true that about 3% of the world's health workers are African?,Have any countries around the world produced health workers like that?
Did Anthony Fauci fund experiments with AIDS orphans?,Did AIDS orphans die?,Is Anthony Fauci associated with AIDS?,Has anyone died of an adverse health effect?,AIDS orphans died?,Are there any other relevant information about Anthony Fauci's experiments?,Do these projects provide an example of Fauci's research?
Did Madagascan President say WHO Offered Him A $20 Million Bribe?,Did Madagascan President Say WHO Offered Him A $20 Million Bribe?,Did Madagascan President say WHO Offered Him A $20 Million Bribe?,Did Madagascan President Say WHO Offered Him A $20 Million Bribe?
Did Biden do this work with H1N1?,Is there any evidence to back this claim?,Did Biden have any other role in the H1N1 flu outbreak?,Have any of Biden's health professionals subsequently worked on the H1N1 flu outbreak?,Does Biden appear to have been involved in the actual onset of H1N1?
Did Trump's ad specifically call on people to call an 800 number to take part in a survey?,Did Trump run any ads related to his wall besides his ad?,Did the ad call on people to call an 800 number to take part in a survey?,Did Trump's ad ask people to take part in a survey?
Did this light elude to the Prince's death?,Are this lights only at specific locations?,Did this light honor Prince during any other events?,Did this light use the purple color for Prince's departed wife?,Did this light honor Prince's wife?,Does this light in this area still exist today?
Did the train go into a crash on 12 June 2021?,Was the train travelling between Chhapra and Anand Vihar railway station?,Did the train travel through a closed station?,Did the train cause any injuries?,Is this a reported accident?,Did the train have a faulty diesel engine?
Did the Department of State release a statement on their website?,When did the Department of State release this statement?,"Did the statement reference Trump's term ending Jan. 11, 2021?",Is this a recent statement from the U.S. Department of State?,Does this confirm or deny that Trump's term ended Jan. 11-2021?
Is this statement true?,"Has more than 100,000 Polish troops entrusted the border since the african invasion?",Are these troops part of a larger Russian army?,Has the Ukrainian force ever pushed back from a border?,Does this action threaten or embolden the u.s.-brazilian military alliance?
Did Montagnier say this statement in response to an advertisement?,Is Montagnier claiming that this statement is true?,Is Montagnier's statement true?,Has Montagnier stated this before?,Do other studies have similar claim?,Pl Montagnier?,L0оу?
Did David DePape film the attack?,Did DePape make any attempts to film the attack?,Did the attacks occur on Jan. 6?,Did any of DePape's efforts result in a video in public?,Did DePape release any pictures of the attack?,Did DePape perform any other role during the attack?
Did ICE detain Lukasz Niec as a child?,Did Niec emigrate as a child?,Did Niec detain Niec?,Did Niec's deportation affect Niec's family or future?,Did Niec emigrate as a child?
Did Kenya's exams council not rank best-performing schools when releasing 2020 form 4 exam results?,Did Kenya's exams council have a good working relationship with the Ministry of Education?,Did Kenya's exams council have a good working relationship with all the schools where the scores were released?,Did the ranking system of the exams list only schools with a high score?,Did Kenya's exams council systematically rank school performance for all year grades in their form 4 exams?
"Did Modi provide the cash to all BJP leaders, ministers and officials?",Did these leaders give this amount to Modi in return for an exit from India?,Was any one of these leaders personally involved in granting this money?,Is this cash equivalent to about Rs 456 million?,"Did Modi directly provide this cash to BJP leaders, ministers or officials?"
Did more people illegally cross the U.S. border in 2020 compared to 2021?,Did more people illegally cross the border in 2020 compared to 2021?,Is there a difference between the number of people that illegally crossed the U.S. border in 2020 and the number that illegally crossed in 2021?
Did he enter the congress as one of the poorest men there in government?,Did the majority of congressman in this Congress pay for the salaries of all the lawmakers under him?,Did this group of congressmen have any members under them that were well under the poverty line?,Did this group of lawmakers have any members that were on the poor side of government under Obama?,Did this group of lawmakers have any members that did not pay any taxes under Obama?
Are DA nurses able to take part in their job?,Has the ANC left a 4% vacancy rate for nurses since 2013?,Is the DA reducing this vacancy rate?,Has the ANC left a 6% vacancy rate for nurses since 2013?,Did the ANC leave a 6% vacancy rate for nurses in 2013?
Is the estimated per capita income of Kenya increased by 92.1% from 2013 to 2021?,Has the estimated per capita income in Kenya changed from 2013 to 2021?,Has the estimated per capita income in Kenya changed significantly from 2013 to 2021?,Has the estimated per capita income in Kenya increased since 2013?
Is it true that New York state requires members of the public to obtain a stargazing permit for use in certain public parks as of January 2020?,Is it true that New York state requires members of the public to obtain a stargazing permit for use in certain public parks as of January 2020?,Is there a list of all public parks where public stargazing must occur?
Have all studies indicated that 8 percent of white voting-age citizens lack government-issued photo IDs?,Has any study indicated a higher percentage of African American voting-age citizens lack government-issued photo IDs?,Has any study indicated a higher percentage of Native American voting age citizens lack government-issued photo IDs?
Did Crist support Obama's stimulus?,Did Crist support ObamaCare?,Did Crist support ObamaCare in any way?,Was Crist related to ObamaCare or not in any way?,Was any other politician involved in the passage of ObamaCare?,Is it true that Crist supported ObamaCare?
"Did Texas gain 21,000 doctors due to tort reform?",Is this claim true?,Can an analysis of this claim help us to better understand the numbers?,Can this claim be validated?,Did any of these claims have a supporting supporting evidence?,Are there other claims that support this claim?,Did it happen due to other factors?
Did this scam occur?,Did the fraud have any effects on the government?,Was this fake scam successful?,Did the scam result in any losses?,Did this scam occur over the weekend?,Did this scam cause anyone to be robbed?,Have similar bogus scams occurred in the past?,Are these scams still widespread?
Did the 1995 plot involve jumbo jets over the Pacific Ocean?,Did the 1995 plot involve explosives?,Did the 1995 plot have a link to a Lubbock terror suspect?,Did the 1995 plot involve a single explosive device?,Did the 1995 plot have a direct link to the Lubbock terror suspect?
Did the New Mexico Secretary of State count more than 17 million registered voters in a state with a population of around 2 million?,Did all registered voters in the state are registered?,Has the population of the state increased in comparison to recent elections?,Has the population of the state shifted in comparison to recent elections?
Will landowners have to pay one per cent of income in rent to an Aboriginal council?,Will landowners have to pay one per cent of income in rent to an Aboriginal council?,Does the proposed amendment require landowners to pay 1 per cent of income in rent to Aboriginal councils?,Will the proposed amendment require landowners to pay 1 per cent of income in rent to Aboriginal councils?
Are a majority of immigrants able to obtain American citizenship only because of skill?,Does this mean a significant number of people pursuing American citizenship come based on labor and skill?,Is this accurate in general?,Did this article specifically address the issue of immigration based upon skill and labor?,Does this policy reflect a consensus within the United States?
Did Chinese government force the closure of the US consulate in Chengdu?,Was there a photo from this location?,Does this photo belong to this US consulate?,Is there any other US consulate locations?,Is there any other photo of this location?,Is this US consulate located in China?
Did Kagen promise jobs by voting for the $787 billion stimulus?,Did the stimulus lead to job losses?,"Did the stimulus cost the country another 77,000 jobs?",Did Kagen offer more jobs?,Does Kagen know how many jobs was lost from the stimulus?,Does Kagen support limiting the amount of stimulus spending?
"Did the DC Park Service say less than 12,000 people attended the ‘Million MAGA March’?",Did the DC Park Service say the crowd was smaller than that at the protest?,"Did the DC Park Service say less than 12,000 people attended the “Million MAGA March”?",Are any other people in DC known to have attended the march?
Did the vehicles transported bodies to an over-subscribed crematorium?,Was the crematorium over full?,Are bodies not scheduled to be transported to the crematorium?,Does this Crematorium have a large amount of over-subscribed burials per year?,Did the soldiers transport the bodies to the crematorium?
Do all 18 federal food assistance programs have positive health and nutrition outcomes?,Are all 18 federal food assistance programs effective in addressing health and nutrition needs?,Do 2% of Federal food assistance programs have significant effectiveness?,Do 9% of Federal food assistance programs result in no outcome?,Does 70% of Federal food assistance programs result in no outcome?
"Would Romney, Perry, and Gingrich cut foreign aid to Israel to zero?","Would Gingrich, Romney, and Perry cut foreign aid to other countries?","Do all of these candidates equate ""zero"" aid cuts to Israel?",Are all of these candidates also against zero aid cuts to Israel?,Does every country receive foreign aid to zero?
Does WhatsApp still work on devices with older software?,Will older software continue to work on phones?,Will existing hardware with outdated software still be supported by WhatsApp?,Will older software continue to be supported by WhatsApp?,- What does a modern smartphone look like?,- Does Snapchat still work with Android phones?,- What about iPhones?
Did they say there's $4 billion in private investment along the streetcar?,Did the estimated project cost 4 billion?,Did the estimated project cost 4 billion?,Did the estimates include infrastructure costs?,Did the estimated project cost $4 billion?,Did the estimated project cost 3 billion?,Did the estimated project cost 4 billion?
"Did Steve Reevis of Fargo, Dances With Wolves die?",Was Reevis an acclaimed actor and have any other notable acting credits?,Were his performances as an actor in Fargo memorable?,Did Reevis have any other memorable roles in his career?,Was Reevis a good actor or just great?,Was this his last performance?
"Did the study state that Wisconsin's coronavirus cases will peak on April 26, 2020?",Will the case peak be in other states?,Is the country experiencing any other occurrences of coronavirus cases?,Is the United States preparing to have all states infected?,Are deaths from the coronavirus likely to peak in other countries?
Did banks waive off loans amounting to 68 thousand crores of 50 wilful defaulters including fugitive Nirav and Mehul?,Did banks waive off loans amounting to 68 thousand crores of 50 wilful defaulters including fugitive Nirav and Mehul?,Was this news clip about the fugitive's robbery?
"Did 30,000 individuals arrested a year for crimes that were 16 or 17 result in a criminal conviction?",Did only a few percent of individuals arrested a year for crimes that were 16 or 17 result in a criminal conviction?,Did only a few percent of individuals arrested a year for crimes that were 16 or 17 result in a criminal conviction?
Did this man stabbing his friend 63 times for making them lose a Fortnite match?,Did the man have a friend of his?,Did this man have a friend of his at this time?,Did this man have any criminal record?,Did this person do this on a regulated level?,Did this man have a criminal record?
Is it illegal for non-federally licensed gun dealers to not provide a background check?,Can a background check on a person who is a non-federally licensed gun dealer be required under Virginia law?,Can a background check on a person who is not a federally licensed gun dealer be required under Virginia law?,Are background checks not required for non-federally licensed gun dealers in Virginia?
Is the COVID-19 cases escalating in texas due to public holidays?,Is this due to the fact that the school & colleges in texas will be closed from 01 March – 07 May 2021?,Is this due to the increased number of COVID-19 cases?
Do train station in Kolkata have a lot of passengers in November?,Are train station in Kolkata very crowded?,Does it have a lot of trains in the city?,Can you tell if this train station is busy on the day of the test?,Are there any riot police near train station?,Can you tell if this train station is busy?
Did an MH370 crash landing cause an MH370 to go missing?,Did MH370 have a human skeleton found in the ocean?,Did MH370 disappear from radar on 9/11?,Are there human skeletons found at the airport?,Have there been any other wreckages found on airplanes?
Did the deaths of 6 doctors in Canada occur within two weeks of receiving the vaccine?,Has the vaccine contributed to any other deaths?,Are there any other sources of deaths besides the four doctors listed in the article?,Was it the doctor who died that was covered by this news?,Was it the doctor that died that did not appear on this news?,Is the vaccine responsible for this?
Did Republicans place filibusters on every piece of legislation in the past five years?,Did the filibusters impact every nominee from the GOP?,Did Republicans place filibusters on every individual bill in the past 5 years?,Did Republicans place filibusters on every single nominee in the past five years?,Did Republicans place filibusters on every individual bill in the last 5 years?
"Did Mundine say saying ""No"" to a voice would be to our eternal shame?","Did Mundine say ""Saying No to a voice will be to our eternal shame"" in the early 2023?",Is Mundine a member of Australian politics?,Did Mundine attend the 2017 National Party convention in Canberra?
Did the ad show the Covid-19 pandemic?,Does this video contain any mentions of the Covid-19 pandemic?,Did the ad mention the Covid-19 pandemic in the video?,Did the ad mention the Covid-19 pandemic in the video?
Did the White House send text messages in mid-March 2020 warning people of a mandatory quarantine?,Did the White House put out a text message on 5 March 2020 describing the quarantine?,Did the White House call out the quarantine?,Did the text message mention quarantine?,Was the text message in mid-March 2020 for all U.S. citizens?,Did the text message specifically mention the quarantine?
Has Florida's manatee population increased since the year 2021?,Have more manatees died in the first six months of 2021 than in any other year in record?,Has Florida had a higher-than-average number of manatee deaths in the first half of 2021?
Did this study conclude natural blondes are unlikely to be extinct within 200 years?,Is this study consistent with the conclusion of Natural Blondes being extinct within 200 years?,Is there any evidence to indicate the lack of natural blondes in the future?,Were the results of this study published in the media?
Is there evidence of state coverage in 2013 of education?,Is there evidence of state coverage of education in 2002?,Is the percentage of education coverage in 2013 less than in 2002?,Do all states have educational costs that are covered?,Is the percentage of education coverage in 2013 the same for all states?
Did the City of Portland pay over $6.2 million to its public relations representatives?,Were these representatives paid by tax payers?,Did the City of Portland increase its public relations efforts over the years?,Did the City of Portland pay this public relations effort for the previous years?,Page 4 - Public Relations in Portland?
Did Biden inherited an inflation rate of 1.7%?,Did Biden raise the inflation rate beyond the presumptive inflation rate of 8%?,Did Biden reelect Hillary Clinton as president?,Did Biden increase the inflation rate beyond the presumptive inflation rate of 8%?,Did Biden raise the inflation rate beyond the presumptive inflation rate of 8%?
Did Detroit Zoo start vaccination against COVID-19 in late August 2021?,Is the Detroit Zoo only vaccinating animals against COVID-19?,Is it possible that COVID-19 circulating in the Detroit Zoo is spread from human-to-human transmission?,Did the Detroit Zoo start vaccination against COVID-19 in late August 2021?
Is this man able to fit 9 pairs of shoes in his rectum when he crosses the US border?,Does this man have any tummy issues?,Does this man have a criminal record?,Did this man have criminal record before?,Was this man originally from Canada?,Did this man have legal status in America?
Did Pete Buttigieg cite Grenell as the first openly LGBT Cabinet member?,Did Grenell consider Pete Buttigieg as the first openly LGBT Cabinet member?,Is the word LGBT used by Pete Buttigieg to describe Grenell?,Is Grenell a gay person or an out and out LGBT person?
Is Gov. Scott responsible for job losses in Florida?,Is Gov. Scott the governor responsible for job losses?,Did Gov. Scott spend most of his money on a campaign to reelect Rick Scott in Florida?,Is Gov. Scott also in charge of other jobs in Florida?,Is Gov. Scott the Governor of Florida?
Can anyone under the age of 50 be banned from getting COVID-19 vaccines?,Do British people have to be at least 50 years old to get COVID-19 vaccines?,Do COVID-19 vaccines prevent illness?,Is there no ban on COVID-19 vaccines under 50?
Is this the only deal Trump has arranged with Carrier to keep jobs in the US?,Does Trump have a history of dealing with large corporations?,Does Trump work with big corporations?,Is Trump the only person who has worked with big corporations?,Is Trump a successful business leader?,Are Trump's efforts to keep jobs in the US successful?,Is Trump's deal with Carrier a success?
Did Trump mention trump at the debate?,Did Trump mention trump at the debate?,Was Trump at the debate?,Did Democrats mention trump at the debate?,Are the 2020 presidential debates televised?,Did trump mention trump at the 2020 presidential debate?,Did Democratic mention trump in 2020?
Did retailers like Spirit Halloween sell Karen wigs and T-shirts?,Did retailers like Amazon sell Karen wigs and T-shirts in early October?,Did retailers like Spirit Halloween sell Karen wigs and T-shirts in early October 2021?,"Did retailers like Amazon sell ""Karen wigs"" and ""Karen T-shirts"" in early October 2021?"
Did Clinton write to Brazile in October?,Does Brazile know Clinton is a bastard?,Did Clinton email Brazile in Oct. 2017?,Did Hillary Clinton send Brazile a letter?,Have all of the people Trump has targeted ever won elections in?,Does Trump have ties to Hillary Clinton?
Do hydrogels play a role in COVID-19 vaccines?,Do hydrogels connect people to the Internet?,Are bio-devices made of hydrogels?,Have hydrogels been designed to connect people to the internet?,"if so, what are the potential consequences?",was there evidence of COVID-19 vaccines in other forms?
Does President Biden's climate plan include cutting 90% of red meat from Americans' diets by 2030?,Does the percentage reduction for red meat include the reduced consumption in total?,Has the portion reduction of red meat come under scrutiny in a major report?,Is the percentage reduction for red meat included in a major report?
Is California No. 1 in the country in having fully vaccinated teens?,Are 5-11 year olds in California No. 2 in the country in having fully vaccinated?,Did California Rank Highest In Overall Vaccination for all age groups?,Has the number of teenagers who were fully vaccinated decreased from a peak of 72% to a low of 88%?,Is California No. 1 in the country in having fully vaccinated five year olds?
Did this man take down the Indian flag in a year 2020?,Was this person in West Bengal?,Did this person have a prior incriminating photograph of an Indian flag?,Did this person have a previous incriminating photograph of an Indian flag?,Did this person have a prior incriminating photograph of an Indian flag?
Did the Department of Labor survey indicate Wall Street fees cost a worker 17% of the value of the plan over the span of their career?,Did the Department of Labor study estimate that Wall Street fees cost a worker 28 percent of the value of the plan over the span of their career?,Did the Department of Labor survey indicate that Wall Street fees cost a worker 28% of the value of the plan over the span of their career?
Did Robert Aaron Long's parents help law enforcement apprehend him?,Was the Atlanta area near the Atlanta massage parlors the scene of multiple murders?,Is the massacre a mass murder?,Did many people die in the massacre?,Are there any other deaths of victims?,Were there any witnesses?
Is there evidence that Trump is waging a trade war against WI farmers?,Is there any evidence proving these claims?,Has the Trump administration been pursuing this policy for a long time?,Do I believe Trump is waging a trade war against WI farmers or do these farms close?
Have all Australians been inoculated by the end of 2021?,Will all Australians be sent to 'isolation camps'?,Is there any evidence that Australia will not be inoculated by the end of 2021?,Do all Australians have access to health resources to provide coverage for inoculation?
Did he invest money in a new trading platform?,Did he pay off his credit card debts?,Did Nilekani invest any money in a startup that was developed by a foreign man?,Is Nilekani a well known business man?,Has he invested money in technology?
Did Ribble say the stimulus bill failed to jumpstart the economy?,"Did Ribble's roofing company make $300,000 off the stimulus?",Did Ribble make money after referring to the stimulus bill?,Was the stimulus bill a success?,Will Ribble be able to return to the Senate next year?
Did Glenn Hegar claim he was proud of the cuts in public school funding?,Did Glenn Hegar express pride in the cuts in public school funding?,Did Glenn Hegar have a very significant role in legislating the cuts in public school funding?,Does Glenn Hegar still work as an activist?
Does the federal government have a budget to reduce these expenditures?,Was the study involving the Japanese quail designed to explore the connection between cocaine and risky sex habits?,Has the federal government cut back on the study?,Have the federal government cut back on funding for any other projects?,Has the federal government reduced its budget for the study?
Is it legal to purchase a bus ticket by doing 20 squats?,Is it possible to get a bus ticket in Romania by doing 20 squats?,Are buses in Romania cheap?,Is there a bus company in Romania whose bus tickets are affordable?,Does this company offer a money back guarantee?
Have America spent more money on the military than 12 other nations combined?,Is a large portion of that money spent for the military?,Does this large portion of military spending merely reflect the need to defend our nation?,Are all of the military personnel employed in the United States?,Has the military spent money on its operations in response to the need for retaliation from countries that would be hurt by its actions?
Are 70% Americans lying in their stories?,Do 40% of Americans believe mainstream media?,Is 30% of Americans lying in their stories?,Do 35% of Americans believe that Biden won?,Is 80% of Americans lying in their stories?,Is 70% of Americans lying in their stories?,Are 70% of Americans lying in their stories?
Is there any evidence that vampire bats distancing from other bats in their roost is social behavior?,Did this research include all species of vampire bats?,Was this study published in 2020?,Is there any evidence that vampire bats use social distancing behaviors to escape their roost?
Did a judge in Florida require golfer Tiger Woods to undergo 137 paternity testing?,Did Woods's paternity status remain unknown after the order was issued?,Did any of the paternity tests result in an actual paternity link?,Is there any evidence to support a link between the paternity test and Tiger's mother?
Is the Congressional Budget Office saying we save $250 million over the first 10 years?,Were there $1.2 trillion in health care savings over the next 10 years?,Is there evidence of the Congressional Budget Office saying we save $250 million over the first 10 years?,Were there $250 million in health care savings over the first 10 years?,Is there evidence that the Congressional Budget Office was correct in saying we save $250 million over the first 10 years?
Is Netanyahu's main challenger conceding defeat in April 2019?,Are Netanyahu's opponents in Israeli elections running the same campaign a year before?,Is Netanyahu a good candidate to run for re-election?,Is a similar campaign to other parties coming up for re-election?
Are 67% of COVID deaths caused by the vaccinated?,Are 67% of COVID deaths caused by the virus?,Do 67% of deaths in COVID related to vaccines result from COVID?,Do 77% of COVID deaths in COVID related to vaccines result from COVID?
Was the artificial woman named Hoori in the video?,Can the artificial woman function for 72 hours after being charged?,Was the artificial woman produced in China?,Is the artificial woman's name a part of the Chinese language?,Is the artificial woman in the video modeled after a female model?
Did over $115 million of US weapons go downrange in the first 24 to 36 hours of the operation in Libya?,Did Americans use more than $1 million of ammunition downrange in the first 24 to 36 hours of the operation in Libya?,Were the Americans allowed to deploy more than $1 million of ammo downrange in the first 24 to 36 hours of the operation in Libya?
Did the Coast Guard sell cocaine?,Was the Coast Guard responsible for the sale of cocaine?,Did the Coast Guard sell cocaine during the shutdown?,Did the Coast Guard sell cocaine under a different name?,Was the Coast Guard responsible for the sale of cocaine during a government shutdown?,Did the Coast Guard have more cocaine at the time of the government shutdown?
Did Craig say that the percentage of voting loss is 1 vote every 13 minutes?,Did Craig say there are 13 minutes in a hour?,Did Craig say that the percentage of voting loss is 7%?,Does Craig believe that the percentage of voting loss is below the national average?
Did the figure for Americans in this number come from sources that weren’t necessarily reliable?,Are there thousands of veterans sleeping out on the streets today?,Is this information based on historical data?,Did this figure represent only one number of Americans living on the streets today?,Is this the third largest number of Americans in the U.S.?
Did Border Guards found 52 tons of guns and ammunition in 14 Conex containers disguised as furniture?,Did the guns and ammunition come from Muslims immigrant?,Were any of the Conex containers also used as furniture?,Do any of the Conex containers contain weapons of any kind?
Did McAllen say immigration should be shot at the border with Mexico?,Did McAllen say immigration should be shot at the border with Mexico?,Did McAllen think immigrants entering the United States should be shot at the border with Mexico?,Were McAllen's remarks about immigrants to the United States accurate?
Did Trump pay any tax?,Did Trump pay any taxes as of 2017?,Have any of his tax returns been public record?,Have any of his returns been fabricated?,Is this information true?,Has Trump received any money from his tax auditors?,Has Trump paid any taxes as of 2019?,Are there any other taxpayers who may be affected by this taxation?
Did Do-Dodonpa have a closed pending investigation?,Did four people report any alleged injuries?,Was the roller coaster's closure pending investigation?,Did Do-Dodonpa have a public restroom?,Was Do-Dodonpa at a theme park located in Japan?
Did 25 students make bombs at Allahabad University?,Was any other group involved with the bomb making?,Did any of the arrested students have criminal status?,Was any other group involved in the making of the bomb?,Has any official official been arrested for making bombs?,Did any students of Allahabad University have criminal status or had criminal status before the bomb making?
Was the crew illegally fishing or were they under arrest?,Did the Philippines Coast Guard arrest the Chinese crew?,Was the crew part of the illegal fishing in Tawi Tawi?,Is it true that the Philippines Coast Guard nabbed a Chinese crew illegally fishing in Tawi Tawi in July 2023?
Did 74 percent of Rhode Islanders support a national popular vote?,Did 74% of Rhode Islanders endorse a national popular vote?,Did 74 percent of Rhode Islanders believe in one person one vote?,Approximately how many people in Rhode Island support a national popular vote?,Have any people in Rhode Island rejected the one person one vote idea?
Does the U.S. have the most legal immigrants per year?,Is a million people in the U.S. legal?,Does any other country come close to this figure?,Is there a significant increase in illegal immigration?,Can the U.S. successfully discourage illegal immigration?,Is there an estimated amount of illegal immigration in the U.S.?
Did Arijit sing the song 'Rang De Tu Mohe Gerua' at KIFF 2022 as per Mamata Banerjee's request?,Did Arijit sing the song during the festival?,Are the lyrics from the song 'Rang De Tu Mohe Gerua' from KIFF 2022?
Has Obama written more bills than Clinton in more years?,Have Barack Obama’s bills reached more states in three years than Hillary Clinton?,Have Barack Obama and Hillary Clinton both made fewer bills in more years?,Have Barack Obama and Hillary Clinton both written and co-sponsored bills more times in more years?,Do Barack Obama and Hillary Clinton have more bills in three years than Hillary Clinton?
Is Ohio expected to pay up to 41% more for their insurance premiums when Obamacare takes effect?,Can you provide more information about these cost increases?,Is it likely to increase Obamacare’s overall coverage as a whole?,Does Ohio already receive subsidies for health care?,Does the federal government reimburse these costs to the Ohio health system?,Can Ohioans afford additional costs in the future?,Can the federal government reimburse Ohio residents to cover health care costs for 2014?
Did Brown's vote in support of Obama's health care bill impact small businesses in Ohio?,Did Sherrod Brown's vote in support of Obama's health care bill impact Ohio's small businesses?,Did Sherrod Brown have any connections to Ohio's small businesses?,Does this health care bill affect small businesses in Ohio?
Did Scott accuse the Columbia/HCA Hospital chain's executives of misconduct in a campaign?,Are the three executives indicted?,Has the chain been investigated for misconduct?,Has Scott attacked the Columbia/HCA Hospital chain's executives before?,Was the Columbia/HCA Hospital chain involved in any criminal activity?
Did one or two drinks a day help prevent stroke?,Is one drink a day thought to reduce stroke risk?,Are drinks a day and one or two drinks a day found to increase stroke risk?,Are other causes associated with stroke that should be explored before drinking a single beverage a day?
Did Santos vote in favor of McCarthy for Speaker?,Did Santos vote for McCarthy in January of the year 2023?,Did Santos vote for McCarthy before McCarthy was speaker?,Did Santos vote for McCarthy during McCarthy's presidency?,Was this vote on the White Power symbol?,Would this vote have violated the US Constitution?
Did KFC send out this offer to any Facebook users before July 20?,Was this offer exclusive to Facebook users?,Was this offer limited to one post per customer?,Did the offer begin as early as July 20?,Did KFC offer a separate promotion for sharing a Facebook post?,Was KFC offering vouchers to any specific Facebook users?,Did KFC do an additional promotion for sharing Facebook posts?
Did this photo show the electrical storm?,Did the storm occur in the area surrounding Lennox Head in 2016?,Did the weather occur during the period of time pictured?,Did the electrical storm occur while the storm was erupting?,Did this storm occur at the same time as the previous one?,Did this storm occur at the same time as the previous one?
"Was Johnson also author of the following statement: There is a risk that leaving the EU will be globally interpreted as a narrow, xenophobic and backward-looking thing to do?",Are other US/China trade agreements better placed for the EU than the UK?,Is the EU not better placed to strike trade deals with the US or China than the UK on its own?
Has the CDC removed the name of the C-virus pandemic and replaced it with the C-virus outbreak?,"Is the CDC replacing the term ""Covid-19 pandemic"" on their website?",Was the C-virus pandemic considered to be a non-pandemic?,Did the CDC delete the term C-virus pandemic on their website?,"Did the CDC remove the term ""Covid-19 pandemic"" on their website?"
Did a viral photo show a Himalayan flower that blooms once in 400 years?,Is the Himalayan flower species known to only bloom once in 400 years?,Did the flower's bloom in 400 years take place in a particular location?,Did the flower bloom in 400 years before the photo was taken?
"Have nearly 5,000 farms been transferred to black people?","Did these farms benefit over 200,000 families in South Africa?",Did farms benefit black people in Africa?,Have there been any other disadvantaged Africans affected by these farms?,Have these farms been built in the Southern States?,Are farms in this Southern Africa region often built on old land?
Did any mobile service provider initiate charge-for-emojis in February 2016?,Did any other mobile service provider make charge-for-emojis in February 2016?,Was any other user charged for emojis in February 2016?,Is there any evidence for this argument?,Does anyone know if there is any ongoing research from Verizon regarding the introduction of charge-for-emojis?
"Was a Philadelphia Mob boss hired to produce 400,000 ballots for Joe Biden?",Was the voter identification information collected at the polls during this process?,Was the voter identification information collected prior to the election?,Was the voter identification information provided at the polls during this process?,Did the voter identification information collected at the polls during this process?
"Did Ocasio-Cortez receive a ""$10 million payout"" from Netflix?",Was Ocasio-Cortez paid from Netflix?,"Did Ocasio-Cortez receive a ""$10 million payout from Netflix""?","Did Ocasio-Cortez receive a ""$10 million payout from Netflix"" in 2016?"
Did the study include all people who are released from prison?,Was there a significant difference in mortality from drug overdoses among those who are released from prison compared to those released from prison?,Did individuals released from prison die of a drug overdose during the first two weeks after release?,Did the study include all individuals released from incarceration?
"Has the media reported on the housing project in Deparo, Caloocan?",Has the media covered this project?,Has Marcos’s alleged housing project been hacked down on?,Does Marcos claim he was attacked over housing projects in his town?,Have media reported about this project?,Are there any recent reports of the housing project?
Did this train travel from Osaka to Tokyo?,Did the train have seats for the passengers?,"Was the train driven by people, not machines?",Was this train faster than any other train?,Did the train run for 10 minutes?,Did the train have seats?,Did this train speed up?,Will the train travel faster than a plane?
Did this obese mother have to starve all of her children?,Are there any other types of diets where only enough food is used?,Did the obese mother starve the children or even feed them on a regular basis?,Did this obese mother have a family member with type 2 diabetes?,Did the obese woman live at a high rate?
Will ocean rise this a single eighth of an inch in the next 200 to 300 years?,Is ocean warming a natural occurrence?,Are the projections for the ocean increase in the next 200 to 300 years accurate?,Are the projections based on facts?,Are the projections based on predictions in general?
Was this injection studied in any phase 3 trials?,Did these trials use only 1 dose of the injection?,Was there any information in this publication to indicate that this was an experimental injection?,Did this injection have other ingredients?,Are there other injections out there with this same chemical content?,Are these injections considered 'experimental'?
Did the law pass while everyone was distracted?,Did the coronavirus pandemic have a coronavirus-related virus?,Do there seem to be a certain number of symptoms associated with 5G exposure?,Does this report include a link to a 5G bill?,Are these 20 symptoms listed on this report?,Did any of these symptoms occur before the coronavirus pandemic?,Are there any other symptoms listed on this report?,Is there any evidence to suggest there was a significant correlation between 5G and coronavirus-related illnesses?,Do any of these symptoms exist as?
Has this change happened over the course of time?,Does this increase account for a reduction in the number of pages in this bill?,Are the pages in this bill greater than the resulting conforming bills?,Does this amount represent a more accurate estimation of the overall growth in this bill over time?,Will this increase be seen over the entire time period?
Does the photo depict a state based ban on firecrackers?,Is the photo used to promote a political cause?,Is the photo used in a campaign for the police to ban firecrackers?,Is the image used in support of a political cause?,Are police prosecuting for this act?,Is a photo of Ashok Gehlot in public view?
Did the photo show soldiers killed at the LoC?,Did the photo show all 30 of the dead soldiers?,Did the photo show all of the dead soldiers at the LoC?,Do any of these soldiers have graves in this photo?,Did any of the dead soldiers have coffins?,Did the photo show a specific date?
Does watching Peppa Pig per day increase the risk of autism by 56 percent?,Are children who watch 30 minutes of Peppa Pig per day more likely to develop autism?,Is autism associated with children who watch 30 minutes of Peppa Pig per day?,Are children who watch 30 minutes of Peppa Pig per day more likely to develop autism?
Did Trump compare his mouth to Elton John’s organ during a 2018 rally?,Did Trump compare his brain to Elton John’s organ?,Is Trump’s mouth a organ?,Are Trump’s words in general similar to John’s?,Are Trump’s words in general similar to John’s?
Did the City of Providence make any progress towards achieving a 10 percent goal for women and minority businesses?,Did a small percentage of contracts go to women and minority businesses in general?,Did most of the contracts go to women and minority businesses?,Are women disproportionately represented in the City of Providence?,Will Providence need to increase its representation in this region?
Did Google attempt to hide this payment?,"Have more than 1,000 vaccinations been vaccinated this year?",Does this increase cover the costs of vaccines?,Does Google support this increase?,Would this increase be seen by a large portion of the population?,Do we know when the new money will come out?
"Did West Virginia University release a study that showed 20,000 jobs will be created in clean energy in West Virginia?",Was the study made by West Virginia University or other private or public research institute?,"Did the study show that 20,000 jobs could be created in clean energy in West Virginia if Biden’s agenda is passed?"
Did they recieve bail at midnight?,Did the person's kin reach home by a vehicle?,Was the person's home address not specified in the tweet?,Did the person's kin receive bail?,Does the tweet mention any other Muslim's kin?,Did the person's kin reach home by a vehicle?
Does this new regulation require motorcycle owners to install a 75 MPH governor by January 2017?,Is the change effective in all states?,Is the regulation required by California?,Is the proposed rule in all states?,Is the regulation effective in all states?,Is any state in this regulatory move in effect in California?,Is the proposed rule relevant to all states?
Was there more illegal immigrants in the country five years ago?,Was immigration policy at this time different?,Was the number of illegal immigrants higher in the country five years ago?,Is it likely that this policy was more lenient in the early 90's?,Is the number of illegal immigrants higher in the county today?,Is there any evidence that the population has decreased since 1990?
Has the U.S. Dollar lost 98% of purchasing power since the Fed was created?,Has the U.S. Dollar lost 98% of its purchasing power since the Fed was created?,Is the rate of decline in the U.S. Dollar the same as that of the European currency?,Is the rate of decline in the U.S. Dollar the same as that of the European currency?
Have AIDS-associated diseases and cancers increased by 338x since the COVID-19 vaccine rollout?,Has AIDS-associated diseases and cancers increased due to the COVID-19 vaccines?,Do many countries use CDC and foreign government body data?,Does the CDC have an uncontrolled database of COVID-19 vaccine data?
Does this data indicate women earn 77 cents for every dollar earned by a man?,Is this data from 2015?,Does the data reveal a gender pay disparity between Ohio females and males?,Do racial and ethnic groups differ from women and men?,Is the gender pay disparity per dollars men and women earn?
Will the BJP lose all states by 2024?,Did Kishor state this?,Is Kishor currently the Prime Minister?,Did Kishor give an estimate for the state losses before 2024?,Did Kishor predict these losses?,Did Kishor claim these losses are a result of the BJP being unpopular?,Did Kishor speak to the political elite about these states?
"Did Dr. Bowser say that """"Dhimmitude"""" is on page 107 of the health care law and means Muslims are specifically exempt from the government mandate to purchase insurance?","Did Dr. Bowser say that the word """"Dhimmitude"""" is on page 107 of the health care law and means Muslims are specifically exempt from the government mandate to purchase insurance?"
Do these agencies share information that has come out of President Trump's cell phone?,Do these agencies believe that this information is related to the president's erratic behavior?,Was there a leak from Trump's cell phone?,Did the leak take place during a presidential era?,Did this type of leak affect the president?
Is Pence the one who approved the Twenty-Fiveth Amendment to remove President Trump from office?,Will the Twenty-Fiveth Amendment make it illegal to take executive action against Trump?,Is it safe to take executive action against Trump?,Is there an alternative to take executive action against Trump?
Does the blue economy have a direct and indirect impact?,Does this study identify specific people with the blue economy?,Does this report support the notion of blue jobs creating a population?,Have this economic projects helped several people in a specific way?,Is there any additional data to confirm this claim?,Are these estimates based on a small sample?
Is California the sixth largest economy in the world?,Are California's poverty rates the highest in the nation?,Does California have one of the highest poverty rates in the country?,Is California the sixth largest economy in the world?,- California has one of the highest poverty rates in the nation! Do California's poverty rates rank among the highest in the country?
Was this person accused of stealing bread and cheese?,Did this person steal them and report them?,Has this person been arrested for stealing anything else?,Has any other entities taken action to protect this individual?,Is this person under 15 years old?,Has this person ever been charged with a crime?,Did this person violate the store's security policy?
Would the new reform bill eliminate peoples ability to obtain a 15 - and 30- year mortgage?,Would the reform bill also eliminate peoples ability to get mortgages with a lower interest rate?,Is it possible to get a mortgage in an age other than 30 - year terms?,Could this reform bill be used as a tool to increase homeowners access to mortgages?
Did people have the same objections towards snickers bars that the penis analog is used for?,Is the vein still used for snickers bars after 2022?,Does the penis analog for snickers bars relate to snickers bars in a logical way?,Is there evidence the penis analog is still used in Snickers bars?
Have Indians made a 50 per cent increase in their money deposits in Swiss banks in the past year?,Have any Indians been unable to deposit money with Swiss banks in the past year?,Has the currency that Indians deposit money in Swiss banks increased in the last year?,Does the increase in the amount deposited in Swiss banks increase over the years?
Was over R670 million worth of clean drinking water lost within three months due to leaks and burst pipes?,Did a water survey be conducted before the study was released?,Was Mangaung a ANC-run municipality?,Did leaks and burst pipes cost more than R670 million?
Did this babysitter tie the baby to the ceiling fan for 26 hours?,Did this babysitter know the baby was crying when they tied it to the ceiling fan?,Did the babysitter ever wake up and notice the baby was crying?,Is this a criminal offense?,Is this a serious crime?
Did this video show goods being discarded after the Muslim boycott of France in October 2020?,Did this video show goods being discarded in this fashion?,Has this video been distributed in this format before?,Is this video in the public domain?,Has this video been repurposed?,Is this video available for download in this format?
Does the video exist or does the video exist after 2014?,Was China's First Lady's daughter in attendance?,Did this video go viral?,Did this video receive critical acclaim for its content?,Did the video have a significant impact on the Chinese economy?,Are the results of this video public knowledge?,Is this video public knowledge or were these video excerpts released prior to this video?,Is this video associated with any type of political activity?
Was this a fake story?,Did this fake story originate from the event?,Did this fake story end in an accidental death?,Was this fake story in the aftermath of a natural disaster in Ukraine?,"Against the peoples' rights of all peoples throughout the world to protest, a large number of peoples refused to speak out about this racial discrimination. Would this group be responsible for this racial discrimination?"
Does the Central Government have final say on the closing of schools in India?,Can the closure of schools in India be done after 2020?,Does the Central Government have final say on the closure of schools in India?,Does the Central Government have final say on closing schools in India?,Has the government already made specific decisions regarding the closure of schools in India?
Did video show evidence that the 2023 earthquake in Turkey-Syria was caused by HAARP?,Can someone confirm this claim?,Do other videos contain confirmation of this claim?,Are all videos similar?,- Has anyone else confirmed that this claim is true?,- Has this claim been proven?
Is the number of earmarks cut significantly?,Has the number of earmarks decreased in the past?,Is the number of earmarks cut in the past consistent?,Is the number of earmarks cut in the past consistent?,Is the reduction in earmarks consistent with the cuts that were made prior to 2016?
Does the average time someone has held a share of stock in the ’60s be eight years?,Do all shares held today carry a five year period?,Is the average time someone has held a share of stock in the ’60s four months?,Are all shares held today carry a five year period?
Did the genetic testing for 23andMe test more than 50 million people?,Will DNA testing result in the generation of 53 million people's DNA?,Will DNA testing make 53 million people's DNA in the genetic testing repository?,Are there 3 million people in the genetic testing repository currently?,Is it true that the genetic testing repository has 53 million people's DNA in it?
Did the N.J. Democrats fund the stimulus?,Is the stimulus a positive for the economy?,"Did the stimulus cost $278,000 per job?",Would the N.J. Democrats funding the stimulus be of value to the economy?,. Would the N.J. Democrats support such a measure?
"Was Rihanna wearing a ""satanic"" pentagram?","Was it a symbol representing the ""satanic"" side of satanic?",Was the symbol on the show on a black background?,"Did the Super Bowl LVII halftime show have a ""satanic"" portion?"
Did a protester dressed as Batman arrive at the US Capitol Hill alongside Donald Trump supporters who stormed the building?,Did a protester dressed as Batman arrive at the US Capitol Hill while Donald Trump supporters stormed the building?,Did the protester dress as Batman with Trump supporters who stormed the Capitol Hill?
Do immigrants successfully cross borders illegally?,Are there any studies on what the numbers are?,Is this average number accurate?,Are there any estimates of recurrence?,Is this number accurate?,"Do any statistics say the total number of people who enter the country illegally is less than 350,000 each year?"
Is it true that Nancy Pelosi had an affair with President John F Kennedy?,Was there any evidence that she lied about her involvement with Kennedy?,Has any evidence of this relationship in evidence?,Did Kennedy befriend Nancy Pelosi or others during the time he was a president?,Did Pelosi do anything wrong in her relationship with Kennedy?
Did we spend more than 3 percent of GDP on infrastructure projects in 1960?,Did the average cost of projects vary by location?,Does infrastructure spending increase or decrease based on location?,Have the changes in these projects changed more than the overall increase in infrastructure spending?,Has the cost of projects decreased since 1960?,Do the costs of these projects vary depending on which location one resides in?
Is it true that Congress has given up on Gujarat?,Is AAP and BJP in a two-way fight?,Is this statement true?,Was this report conducted by the AFP media agency?,Is AAP in a two-way fight with AAP?,Is there any link between the AAP and the Congress?
Was Raphael Warnock arrested during a demonstration at the U.S. Capitol in 2017?,Was Raphael Warnock arrested when he was arrested?,Did Raphael Warnock pray during the demonstration?,Did Raphael Warnock pray during the demonstration?
Did Doyle's eight years as governor bring more job creation than the three years since DeLay?,Was the jobs creation rate the same in DeLay's three years as governor?,Is the jobs creation rate the same in Doyle's eight years as governor?,Is the job creation rate the same in DeLay's three years as governor?
Are there over 4.6 million new private sector jobs created in 2013?,Has private sector job growth been strong in this period?,Did this increase in private sector jobs reflect a greater economic recovery?,Is there a high percentage of new jobs in this period?,Is this pattern similar to the previous period?
Is it true that both vaccinated and unvaccinated people have over 99% chance of surviving COVID-19?,Has it been proven that there is an actual chance of surviving COVID-19?,Is it true that both vaccinated and unvaccinated people have over 99% chance of surviving COVID-19?
Did the family see the photo?,Did the family seek shelter for the Australian bushfires?,Did the family make the shelter choice in advance of the Australian bushfires?,Was the family members still at home when they arrived?,Do any of the family members currently remain in place?,Do any family members who remain in place have any status?
Did this school district have a structural deficit prior to Arrested Development?,Did Arrested Development have more students than it currently has?,"Did Arrested Development actually have 70,000 more students before Arrested Development?",Was this district's current deficit before Arrested Development?,Did Arrested Development receive any cash from this district?
Did Swalwell propose launching nuclear weapons against gun-owners who refused to hand over semi-automatic rifles to the U.S. government?,Did Swalwell's suggestion involve launching nuclear weapons against gun-owners who refused to hand over semi-automatic rifles to the U.S. government?,Did Swalwell suggest launching nuclear weapons against gun-owners who refused to hand over semi-automatic rifles to the U.S. government?
Did French media outlets claim to have a fake article on 20 minutes about censoring Tetris?,Does the French media outlet report true censorship allegations about the game?,Was the article posted to online for free?,Have Ukrainians called on censorship of Tetris?,Has the game been banned by governments in other nations?
Was the job growth in the right-to-work states twice as high as those in non-right-to-work states?,Was the effect on job growth in the right-to-work states the same or increased in both right-to-work states and non-right-to-work states?
Is Trump aware that 13 Obama deep state operatives have been arrested for treason?,Did Trump order all 13 operatives to be arrested for treason?,Is Trump aware that 13 operatives have been arrested for treason?,"Are any of these ""Trump order"" announcements related to an investigation?"
Is there a contest to choose a slogan for Carnation Milk?,Was this slogan short and sweet?,Did this woman write this poem?,Was this poem well received?,"Did this woman win $1,000?","Will this woman win $1,000 again?",Is there an image from this poem?,"Does this woman win $1,000?"
Is the West Bengal government shutting down 125 RSS-affiliated schools?,Will this closure happen?,Does this closure affect all schools in the West Bengal state?,Has any of these schools received any legal threats?,Is this closure planned to affect all schools in the West Bengal state?,Is this closure planned to affect all schools in the West Bengal state?
Are all Americans in agreement that the Patriot Act had a positive effect on email and phone habits?,Is there any evidence that all Americans have changed email and phone habits due to the Patriot Act?,Does a majority of Americans say they switched email and phone habits because of the Patriot Act?,Are the majority of Americans saying they changed their email and phone habits because of the Patriot Act?,Does this estimate hold true in the majority of U.S. states?
Did West Linn have one of the highest per capita rates of home - based businesses in the United States?,Are there more home - based businesses in West Linn than any other city?,Are there any other cities that have higher home - based business rates?,Are any other cities that have higher home - based business rates?
Was less than 9 percent of all total spending spent on vaccines?,Does the Trump proposal guarantee that vaccines are always cost-effective?,Has the Trump plan been tested as a total effect?,Does the Trump proposal address the fact that vaccines are rarely utilized for this purpose?,Is the Trump proposal clear about the intent of the package?
Did the Democrats make that a partisan issue in Iran after the killing of more than 250 Americans in Lebanon?,Did Republicans make the killing of more than 250 Americans in Lebanon a partisan issue in Iran after the killing of more than 250 Americans in Lebanon?,Do any of these terrorists represent a partisan issue to the Democratic Party?,Have any of these terrorists been found on record after the killing of more than 250 Americans in Lebanon?,Have these terrorists been found by any of these legal institutions?,Has there ever been a record of a partisan issue in Iran?,Are there any other partisan issues?
Did a post on Facebook say an inquiry was set up to investigate fraud in the Myanmar election?,Are other social media posts about an inquiry saying a fraud investigation is underway?,Was the investigation based on a social media post?,Was the inquiry based on a Facebook post?,Has there been any controversy surrounding the investigation into fraud in Myanmar's 2020 election?
Did COVID-19 test was patented in 2015?,Did COVID-19 test detect disease by 2015?,Has COVID 19 test tested positive or negative for COVID-19?,Did COVID-19 test detect disease by 2015?,Does COVID-19 test detect disease by 2015?,Is COVID-19 disease officially discovered?
Did the people in those areas vote in the 2016 EU referendum and were affected by Mad Cow Disease in 1992?,Was that country at risk for developing the disease?,Did those places vote in the EU referendum?,Did the affected areas receive any assistance to cure Mad Cow Disease in 1992?,Did the affected areas receive funding for further research into Mad Cow Disease?
Could a $10 bottle deposit increase increase a case of water bottles by double the price in the store?,Did any bottles in the case increase?,Did the increase increase significantly for a case of water bottles?,Could increasing the price for a case of water bottles increase the price of the product?,Is the increase in the price of water bottles calculated to increase in tandem with increased bottle deposit?
Did 13 children die from the Covid-19 vaccine in South Africa?,Did video show children killed in a stampede in Kenya?,Did this cite mention whether the Covid-19 vaccine in South Africa was effective?,Do other sources cite evidence that the Covid-19 vaccine in South Africa was effective?,Did this cite any additional information regarding Covid-19 vaccine in South Africa?
Is Blueprint for Prosperity required to be signed into law?,Will the amount of tax relief be $2 billion?,Will the tax relief fund be fully utilized when the Blueprint is approved?,Will the Blueprint's tax relief fund have been fully utilized when the blueprint is signed into law?,Will the Blueprint's tax relief fund have been fully utilized as of the time of publication of the Blueprint?
Is demonitisation successful in its first attempt?,Are there any restrictions on indiscriminate demonitisation?,Will the demonitisation fail in its first attempt?,Will Modi resign his position in 50 days?,Does Modi have an opponent in the demonitisation fight?
Did the study include any gaps?,Was the study conducted on patients?,Did the study have gaps?,Did the research include significant differences in results?,Were any significant differences reported in any data?,Did ivermectin reduce the risk of COVID-19 death by 92%?,Were any differences in studies reported in ivermectin?
Did Biden say he lived in Section 8 housing as a little boy?,Does Biden support Section 8 housing?,Did Biden support Section 8 housing as a young boy?,Is Biden not likely to support Section 8 housing?,Do Biden support any other policies that would reduce Section 8 housing?
Does Kashmir have a cinema theatre after 1947?,Does the movie RRR have a history in Kashmir?,Is the movie RRR 'The First Movie To Be Played in Cinema Theatres in Kashmir after 1947'?,Has Kashmir had a cinema theatre after 1947?,Does this movie have history in Kashmir?
Do there any fuel taxes in this country?,Is a fuel tax the only significant income tax in this country?,Does this country tax itself on income?,Is a fuel tax on income one of the many taxes in this country?,Does this country tax itself on fuel income taxes?,Is there an income tax on fuel income?
Does Hammer have a super computer?,Does Hammer have a program that can be used to manipulate voter turnout?,Does Hammer contain software that can be used to manipulate election turnout?,Does Hammer have a large team?,Does Hammer plan to change electoral outcome?,Do Democrats plan to steal the election in 2020?
Do research report that over the period of the Brady Bill ban the use of assault weapons in crimes decreased by two thirds?,Are there other research reports on the Brady Bill ban?,Did any other research report that the use of assault weapons in crimes decreased by two thirds?,Did a second research report support the findings of the third research report?
Did the population grow by one thousand a day during the previous year?,What percentage of the total population were moving to Texas in the previous year?,Will Texas see 15 million more people over the next 25 years?,"Are those people moving to Texas from other states, such as other states?",Does the projected population increase for Texas due to its economic recovery exceed estimates for the entire state?
Did Horn owe back taxes in 2017?,Is Horn the chairwoman of the N.H. Republican Party?,Does Horn owe taxes in 2017?,Did Horn pay taxes in 2015?,Has Horn been accused of paying back taxes in 2016?,Is Horn a Republican Party representative?
Do all polls in UP vote for the BJP?,Is it true that all polls in UP vote for the BJP?,Were the polls for the BSP more or less rerun than the BJP?,Are the polls for the BJP less or more than the BJP?
"Did Polistina claim that he collected $70,000 in taxpayer financed salaries over several years?",Did Polistina claim that he was collecting an income from the government pension?,Was Polistina receiving a salary?,Did Polistina claim to have collected a salary?
Was this member of antifa?,Was this member of antifa identified by CNN?,Did this person dress like a Donald Trump supporter?,Did this person cause the Capitol riot?,"Was this person a ""proud antifa member""?","Was this person a ""true antifa member""?"
"Was the image shared on September 21, 2021, with the description, ""Ronaldo carrying yama buddha sketch""?",Was the image shared with a name that referred to Rondn dos Santos?,Did the picture have a subject that is known for being a person in the media?
Did the premium on average for a family plan stay the same in Obamacare reforms?,Did the cost of an average family plan increase in Obamacare reforms?,Did insurance premiums increase under Obamacare reforms?,Did any other reforms have health benefits like a family plan increase premiums?,Does Obamacare reform require a minimum number of people to purchase insurance?
Did this group in Gujarat jail time 122 men?,Do these Muslim men have criminal status?,Was the group arrested in Surat in 2001?,Did the men have a history of violent activity?,Did these people escape their conviction?,Did the group have a criminal record?,Did they acquit their arrest under UAPA?
Did Biden confirm his presidential intentions to be a 2020 presidential candidate?,Did Biden confirm this information to the public prior to the 2020 election?,Did Biden confirm Biden would be running for re-election?,Did Biden confirm that Biden would be running for re-election in 2020?
Did the corporate income tax account for 33 percent of all federal tax revenue in 1952?,Does corporate income tax bring in less than 9 percent today?,Have corporate income taxes grown?,Did corporate income taxes account for 33% of total federal tax revenue in 1952?,Do corporate income taxes contribute to 98 percent of federal tax revenue today?
Has Austin's water rate increased by 100% in the past decade?,Has Austin's water cost increased the most per capita in the state?,Have Austin's water costs increased the most per capita in Texas overall?,Have Austin's water rates increased by any other factor outside of inflation?,Have Austin's water rates increased by more than any other other factor?
Did the video show the launch of a checkered Russian rocket in 2018?,Has Russia ever tested an intercontinental missile?,Did the first Sarmat missile test occur in 2018?,Did the launch of the first Sarmat missile happen in 2018?,Did the Sarmat missile fail before the launch?,Would the launch of the first Sarmat missile occur in 2018?
Is it true that the CDC has classified monkeypox as airborne?,Does the airborne nature of monkeypox contribute to the health risks?,Did the BBC cite the report in a graphic?,Can anyone with 15 feet spread monkeypox?,Does the CDC recognize monkeypox as an airborne disease?
Will NYC property owners be fined $250k for using incorrect pronouns?,Will New York City property owners be fined for using incorrect pronouns due to new transgender laws?,Is NYC being fined $250k for improper pronouns?,Is NYC being fined $250k for incorrect pronouns?
Did Biden claim Sanders has 9 super PACs?,Was Biden in fact the same person in the debate?,Did Sanders have a higher number of super PACs versus Biden?,Did Biden claim that Sanders had a lower number of super PACs?,Did Biden claim Sanders was having an increase in super PACs in 2019 compared to 2018?
Did a number of baby wipes being recalled from stores in the U.S. pose a risk of serious infection?,Did the Baby Wipes recalls only occur in the United States?,Do all baby wipes in the U.S. have the same ingredient or a similar ingredient?
Did Aaj Tak report on Penirun capsule?,Is the Penirun capsule 100% natural?,Is the Penirun capsule used to treat Erectile Dysfunction?,Are these two causes of ED treated by Penirun capsule?,Was Penirun capsule used to treat ED?
"Did Hasner give wealthy tax breaks worth $250,000 a year?","Does Hasner raise middle class taxes by $2,000?",Did Hasner raise middle class taxes?,Does Hasner support a more universal tax system?,Does Hasner support a higher general income tax rate?,Does Hasner support raising middle class taxes?
Does this bill require vasectomy within one month of the 50th birthday?,Is this bill passed in the Alabama Legislature?,Is this bill effective immediately?,Is this bill currently on the agenda of the Alabama legislature?,Is this bill currently on the legislative bill list?,Does this bill exist in the Georgia legislature?
Is the percentage of adults in Rhode Island who are released from state prison within 1 year re-incarcerated?,Is the percentage of adults in Rhode Island who are released from state prison within 1 year re-incarcerated?,Were the percentages of adults released in Rhode Island greater than %2 of Rhode Island's population?
Did the video footage consist of 400 sadhus offering their bodies to the fire god before Kumbh Snan?,Did the video footage have the words Kumbh Snan mentioned?,Did the video footage include any religious or cultural symbols in addition to offering their bodies to the fire god?,Did the video footage feature any religious or cultural symbols that did not contribute to the celebration of the Kumbh Snan?
Does the country who launched the satellite receive a compensation from the satellite's owner?,Will the satellite's owner receive a compensation if it falls on their house?,Does the country that launched the satellite know the value of the satellite?,Did the satellite launch country pay a compensation to its homeowners?
Is it true that there are 4 justices who signed a declaration that Americans have no fundamental right to self defense?,Is there evidence that those justices endorsed a declaration that Americans have no fundamental right to self defense?,Do those justices believe that there are any fundamental rights to self defense in any country?
Was Major bit someone at the White House?,Was a dog sent to Delaware?,Did the Bidens have a dog?,Did the Bidens have a dog who bit someone in Delaware?,Was Major the first Biden dog to bite someone?,Was the Biden dog abused?,Did Major have negative repercussions for a dog bite?
Did Florida Governor Rick Scott get injured after Hurricane Irma?,Was Governor Rick Scott confined to a hospital?,Was Florida Governor Rick Scott re-injured?,Did Governor Rick Scott become incapacitated after Hurricane Irma?,Did Governor Rick Scott do all of the cleanup after Hurricane Irma?
Has Baldwin sponsored 105 bills?,Has Baldwin sponsored 3 bills?,", Has Baldwin sponsored 105 bills?",", Has Baldwin sponsored 3 bills?",", Has Baldwin sponsored any bills?",", Has Baldwin sponsored any bills?",", Has Baldwin sponsored any bills?",", Has Baldwin sponsored any bills?",",, Has Baldwin sponsored any bills?"
"Did Biden raise the taxes for families earning $75,000?","Did Biden raise the tax from 12% to 25% for families earning $75,000?","Is Biden willing to raise the tax from 12% to 25% for families earning $75,000?","Does Biden have an unbiased view about the tax increase for families earning $75,000?"
Did the 1969 moon landing a hoax?,Did the 1969 moon landing take place?,Was the astronaut wearing a suit walking on the moon?,Does anyone know that this was a hoax?,Can this man be identified from the photo?,Did anyone else in the photo claim the moon landing was a hoax?,Did anyone in the photograph assert the moon landing was a hoax?
Did more mail-in votes occur in Pennsylvania during the 2020 election than ballots requested?,Did Pennsylvania have a lower number of votes from mail-ins than polling locations?,Did Pennsylvania have a lower number of mail-in ballots requesting mail-in votes than polling locations?,Was Pennsylvania significantly more mail in compared to polling locations?
Did President Duterte's father take responsibility for the COVID response fund?,Did the COVID response fund come from the local government units?,Is there evidence to support Duterte's statement?,Can you provide context?,Was Duterte's father responsible for COVID?
Did Obamacare have a major failure based on the fact that Obamacare did not pass?,Did Obamacare help people who were struggling to afford care?,Did Obamacare cost $3 billion dollars in penalties in 2015?,Did some people pay a penalty for not purchasing health plans?,Would many Americans pay a penalty under Obamacare for not buying health plans?
Did this incident occur in Guwahati?,How many people died in this incident?,Was this incident reported to the local authorities?,Was this incident related to a riot?,Did this incident occur at a school?,Did this incident occur on a school's 4th floor?,Has this incident been investigated by local law enforcement officials?
Did the jailing of immigrants double in the last 15 years?,"Is it true that in the last 15 years roughly 70,000 people detained annually are jailed each year?","Is it true that the number of people jailed per year rose from 70000 to 400,000 in the last 15 years?"
Does the World Health Organization estimate that one in four Nigerians has a form of mental health illness?,Does this estimate include every one in four Nigerians with a mental health illness?,Has the WHO estimated this?,Is it true that every one in four Nigerians have a mental health illness?
"Is the average of 5,600 committing suicide per day?",Is this based on a single month or by a number?,Does this include more than 40 suicides by soldiers?,Are there other statistics surrounding suicides by soldiers?,Are there any other details not included in this analysis?,Was this data provided by CNN?
Did Indonesia sink 60 Chinese ships that were fishing in their territory?,Does Indonesia have a navy?,Was this incident against China?,Has the Indonesian government conducted this kind of activity before?,Are all of these vessels currently docked off Indonesia?,Was this incident against China?,Was this event caused by an attack by the Indonesian government?
Would a full inflating tires decrease oil consumption?,Does a full inflating tires reduce the number of cars on the road?,Is a full inflating tire the only way to reduce your oil consumption?,Does a full inflating tire increase the efficiency of the car you drive?
Was the state involved in any effort to advertise spending?,Is the state listed by this reporter as paying for a million signs?,Was any state involved in any other marketing campaigns?,Were any signs placed in any other media?,Did one state spend a million dollars to advertise spending on these projects?,Are these signs widely shared?
In August 2023 did the Walt Disney Company announce they were ending the Disney+ streaming service?,Is the Disney+ streaming service the only streaming service the Walt Disney Company is ending?,Is there an exact date that Disney will be ending the Disney+ streaming service?,Is there any other streaming service that the Walt Disney Company is ending?
Will Trump profit from the G7 Summit meeting at Trump’s Doral resort?,Will Trump use the Doral Resort as a meeting venue for the G-7 Summit meeting?,Did Trump say that he won't profit from the G-7 summit meeting at Trump's Doral resort?,Did Trump not say that he would profit from the G-7 Summit meeting at Trump's Doral resort?
"Did the perfume ""Lovely"" inflict any harm to its users?",Did the fragrance kill any victims of the perfume inflicted on them?,Did anyone become instantly fatal by the perfume's effects?,Have any of the people described in the perfume ever been saved from these horrors?,"Did the perfume ""Lovely"" have any negative consequences for the user?"
Is the picture of calves kept in crates for six weeks before slaughtering for veal?,Do the crates contain a clod of veal?,Is the calves kept in the crates confined to the slaughterhouses?,Is there evidence that the calves are kept in the crates for six weeks?
Did deficit spending explode during the Obama administration?,Did spending explode during the Obama administration?,Did deficit spending increase during the Obama administration?,Was deficit spending greater during the Obama administration than under the Bush administration?,Did deficit spending grow more during the Obama administration than under George W. Bush?,Did deficit spending increase during the Obama administration?
Did fewer than a quarter of Australians that enrolled for the 2022 federal election not vote?,Did fewer than one quarter of Australians who enrolled for the 2022 federal election vote?,Did all Australians who enrolled for the 2022 federal election vote?,Did the percentage of Australians who did not vote rise by 14% from the % of eligible voters in the 2022 federal election?
Did McCartney died in 1966?,Did McCartney's appearance in an interview make Starr suspicious?,Did McCartney and Starr publicly discuss the death of McCartney?,Was there an official confirmation of Paul McCartney's death?,Have these allegations influenced other musicians or singers?
"Did Jordan say that Obama and Biden were ""cowering on Air Force One""?",Did Jordan say that Trump was standing on Air Force One?,Did Jordan say that Biden and Obama were flying on Air Force One?,Did Jordan say that Trump was standing on Air Force One?,Is there evidence proving that Jordan was standing on Air Force One?
Are there any planned protests on July 25?,Has any government action been announced since the apex of the lockdown?,Are any riots on the apex of the lockdown being declared?,Have any protests occured in the area prior to the lockdown?,Is there any threat of terrorist attack on a apex of the lockdown?
Did a reduction in violent crime in Massachusetts occur during the Obama Administration?,Did criminal crime decrease in Massachusetts?,Does the FBI report on Massachusetts crime numbers indicate a reduction in crime?,Did the FBI report on Massachusetts crime statistics indicate a reduction in crime?,Does this claim also claim that Massachusetts has been reduced in crime?,Does this claim by Obama address the issue of the crime rate in the state?
Did anyone else watch the pujan?,Did the blackout have a negative impact on viewers?,Did all people see the pujan at night?,Was the blackout completely out by the time of the pujan?,Did most people leave the venue before the pujan?,Is there any way to get a refund for the blackout?
Did this tower set on fire in Italy?,Did this tower originate in La Spezia?,Did this tower fire in April 2020?,Did this tower cause any injuries?,Did this tower become unsafe?,Did the fire cause injury or loss of life?,Was this tower required to undergo a retrofit?,Did this tower contribute to the earthquakes in Italy?
Did the WHO say that a vaccine funded by Bill Gates caused a rash of child malnutrition in Africa?,"Will he and the media call this a ""health skandal""?","Would he call the media an ""abuse of power?",""" Will the media press the WHI to confirm that a vaccine funded by Bill Gates caused a rash of child malnutrition in Africa?"
Did NHS England report the number of people whose death certificates show death from only coronavirus?,Did the figures show how many people died from only coronavirus?,Were there multiple death certificates for people whose death was related to coronavirus?,. Have the death certificates for people whose death was due to only coronavirus increased in recent years?
Is it true that Jennifer Brunner inherited at least 18 lawsuits from Ken Blackwell?,Was Ken Blackwell responsible for the heinous mismanagement of the 2004 election?,Was Ken Blackwell the chief that was responsible for these lawsuits?,Was there proof the lawsuits were filed by Blackwell?,Did this prove Blackwell was responsible for these lawsuits?
Has LA abolished the Electoral College?,Does LA have fewer constituents than 43 states?,"Does Los Angeles not already have a population of under 50,000?",Are there any other factors other than population a factor in determining the strength of LA?,Are Los Angeles residents more confident in the future?
Did activists demand the blackface portrayal of Dick Van Dyke be removed from Mary Poppins?,"Is Dick Van Dyke's use of blackface in ""Mary Poppins"" an issue of racism?",Did people have other opinions on the use of blackface in Mary Poppins?
Did 75 people go on food stamps on an average per job created by Obama?,Does the average per job per hour pay raise for Obama be below what many employers report?,Was the number of jobs created by Obama based on the average per hour wage rose by an average of 0.5 percent per year?
Has the FAA expanded the electrocardiogram parameters for pilots?,Is there evidence that COVID-19 vaccines have caused serious heart damage?,Is there sufficient evidence to substantiate the FAA’s claims?,Is there sufficient evidence that COVID-19 vaccines have caused serious heart damage?
Is there a record of a train stopping at Begunkodor Railway station in the last 42 years?,Is there a record of an Indian train stopping at Begunkodor Railway station in the last 42 years?,ii. Does the train stop regularly in the last 42 years?,Is there a record of a train stopping at Begunkodor Railway Station in the last 42 years?
Is PCR testing accurate for determining whether a person has SARS-CoV-2?,Is it feasible for a person to vaccinate for SARS-CoV-2?,Are there any known examples in which people vaccinate for SARS-CoV-2?,Are there any studies establishing that PCR tests can't be used to determine whether someone is infected with SARS-CoV-2?,Is it probable that people vaccinate for SARS-CoV-2?
Did the photo show police personnel washing off the stains of the farmer's blood?,Did the farmers blood show up in a video uploaded on YouTube?,Did the farmers blood show up in a photograph of police personnel washing off the stains of the farmer's blood?,Did the photo show farmers blood washing off the stains of the farmer's blood?
Did Lamar Smith appear in moderated debates?,Is the information in question consistent with Smith's public statements?,Has Smith appeared in moderated debates in 2018?,Is there an evidence of Smith appearing in moderated debates?,Would that be accurate based on Smith's campaign?,Was Smith included in a debate that had the debate participants asked questions?
"Do Texas women make an average of $8,355 less per year than men doing the same job?","Do women in Texas make an average of $8,355 less per year than men doing the same job?","Do women in Texas make an average of $8,355 less per year than men doing the same job?"
Has a bipartisan payroll tax cut resulted in an average family pocket being $1000 this year?,Has the federal government also pushed through a payroll tax cut resulting in the average family pocket being $1000 this year?,Does it seem that a bipartisan payroll tax cut would have resulted in a pocket being $1000 this year?
Did the three sisters who cleared the UPSC examination become IAS officers?,Did they all pass the UPSC exam?,Was any photo of the three sisters who cleared the UPSC examination taken?,Did any photo of the three sisters who cleared the UPSC examination take place before the official picture?,Did the three sisters who cleared the UPSC examination wear bright colored uniforms?
Did all of the destroys that raged on the West Coast in 2020 were started by direct energy weapons?,Does the United States have any legal authority to regulate direct energy weapons?,Does the U.S. have a right to regulate direct energy weapons?,Did the U.S. military conduct research on preventing and eradicating direct energy weapons?,Did any study by the U.S. government determine that there are evidence of direct energy weapons?
Does Neypro 1 Gold cure kidney related diseases?,"Are kidney-related diseases, insomnia and joint and back pain caused by this product?",Is Neypro 1 Gold formulated to help with kidney problems?,Is Neypro 1 Gold approved by the FDA to cure kidney related illnesses?,Is Neypro 1 Gold approved by the FDA to cure sleep related illnesses?
Was the CEO of Delta Air Lines a fan of Georgia's new voting law?,Did the CEO of Delta Air Lines praise Georgia's new voting law?,Was the CEO of Delta Air Lines a fan of the new voting law?,Did the CEO of Delta Air Lines praise Georgia's new voting law?
Did the Florida Highway Patrol use a semi-truck?,Are there any examples of these vehicles being used by the Florida Highway Patrol?,Were the vehicles in question concealed in plain sight?,Is it true that the Florida Highway Patrol uses a fleet of three such ‘hidden in plain sight’ trucks?
Can Microsoft produce a microchip chip that will store COVID-19 information?,Can Microsoft start human trials on a chip chip that will store COVID-19 information in June 2022?,Will Microsoft start human trials on a chip chip that will store COVID-19 information?,Are there no human trials currently underway on a microchip chip that will store COVID-19 information?,Is Microsoft currently testing a microchip chip that will store COVID-19 information?
"Did Musk twitt that his twitter account ""Twitter Tere Tukde Honge"" gang should pay $8?",Did Musk tweet that his Twitter account 'Twitter Tere Tukde Honge' gang should pay $8?,"Did Musk tweet that ""Twitter Tere Tukde Honge"" gang should pay $8?"
Did China directly fund COVID-19 development during this time?,Has China used COVID-19 funding for research?,Did China use COVID funding for other projects as well?,Has China used Obama Administration funding for COVID-19 development in this time period?,Have other governmental entities funded these types of research?
Is there an existing law that allows for the operation of an iron ore mine in northern Wisconsin to fill in pristine streams and ponds with mine waste?,"Is the 2013 state law effective as of May 29, 2013?",Is there any other state law that allows the operation of an iron ore mine in northern Wisconsin to fill in pristine streams and ponds with mine waste?
Was the woman being abused by a group of men?,Is the women in the video in good health?,Was the woman abused?,Is it possible that she was sexually assaulted?,Is there evidence for men being sexually assaulted in this video?,Can one use a sex test to determine whether a man has sexually assaulted another person?,Is the video evidence for one man having sexual assault on another person?
Does this tax bill save households $540?,Will this tax bill benefit families primarily financially?,Does this tax bill provide a savings over two years?,"Is this tax bill required to have a minimum value of $2,003,000 per year?","Is this tax bill required to have a minimum tax rate of $75,000 per year?"
Did school districts' staff remain the same or grow after the 2011-'13 state budget?,Did the overwhelming number of school districts report staff remained the same or grew following the 2011-'13 state budget?,Did all schools report staff growth following the 2011-'13 state budget?,Did all schools report staff to remain the same or increase after the 2011-'13 state budget?
Do the first three digits in the barcode tell the product is Made in China?,Is it true that the first three digits of the barcode tells you the product is made in China?,Is the first three digits of the barcode always the first digits of the product?
"Would raising the income tax rate for families making $75,000 increase the income tax rate by 25%?","Would a tax plan benefit families who make more than $75,000?","Would a tax plan benefit those making less than $75,000?",Is the Tax Plan endorsed by Biden an attempt to reduce income taxes?
Is Mar-a-Lago a trip that costs taxpayers approximately $3.6 million?,Was the Government Accountability Office report from 2008 reliable?,Was the Government Accountability Office report from 2010 accurate?,Is Mar-a-Lago a trip that costs taxpayers approximately $3.6 million?,Is the government accountability office report from 2008 reliable?
Did Nigeria allocate 3.95% of its budget to funding its health Ministry in 2018?,Did Nigeria allocate 3.95% of its budget to funding its health Ministry in 2018?,Is the amount allocated to funding the health Ministry by Nigeria less than it used to?,Did Nigeria allocate less to funding its health Ministry in 2018?
Was the California gas tax hike expected to create the highest gas tax in the nation?,Was the California gas tax hike expected to have no effect on fuel prices?,Did the California gas tax hike have any impacts on fuel prices?,Will the gas tax hike result in an increase in fuel prices for California?,Does California have a far lower gas tax than any other state?
Are there any countries that have cancelled all quarantine procedures?,Are any of these countries part of the United Nations Convention on Mutual Immunity?,Has any of these countries banned compulsory vaccination?,Are there any other countries that have banned these vaccinations?,Have any countries banned any of these vaccinations?,Is there any information about countries that have cancelled quarantine procedures?
Did AOC's tweet come after the election?,Are there any indications that this tweet was written after the election?,Is this statement true?,Can there be a beginning of the Purge because of Biden's presidency?,"Can Democrats commence ""the Purge"" because Biden is president?"
Does this estimate compare directly to the actual construction contracts?,Did this project come in below estimates?,Does this estimate still hold?,Does this estimate still hold?,Is this estimate based on actual performance?,Is this estimate in line with the budget?,Is this estimate based on other current projects?,Is this estimate based on the current economic climate?
Does the Australian government database say women experienced menstrual bleeding were six years old?,Is Typo on Australian database correct?,Is Typo on Australian database the only database showing women experiencing menstrual bleeding?,Did the Australian government database report this erroneously?,Are there other erroneous erroneous reports?
Did the Avengers 4 have a 'Left Behind' crossover?,Was the Avengers 4 announcement made about a crossover?,Will the Avengers 4 crossover feature a 'Left Behind' crossover?,Would the Avengers 4 crossover feature a 'Left Behind' crossover?,Did the Avengers 4 reveal a 'Left Behind' crossover?,Will the Avengers 4 crossover feature a 'Left Behind' crossover?,Will the Avengers 4 crossover feature a 'Left Behind' crossover?
Has King Jr. said that education is to teach people how to tell fact from fiction?,Is there any evidence that King Jr. is citing facts from fiction?,Do King Jr.'s quotes refer to teaching people how to tell fact from fiction?,Do King Jr.'s quotes appear on his website?
Do the circuits in Indonesia have the capacity to host a MotoGP race?,Is the GP circuit in Indonesia planned for a 2021 date?,Does the GP circuit have any existing support from the country?,Is the GP circuit in Indonesia ready for a race?,Does the GP circuit have any sponsorship support from the country?
Does Trump want $54 billion in foreign aid to secure our border and build a wall?,Does Trump only want 10% of the $54 billion in foreign aid to secure our border and build a wall?,Did Trump say the Democrats want $54 billion in foreign aid to secure our border and build a wall?
Did the overall immunisation coverage increase under Modi's government?,Did the percentage of immunisation increase under Modi's government increase in 2014?,Did the immunisation coverage increase under Modi's government?,Did the immunisation coverage increase by more than 60 percent under Modi's regime?
Did Kerry win the election with 4 percent?,Was Kerry's vote share between December 2003 and January 2004 the same?,Is Kerry a likely candidate for the Republican nomination in 2016?,Is Kerry a likely candidate for the Democratic nomination in 2016?,Does Kerry currently hold a majority in the U.S. Senate?
Does using lemon and ginger lower belly fat?,Does ginger and lemon have an effect on belly fat?,Does using ginger and lemon have an effect on your stomach size?,Will using ginger and lemon help decrease your body fat?,Does ginger and lemon have an effect on heart health?,Is ginger and lemon an effective calorie burn tool?
Did Gowdy admit the four Americans were killed in time to get assistance?,Was the incident on Fox News produced by Gowdy or another person?,Did Gowdy admit the Americans were killed in time to get help?,Was this incident produced by Fox News or another source?,Nothing?
Has this statement been made in conjunction with other statements?,Has this statement been made in conjunction with other statements?,Did House speaker Ryan say these statements?,Was this statement made in connection with other statements?,Did the statement refer to the entire House or specific individual House members?,Was this statement made in connection with any other statement?
Did New Zealand intelligence bosses call on citizens to report fellow Kiwis if they don't agree with COVID-19 measures?,Did New Zealand intelligence bosses call on citizens to report fellow Kiwis if they don't agree with COVID-19 measures?,Has New Zealand intelligence bosses been criticized for the lack of follow-through with COVID-19 measures?
Did Arvind praise government efforts to install dustbins?,Is Arvind a politician?,Is Delhi's Kirti Nagar Industrial Area home to a dustbin installation project?,Is Arvind an advocate of dustbins?,Is there evidence of Arvind's criticism of dustbins?
Did Georgia have the highest number of scholarships in the country?,Does Georgia have the highest number of scholarships per student?,Is Georgia one of the richest states in terms of scholarships for college admission?,Would Georgia be one of the wealthiest states in terms of scholarships for college admission?,Is Georgia one of the richest states in terms of scholarships for college admission?
Did 650 members of this group represent any political party?,Was all of this group elected?,Is there a quorum of voters in any of these?,Is there any type of political grouping in this report?,Are any members of this group affiliated with the Prime Minister?,Was this person's grouping elected?
Is the 2017 Super Bowl MVP trophy awarded to Tom Brady?,Is it possible that Tom Brady may have been a target for this gesture?,Is it possible for Tom Brady to show his middle finger while receiving the 2017 Super Bowl MVP trophy?,Is there a reason Tom Brady might have had this gesture?
Would the Fed have a “no consequence” outcome if rates were higher?,Can the Fed use leverage to create leverage?,Was the Fed’s decision to cut rates to near 0% well-adjusted?,Is it accurate to say the Fed would be of little consequence since the Federal Reserve recently cut its interest rates?
"Did this happen on October 13, 2014?",Did this take place during the announcing of the game?,Did George's jersey number change due to the 360 dunk?,Does this happen every year?,Does this happened in a season?,Is this mentioned in a sports article?,Is there any other notable video information about this event?
Did senate Republicans expect Hillary Clinton to be indicted over the Whitewater scandal four days before bombings?,Is it true that Clinton was to be indicted over the Whitewater scandal four days before documents related to the case were destroyed in Oklahoma City bombing?,Is there evidence Clinton was ever questioned over the Whitewater scandal?
Is Thompson's tax plan a $1 million tax cut?,Is Thompson's tax plan a tax cut of over $1 million per year for the top 1%?,Can Thompson reduce his tax cuts for the top 1% as well?,"Would Thompson's tax plan provide a tax cut of $87,000 per year for the top 1%?"
Did the US government spend $65k to get 2 million likes on facebook?,Did the US government spend any money on Facebook advertising?,Were there any media criticisms regarding this policy?,"Would some of this strategy be considered a ""faux"" strategy by Facebook?","Will these statistics be used to justify an ""usual"" strategy?"
Will the Philippines ban Mobile Legends on September 5th?,Is the game allowed to be purchased in the Philippines?,Will this ban only effect specific regions?,Is this ban still in place?,Has the ban been lifted in any other regions?,Is it still against the law in any other countries?,Has there been any news of this ban in any other countries?
Did the percentage of black males entering the criminal justice system increase?,Do all black males entering the criminal justice system have a criminal record?,Will all black males who are incarcerated in the criminal justice system be released within a reasonable time?,Was the percentage of black males who were incarcerated increasing?,Does the criminal justice system have any other ways for black males to avoid the criminal justice system?
Did a narcotics activist have a claim of trying to cancel Snow White?,Was Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs featured in a non-consensual kiss in Disney's film?,Has Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs received a lot of criticism for its depiction of heroine's romance?
Did U.S. Rep. Ann McLane Kuster use taxpayer money to send campaign mail?,Did Kuster use any of taxpayer money to send campaign mail?,Were Kuster campaign funds allotted to her?,Did Kuster use any part of taxpayer money to send campaign mail?,Did Kuster send a lot of campaign mailings in 2010?,Did Kuster receive any money for campaign mail sent in 2010?
Did Honor Kill His Wife and 2 Daughters and Says Allah Told Him To Do It?,Is Honor Not a Muslim?,Is Honor's wife alive?,Was Honor's wife alive?,Did Honor claim that Allah told him to murder her and her children?,Did Honor claim to have been brought to Israel by his wife?
Did Biden tweet a photo that included a medical device?,Did Biden tweet a photo during the 2022 Winter Olympics?,Was Biden's tweet about a medical device correct?,Are there other instances of Biden holding a medical device during the 2022 Winter Olympics?,Does Biden hold any other medical devices?
Did a recent poll indicate that American people don’t support sanctuary cities?,Did the poll show that American people are against using their tax dollars to fund illegal immigrants?,Did a recent poll show that 80% of Americans support sanctuary cities?,Is it true that the majority of Americans oppose sanctuary cities?
Did Marshall refuse to return campaign contributions from Rangel?,Did Rangel's campaign donations incite a boycott of Marshall?,Did Rangel's campaign donate more to Marshall than to any other candidate in a single election cycle?,Did the candidate that rangel allegedly supported in 2014 agree to return a large amount of donations?
Did the baby survive the crash?,Did anyone use a life vest?,Is the baby pictured wearing a life vest?,Was there any photo of a life vest used during the crash?,Did the baby have a life vest in the crash?,Did anyone wear a life vest during the crash?
Did Gore say there will be no ice on the North Pole by 2013?,Has Gore said that he believes the North Pole will be ice free in the summer by 2013?,Does Gore agree with the global warming prediction of Dr. Scott?,Has Gore endorsed the climate change plan?
Does illegal immigration cost 4 billion dollars a year?,Does illegal immigration make 70000 per family in Florida?,Did the state spend on illegal immigration?,Would a $600 per household increase in Florida's costs from illegal immigration?,Do the cost of illegal immigration increase by $70 in each state?,Is there any evidence in this regard?
Is the Virginia population growth net zero since McDonnell became governor?,Is the average annual growth in population zero?,Is job creation in Virginia net zero since McDonnell became governor?,Did McDonnell provide any job creation services to the Virginia community?,Is McDonnell re-elected governor?,Has McDonnell's economic policies prevented job creation?
Does this video date back to 2015?,Has the video been on the internet for several years?,Is this video viewed by many people who hold their hands together as a sign of respect?,Is this video part of a group protesting against funerals?,Can this video be found in other places?
Has Mersey Care NHS Foundation Trust had any deaths related to Covid-19?,Did all patients that died have pre-existing conditions?,Do all deaths related to Covid-19 related to Mersey Care NHS Foundation Trust happen within the last 30 days?,Have all patients that died related to Covid-19  died?,Had all patients who died due to Covid-19 gotten any other diseases?,Had any patients die due to Covid-19 gotten any other diseases?
"Did Michigan, New York and Nevada issue orders banning the prescription of hydroxychloroquine to COVID-19 patients?",Does this order apply to all COVID patients?,Did this order apply to all patients with COVID?,Did the governors of these states approve these orders?,Was any evidence given of the approval of this order?
Was it clear that the ring road would cross through 52 villages and 5 districts?,Was it clear that the ring road would go to the southern part of Kashmir?,Did the ring road go to the northwest part of Kashmir?,Did any of the villages go to the western part of Kashmir?,Did the ring road go to any of the villages in the northwest?
"Have there been 25,000 businesses created since Scott Walker became governor of Washington?",Has a majority of these companies been small or medium-sized?,Did each of these companies create their own jobs?,Have the jobs created been in the same area as the original businesses?,Were the new jobs created from the same location as the original businesses?
Did Trump roll out a tax plan to cut taxes in 2005?,Is this 2005 tax return a part of Trump's 'tax plan'?,Is Trump's tax plan similar to other people's tax plans?,Did Trump's tax plan cut taxes in 2005?,br>?
Did Barack Obama agree with George Bush's war-control policies in 2004?,Did Obama oppose those policies and subsequently withdraw from the war in Iraq?,Was Obama willing to withdraw from the war in Iraq?,Would Bush continue to conduct the war in Iraq in 2012?,Did Bush stop conducting the war in Iraq in 2012?
Did Nickelodeon pull these episodes because they were considered problematic?,Did Nickelodeon pull these episodes because the story lines were problematic?,Were these episodes pulled from online platforms?,Do some Paramount+ users still have access to these episodes?,Were these episodes pulled from a number of other platforms?
Did a wealthy woman leave her entire estate to a man she had met once and spent four hours with?,Was she married to this man?,Did this man make any money from this relationship?,Did this man have any previous marriages before this one?,Was there any other relevant information about this relationship?,Was this man a good husband?
Is there evidence that there were five suspected killers of worshippers in the owo attack?,Did these suspects have their names and photos emailed to security?,Was there any evidence of any kind related to the owo attack?,Do these suspects have anything in common?,Did the tweet reveal any information about any other suspects involved?
Does the UP government have laws to punish people for friend requests?,Is there a new law to punish people for friend requests?,Will anyone be jailed for 3 years and fined for friend requests?,Do any other countries have laws against friend requests?,Is this new law being enforced?
Did Dominion Voting Systems Ballot-Counting Machines work for Justin Trudeau during the 2018 federal election?,Did Trudeau receive a majority of his vote during the 2018 federal election?,Did Trudeau receive a majority of his vote during the 2018 federal election?,Did Trudeau receive a majority of his vote during the 2018 federal election?,Did Trudeau receive a majority of his vote during the 2018 federal election?
Did mission Indradhanush complete four phases covering 528 districts?,Was the total area covered in the four phases by 528 districts?,Did the four phases cover all 62 districts of India?,Is the average area covered by the four phases by 528 districts?,Does the number of districts in the four phases by 528 district make it the largest area occupied by the mission?
Did video show two women being swept away by waves at Bandra Band stand?,Did video show waves being swept away at Bandra Band stand?,Did video show two women being swept away by waves during Bandra Band Stand?,Does bandra band stand have a lot of water on beaches?
Has HB2 had a negative effect on the economy?,Has this negative impact on the economy increased over time?,Has HB2 made much of this negative impact known?,Does this negative impact have a direct relationship to the economy?,Have other negative effects on the economy resulted from HB2?
Did China seek to kill more patients than needed to avoid a further spread of the virus?,Are the number of patients cited in China's request the largest ever?,Was China's request for more coronavirus patients related to the AIDS pandemic?,"Is China attempting to kill 200,000 patients?"
"In America today, how much are women paid on average?",Are women paid 80 cents on the dollar of what men are paid for the same work?,Are women paid at least 80% of what men pay for the same work?,Are women paid more on average than men?,Can women and men be paid the same amount for the same work?,Are there other factors for the gender pay gap?
Is there any evidence that this plan will deprive 120 million Americans of their current health care coverage?,Did this plan include a government-controlled health care plan?,Was this proposal a reworking of a previous plan?,Is this plan intended to be a replacement for current health care coverage?,Is this plan specifically intended to deprive 120 million Americans of current health care coverage?
Did Hyde open fire at a school?,Did 6 people die as a result of Hyde's shooting?,Did Hyde shoot at a school in the US?,Did Hyde open fire at a school in the US?,Was it in the US?,Did Hyde shoot at a school in the US?
Did US debt grow during the first 29 months of the Obama administration?,Was the increase in debt an equivalent of $4.5 billion per day?,Has US debt grown by $3.4 trillion during the first 29 months of the Obama administration?,Has the increase in the US debt been offset by any changes in the economy or in foreign markets?
Has there been discussion on whether a no deal Brexit does or does not mean a £39 billion divorce bill to the EU?,Has there been discussion on whether or not a no deal Brexit does or does not mean that a £39 billion divorce bill to the EU?,Does any recent research indicate that a no deal Brexit could mean that the UK could no longer pay a divorce bill to the EU?
Did Russian military personnel run from smoke?,Did the person in the clip run from smoke?,Was the person running from smoke from a fire at Kuzminka military base?,Have any other Russian military personnel been arrested in connection with this incident?,Have any other Russian military personnel been charged with in connection with this incident?
Did Biden complete a mile and push-up routine?,Did Biden do a pull-up routine?,Is Biden's health status reported by the early 2023 health status report?,Is the early health status report from a former President credible?,Were Biden's exercise routines consistent with the first one?
Did President Obama sign this bill into law?,Is this bill related to President Trump's immigration executive order?,Was the executive order signed under this bill in 2015?,Did the executive order affect immigration policies of previous administrations?,Is this decision an exception?,Is this policy based on the interpretation of this bill by the majority of administrations?
Has Biden owned any real estate?,Are all homes owned by Biden?,Are the homes in Biden's current portfolio estimated to be worth between $7.5 million and $3 million?,Is Biden's salary based on income?,Does Biden live off of an average salary?,Has Biden made money from political campaigns?
Did the Governor sign a letter saying no more masks starting October 1?,Did the Governor sign a letter saying no more masks starting October 1?,Was the governor's response positive?,Was the governor's response negative?,Was the governor's response negative?,Did the Governor's response in general support the governor's response to the March 5th shooting?
"Did Norway spend $33,000 on early childhood care per child?","Did Finland spend $23,000 on early childhood care per child?","Did Germany spend $18,000 on early childhood care per child?",Did the U.S spend $500 on early childhood care per child?,"Was the U.S. spending more than $18,000 on early childhood care per child?"
Did Rihanna tweet about protests in support of Khalistani farmers?,Did Rihanna receive a payment from the PR firm with Khalistani links?,Did the PR firm pay Rihanna for the tweet?,Was Khalistani involved in the tweet?,Did Khalistani pay Rihanna a salary for her tweet?
Did the Obama Administration approve the sale of 20% of our uranium at the same time that FBI investigations were ongoing?,Was the administration aware of the FBI investigation during the time when the sale of 20% of uranium was approved?,Did any other federal agencies have any investigative activities during this time period?
Is the West responsible for Ukraine’s counteroffensive?,Is Ukraine in a situation in which it must coordinate its actions across borders?,Is the West’s response to Ukraine’s counteroffensive in line with the international legal standards?,Have the West’s strategy for Ukraine’s future been successful?
"Does the CBO estimate that the Bush tax cut will add 600,000-1,4 million jobs in 2011 and 900,000-1,7 million jobs in 2012?","Does the CBO estimate that the Bush tax cut will add 900,000-2.7 million jobs in 2012?","Does the CBO estimate that the Bush tax cut will add 600,000-1,4 million jobs in 2011 and 900,000-1,7 million jobs in 2012?"
Does this vaccine kill 40 times more elderly than the virus?,Would the vaccine kill 40 times less elderly if it did?,Is this vaccine effective against older people?,Would the vaccine cause more people to die?,Can this vaccine be used to prevent disease?,Is this vaccine effective in improving the immune system?
Did Alter get an F in attendance in 2016 as an Austin parks board member?,Did Alter receive an F in attendance in 2016 as an Austin city council member?,Was Alter removed by a unanimous vote?,Does Alter attend meetings at Austin City Council meetings?,Does Alter receive an F in attendance in 2016 as an Austin parks board member?
Does the t y test for coronavirus tell if you have fibrosis in the lungs?,"Does taking a t y test for coronavirus indicate a coughing, discomfort, stuffiness, tightness.?",Does the t y test for coronavirus prove if you have fibrosis in the lungs?,Does the t y test for coronavirus show if you have fibrosis in the lungs?
"Does Covid-19 vaccine effectiveness decrease from 98% to just 1% among a wider, younger population?",Was Covid-19 vaccine effectiveness in people aged 65 and older?,Did this vaccine effectiveness drop among people aged 71 and younger?,Did this vaccine effectiveness decrease among people aged 75 and older?,Has this vaccine effectiveness decreased since the beginning of the year?
"Are there 1,600 coal-fired power plants that have just started construction?",Is there a minimum number of coal-fired power plants that will be constructed under this guise?,Are these power plants the least costly to build?,Do nuclear power plants outperform coal-fired power plants in general?
Do these estimates exclude the People's Liberation Army?,Are these predictions realistic?,Does the interest sent by the United States guarantee Chinese spending?,Do the United States and China make trade agreements?,Are these agreements based on mutual interests?,Is the number of bilateral contacts discussed in this paragraph accurate?,Are these relationships defined in this paragraph?,Is there any evidence that the United States is collaborating with China in this way?
Did the group perform outside Buckingham Palace on Thursday following Queen Elizabeth's death?,"Was the crowd at the time of the group's performance of ""Another One Bites the Dust"" large?","Was the person who attended the performance of ""Another One Bites the Dust"" from the Dublin area?"
Did Hawking die on Albert Einstein's Birthday?,Was Hawking born on the anniversary of Galileo's death?,Did Hawking die on the anniversary of Galileo's death?,Did Hawking die in the month of January?,.. Did Hawking die on the anniversary of Galileo's death?
Did a higher Institute of Health drastically reduce the country’s COVID death toll by 97%?,Was the new definition effective for people with COVID rather than with COVID?,Have the death tolls from COVID dramatically decreased due to the new definition?,Has the change to the new definition resulted in the deaths being less common?
"Did Truman call political correctness a doctrine benefited by a delusional, illogical minority in 1945?","Is it true Truman called political correctness a doctrine benefited by a delusional, illogical minority in 1945?","Does Truman cite any evidence in support of his statement that political correctness is a doctrine benefited by a delusional, illogical minority in 1945?"
Did Japan ban seven countries from entering the country?,Can Thailand enter the country on Japan's request?,Has Japan banned other countries from entering Japan?,Does Japan ban all of these other countries?,Was Thailand banned from entering Japan?,Have any of these countries had success of gaining entry into Japan?,Does the Japanese Government ban the country from entering the country on Japanese request?
"Does Ryan’s Medicare plan increase future retiree costs by more than $6,000?",Is the Medicare plan based on the aforementioned criteria?,Does Ryan’s Medicare plan change cost per beneficiary?,"Can Ryan’s Medicare plan be amended for more than $6,000 in cost?",Does Ryan’s Medicare plan offer a specific Medicare benefit?
Did the missing ship sail away from its home port?,Did the missing ship surface amidst clouds?,Did the missing ship ever resurface?,Did the missing ship crash?,Did other ships have the same boat?,Did the missing ship actually return to its home port?,Did the ship sail back to its home port?
Did these state senators vote against the North Carolina body camera law?,Did these state senators vote against the body camera law?,Was this body camera law in effect during 2013?,Did these state senators vote against the body camera law?,"0 Responses to ""Debbie Carter: I was one of two state senators who voted against”?"
Was there a phone call that caused 400 children to be taken from their parents without a warrant?,Was it a prank?,Was the call related to the family's criminal history?,Is there a specific time frame where the children will be taken from their families?,Is there any evidence that could indicate any criminal background at this time?,Does this person imply that this is the entire list?
Did the rocket that was loaded with fuel ignite?,Did the explosion occur after it exploded on the bridge?,Did the rocket containing the fuel explode on top of the bridge?,Was the rocket unable to ignite on top of the bridge?,Did the rocket explode while flying on the bridge?,Did the rocket containing the fuel burn when it crashed on top of the bridge?
Did the video show the bullet train traveling from Osaka to Tokyo in 10 minutes?,Was the speed of the bullet train accurately predicted by the video?,Did the time of the bullet train travel depend on the geography of the Japanese country?,Did this video show the train traveling in a straight line?,Did the bullet train traveling from Osaka to Tokyo take an unusually long time?
Does time itself speed up and we perceive a 24-hour day as a 16-hour day?,Is this belief correct?,Was the evidence provided in the case of the citation?,Did this study have a positive outcome with the claim?,Could this be the reason for this belief?,Was this research independently verified?
Is it true that women earn 80 cents on the dollar compared to white men doing similar jobs?,"If this is true, who are women earning 80 cents per dollar?",Do women earn 80 cents per dollar compared to men doing similar jobs?,Has this report been endorsed by any non-profit organization?
Was the WHO statement that 87% of the population of India would suffer cancer by 2025 because of adulterated milk based on what is the WHO's information?,Did the WHO report to the Government of India indicate the amount of cancer this would cause if it was to occur?,Do all adults in India consume an adulterated drink of milk?,Did the WHO report say that 87% of the population will suffer from cancer by 2025 as a result of consuming adulterated milk?
Was the US Coast Guard Cutter vessel attempting to enter the Philippine Sea?,Is this vessel currently ashore?,Is the USCGC Cutter vessel a U.S. Navy vessel?,Is there any evidence to support the claim by the U.S.CGC Cutter vessel that it fired at the Chinese vessels?,Is this vessel currently a U.S. Navy vessel?
Did the hospital request the release of Balasubrahmanyam's remains?,Did the hospital request the release of Balasubrahmanyam's remains till payment of 1.85 crores?,Was there any issue in clearing the amount?,Was S.P. Balasubrahmanyam's remains released once the balance money was cleared?
Is this comment a news article?,Are these deaths related to Michigan?,"Would these murders be considered to be ""less vengeful"" in light of this statement?",Do these death sentences involve the death penalty?,Did the victim die in a car crash?,Is there any evidence of mental disorder associated with these deaths?
Did the USPS backdate 100K ballots?,Did the USPS backdate 100K ballots and cause them to be illegally counted?,Did the USPS backdate 100K ballots so that they could be counted illegally?,Did the USPS backdate 100K ballots so that they could be counted illegally?
Was the video shown in late August 2023 during hurricane Hillary?,Did the video have an effective time frame?,Did the video go viral with multiple urls?,Does the video have an effective time frame?,Will the video get released later in the year?,Will it also go viral in 2020?
Was Kristyna Martelli diagnosed with a rare type of cancer at the time of her death?,Did she undergo any elective surgeries?,Did Kristyna Martelli die during a surgical procedure?,Was Kristyna Martelli admitted to a hospital?,Did Kristyna Martelli have any family members?
"Is it true that pensioners receive only £8,000 a year?",Is there an increase in the cost of TV?,Is the TV licence still a cost?,Is there any increase in the cost of TV for pensioners?,Is there any change in the cost of TV for pensioners?
Did the Affordable Care Act change the number of Americans with health insurance?,Is there a record number of Americans in the country who gained health insurance because of the Affordable Care Act?,Did it change the number of people who lost health insurance?,Did the Affordable Care Act change the number of people with health insurance?,Are all of these people able to purchase health insurance as a result of the Affordable Care Act?
Did he say the infrastructure deficit was $2 trillion or $3 trillion?,Did the president mention the people that want to go to work?,Did the president acknowledge that the work that needed to be done included in the infrastructure deficit?,Did the president also admit that the people that want to go to work are primarily in poor areas?,Did the president claim that there are people that will go to work because of infrastructure?,Did the president say the infrastructure deficit was between $2 trillion and $3 trillion?
Has Trump said Trump has a small penis?,Has Trump said Trump has a small penis?,Has Trump said Trump has a small penis?,Has Trump said Trump has a small penis?,- - - - - - - - - -?
Was over 40% of African-American men in Milwaukee County going to prison for low-level drug offenses?,Is the percentage of African-American men who went to prison for low-level drug offenses in Madison at least that amount?,Has the percentage of African-American men in Milwaukee County increased as a result of increasing drug crime?,Has the percentage of African-American men in Madison increased as a result of increased drug crime?
Was this book written by an Indian author?,Did this book contain any controversies?,Was this book considered controversial?,Was the title of this book written for an Indian author?,Will this book be published in India?,Is there any controversies?,Is this book about a particular political event?,Will this book be translated into other languages?
Do conspiracy theories regarding Trump being reinstated stem from debunked conspiracy theories?,Is there data suggesting Trump will be reinstated on August 13?,Can Trump ever be reinstated?,Is Trump being reinstated on August 13 only hypothetically?,Do conspiracy theories stem from Trump reversing his presidential tenure?
Did Gates mention this idea in the speech?,Did the video cover this topic at length?,Was the speech edited?,"Did Gates say the word ""control"" in the speech?",Do any other aspects of the speech address this idea?,Did the video cover this entire issue?,Did Gates recommend vaccination?,Did Gates talk about this idea in public?
Did Einstein say technology would one day surpass our human interaction and create a generation of idiots?,"Was Einstein referring to the creation of a generation of idiots, not humans?","Was Einstein referring to Einstein's suggestion that technology would one day ""surpass our human interaction""?"
Did the vaccines receive full approval via the Yellow Card?,Did the vaccines receive full approval after the Yellow Card was submitted?,Did the vaccines received full approval under the Yellow Card?,Are other vaccines that are not phase 3 clinical trials eligible for full approval?,Did the vaccines in these vaccines have data required for full approval?
Did Americans spend less than 10 percent of their disposable income on food in 2008?,Did Americans spend 22 percent of their disposable income on food in 2012?,Did Americans spend a greater percentage of their disposable income on food in 2012 than in 2008?,Did people in China spend 28% of their disposable income on food in 2012?,Did people in Russia spend 37% of their disposable income on food in 2012?
Did Clinton's plan result in any type of effectiveness in bringing in refugees?,Does Clinton's plan cost $400 billion in lifetime welfare and entitlement costs?,Does Clinton's plan contain any efficient methods to screen for refugees?,Does Clinton's plan provide an effective method of screening refugees?,Does Clinton's plan cost $400 billion in lifetime welfare and entitlement costs?
Did more than R1.3 trillion be invested in infrastructure over the last five years?,Has the infrastructure being provided by government benefited from this investment?,Do the country's investment in infrastructure provide a definite increase in the amount of money spent on infrastructure as a whole?,Does this information have anything to do with the increase in the amount of money spent on infrastructure in particular?
Did this photograph show an explosion at Kabul airport?,Was this photograph taken on August 16th?,Did this photograph capture an explosion at the airport?,Has this photograph been produced since then?,Did this photograph capture an explosion at the airport?,Has this photograph ever been released on the internet?,Is this photograph the only one of this kind?
Did Walmart plan to close 250 Sam's Club warehouses?,Did Walmart announce this plan?,"Is it true that this plan will have 100,000 people unemployed?",Is it true that this plan was announced by Walmart?,Is this plan a certainty?,Is there an official estimate for the number of lost workers?
Did the retired colonel shoot himself in distress?,Did one of his sons attend his mother’s last rites?,Did the colonel have siblings?,Is this man a resident of Lucknow?,Did this colonel shoot himself in distress?,Is this man a resident of Lucknow?
"Did the Texas election have 600,000 registered voters who didn't have photo IDs to vote?",Did the Texas election have enough voter in the state to have a voter that didn't have a photo ID to vote?,Have there been any documented elections with a voter that didn't have a photo ID to vote?
Does this war cost us $275 million a day?,Would this war have never been authorized?,Do we have to take such a big cut in budgets?,Is this war a war that has been conducted without any prior authorization?,Does the war have to be limited to the use of US funds?
Is the case in 2003 a generalization of the result in today's immigration system?,Are the immigration benefits being based on today's conditions?,Is the effect today's immigration benefit still a generalization of immigration conditions?,Are the immigration benefits being based on today's conditions?
Did Trump repeal any regulations?,Did Trump abolish these regulations?,Will this repeal hurt the economy?,Did Trump repeal these regulations?,Will the repeal costs affect the economy?,Did this repeal affect any specific sector?,Did these regulations affect many other industries?,Have Trump repealed similar regulations in the past?,Did Trump repeal these regulations after they were passed?
Are children born in America today likely to inherit debt?,Will all children inherit debt?,Do children inherit more debt than their parents?,Is the amount of debt for the entire country a given for every child born?,Does this percentage imply the state a child was born into?,Has this percentage changed in the past ten years?
"Did this video show only 10,000 or more Nihang warriors?","Did this video show more than 20,000 Sikh warriors?","Did this video show only 2,000 horses?",Is this video about the protesting farmers in Delhi?,Can we expect this video to make it to the protesting farmers?,"Would this video be viewed by more than 20,000 Nihang warriors?"
Is there a 40% increase in child births originating out of wedlock?,Are all child births resulting from wedlock within the United States?,Has the percentage of child births in the United States increased by any significant amount since 1979?,Can there be any other plausible causes of child births outside of marriage in the United States?
Do Sharifa Alkhateeb Talks about Using Public Schools to Convert America to Islam?,Is Sharifa Alkhateeb talking about using public schools to convert America to Islam?,Do Sharifa Alkhateeb speak on a specific topic in the speech?
"Did this crime occur on Oct 25, 2010?","Did this crime occur on Oct 24, 2010?","Did this crime occur on Oct 25, 2010?","Did this crime occur on Oct 24, 2010?","Did this crime occur on Oct 24, 2010?",Did the victim ever suffer head injuries?,"Did this crime occur on Oct 24, 2010?","Did this crime occur on Oct 24, 2010?","Did this crime occur on Oct 24, 2010?"
"Did President Trump tell billionaire George Soros to ""go to hell"" during the 2018 World Economic Forum?",Did Soros get a full refund for his money?,Did Soros pay back Trump for the money he gave him?,Did Trump get a full refund for Soros' money at Davos?
Did Trump ever tell Cruz he cheated in the Iowa caucus in 2016?,Was Trump ever accused of cheating in the Iowa caucus?,Did Trump utter a similar accusation when he lost the 2016 Iowa caucus?,Did Trump win the 2016 Iowa caucus with Cruz?
Is this image from the 2018 police academy open day in Berlin?,Does the image depict a single child in police riot gear?,Did the image depict multiple children in police riot gear?,Did this image appear on social media?,Did this image appear on national news?,Did this image appear on social media?
Are there any controversies regarding Albert Bourla's statement?,Was Pfizer CEO Albert Bourla involved in any scandal?,Did Albert Bourla speak to his audience at WEF 2022?,Did Albert Bourla pledge to reduce the global population by 50 percent?,Does Albert Bourla currently serve on the Executive Committee of the Association for Globalization?,"Does Albert Bourla plan to pursue other goals, besides cutting the population?"
Was a blast at the port of Beirut documented in the video?,Was the blast at Beirut caused by the Feb 6 earthquakes?,Is the explosion a similar one to that experienced at the Turkish port?,Is the footage of the Turkish port explosion shown in the video?,Have the earthquakes affected a larger part of Turkey compared to the earthquakes in Beirut?
"Did Stalin say that if you want to bring America down, you must undermine three things: spiritual life, patriotism and morality?","Is it true Stalin said that if you want to bring America down, you must undermine three things: spiritual life, patriotism and morality?","Is it true Stalin said that if you want to bring America down, you must undermine three things: spiritual life, patriotism and morality?"
Did any members of Congress wear AR-15-shaped pins in February 2023?,Did any members of Congress wear AR-15-shaped pins after 2023?,Did the GOP members of Congress wear AR-15-shaped pins before 2023?,Did any GOP members of Congress wear AR-15-shaped pins after 2023?
Did a construction worker throw a saw blade through a two by four?,Did the construction worker throw a saw blade through the wood?,Did the construction worker throw the saw blade through the wood?,Did the construction worker throw the saw blade through the wood?,Did the construction worker throw a saw blade through the wood?
Was an old photo from 2018 circulated online alongside misleading claims about ongoing Indian farmers’ protests?,Was the photo distributed along with misleading claims about ongoing Indian farmers’ protests?,Did the photo circulated along with misleading claims about ongoing Indian farmers’ protests?,Did the photo circulated along with misleading claims about ongoing Indian farmers’ protests?
Did Gingrich co-sponsor the U.N. program in which $60 million a year would have been given to China's brutal one-child policy?,Did Gingrich and Pelosi ever co-sponsor this bill?,Did Gingrich participate in this bill?
Did the 1973 Roe v. Wade decision primarily deal with whether plaintiff had been raped?,Is there any evidence to suggest the Roe v. Wade decision focused solely on whether plaintiff had been raped?,Has this decision been challenged?,Is this decision considered to be a historic landmark?
"Did successive governments aim for electricity supply to 6,000 MW, 10,000 MW and 20,000 MW?",Are all of Nigeria’s electricity projections met in reality?,Do all of the projections have failed to meet expectations?,Does this government have any plan to increase their electricity supply?,"Posted on November 22, 2012 by Drugoben D. Olufola?"
Does this treatment allow for the removal of the vax contents within 30 minutes?,Does this treatment allow for the removal of the vax contents within 30 minutes of the injection?,Is this treatment available in other locations?,Does this treatment appear to be only in this location?,Does this treatment remove the vax content within 30 minutes of the injection?
Did the US import fuels in 2011?,Did the US export more gasoline and diesel than import in 2011?,Do these facts support this claim?,Are these data used in economic news?,Is the 1% percent increase in exports from imports in 2011 a significant trend?,Does this data support the claims made by the author?
Does Winslet hold her breath underwater for more than two minutes?,Was Winslet underwater for more than 14 minutes?,Was Winslet underwater for a shorter time than 14 seconds?,Did Winslet lose her breath while underwater?,Are there any other ways to claim these assertions?,Has any other actress held a breath underwater as long as Winslet?
Did these castles in the 1975 film all actually exist?,Did Castle Doune in Scotland have several different views shot on its side?,Was all of this shot done in real life?,Did all of the castles depicted in the 1975 film appear in real life?,Is this information correct?,Are any of the castles in these films in the same country?
Did media report Dayanand Tiwari’s brave act of saving 50 people in the Delhi - Mundka fire accident?,Did media report on the incident?,Did media report on Tiwari’s brave act of saving 50 people in the Delhi - Mundka fire accident?,Was Tiwari commended by media?
Did Trump attend the photo shoot at Epstein’s island in New York?,Did the photo shoot take place on the Epstein island in New York?,Was the photo taken in New York?,Was Trump dancing with a 13-year-old girl?,Did Trump and Epstein have any children on the island?
Did the Pakistani resident claim the Balakot attack killed 292 Jaish terrorists?,Were the Jaish terrorists killed in the airstrike?,Did the Pakistani resident say that Balakot killed Jaish terrorists on WhatsApp?,Do you have evidence of the Jaish terrorists being killed in the airstrike?
Is this a measure that could lead to a reduction in city funding for education?,Would this money be used for a private charter school?,Will tax increases result in significant increases in public funding?,Are there any ways to increase taxes for this public school?,Are there any other options that would increase public funding?
Is Oxfordshire County Council a county in England?,Is Oxfordshire County Council a county in the United States?,Do the residents of the county have control of the climate?,Did the county pass a climate lockdown?,Did the residents stay in their homes?,Did the climate lockdown affect the economy?
Was it after the 2023 elections that Pakistan's flag was raised in Bhatkal?,Did the Congress win Karnataka elections in that year?,Was there no other flags raised in that town?,Is Pakistan's flag currently on the flag of Karnataka?,Does Pakistan's flag currently fly in India?
Was Sudhir Chaudhary the SP for rajsamand?,Was Chaudhary the SP for the two men arrested?,Was Chaudhary arrested before the two men could escape?,Was Chaudhary the SP of Kanhaiya Lal when he arrested them?
Did Rodrigo Duterte release evidence that Bongbong Marcos Jr won as Philippine vice president in 2016?,Was Marcos Jr. ever charged with any crime?,Did Marcos Jr. receive a ban for political activity?,Did Marcos Jr. receive a ban for criminal activities?
Did Biden support the Chinese one-child policy?,Did Biden say this to people in China?,Did Biden say that China had an abortion ban in place?,Did Biden claim that China's one-child policy is illegal?,Did Biden say he sympathized with China's abortion policies?
Did an Australian government announcement on this ill plan come through?,Did these children have vaccinations at all from this ill plan?,Did the Australian government put these children into quarantine?,Will the Australian government allow vaccinated children to stay?,Will the Australian government use this ill plan to cover up vaccines?
Did Obama's Recovery Act have to do with roads?,Was the ARRA supposed to fix crumbling roads and bridges?,Did the ARRA fix crumbling roads and bridges?,Did the ARRA actually fix crumbling roads and bridges?,Did Obama's Recovery Act cost a trillion dollars?
Did Hindu rituals for the launch of the INS Vikrant occur?,Did Hindu rituals for the launch of the INS Vikrant occur?,Is it certain that this event was a religious event?,Has anyone verified this event?,Is there any substantiation for this event being held in this country?
Has the central government decided to resume DA and DR for central government employees and pensioners?,Has the central government decided to resume DA and DR for central government employees and pensioners from July 1?,Has the central government decided to resume DA and DR for central government employees and pensioners from July 1?,Has the central government decided to resume DA and DR for central government employees and pensioners from July 1?
"Can people bring pot-bellied pigs, turkeys, monkeys, and miniature horses to the US?",Can people carry any other animals that are ESL?,"Is it possible to bring dogs, pot-bellied pigs, turkeys, monkeys, and miniature horses to the US?"
Do 76% of Americans live paycheck to paycheck?,Are 76% of Americans living paycheck to paycheck in the US?,Are 76% of Americans living paycheck to paycheck because of a change in wages or economic factors?,Are 76% of Americans living paycheck to paycheck because of an increase in health care costs?,Does 76% of Americans live paycheck to paycheck?
Did voting machines in Arizona fail to meet US AP criteria of being certified?,Has Arizona passed a vote on certification of voting machines?,Was the vote certified on US AP criteria?,Can Arizona vote legally?,Are there any other reasons for voting machines failing?,Can the vote be certified?,Can the election vote legally in Arizona?
What are the dates that Corbyn is shown in a photo?,"Did this photo appear on the MailOnline website on June 26, 2016?",Are these dates true?,Is Corbyn wearing a white shirt?,Are there records of this photo?,Were the two people on the photo in one single photograph?
Did Hicks fail to pay all of his fines?,Did Hicks avoid paying most of his fines?,Did Hicks fail to pay all of his fines?,Did Hicks receive any awards for his efforts?,Did Hicks perform well?,Did Hicks receive a high percentage of his total fines?
Were the tax cuts approved for these families?,Was the percentage of tax cuts approved for these families the same as the percentage of those who do not have income to work?,Did the governor approve the tax cuts approved for these families?,Did these families not benefit financially?,Was the government's tax cuts approved for any of the families?
Did the study cite 120 murders that could have been prevented if communities worked with ICE and Homeland Security?,Did this study report the percentage of the total murders in this area?,Did this study indicate that murders were prevented because of community partnerships?,Did the study cite the year of crime that was blamed for the 120 murders?
Did Saudi Arabia pay 100% of cost for the cost of U.S. soldiers?,Is it clear that Saudi Arabia pays 100% of all costs for U.S. soldiers?,Is it true that all of the costs of U.S. soldiers are paid by Saudi Arabia?,Are they all military costs?
Is Biden reportedly asleep in a video recorded at the UN climate summit?,Is Biden reportedly snoring in a video recorded at the United Nations climate summit?,Is Biden lying in a video recorded at the United Nations climate summit?,Is Biden presumably snoring in a video recorded at the United Nations climate summit?
Was Clapper formally briefed by CNN's Jake Tapper in early January 2017?,Did Clapper make a private statement before the House Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence to indicate that he briefed Tapper?,Did Clapper formally brief Tapper in private testimony to the House Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence?
Did this tweet claim 43% of men in old black and white photos were non-binary?,Did this tweet have the intention of satire or deceit?,Did this tweet imply the image was non-binary?,Was this tweet meant to be humorous?,Was this tweet posted on Facebook or elsewhere?
Did this worker decline the PERS?,Did this worker make a positive and neutral decision about PERS?,Did this worker use his PERS money to save money?,Was this worker in favor of paying this employee's PERS expenses?,Would this worker have received any compensation for his PERS termination?,Did this worker make their PERS payments to pay for this employee's PERS termination?
Is the tombstone from 1875?,Did McCormick have a botched abortion?,Is this tombstone from 1875?,Has this tombstone been dated?,Do the tombstones for McCormick seem to be older than this particular photo?,Are there any other tombstones in the photos?
Did banks in Shanghai stop ATM operations because of COVID-19?,Does the COVID-19 outbreak affects all ATMs in Shanghai?,Did banks in Shanghai halt ATM operations as a precaution after receiving the alert?,Is it believed that banks in Shanghai stopped their ATM operations as a precaution because of the COVID-19 outbreak?
Did users who donated to charities on a one time basis receive the donation amount in monthly dollars for one year?,Did the payments come from a single donation?,Was the debit amount a separate payment for each month?,Would this method have been used by other users of Facebook?,Was the method of payment used by Facebook specifically a one time donation?
Did this priest have any previous criminal convictions?,Is this priest the person arrested?,Was the person arrested a Christian?,Has any other priest been arrested for an individual alleged crime?,Was this priest convicted for the same crime?,Have any other priests been arrested for alleged crimes?,Are any other clergy involved in the alleged crime?
Are there 22000 voters with the same phone number in Wisconsin?,Did they register on 1/1/1918?,Did these voters have any other issues?,Was there a large amount of uncounted voters in these states?,Are there additional issues with this data?,Are these data valid for all states?,Have these data been independently reviewed for accuracy?
Did the study show a 42 percent increase in graduation rate?,Does the study show a reduction in the racial achievement gap?,Are the findings consistent with prior studies?,Does the work involve all subjects?,Does the study provide specific data?,Did the findings increase graduation rates?,Does the work involve more black students than white students?
Did the koalas stray from the brothels?,Did Australia rescue the koalas?,Did the Australian rescuers save all the koalas?,Was this a first time save for an Australian?,Was this a zoo rescue?
Is this statistic accurate?,Did this crime statistic make an announcement in an inconclusive way?,Did the number of black murderers increase with population?,Was it accurate to cite crime statistics?,Are the following statistics accurate?,Does this rate vary between states?,Can this be verified on social media?
Was the cost of this measure the same for all senate races?,Was the cost of this measure equal to Measure 3-388?,Did the cost of this measure differ from any other measure?,Does the Cost of this measure include federal taxes?,Does this measure cover all senate races?,Did the cost of this measure cover all senate races?
Did Americans get rich in the 1950's?,Did people in the 1950's pay a top tax rate of 90%?,Did most Americans pay a top tax rate in the 1950's?,Did people in the 1950's pay a top tax rate of 90% in general?,Did people pay a top tax rate of 90% in particular?
"Did President Trump refer to the mass shooting in Dayton, Ohio, in August 2019 as having happened in Toledo, Ohio?","Was the shooting in Dayton, Ohio, actually occurring in Toledo, Ohio?","Is the shooting in Dayton, Ohio actually being happening in Toledo, Ohio?",Is Trump's assertion based on data reported from an investigation by a U.S. law enforcement agency?
Has the number of households with access to electricity increased?,Are 9 out of 10 households now connected to water?,Do all households presently have access to electricity?,Have any additional services been established?,Are the number of homes able to access electricity growing?,Are any other services being established?
Was Trump’s mother stating this?,Did Trump’s mother think he was a bad person?,Were social skills something Trump lacks?,Was Trump’s mom concerned about politics?,Would Trump be a disaster if elected to power if he entered politics?,Did Trump's mother wish Trump had not gone into politics?
Did Fox News put India’s Prime Minister at #2 among top 10 most corrupt Prime Ministers?,"Are these top 10 most corrupt Prime Ministers, of any country, criminals?","Did India’s Prime Minister rank in the top 10 most corrupt Prime Ministers, of any country, or criminals?","Did Modi rank in the top 10 most corrupt Prime Ministers, of any country, by Fox News?"
Does natural immunity protect better than vaccination?,Does natural immunity protect better than vaccination?,Was the mortality risk of an un-boosted person under age 30 zero?,Did Closing schools cause harm to children?,Do cloth face masks and school closures have any benefit or harm?,Was there any evidence to support the claims in this paper?
Did the video have some inflammatory content?,Were the three individuals beaten up or forced to chant Jai Shri Ram?,Are there any police reports of these incidents?,"Are these videos typically considered """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""?"
Did the president balanced the budget four straight years?,Was the debt paid off at all?,Did the debt amount exceed $405 billion?,Did the budget reflect this deficit?,Did the budget include revenue for the entire fiscal year?,Did the budget balance for each of these years include a revenue item?,Did the budget include tax revenue for four of these years?
Do you need more ivermectin if you are over 90 kilos?,Is ivermectin only available for those with a rash?,Do pregnant women have to take more ivermectin if they have a rash?,Is it necessary to take ivermectin to treat a rash?
Is Obama going to send 524 troops to protect the country?,Is the border more secure than McCains plan?,Are there plans to expand security through other means?,Will Obama's troops be the same as McCains and Kyls?,"if so, will the troops be the same?",Is this report based on a new estimate?
Does the video show Biden falling asleep during a conversation with Israeli Prime Minister Naftali Bennett?,Is the video from a live stream?,Has Biden fallen asleep during a live stream with Israeli Prime Minister Naftali Bennett?,Is there a video of Biden falling asleep in a live video interview with Israeli Prime Minister Naftali Bennett?
Has Clinton adopted a vegan diet?,Has there been any evidence of Clinton's adherence to a vegan diet?,Does this study support the claims made by People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals that in total 200 animals will be spared from eating a vegan diet?,Is there a documented example of Clinton adopting a vegan diet?
Did an armed insurrection occur on January 6?,Did the assault cause a large retaliatory response from the government?,Did an armed insurrection occur on January 6?,Was the attack of January 6 a large retaliatory response from the government?,Did the assault have an armed element?
"Did Milwaukee County spend more than $170,000 per employee for employees to participate in union activities such as collective bargaining in 2010?",Was it any amount?,"Is it true that Milwaukee County spent over $170,000 in salaries in 2010 for employees to participate in union activities such as collective bargaining?",Is this sum a true total?
Is this a complete list or a collection of numbers?,Is the information contained in this report sourced from a source that may be inaccurate or inaccurate?,Were these numbers sourced from independent sources?,Did these numbers contain anyone that was not verified?,Is the entire list of reported unconfirmed votes included in this report?
Did Churchill say people worry about what everyone thought?,Did Churchill say they cared what everyone thought when 20?,Did Churchill say they stopped caring what people thought when 40?,Did Churchill say that people knew no one was thinking about anyone when 60?,Does Churchill think those are the correct statements?
Did Jack Ma say 2020 was really just a year for staying alive?,Is 2020 a good year for staying alive?,Does this statement support 2020 as a good year for staying alive?,br>Does Jack Ma agree with all this information?,"br>More importantly, does Ma think 2020 will be a great year for business?"
Did Simac pay her property taxes eight out of the nine years for which she was reelected?,Does Simac pay property taxes every year for which she was elected?,Do Republicans claim to be involved in the recall of Simac?,Does the majority of voters support the Republican bid to re-elect Simac?
"Did OceanGate post a job listing during a crisis in which one of their submersibles, carrying five people, went missing in June 2023?","Did OceanGate post a new job listing during a crisis in which one of its submersibles, carrying five people, went missing in June 2023 en route to the Titanic wreckage?"
Did the research suggest polar bears may be wiped out by the end of the 21st century?,Was research published in July 2020 suggesting polar bears may be wiped out by the end of the 21st century?,Was the research published in July 2020 an official release?,Can polar bears survive longer than in the 21st century?
Did Ravish Kumar leave NDTV after Adani Group acquired 29.18% of NDTV stock?,Did Adani gain significant control of NDTV stock?,Are Adani stock prices above or below Nasdaq prices?,Has Adani been a sponsor of NDTV?,Has NDTV sold any stocks to Adani since June 2012?
Did Marcos and his wife open Credit Suisse accounts for money?,Did Marcos and his wife deposit US$68 million in their new accounts?,Did Marcos and his wife open new accounts for money?,Do Marcos and his wife currently have accounts with Credit Suisse?,Was Marcos married in the previous year?
Is there evidence that fentanyl seizures were an alarming rate because of Biden’s open border?,Is there evidence that illegal drugs are flowing into the United States at an alarming rate because of Biden's open border?,Does Biden’s open border contribute to illegal drugs smuggling?
Did 83 percent of votes get to Nancy Pelosi's seat voted in lock step with?,Did Glenn Nye votes in lock step with Nancy Pelosi at 80% of the time?,Are there any other recent polls on this subject in this regard?,Did this poll on this subject garner any publicity?
Has the death rate of males aged 15–19 years for COVID-19 risen due to the vaccine rollout?,Has there been increased mortality of males aged 15–19 years due to the vaccine rollout?,Do males between 15 and 19 years of age still die from COVID-19?
Does the 2011 measure passed into law eliminate the ability of the attorney general to settle lawsuits?,Did the 2011 legislation eliminate the ability of the attorney general to settle cases in court?,Was the 2011 legislation passed without Wendy Davis' support?,Does the 2011 law contain specific provisions allowing the attorney general to settle litigation?
Did Shapiro speak on New Zealand guns?,"Does Shapiro believe there are 200,000 armed individuals in New Zealand?","Did Shapiro say that there are 200,000 armed individuals in New Zealand?","Did Shapiro mention that there are 200,000 armed individuals in New Zealand?",Do you think Shapiro has made these statements before?
Did 25 schools in 2021 have attacks?,"Did 1,440 children go missing or killed during this period of time?",Did this number increase due to more attacks over this time frame?,Did there appear to be a decrease in attacks on schools during this time period?,Are there any other incidents associated with this time period?
Did Obama's governing tenure end with 8.3 million fewer Americans working than were there four years ago?,Did Obama's first term end in 2009?,Are there less fewer Americans working today than four years ago?,Is this a number of Americans working fewer today than four years ago?
Did Congress win Karnataka 2023 elections?,Was the child offering Namaz in the middle of a busy road?,Does the video include the kid's name and date of birth?,Did the kid participate in any other community activities?,Did the video show any repercussions for the young child?
Did the austerity measures discussed by Baerbock impact Germany's overall power consumption?,Did this measure result in an increase in German power consumption?,Does Baerbock expect Germany's electricity use to increase 20%?,Does Baerbock plan to lower Germany's electricity consumption by lowering its energy consumption by 20 percent?
What do I need to pay my husband to make up for this allowance?,Was there an increase in this amount as a result of the immigration reform?,Is there a minimum wage increase per week that you would need to pay your husband for this allowance?,Are the payments reversible?,Can this increase be applied retroactively to another pay period?
"Is it true that a scholarship from the Department of Education includes a P7,000 monthly stipend, a free tablet and books?","Is it true that a scholarship from the Department of Education includes a P7,000 monthly stipend, a free tablet and books?","Is it true that a scholarship from the Department of Education includes a P7,000 monthly stipend, a free tablet and books?"
Is it true that the only funding stream for Social Security is from people who get a wage?,Does there need to be a change in the funding mix for Social Security to make it sustainable?,Is there a difference in the amount of money being collected from people getting a wage from Social Security and other sources?
Did this video go viral on Twitter?,Did this moment go viral in Twitter?,Did this moment go viral on Twitter?,Are any people injured in this video?,Did this user take any actions in this video?,Are there any people in this video who are a result of this strike?,Have these people gotten back in the game?
Did border guards find 52 tons of guns and ammunition in conex containers disguised as furniture for Muslim immigrants?,Did the conex containers contain weapons for use by Muslim immigrants residing in the country?,Did the containers contain weapons for use by Muslims?,Did the conex containers contain weapons or ammo for religious reasons?
Did Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez say this statement?,Was Ocasio-Cortez a self-proclaimed speaker?,Did Ocasio-Cortez say this statement during the speech?,Did Ocasio-Cortez claim this statement in a public setting?
Did the man who picked up the tapeworm pull it out of his own intestine?,Did the tapeworm appear on any other person's person's body?,Did the tapeworm appear on any other man's body?,Did the man who picked up the tapeworm remove the tapeworm himself?
Was the young Nigerian first to perform a 30-minute human heart transplant?,Did this young Nigerian get funding from Peter Obi?,Did this young Nigerian work with Peter Obi on her research?,Do Peter Obi and other sponsors fund research on this young Nigerian?,Did the young Nigerian perform a 30-minute human heart transplant?
Was this substation vandalised during December 2020?,Was this substation vandalised in November 2021?,Is this substation associated with blackouts in South Africa?,Could blackouts in South Africa occur as a result of these blackouts?,Did this substation have blackouts during November 2021?
Will Netflix release The Disney Movie Collection in September 2016?,Is Netflix streaming of The Disney Movie Collection in November 2016?,Is Netflix purchasing The Disney Movie Collection in September 2016?,Will Netflix be offering The Disney Movie Collection for watching in September 2016?,Will Netflix be offering The Disney Movie Collection for streaming in September 2016?
Was the car white?,Was the person on the car white?,Was the vehicle caught on camera?,Was there no one in the car?,Was there any damage to the vehicle?,Did the car stop before entering a residential area?,Was the driver killed?,Did the car get stopped in Rinkerode on the way to Sendenhorst?,Did anyone in the car drive to a commercial area?
"Did over 3,000 trees are axed to build a helipad for Prime Minister Narendra Modi in Odisha?",Did the helipad not cost over $100 million to build?,Was the government required to cut all trees?,Are there any other trees on the site that may be of interest?
Does it require you to pay the toll charge if you return within 12 hours?,Did Gadkari announce that you need to pay the toll charge only once if you return within 12 hours?,Did Gadkari claim a change in the policy by a new announcement?,Was the move credited to Gadkari?
Did the rollout of the COVID vaccine result in the death of three children?,Did the vaccine rollout result in a reduction in hospitalization for an average of 3 patients per week?,Did the COVID vaccine result in a rise in the deaths of multiple patients for an average of.4 each patient per week?
Did 1 lakh convert to Buddhism in Jaipur on 16 October 2022?,Did people convert to Buddhism in Jaipur on 16 October 2022?,Does this event reflect the Buddhist beliefs?,Did these conversions happen in the last 6-7 years?,Does this event coincide with Hindu and Muslim festivals?,Would it have been successful if these conversions did not occur in the previous 6 years?
Did Ukraine destroy 280 tanks?,Did Ukraine use a missile?,Did the explosion occur in Ukraine or Ukraine?,Is this the first time this type of explosion has taken place in Ukraine?,Did this attack take place while it was raining?,Did this explosion take place in the Ukraine?,Is this a Russian attack?
Did he take a higher percentage of the Republican vote than any Republican governor in the 2014 elections?,Did he also carry independents by 12 points?,Did he take a higher percentage of the Republican vote than any Republican governor in the 2014 elections?,Did he take a higher percentage of the Republican vote but also carried independents by 12 points?
Did 10 million Ukrainians get denied the right to vote in Ukraine’s presidential election?,"Approximately how many Ukrainians did this ""fraud"" claim claim refer to?","Are more Ukrainians ""denied the right to vote"" in Ukraine's presidential election compared to the total number of Ukrainians?"
Did state government departments cut teachers after it was discovered Governor Rick Perry's administration was cutting teachers?,Are there any other state department departments cutting teachers?,"Can these state departments cut teachers with budget cuts because it's ""unrealistic""?",Is there any other state department that has cut teacher salaries?,Would this state government have been in any trouble with these state department departments?
Are all government workers unionized?,Are unionized employees paid a 42 percent higher rate than non-union employees?,Does the cost of public labor vary by sex?,Does sex pay change only for unionized employees?,Does all government pay change equal a better bargaining position for employees?
Did the number of ITRs filed during FY 2017-18 rise by 80.5% compared to FY 2013-14?,Has the number of ITRs filed during FY 2017-18 been at an increase of more than 80%?,Did the number of ITRs filed in FY 2017-18 differ in any other year?
Did the scientist live in the lab?,Was the basement home owned by the couple?,Was the lab known to be known to contain drugs?,Was the scientist ever found alive?,Did it get a lot of public attention?,Does the scientist seem like a normal person?,Did this person appear in a news report in a magazine?
Did the United Nations plan to flood America with 600 million migrants?,Did the United Nations plan to flood America with 600 million migrants?,Did the United Nations plan to flood America with 600 million migrants?,Did the United Nations plan to flood America with 600 million migrants?,Did the United Nations plan to flood America with 600 million migrants?
Did voters in all political parties lose in 2008?,Did the Libertarian Party receive additional registration in 2012?,Did the Democratic Party gain registration in 2012 or 2013?,Did Democratic Party losses continue into 2013?,Did Libertarian Party registration increases in 2012?,Did Libertarian Party registration increase in 2013?,Does this poll include Libertarian voters?
Does this estimate match any evidence of labor wages in general in Miami?,Does this estimate take into account the salaries of Miami women and other Latino men?,Are the earnings of Miami women and other Latino men identical to their white American counterparts?,Does this estimate exclude earnings by Latino women and other white people?
Did Obama stress the need for pandemic preparedness in 2014?,Did Obama address the need for U.S. pandemic preparedness in 2014?,Did Obama stress the need for pandemic preparedness during 2014?,Did Obama address the need for U.S. pandemic preparedness in 2014?
Did the MV Karagatan incident cause Ferdinand Marcos to declare martial law in 1972?,Were any laws made in regards to the MV Karagatan incident?,Did this event ultimately result in a nationwide ban?,Was this incident in a country with an indigenous population?,Were there any laws made in regard to the MV Karagatan incident?
Did Biden employ actors to portray marine guards in his speech?,Did Biden use actors to portray Marine guards during his speech?,Did Biden use actors to portray Marine guards in his speech?,Has Biden employed actors to portray Marine guards for an extended period of time?,Have Biden used actors to portray marine guards for an extended period of time?
Is this footage from a jihadi video?,Are these parents bidding farewell to their children before they kill themselves?,Did these parents survive this suicide attack?,Did the parents die in an alleged suicide attack?,Was the father alive when they died?,Does this video have any evidence to suggest that this couple is in any danger?
Did Zareen win gold medal?,Was the award monetary?,Was Zareen honoured for winning gold?,Have any other women in the world competed in the 2022 World Boxing Championship?,Have any renowned athletes at the 2022 Women’s World Boxing Championship been awarded?,Did any other national or international woman in the 2022 Women’s World Boxing Championship have received a golden medal?
Did Kenya's Founding Fathers build more roads despite being independent?,"Did presidents Moi and Kibaki build roads that were more than 11,200 kilometres?",Did Kenya's Founding Fathers spend 50 years on roads building?,Did President Moi and Kibaki spend more than 224 kilometers per year on roads building?
Does Trump say there is progress in border enforcement?,Has Trump placed more boots on the border than at any point in our history?,Has Trump used money to hire additional border officers?,Did Trump have an increased number of boots on the southern border compared to any other time in history?,Are there any other significant accomplishments relating to border enforcement?
Was the photograph taken in the name of the accused in Atiq Ahmed's murder case?,Did the accused in Atiq Ahmed's murder case also have a relationship with Akhilesh Yadav?,Did Yadav and Atiq Ahmed meet outside of the photo?
Did the Water Management District have a budget decrease in the four years Oakley was on the board?,Did Oakley protect local taxpayers over government bureaucrats?,Was the budget decrease in the four years Oakley was on the board 58 percent?,Did Oakley change policies to protect local taxpayers?
Did Trump ship more than a dozen tons of American masks and supplies?,Did Trump ship more than a dozen tons of American masks and supplies to China?,Is it true Trump shipped 17 tons of American masks and supplies to China?,Is Trump shipping more than a dozen tons of American masks and supplies to China?
Was this courtroom photo representative of the 11-year-old hacker?,Was the courtroom photo representative of the 11-year-old hacker who stole billions from a Swiss bank?,Was the courtroom photo representative of the 11-year-old hacker who stole billions from a Swiss bank?,Was the courtroom photo representative of the 11-year-old hacker who stole billions from a Swiss bank?
Did 7 of those first 7 children die?,Are children immune to COVID-19?,Did people die during the vaccination?,Were the first 7 children at the distribution center dead?,Are there any other statistics regarding the outbreak in this state?,Did the vaccine cause death?,Are these deaths related to the new vaccination?
Was the execution of Pastor Lawan Andimi a result of Andimi's refusal to renounce his Christian faith?,Did Andimi refuse to renounce his Christian faith?,Is Andimi considered one of the most hated individuals in Nigerian history?,Did Andimi leave his homeland?,Did Andimi receive any of the punishments mentioned in this paragraph?
Is there a record of Ryan not having a town hall within this district?,Do these town halls have a specific number of days in which Ryan was not in office?,Do Ryan say that there has been no town hall in his district for over 600 days?,Does Ryan have any record of the mayor of the district not having a town hall for over 600 days?
"Is it true that a Nigerian woman dies during pregnancy, childbirth, postpartum or after abortion?",Does it exist between 20-22%?,Is the risk of pregnancy death in Nigeria a significant problem?,"Is the risk of a Nigerian woman dying while pregnant, childbirth, postpartum or after abortion?",Is the lifetime risk a risk based on a national population?
Did the King sign a proclamation declaring Donald Trump won 2020?,Did Charles threaten Joe Biden and Kamala Harris with war?,Did Charles sign a proclamation declaring Donald Trump won 2020?,Did Charles threaten Joe Biden and Kamala Harris with war?,Did King Charles III sign a proclamation declaring Donald Trump won 2020?
Is the number of hospital beds significantly higher than the total number in 2013?,Has the number of hospital beds increased by 47%?,Is there a difference between the number of hospital beds in 2013 and the current number?,"Is there an increase from 56,069 to 82,291 hospital beds in total?"
Did Trump create a protective force?,Did Trump's trump force find over 300 missing kids in less than 30 days?,Did Trump's trump force find over 300 missing kids?,Did Trump's trump force find over 300 missing kids in less than 30 days?,Was Trump's trump force able to find 300 missing kids?
Would it be more constitutional to have indefinite postpone the election than to postpone the confirmation a day?,Is it true that Kennedy said this?,Do we know that Kennedy said this in a way that was not specific to the election?,Are there other examples of this claim?,Is this claim true?
Does Eskom generate 45% of Africa's electricity?,Is Eskom responsible for 65% of Africa's electricity?,Has Eskom created more power in Africa than any other entity?,Are the costs of electricity on a typical day of a typical month lower than most other forms of electricity?,Does Eskom produce less electricity yearly than other entities?
Did Reliance gain from the new farm laws?,Did Reliance gain from the new farm laws in the years after the new farm laws?,Did Reliance benefit from any of the new farm laws in the years since the new farm laws were introduced?,Did Reliance benefit from any of the new farm laws in the years after the new farm laws were implemented?
Is Kejriwal giving money to women in Himachal Pradesh?,Did the women in Himachal Pradesh receive anything from the central government?,Is there any evidence that Kejriwal has received money in support of his campaign?,Did this news release include any claims or information about Kejriwal?
Did environmental protestors left litter in Hyde Park?,Is the litter related to a specific area or protest?,Is the litter part of the environmental protests?,Is the litter part of the protests in general?,Is it clear whether the litter came from a specific area or multiple areas?
Did tourism increase after the passage of the bill?,How many tourists came to the country since the passage of the bill?,Did the bill increase in popularity since the passage of the bill?,Did the bill have more tourists in 2015?,Was the bill a huge increase from its predecessor bill?,Did the bill increase in popularity in 2015?
Did senior White House officials publicly admit to serving no purpose after their response to the White House's decision to conduct a missile strike on Syria in April 2017?,Did senior White House officials actually reveal their position to the public?,Did the White House admit to the public that their response to the White House's decision to conduct a missile strike on Syria was for no purpose?
Did Peters introduce anything that was not law in 6 years?,Is there evidence of Peters sponsoring bills that didn't become law?,Was this bill or other bill a success?,Did this bill become law?,Does this bill or this bill include the acronyms of other bills?,Was this bill or this bill a success or failure?,Did this bill get passed in committee?,Did the bill that was passed get referred to the President?
Did he attend any rallies in 2017?,Has the crowd at his rallies always been large?,Did he attend rallies in 2014?,Did the crowd at his rallies ever have an empty seat?,Did he attend rallies in 2015?,Did the crowds at his rallies ever have empty seats?
Did CNN publish contradictory reports about hydroxychloroquine in 2020?,Were CNN headlines about the report about hydroxychloroquine contradictory?,Was the headline about CNN contradictory?,Was the headline about CNN contradictory?,Did CNN publish contradictory reports about hydroxychloroquine in 2020?,Did CNN post contradictory reports about hydroxychloroquine in 2020?
"Did the tax increases in Michigan result in wealth, jobs, and people leaving the state?",Was the tax hike a major factor in the economy?,Do Michigan residents still complain about these taxes?,Did the tax hikes in Michigan reduce jobs in the state?,Are other state taxes on higher-than-normal incomes?
"Did the ""Ghost of Kyiv"" pilot shoot down 10 Russian military planes during the Russian invasion?","Did the pilot ""Ghost of Kyiv"" shoot down 10 Russian military planes?","Did the pilot ""Ghost of Kyiv"" shoot down 10 Russian military planes during the Russian invasion?"
"Did COVID-19 vaccines begin to be approved in India by April 24, 2019?","Was the COVID-19 vaccine approved in India until April 24, 2019?","Will the COVID-19 vaccine be issued before April 24, 2019?",Do Indias are vaccinated for COVID-19 as per its CDC recommendation?
What is missing from this article?,Did this person receive any benefits from this article?,Did this person receive any money in any way from this article?,Did this person receive any benefit from this article?,Will anyone see this article in the newspaper of Denmark?,Did this person's family receive any welfare from this article?
Did guns cause more deaths in the U.S. in 2022?,Has constipation killed as many people in the U.S.?,Did rifles cause more deaths than constipation in the U.S. in 2022?,Have a yearly increase in diseases caused more deaths in the U.S. in 2022?
Is there information about the pH range of coronavirus?,Is alkali food above the level of the virus?,Is there information about the relative pH levels between coronavirus and food?,Is it recommended that people consume alkaline food?,Is there evidence that Alkaline foods are good for the immune system?
Did it take that long for the number of crimes by criminal aliens in Texas?,"Is there any evidence to suggest that 666,536 crimes by criminal aliens were committed in the state in the last six years?",Was there any evidence that crime rates by criminal aliens in Texas decreased during this period?
Can you be certain the team was allowed to wear barefoot?,Did the team not have funds to buy shoes?,Did the team have shoes on the ground?,Is there any evidence that the team played barefoot in 1948?,Was the player playing barefoot during any other Olympics?,Did the player's appearance contribute to the idea of wearing barefoot?
Is it true that the Texas Board of Nursing has a backlog of 3000 complaints against nurses?,Are all of these complaints sexual assaults?,Are these complaints related to malfeasance?,Are these cases on record as being similar?,Does this backlog include other types of complaints?,Has the Board of Nursing contacted these individuals to resolve their complaints?
Does the US spend a large amount on teach drinking responsibly?,Are these prostitutes also taught how to drink responsibly?,Is the US government responsible for the spending?,Does the US spend money on teach drinking responsibly?,Does the US Government spend money on teach drinking responsibly?,Are the prostitutes being taught drinking responsibly?
"Did Robinson receive a $160,000 yearly pension for life after Obama left office?",Did Robinson receive this pension before Obama came to office?,Will Robinson receive this pension when Obama leaves office?,Is Robinson receiving this pension?,Was Robinson's death attributed to Obama's policies?,Does Robinson have any siblings?
Is there a limit to the amount that a family could pay for health care?,Is there a limit to the number of members in the family?,"Is it typical for most families to pay $30,000 per year in health care?",Is there a limit on the number of people the family can bring in for health care?
Did McDonald's donate 3 Big Mac meals to all social media posts that were shared by everyone?,Did the promotion celebrate McDonald's 80th anniversary?,Is this promotion available on Facebook?,Has McDonald's held this promotion in the past?,Is this promotion offered on other social media sites?,Is this promotion a current offer from McDonald's?
Does a spider bite from a Brazilian wandering spider cause an erection that lasts up to four hours?,Does a spider bite from a Brazilian wandering spider cause an erection that lasts up to four hours?,Is it known that there is a common name for this spider?
Did Allegian Airlines celebrate 23rd Birthday by providing 2 free tickets?,Was the birthday celebration for Allegian Airlines limited to a certain date and time?,Has Allegian Airlines offered this promotion to any other airlines?,Did Allegiant Airlines offer this promotion for other airlines?,Will Allegian Airlines ever offer this promotion again?
Did Biden's COVID-19 Task Force suggest withholding social benefits from those who refuse to be vaccinated?,Was this suggestion made by Biden's COVID-19 Task Force?,Was this recommendation made in response to a report from Biden's COVID-19 Task Force?
Did the BBC have employees dancing after England won the ICC World Cup 2019?,Does this event occur within the BBC network?,Has this event occurred in any other news network besides the BBC?,Were the people who danced in this event at a time other than the ICC World Cup 2019?,Did these people dance in this event in any other way besides a regular event?
Did Modi take out a mortgage on Lucknow Airport for 46 crores for 50 years?,Is Lucknow Airport profitable per year?,Did Modi have any debts after buying the airport?,Did Modi sell Lucknow Airport for more than what he borrowed?,Did Modi make any profits after buying Lucknow Airport?
Did this video show the moment a Boeing 747 Ethiopian Airlines plane crashed near Addis Ababa?,Was this video from the actual crash site?,Did the plane have a safety certificate?,Does this video show the initial landing spot?,Did this plane use a GPS before the crash?,Did this crash have a fatality?
Did 24 million people stop looking for work?,Is the percentage of people who have quit looking for work lower than that of those who have already?,Is the number of people who have stopped looking for work lower than that of those who have already?,Does the percentage that stopped looking for work have any correlation to other factors?,Are there other reasons for people to stop looking for work?
Did Obama give $150 billion to an enemy of the United States?,Did Pelosi and Schumer help Obama give $150 billion to an enemy of the United States?,Did Pelosi and Schumer help Obama give $150 billion to an enemy of the United States?,Was the President of the United States an enemy of the United States?,Did Obama give $150 billion to an enemy of the United States?,Did the President of the United States give $150 billion to an enemy of the United States?
Did Batsarashkina shoot one-handed?,Did the person who scolded Batsarashkina mention that rules for pistol sports require one-handed stances?,Was Batsarashkina scolded for shooting one-handed?,Did Twitter users scold Batsarashkina for shooting one-handed?
"Did Richardson pass legislation passing soldiers $400,000 in life insurance?",Has Richardson passed a similar bill in other states?,"Did Richardson pass legislation that gave soldiers $400,000 in life insurance?",Have other states passed similar laws?,Did the act that Richardson passed affect the National Guard?,Did the National Guard ever pass legislation providing insurance for soldiers?
Did California’s Prop 60 require women to use condoms in adult films?,Is California’s Prop 60 going to result in lawsuits and harassment?,Was California’s Prop 60 considered a deterrent against women's filming?,.Do women's films have an impact on their earnings?
Will Russia launch the world’s first COVID-19 vaccine in mid-August 2020?,Was Russia originally planning on launching the vaccine in the late 1960s?,Is Russia currently working on a vaccine for COVID-19?,Has Russia ever produced an experimental vaccine to prevent COVID-19?
Did a mural depicting people wearing masks in Denver International Airport in 1994?,Is it true that this mural depicts people wearing masks in Colorado?,. Are there records that this mural was in Denver?,. Is there any evidence to indicate a time period in Denver International airport of this mural?
Did NASA record this video?,Does this video have any identifying information?,Is the information listed in the description for this video?,Is there evidence of aliens flying these UFOs?,Does this video have images of UFOs in this video?,Is the footage from this video unlabelled?,Is this video considered to be a true proof of aliens flying these UFOs?
Did the first train start in December 1809?,Was there any interesting events during the journey?,Is the first train journey worth watching?,br> Do some of the interesting events appear on this video?,br> Do some of the interesting events appear on this video?,br> Did the first train start in December 1809?
Does the planet have 8 or 9 years to go underwater?,Will most major cities need to be underwater in eight or nine years?,Will major cities in the near future need to be underwater?,Is there any indication this was a specific quote by Bernie?,Is there any other evidence that suggests Bernie would be correct?
Did the stimulus bill generate jobs in 2009?,Has there been a major job loss since 2009?,Is the stimulus plan responsible for more job losses than the overall economy?,Is the stimulus bill responsible for much job losses?,Is the stimulus bill responsible for job losses more than other economic events?,Was the stimulus in 2009 a natural recession?
Did Ryan cut the amount of embassy security in his budget by $300 million below what I asked for?,Did Ryan cut the amount of embassy security in his budget by $300 million below what I asked for?,Did Ryan cut the amount of embassy security in his budget by $300 million below what I asked for?
Did Obama create over 3 million jobs since taking office?,Has there ever been a president in history who created more jobs in the first five months than Trump?,Has Trump created more jobs than most ever in a first five months?,Has Trump created jobs more successfully than any other president in a first five months?
Has the practice of hammering an ice pick into a patient's brain through eye sockets ever been done?,Has the practice of hammering an ice pick into a patient's brain through eye sockets ever been done?,Has the practice of hammering an ice pick into a patient's brain through eye sockets ever been done?
"Was this incident in Draketown, Georgia, 2018.?",Did these neo-Nazis perform this Nazi salute?,Does this scene imply that the person performing this Nazi salute did so against the will of the Native Americans?,Is this incident considered to be a racist incident?
Will Britain still be paying £26 billion to £32 billion a year in a no deal Brexit?,Would the money still be worth £26 billion to £32 billion after the Brexit?,Would the UK still be requiring yearly payments of up to £26 billion and up to £32 billion in a no deal Brexit?
Was Italy going against WHO's 'law' against COVID-19 autopsies?,"Did Italy discover that COVID is not a virus, but a bacteria?",Did Italy rely on a bacterium rather than virus to diagnose Covid?,"Did Italy find that COVID is not a virus, but a bacterium?"
Are the cars in the photograph from Ohio?,Did the cars involved in the accident have a taylors license?,Was the accident in Ohio occurred on a Tuesday morning?,Is the photographer known for this photograph?,Was the accident in Ohio occured at night?,Did the car crash occur in Ohio during the day?
Did Disneyland sell a snack with peanut butter during spring of 2021?,Has Disneyland ever sold a snack with a side of peanut butter before?,Is there any evidence that there was a corn dog with peanut butter in Disney's Spring 2021 Resort?,Did Disneyland ever sell a snack with a side of peanut butter in Summer of 2021?
Is this the first time this happened?,Was this a single incident?,Is there any video showing this?,Did this incident occur during a Starbucks rush?,Is this an ongoing event?,Is this event the first time this happened?,Are there any other recent arrests with this type of group?
"Is there evidence that ""Avoiding the Future Plague"" is a satire?",Does the satire exist despite the title?,Does the satire exist despite the date of the video being released?,Does the satire aim to offend or offended?,Does the satire exist in 2020?
Is Ukraine training child soldiers to fight Russian troops in 2022?,Did Ukraine do the training?,Did Russian troops attack the Ukraine?,Is Ukraine training child soldiers to fight Russian troops in 2022?,Has Russia fought child soldiers to date?,Is Russian military involvement in Ukraine a concern for United States?
"In the next two years, we'll spend more on interest on our national debt than we do on defense?",Is this an accurate report?,Did this report show that we'll spend more on interest on our national debt than we do on defense?,Is this an accurate report?,Can this report be relied on for more information?
Has the walrus cause damage to boats in Norway?,"Does the walrus weigh 1,500 lbs?",Has the walrus caused boats to sink in Norway?,Is the walrus capable of climbing a boat?,Was the walrus released from a vessel?,Are there any other animals that can cause boats to sink?
Are all ingredients in the smoothie able to help you lose 7 pounds?,"Is the juice of Cucumber, Lemon, Ginger, and Pineapple in a bottle?",Is the fruit and spices listed in this juice safe to eat?,Is this juice safe to take in a large amount?
What will each asylum seeker get paid per week?,Does each asylum seeker receive a minimum £57 per week?,Is this amount included in the government's average weekly payments?,Is there an information gap between the average weekly payments and the actual amount?,Is this a specific number or percent of the total number of asylum seekers?
Has Albert Bourla said the vaccine does not have the ability to prevent the onset of the disease?,Does Albert Bourla deem the vaccine to provide very limited protection?,Was Albert Bourla the CEO of Pfizer?,Did Albert Bourla state that the vaccine offers very limited protection?,Did a large number of people die from the onset of the disease with the vaccine?
Are we talking about a 'high-level exercise' that was conducted 3 months ago?,Are there other recent examples of how a Coronavirus Pandemic could kill 65 million people?,Is it true the 'high-level exercise' showed that a Coronavirus Pandemic could kill 65 million people?
Did these refugees attack the boy?,Did the girl say the story?,Has the girl been able to get medical care to help them?,Has this video been shared widely?,Has anyone been able to help them?,Did this video come with a release date?,Are these injuries fatal?,Is there evidence of these injuries?
"Is Elgin, IL a city where 17 women discover they’re all pregnant?",Is the local population of the city greater than 1000 people?,Did all of the women have sex with a local man?,Was there a marriage record for any of the women?,Did the couples all have sex with the same man?
Did the ship sail down the Bermuda Triangle?,Was the ship seen in a photo?,Did the ship ever return to the ocean?,Did the ship sail a long distance south?,Has any evidence for the ship ever been found?,Did the ship sink near the Bermuda Triangle?,Has any ship had an upcoming expedition?
Did official Russian and pro-Russian accounts claim that the killings and images of dead bodies in Bucha were staged?,Is one video from Bucha showing people pretending to be corpses?,Has anyone independently verified these claims?,Do official reports agree with these claims?,Is the video alleged that the video shows people pretending to be corpses?
"Did voters in Maricopa County, Arizona, lose more or less than 1.9 million votes?",Is there a record number of voters that are losing more than 1.9 million votes?,"Did 35,000 votes be added to the voting list in Maricopa County?",Did the voters lose more than 1 million votes from voting?,Are there any other ways that voters can lose votes from voting?
Is there information on how much per student funding has dropped over time for the Florida State University system?,Do the rates shown for the Florida state university system reflect the overall percentage of funding that is increased or decreased in comparison to those listed?,Have overall per student funding in the state university system remained consistently the same over time?
Did Donald Trump wear a face mask during the election?,Did two-thirds of Americans disapprove of Trump wearing a face mask in public?,Did three quarters of Americans support Trump's face mask ban?,Was there an exact percentage of Americans who disapproved of Trump wearing a face mask in public?
Did these two pieces of legislation result in the California shipping backlog?,Did these two pieces of legislation create the California shipping backlog?,Does AB 5 prohibit owner operators?,Is AB 5 based on a valid source?,Did the California truck ban originate with the California Truck Ban?,Did all of these provisions have an effect on shipping in California?
Did the tax cuts decrease the deficit over 10 years?,Did the tax cuts contribute less to the deficit than Obama's stimulus in one year?,Will an extended tax cut make the deficit smaller under these conditions?,Did Obama's stimulus have higher cost per household?,Would extending the tax cuts make the deficit smaller under these circumstances?
"Do illegal aliens, people who qualify for other insurance, and people who make over $70,000 per year not count people who are uninsured?",Is there a significant gap between uninsured and covered?,Is the estimated 15 million figure for uninsured higher than the stated average?
Did the U.S. Department of the Interior remove gray wolves from the Endangered Species Act?,Did the U.S. Department of the Interior remove gray wolves from the Endangered Species Act?,Are the states and tribes responsible for managing and protecting gray wolves?,Is there any other specific policy changes associated with gray wolves affecting states and tribes?
Was the person arrested wearing blackface?,Was the person arrested wearing blackface?,Did the person who wore blackface look or act in the photo?,Did the person arrested wearing blackface ever become a household name?,Was the person arrested wearing blackface in the photo?,Did the photo show the person wearing blackface?
Did Obama increase the number of unemployed women?,Did Obama increase the number of unemployed women by any significant amount?,Are there only a small number of unemployed women today?,Have unemployed women increased significantly since Obama took office?,Is it possible for an individual to become unemployed and not have children?
Did Tubman ever claim to have freed thousands of slaves?,Did Tubman agree with that statement?,"Does Tubman know whether or not a number of slaves did indeed become free, or indeed if anyone knew about slaves?",Was Tubman the author of a memoir about slaves?
Does Russia discount oil at 40%?,Are Indians aware of sanctions?,Does India take advantage of the moment?,Was this oil purchased at a discount?,Are India's sanctions known?,Did the country use this discount to fuel its oil supply?,Was the discount based on the amount of oil purchased?,Did the company purchase the oil at a discount?,Did this organization participate in the sanctions?
Does this tax plan have a better tax-free payment?,Will the 401(k) plan have a better tax-free payment than the existing tax-free payment?,Will the 9-9-9 plan have a better tax-free payment than the current tax-free payment?,Would this plan be easier to get under under other tax-free payment schemes if it were a tax-free payment?
Is Florida's stand your ground law responsible for a decrease in violent crime?,Has Florida's stand your ground law made it much harder for gun crimes to happen?,Has Florida's gun violence rate been decreasing since 2005?,Is the reintroduction of Stand Your Ground Law a necessary factor in reducing gun violence?
Would this bill force teachers to recite the Ten Commandments at school?,Would this bill require teachers to perform this speech at school?,Would this bill require public schools to recite the Ten Commandments in order to maintain civil rights?,Will this bill require public schools to perform this speech on a daily basis?
Did Hayworth support the renovation of a Maine blueberry farm?,Did Hayworth fund snowmobile trails?,Did Hayworth support the construction of a Vermont snowmobile trail?,Did Hayworth support programs that focused on preserving Vermont forests?,Is Hayworth famous for supporting his own causes?,Would Hayworth endorse any specific political causes?
Is this circular about banks only or does it cover any other category of banks?,Was there any restriction in this circular?,Did the circular address any specific industries of banks?,Did the circular allow bank employees to work for any specific period?,Did this circular include restrictions of how long people could work for banks?,Did the circular say all banks were not covered by this restriction?,Was the Circular specific to specific banks?
Was McCaskill a liberal voter for amnesty?,Was McCaskill in favor of amnesty?,Did McCaskill participate in campaigns that supported amnesty?,Did McCaskill support granting amnesty to 11 million illegal immigrants?,Does this support appear to have been established by McCaskill?
Does the French virologist think COVID-19 vaccines will kill people in 2 years?,Did Montagnier predict there would be a death in 2 years with vaccines?,Did Montagnier write his statement in an article?,Was Montagnier speaking at a conference?,Was Montagnier an expert in the vaccine?,Was Montagnier a virologist?
Are 22.5 million additional Nigerians now able to access potable water?,Are 22.5 million of these individuals eligible for Medicaid?,Are there any limitations to access for these individuals?,Is the increase purely political?,Is the increase purely economic?,Can this increase be attributed to poverty?
Can you verify that this statement is true?,Is there anything in this statement that could indicate that a larger number of people will be entering the country illegally than those born in the country?,Are the numbers of illegal migrants in this statement inaccuracy?,Were there enough illegal immigrants to create a negative effect for the economy in this country?,Do any legal immigrants posses a negative impact on the economy?
Did this image include the father of the Hathras accused?,Did the photograph include the father of the Hathras accused?,Have these images been publicized before?,Do these images include any other people?,Are the photos public?,Have these images been publicized before?,Does this image include any specific individuals?
Did Cunningham get tax incentive?,Did Cunningham take advantage of this tax incentive?,Did Cunningham pay for this tax incentive?,Was there a tax incentive to install this new pantry?,Was this work part of a tax incentive?,Did Cunningham pay the tax incentive?,YES?
Was General Electric expected to get $4.55 billion for GE?,Was China planning to buy General Electric for more than $4.55 billion?,Was China set to purchase GE for more than $4.55 billion for GE?,Were there other Chinese company plans to purchase GE?,Were Chinese plans to purchase GE for more than $4.55 billion?
Did a conference of U.S. governors vote to impeach Nancy Pelosi?,Will Pelosi be impeached?,Did this result in Pelosi being removed from office?,Did a majority of these governors support impeaching Pelosi?,Did these governors think they had done a good job impeaching Pelosi?
Did two-thirds of the Hurricane Sandy relief bill have nothing to do with Sandy?,Did Hurricane Sandy relief bills specifically fund relief to Sandy victims?,Did the relief bill cover only Sandy relief recipients?,Did the relief bill cover Sandy aid recipients?,Did the relief bill specifically cover Sandy relief recipients?,Did the hurricane relief bill cover only Sandy aid recipients?
"Has the Indian government reported 5,213 incidents of Naxal attacks since Amit Shah became home minister?",Has this increase been due to other forces?,Has this increase in attacks been due to other forces?,Has this increase in attacks been due to other forces?,Has the issuance of this document resulted in new Naxal attacks?
Did the police find the bodies after the police had been investigating their case?,Was the freezer in which they found the bodies safe from theft?,Was the black Lives Matter sign visible on the bodies?,Did the bodies contain many people?,Was the black Lives Matter sign visible in the freezer or refrigerator that the police found?
Do Connecticut gun laws ban assassination?,Is Connecticut's assault weapons ban a part of the country's strictest gun control laws?,Is Connecticut's assault weapon ban one of the country's toughest?,Has Connecticut's gun control law been criticized for a number of gun related actions?
Did the helicopter that the team was on fire have 30 people on it?,Did the helicopter crash happen as they were running away?,Was the team forced to abandon their vehicle and wait for rescue?,Is there evidence the team lost all of its team members?,Is there evidence of the team being killed in Afghanistan?
"Are legislators ""ramming through a provision that'll make investigations like #NC09 less transparent""?",Would this provision make investigations like #NC09 less transparent?,Would this provision result in investigations like #NC09 being less transparent?,Are all investigations like #NC09 transparent?,Do there plans to prevent investigations like #NC09 being transparent?
Did the administration refuse to expand Medicaid in Texas?,Will all veterans in Texas not be eligible for health insurance under Perry's plans?,Did Perry reject the Medicaid expansion because of the Obamacare plans?,Is it too risky to reject Medicaid in Texas?,Is the Obamacare plan already available in Texas?
Is there evidence that 1% cuts to the budget amount to $13 billion?,Is there evidence that 1% cuts to the budget amount to $13 billion?,Is there evidence of 1% cuts to the budget amount to more than 1 billion?,Is it true that 1 percent cuts each year equals $13 billion?
Does the video show a housewarming party at 10 Downing Street?,Was the housewarming party recorded?,Did the host show off the interior of the house?,Was the host on camera during the celebration?,Was the host part of a political team?,Did the host make use of a t-shirt?
Did UPS mail me an email with a UPS logo and picture?,Did UPS send me an email asking me to take a 30-second survey?,Was there any claim in this email that the reward was exclusive?,Was there any information to support any claim in this email?,Did UPS send me an email saying that they had a reward in this email?
Are millennials getting the Bernie 2020 logo tattooed on their face to show support?,Is the Bernie 2020 logo tattooing an indication of support for the candidate?,Have tattoos on people with the Bernie 2020 logo been in circulation for more than two years?,Did the Bernie 2020 logo tattoos attract many individuals?
Has Suella Braverman claimed expenses for her parents' electricity bills?,Have Suella Braverman expenses paid for her parents' electricity bills?,Have Suella Braverman expenses paid for her parents' electricity bills?,Did Suella Braverman claim to pay her parents' electricity bills?,Are there other explanations for why Suella Braverman has claimed expenses for her parents' electricity bills?
Did Grimes support the Obamacare plan that cuts $700 billion from seniors' Medicare?,Did Grimes support Obamacare in the sense that it provided a better coverage?,Does Grimes support Obamacare in that this plan cuts $700 billion from Medicare?,Was Grimes supportive of these changes to Medicare?
Was the video filmed by BJP and in the Karnataka election?,Is there evidence that cash is taken out of the spare tyre?,Did the BJP run this election?,Is it plausible that the BJP run this election?,Is it necessary to track this person down?
Was the donation to fight coronavirus made by SRK?,Is the donation from SRK made for the combating of coronavirus?,Did the donation result in a decrease in the cost of the virus?,Has the donation amount was calculated according to the estimates of this country?
Did Ambani donate 3 gold crowns?,Does Ambani donate gold to Ram Mandir?,Did Ambani donate gold to Ram Mandir?,Was Ambani donating gold to Ram Mandir?,- Ambani is donating gold to Ram Mandir. - Is Ayodhya related to India?
"Do ""Chicken Packs"" serve two people?","Is McDonald's ""Chicken Pack"" advertised in ads?","Is ""Chicken Pack"" sold in restaurants with multiple locations?","Does McDonald's ""Chicken Pack"" have a limited availability?",Does McDonald's use a limited quantity?
"Did the fires in Hawaii have no response from local, regional or federal officials?",Did the fires in Hawaii affect any villagers?,Did the fires in Hawaii cause any death or injury?,Did the fires in Hawaii cause any injuries?,Has any state or federal official received any public assistance?,Has anyone else in the state ever received any aid?
Is the amount of carbon that Bezos will put into the atmosphere during his 180 second space mission true?,Is the amount of carbon a given in the sentence that Bezos will put into the atmosphere while in space?,Is Bezos going to put an amount of carbon into the atmosphere while in space?
Did the tax bill give 80 percent of its benefits to the top 1 percent?,Did the Republicans and President Trump pass a tax bill?,Did the tax bill only benefit the top 1 percent?,Is there any evidence that any of the tax benefits in the bill were intended to go to the top 1 percent?
Did Scott cut $20 million in funding for mental health care?,Is Florida already at the bottom of the country for mental health care?,Did Scott stop funding for mental health care?,Did Scott end the funding for mental health care?,Are there any reports on Scott saying that he cut funding for mental health care?
Did Duterte abolish the K-12 education system in any way?,Was Duterte's order to abolish the K-12 education system official?,Did the order to abolish the K-12 education system come from Duterte?,Has Duterte made any other order to abolish the K-12 education system?
Did three members of the Irish Mob Midgets in Boston enter or leave the country on drugs?,Was the total number of arrests a criminal gang?,Was the entire group associated with a crime gang?,. Did the arrests occur in Boston?,. Did the arrests occur in other states?
"How many people are not working, or who are not looking for work?",Are 90 million Americans either not working or looking for work?,Are 90 million Americans considered to be unemployed?,Are these number associated with a group of Americans in the top ten that are not looking for work?,Are there other numbers associated with unemployment?
Is it true that immigrant detainees accounted for 75% of federal drug possession convictions and 5 - 30% of convictions for murder and kidnapping plus two other crimes?,Was this information given to be accurate and complete?,Was this report based on reliable sources?,Was the percentage of convictions for drugs attributed to immigrant detainees higher than the proportion for murder and kidnapping?,Was the percentage of convictions for drug possession and murder and kidnapping higher than the percentage for murder and kidnapping?
Did Bush spend $100 million in worker training in 2012?,Did Obama invest over $100 million in worker training?,Did Obama invest in worker training after 2012?,Did Obama invest in worker training after 2012?,Did Obama invest in worker training after 2012?,Does Obama claim to have poured $100 million into worker training?,Were there any other significant worker training investments between 2012 and 2013?
Did Bush have a 90 percent approval rating after the First Gulf War?,Did Bush receive higher ratings after the Gulf War?,Did Bush receive higher ratings after the first Gulf War?,Was the majority of Bush’s approval rating higher after the Gulf War?,Did Bush receive higher ratings after the first Gulf War?,Did the majority of Bush’s approval rating after the first Gulf War?
Did Clinton wait on Air Force One at Los Angeles International Airport?,Did Clinton get a $200 haircut on Air Force One?,Did Clinton stop at another airport during the flight?,Does this incident raise questions about the security of Los Angeles International Airport?,Are there any other incidents about Bill Clinton that hold up air traffic?
Did Walker say that Act 10 made the counties budget slightly less than the $28 million cut in aid?,Does Walker agree that Act 10 was needed to fill the hole left by the cut in state aid?,Was Walker willing to say that it took millions of dollars off of Milwaukee County budgets for the 2016 fiscal year?
Did Kloppenburg put an 80-year-old farmer in jail for refusing to plant native vegetation on his farm?,Is Kloppenburg currently a member of the Wisconsin Supreme Court?,Did Kloppenburg place the farmer in jail for refusing to plant native vegetation?,Did Kloppenburg place the 80-year-old farmer in jail for refusing to plant native vegetation?
"Was whipped cream banned in South Korean cafes in January, 2019?",Did whipped cream ever appear in the country?,Did whipped cream ever appear on a menu in a South Korean cafe in the U.S. before 2020?,Do whipped creams still have their shelf life?,"Was the ban effective for all cafés in the U.S. in January, 2021?"
Did the BJP meet with Rajnath Singh?,Are there any records of the meeting?,Have any MPs requested to take back the NRC?,Did a senior BJP politician ask for the NRC to be taken back?,Did any MPs ask for the CAA to be taken back?
Did the total number of marijuana arrests in 2017 exceed the total number of violent crime arrests?,Did marijuana arrests contribute to fewer violent crime arrests compared to violent crime arrests combined in 2017?,Did marijuana arrests contribute to more robberies compared to robberies combined in 2017?
Was this person in a photograph?,Was this person a pilot on a plane in Afghanistan?,Did this person fall from a plane in Afghanistan?,Was this person a pilot in a plane in Afghanistan?,Did this person fall from a plane in Afghanistan?,Did this person die in combat during this shooting?
Are sexual assault survivors who report having been attacked by a ridesharing driver at a rate of one per month?,Were sexual assault survivors who reported having been attacked by a ridesharing driver that had also reported a sexual assault incident?,Does Austin's Stop Abuse for Everyone investigate these allegations?
Can people trading cryptocurrencies use Ai Biticodes?,Can someone trading cryptocurrencies through Ai Biticodes use BTC Ai 360?,Is there any information available on how to trade cryptocurrencies using Ai Biticodes?,Will people be able to buy cryptocurrencies on Ai Biticodes?
Did a voucher school collect taxpayer subsidies since their first opening?,Did the voucher school receive $5.4 million in taxpayer subsidies this year?,Has the voucher school's revenue increased since its first opening?,Does the voucher school have any students currently enrolled?,Was the voucher school closed after 9 days?,Did the voucher school collect taxpayer subsidies after its first opening?
Have 90% of mass shootings occurred in so-called ‘gun-free zones’?,Are there any other areas where mass shootings have occurred?,Do gun-free zones pose an advantage to mass shootings?,Do gun-free zones have a more favorable security situation compared to non-gun-free areas?
Is it true that this plan would raise taxes on nearly one in three Wisconsinites?,Will it sunset Social Security and Medicare?,Is this plan expected to result in a raise in taxes for this group?,Are any of these issues in the plan discussed?,Is this plan endorsed by one of the party's governors?
Has any of Cicilline's bills been advanced past the embryonic committee stage?,Has Cicilline's bill passed through Congress on a single occasion?,Has Cicilline sponsored any bills before this point?,Would Cicilline have voted against the bill before it was voted on?,Would Cicilline have voted against any of the bills before it was voted on?
Is Biden a believer in a $5 gas card in his proposed plan?,Is this a proposal Biden would endorse?,Is it an endorsement of Biden's proposals for giving $5 gas cards?,Is the proposed $5 gas card a proposal Biden would back for 2019?
"Has Texas employed one inspector per 4,500 oil and gas wells?","Has Texas hired one inspector per 4,500 oil and gas wells?",Is Texas a large state?,Does Texas have a lot of oil and gas wells?,Is Texas a large state?,Is Texas an ample state?
Did Amarillo support a retirement age increase based on income?,Did Amarillo vote to cut retiree taxes to help fund retirement?,Would the process not be fully implemented until around the turn of the century?,Was the plan fully implemented before the turn of the century?,Did Amarillo vote for a retirement age increase of 70?
Did Duterte have a 91% approval rating in Pulse Asia?,Was Duterte's approval rating all inclusive?,Did Duterte approve of everything?,Was Duterte's approval rating all inclusive?,Was the 91% approval rating a 100% approval rating?
Did Kenya's defence minister admit Raila Odinga won the 2022 presidential election?,Has the video been edited?,Did the aforementioned video appear on the web?,Did a copy of the video surface at some point prior to the statement being released?,Did the aforementioned video contain multiple shots of the cabinet meeting?
Was there a giant moon in the Arctic during this video clip?,"Could this be one of the rare, large-scale moons to appear in the Arctic?",Did the large moon disappear in 30 seconds?,Was this a recent sighting of the large moon in the Arctic?,Did the large moon disappear in 30-seconds?
Will people who committed involuntarily for 72 hours under the Baker Act get their guns back automatically and immediately upon discharge?,Will people who committed involuntarily for 72 hours under the Baker Act receive their guns back automatically and immediately upon discharge?,Will the Baker Act never register the people involved with the commitment?,Will Baker Act gun confiscators be notified of gun confiscations when the program is in place?
Is it true that Democrats in the last four years increased discretionary spending by 30 percent?,Is it true that Republicans in the past 8 years didn't increase it by 1?,Is it true that Republicans in the past 8 years didn't increase it by 1?,Can we say the Democrats increased spending in the last four years in all of the previous years?
Was Trump delivered supplies in Texas during a winter storm?,Was Trump delivery supplies during a winter storm?,Did Trump deliver supplies for a winter storm?,Did Trump deliver supplies during a winter storm?,Did the video show Trump being helped during a winter storm?,Were there any other videos showing Trump in Texas during a winter storm?
Did Trump refer to Cramer’s healthcare bill as mean?,Did Trump refer to Cramer’s health care repeal bill as “mean” because it gutted protections for preexisting conditions in North Dakota?,Did Trump even refer to Cramer’s health care repeal bill as a “mean” bill?
Is there evidence of Clinton warning about Trump deplorables?,Did Clinton say Trump deplorables were the biggest threat to America?,Did Clinton say Trump deplorables were the biggest threats to America?,Did Clinton talk to the students at the University of California Berkeley about Trump deplorables?
Did Saudi Arabia announce plans to build a 100-mile long skyscraper megacity in July 2022?,Is the megacity plan based on an existing urban area?,"Specifically, would the megacity be built on land that was already inhabited?",Are any other cities planned as megacities?
Is there an accurate number of city employees with salaries $60.00?,Did Austin have any employees earning these salaries?,Was the city budget for hiring employees $60.00 for 2013?,Is there any way to determine the salaries Austin has?,Can one check on the city budget for 2016 and estimate its numbers?
Did this billboard have Trump's name on it?,Did this billboard advertise for Trump?,"Does this billboard advertise for Trump on I-170 near St. Louis, Missouri?",Would Trump have liked this billboard if he had used the Gospel verse on it?,Did this billboard have Trump's name on it?
Is there more than half as many Georgia technical college students than there were two years ago?,Is there less than half the number of Georgia technical college students than there were two years ago?,Is there more students in Georgia technical college than there were two years ago?,Is there more than half the number of Georgia technical college students than there were two years ago?
Did Netflix release a film poster showing young girls in sexualized manner?,Did the film poster portray young girls in a sexualized manner?,Is it true that many viewers experienced sexualized content in the film poster?,Is the video content in the film poster in an unlicensed form?,Is the film poster in an unlicensed form?
Did the federal government verify the jobs numbers from his administration?,Did the federal government verify the jobs numbers of his administration?,Has the number of jobs that Wisconsin added increased since the 2001 election?,Did the Federal government review and verify the job number?,Did the state record employment in 2010 and 2011?,Were there any other jobs creations in 2011?
"Did Rep Sean Duffy spend $15,000 on a car?",Is this representative involved in illegal activity?,Do these members of Congress hold a major political or political affiliation?,Did these members spend much money on cars?,Did the members of this congressional group buy one car each?,Did these representatives pay for those cars?,Is this representative from another political party?
Do officials recommend these shots for women for at least 2 months?,Do officials recommend these shots to women for at least 3 months after getting them?,Have these shots been proven to be safe?,Do doctors recommend these shots to women for the first 2 months after being injected?,Do official stances for vaccine safety vary?
Was the man raped during the war?,Did the man wear a skirt as a disguise?,Did the man wear a hat when carrying his wife?,Is there proof of the man having raped a wife during the war?,Does this man have any rape allegations?
Did this person say there is a current population of half a million Florida Alzheimer’s patients?,Is the Alzheimer’s disease diagnosis growing at a 40% rate?,Do there exist other research indicating these numbers are higher than the current population?,"Is this population projected to grow by over 200,000 in ten years?",Is this population projected to grow significantly over time?
Will Indonesia host the G20 Summit in 2022?,Will Indonesia have to provide funds to host the G20 Summit in 2022?,Is there any proof that Obama is supporting Indonesia in hosting the G20 Summit in 2022?,Is it true that Obama wished Indonesia success in hosting the G20 Summit in 2022?
Did violent crime decline during Nixon's tenure in office?,Is murder up 26 percent under Trump?,Did Nixon increase violent crime under Democratic mayors?,Is Trump's response to violent crime higher than during Nixon's tenure?,Did Nixon increase violence under Democratic mayors?,Is Trump's response to violent crime higher than under Nixon?
Did Musk say he will be running for president in 2024?,Did Musk declare he will not be running for president in 2024?,Did Trump announce he would run for president in 2024?,Did Musk declare he would not be running for president in 2024?,Is Elon Musk a member of the political party?
Did Ahmed Patel die of COVOD-19?,Did the funeral procession for Ahmed Patel show COVOD-19?,Is this video related to a person else?,Was Ahmed Patel known to have contracted COVOD-19?,Did Ahmed Patel die of COVOD-19?,Is this death related to a political person?
Did the Centerville Police Department charge the woman?,Did the woman suffer from eating her husband alive?,Did the woman die while eating her husband?,Has any police investigated other instances of eating your husband alive?,Were there more instances of eating your husband alive?,- Was the police department involved in this crime?
Did the COVID-19 pandemic have been planned?,Did the virus jump directly to humans?,Did the virus escape humans?,Has virus progression made it out of the wild?,Was there a virulent outbreak in the wild?,Was the virus spread into humans?,2019 Hungry Birds?
Is there any reason to believe this offer is genuine?,Does it come with a recording contract?,Will the podcast have to be made from this show?,Has this offer ever been confirmed?,Does Spotify want to keep this offer?,Is there any other reason to believe this offer is genuine?,Is there a record deal with Spotify?
Did a Van overturn while covering the beach?,Did the Van have a vehicle named Dolomite?,Did the Dolomite beach have a newspaper or article in it?,Did the Dolomite beach have a newspaper or article in it?,Did the Dolomite beach have an absense in a vehicle?
Did the FBI interview Castile about his stop by police 40 or 50 times before this incident?,Did Castile say he had stopped by police 40 or 50 times before this incident?,Did Castile say he was stopped by police 40 or 50 times before this incident?,Did Castile say he had stopped by police 40 or 50 times before this incident?
Did Clinton laugh at the child who was raped?,Was Clinton laughing at the child that was raped?,Is this the first time that Clinton laughs at a child who was raped?,Did Clinton laugh at the child raped?,Did Clinton laugh at the child that was raped?
How much did MPs earn as of July 2013?,"How much did nurses, midwives, paramedics, and radiographers earn in the average year?",Is MPs salary higher than those for other doctors or nurses?,Does MP salary exceed other professionals?,Is a higher salary offered to all non doctors or nurses?
Did FIFA give people 50GB of free data to watch Qatar World Cup?,Is it true that FIFA gave 50GB of free data to watch Qatar World Cup?,Does FIFA give 50GB of free data to watch Qatar World Cup?,Is there a mention of FIFA giving 50GB data to watch Qatar World Cup?
"Did Texas lose 300,000 jobs in 2015 compared to 2010?",Did the Texas loss translate into fewer jobs overall?,Did Texas loss the largest number of jobs across the country in 2015?,Did the California losses translate into an additional job increase in 2015?,Did the California losses translate into fewer job gains in 2015?
Did SRK pledge Day 1 earnings of Pathaan to a Pakistani NGO?,Did SRK call Pakistan his second home?,Has SRK made a profit from Pathaan?,Has Pathaan sold well?,Is Pathaan considered a success?,Were the net earnings for Pathaan from Pathaan invested in a Pakistani NGO?,Did the NGO have any financial responsibility for Pathaan?
Did Nye vote against health care reform?,Was Nye's vote a result of defunding the IRS?,Is the bill currently pending?,Did Nye vote against the bill?,Was Nye on record supporting the health care reform bill?,Is it true that Nye is against defunding the IRS?
Is the FRDI Bill on the House Rules or the Executive Rules?,Is the FRDI Bill referred to a Joint Parliamentary Committee before it gets passed in the House?,Is the FRDI Bill subject to a constitutional requirement for it to be passed in the House?,Is the FRDI Bill related to financial regulation in the Federal Reserve?
Did the clip of the military being in DC date at least to at least 2021?,Was the clip not filmed ahead of the midterm elections?,Has the clip been seen by everyone that viewed the video?,Did the clip of the military be filmed ahead of the midterm elections?,Did a large portion of the military footage originate from an airport at any point?
Has the state of Texas increased its rate of not graduating graduates by 2040?,Does the state have a lower rate of those who did not graduate than those who do?,Is there a significant decline in Texas workers who do not have high school diplomas by 2040?,Are there any other state's with a higher rate of people without high school diplomas by 2040?
Did a viral video depict embroidery tattoos?,Would embroidery tattoos be realistic?,Did this video have any effects?,Does this video make a point of showing embroidery tattoos?,Does this video show embroidery tattoos on people?,Is this video representative of embroidery tattoos?,Did this video depict embroidery tattoos?
Did Lyndon Johnson veto any civil rights measures during his tenure in Congress?,Was there a civil rights measure that Johnson supported during his term in Congress?,Did Johnson oppose any other civil rights initiatives in Congress during this period?,Did Johnson oppose any other civil rights initiatives in Congress?,Did Johnson vote against every major civil rights measure in Congress?
Was there any evidence that he has come in through someone?,Did those people have previous crimes?,Is there any evidence that people with the type of criminal conviction that was stated came in through this person?,Can he be prosecuted based on this information?,Is this person being prosecuted in the same jurisdiction as the criminal?
Did they kayak in Avila Beach?,Did a humpback whale swallow the kayakers?,Was the whale a male whale?,Was a male whale swimming near the kayakers?,Did the whale have a baby?,Did the whale have any other victims?,Did the humpback whale have any kids?
Did this school have a shooting threat?,Did teachers use guns?,Did this school host any shooting threats?,Did there ever appear to be an isolated shooting threat on this school?,Did this school respond to any shooting threats?,Did this school have a shooting threat?,Did any of the students have a gun?
Did Brown save banks $19 billion in taxes as a Senator?,Did Brown save banks more than $90 billion in taxes as a senator?,Does Brown appear to have worked with other banks during his tenure as U.S. senator?,Does the senator appear to have argued against the role of banks when in his office?
Did Russia let over 500 Lions loose to keep people indoors during the Coronavirus Pandemic?,Did Russia allow lions to loose to keep people indoors during the Coronavirus Pandemic?,Did Russia allow lions to loose during the Coronavirus Pandemic?,Did Russia allow Lions to loose during the Coronavirus Pandemic?
Did Antifa plan an attack on white suburbs or the Gettysburg National Cemetery on July 4?,Did Antifa plan to attack white suburbs or the Gettysburg National Cemetery on July 4?,Did Antifa plan an attack on the White suburbs or the Gettysburg National Cemetery?,Did Antifa plan an attack on the White suburbs or the Gettysburg National Cemetery?
Could the wall have had environmental impact statements?,Did they get environmental impact statements?,Was the wall built before the environmental impact statements were needed?,Did the city of Los Angeles have approval for the wall?,Did the city of Los Angeles have environmental impact statements or approval?,Was it considered feasible to build the wall?,Was the wall not constructed?
"Did the 700 bodies of alleged ""harvested children"" found in Malaysia originate from the United States?",Did the victims of the incident die?,"Were the victims of the incident all children, or all under the age of 5?",Did the victims of this crime belong to the same family?,Are any children of this family still alive today?
Are asymptomatic COVID-19 patients no longer isolated or quarantined?,Can asymptomatic COVID-19 patients spread COVID?,Did the WHO take a U-turn?,Is asymptomatic COVID-19 patients no longer isolated or quarantined?
Did the picture depict the train that killed a cow in 1938?,Was the train shown on video in this picture?,Did the picture accurately depict the train that killed a cow in 1938?,Did this train have a safety device to reduce the amount of time it was parked outside?,Was this train a model train?
Was South Africa 100 times more illegal immigrants in 1994?,Did South Africa receive 100 times more illegal immigrants in 2014?,Did South Africa receive 100 times more illegal immigrants in 2012?,Are there more illegal immigrants in South Africa since 2011?,Are there more illegal immigrants in South Africa than in 1994?
Is it true that the top 1 percent pay 40%?,"Is it true that most people under $50,000 don’t pay any income tax?",Are the percentages listed the same for all income tax brackets?,Are there reasons why a tax of the 1 percent would not be considered normal for many people?,Is it true that only a subset of people pay income taxes?
"Did FBI find further 650,000 emails from Clinton?","Did FBI discover further 650,000 emails from Clinton?",Did the FBI reopen its investigation into Hillary Clinton?,Was this information shared by the FBI or the public?,Was this information shared by any news organizations?,Was this information shared by any other sources?,Has this information been released by other news outlets?
How much would a seat next to the reserved Hanuman seat at the Adipurush movie cost?,Is there a other movie going place near the theater?,Is a non-refundable reservation needed at the Adipurush Movie?,Would a non-refundable reservation be required for any movie at Adipurush?,Would this movie movie also include a refund for non-refundable reservations?,Is this movie movie also having a non-refundable reservation required?
"Did the CEO say Moderna made 100,000 COVID-19 vaccine doses before the pandemic started?",Did Moderna's COVID-19 vaccine doses prevent the spread of the pandemic?,Did Moderna's COVID-19 vaccine doses prevent a rise in COVID-19 cases?
Did the Texas legislature pass a pay increase for teachers and provide them with health insurance?,Did the Texas legislature pass a pay increase for teacher and provide them with health insurance?,Did the Texas legislators pass a pay increase for teachers and provide them with health insurance?,Was the Texas legislature successful in passing a pay increase for teachers and providing their health insurance?
Would a high-speed rail system cost Florida taxpayers one billion dollars?,Would a high-speed rail system cost Florida taxpayers less than one billion dollars to build?,Would a high-speed rail system in Florida require a $1 billion budget?,Would Florida taxpayers have to spend more to fund a high-speed rail system?
Did the Switzerland mountain get lit with the Indian tricolour because the country was gracious and sent the Hydroxychloroquine drugs?,Did the Swiss mountain receive the drugs during the attack on COVID-19?,Did the Swiss mountain receive any aid from the country for its operation of the rescue services?,Did the Switzerland mountain receive any aid from the country for its operation of the rescue services?
Does this program benefit every household?,Is the government paying for the credit?,Will the credit be used to buy things at Walmart?,Will the credit be used to buy groceries at Walmart?,Will this credit be given to each family at the store?,"Will this credit be used for gas, food, or books?"
Is bitter gourd juice safe for COVID-19 to drink?,Has a scientific study concluded that COVID-19 can be cured within 2 hours by drinking bitter gourd juice?,Is the amount of gastrointestinal pain caused by COVID-19 treated?,Is it important to drink bitter gourd juice in order to cure COVID-19?
Did Betsy DeVos propose eliminating the grant for the Special Olympics?,Did DeVos support eliminating the grant for the Special Olympics?,Did DeVos want to ensure that the Special Olympics will have resources for other programs?,Did DeVos agree with the federal government's proposal to eliminate the grant for the Special Olympics?
Did Austin have the lowest property tax rate by far of all the major cities in Texas?,Did Austin have the highest property tax rate by far of all the major cities in Texas?,Has Austin been a model city to lead the nation in property tax rates?,Is Austin a good model for the nation in property tax rates?
Did NASCAR rescind their efforts at national anthems?,Did NASCAR use military flyovers at their races prior to the 2020 season?,Is NASCAR changing rules in regards to pre-race prayers and religious symbols at NASCAR races?,Did NASCAR change the format of its races to do away with these traditional rites?
"Did the article in question mention everyone stating, ""Nobody wants to work anymore""?",Does the meme actually have evidence of this in print?,Does this meme contain anything referring to a specific time period?,Has the meme been replicated in any other articles?,Have the articles had the same theme?
Will everyone who shares a Facebook post get a food box and voucher together?,Will everyone who shares a Facebook post get a food box and voucher together?,Will anyone who shares a Facebook post get a food box and voucher together?,Would each person who shares or comments on a Facebook post get a free food box and voucher together?,Will each person who shares or comments on a Facebook post receive a free Morrisons food box and voucher?
Did the man who became the richest man in India make a fortune?,Did the man earn money from the Internet?,Is the man based in China?,Does the man know much of China?,Was this person involved in illegal activities?,Are there any laws against exploitation of an unarmed woman in China?,Does this man have any family members in the US?
"Was the Muslim man stabbed in Barabanki, Uttar Pradesh for raping an 8-year-old girl?",Did this man have a motive for the attack?,Is there any evidence that the victim was raped?,Did the victim live within a large radius of the incident?
Did the Congress party fail to discover the May 1926 edition of The United States of India featuring Rani Lakshmi Bai?,Did the Congress party fail to discover the May 1926 edition of The United States of India featuring Rani Lakshmi Bai on its cover?,Did the Congress party fail to discover the May 1926 edition of The United States of India featuring Rani Lakshmi Bai on its cover?
Does Biden have information regarding Joe Biden's death?,Did Biden die four years ago or have Biden died four years ago?,Is Biden's death consistent with what Biden told the news media about his death?,Has Biden indicated that Biden's death is related to the President's death?
Does the government say Triple Talaq is banned in 21 countries?,Are there any countries with a ban on Triple Talaq?,Are any countries banned in promoting EVM?,Is the government's statement saying that EVM is banned in the world?,Are there any places with bans on triple talaq?
Was 50 percent of households able to get clean pipes?,Are 95% of those with access to clean pipes still in need of access?,Are water pipes also available in some areas?,Do government figures on water access vary by region?,Does this percentage change with time?,Are there any other factors that could influence water access by region?
"Did Tennessee's higher education funding model ""is 100% outcomes-based?",""" Did the Tennessee higher education funding model ""change the way our postsecondary institutions do business?",""" Does Tennessee's higher education funding model have a 100 percent outcomes-based model?",Are there any studies in the US to confirm that Tennessee's higher education funding model is 100% outcomes-based?
"Did a comic strip in 1957 encourage face masks to prevent a ""China virus""?",Did a comic strip in 1957 use face masks to prevent a China virus?,Do reputable medical providers endorse the use of face masks?,Does the use of face masks in the United States resemble the use of face masks in China?
Do I need to be in Italy to set up a business there?,Will this move be legal?,Does I need to be a Thai to be living in Italy?,Have I been living in Italy for a long time?,Is this action taking place only in the southern part of Italy?,Have all of these immigrants established themselves in the Italy?
Are livestock employed on a relatively small scale in the United States today?,Are livestock employed in a large capacity in the United States as a whole?,Is livestock a major contributor to U.S. agricultural GDP today?,Is livestock a major contributor to U.S. economic growth?
Did the lotter win a lottery?,"Did the lottery winner leave $200,000 worth of manure on their former boss's lawn?",Was the manure placed on the lawn for the purpose of disposing of the manure or for recycling?,Did the manure cost their former boss millions of dollars?,Did the manure fall into the wrong areas of the yard of the former boss?
Did FEMA file any FEMA cases in 2013?,Is it true the FEMA still has flood cases pending?,Did FEMA File any cases pending in Missouri in 2013?,Is it true that FEMA still has flood cases pending in Missouri?,Does FEMA have any flood cases?,Is it true that FEMA filed any flood cases in Missouri in 2013?
Do the heaviest costs be concentrated in the second five years of the bill?,Is there a mention of the heaviest costs in the second five years?,Does the House health care bill fund all the program costs required?,Do all the heaviest costs fall within the first five years of the bill?
Did all 72 passengers die in the crash?,Did the crash happen in Nepal?,Did the crash take place in a country?,Did anyone die in the crash?,Was any information released about the cause of the crash?,Did this crash take place in a country?,Has it caused any international controversy?,Was this crash a suicide?
Have the US trade deficits since NAFTA been as high as $2 trillion?,Have the US trade deficits since NAFTA been as low as $2 trillion?,Do the US trade deficits since NAFTA fluctuate between different years?,Were the US trade deficits after NAFTA the same amount as the prior year?
Has Congress not reduced their salaries since the Great Depression?,Is Congress's pay based upon average earnings during this era?,Is Congress paying above average earnings for this era?,Has Congress actually gone above average for eight decades?,Did Congress decrease salaries during the Great Depression?,Was Congress paid as well as it is today?
Did the video show clips from the 2017 film or was it from another film?,Did this video contain any footage from the actual 2017 war?,Did the videos mention any soldiers leaving for war?,Did the footage appear in the 2017 war or any other movie?,Did the footage have any Ukrainian soldiers with IDs that left for war?
Did the perpetrator of the Kerch Bridge explosion reportedly have a crime record?,Did Russian officials report their arrest of the perpetrator?,Did the perpetrator escape?,Did the perpetrator survive the explosion?,Was there any evidence the perpetrator made a profit from the explosion?,Was the perpetrator aware of the incident?
Was this a legal challenge for students?,Did the student have to take a coma from ingesting 2 gallons of semen?,Is semen unsafe to ingestion?,Do you think this is illegal?,What can we know about the medical conditions that caused the student to go into a coma?
Do the jobs the Northwest Corridor highway project is expected to create statewide?,Did the project create more jobs in Cobb County or Cherokee County?,Does the Northwest Corridor highway project create jobs in Georgia?,Is the Northwest Corridor highway project in Georgia or Cherokee County?,Is this highway project expected to create jobs in all of Georgia?
Did the initiative result in savings over 15 496 crore rupees?,Did the initiative result in an increase in the population of Brazil?,Do any of the savings relate to the number of LED bulbs distributed?,Did the initiative result in an increase in the population of Brazil?,Does this initiative have a positive impact on reducing greenhouse gas emissions?
Would increasing the federal minimum wage to $15 give more than 40 million low-wage workers a raise?,Would raising the federal minimum wage to $15 make 25 percent of the U.S. workforce increase their wages?,Would boosting the minimum wage to $15 increase income in other ways other than raising the wage rate?,Would boosting the minimum wage increase income in other ways other than raising the wage rate?
Did the energy supply claim spread online after the Nord Stream 2 announcement?,Does this statement explain how the story was spread online?,Did the claim spread through the Internet?,Was the claim correct?,Is there a link to a statement from Nord Stream 2?,Was this claim false?,Did this claim appear anywhere else?
"Did Trump's tweet say 96 percent of Google News results on ""Trump news"" are from National Left-Wing Media?","Did Trump Tweet say ""96% of Google News results on ""Trump news"" are from National Left-Wing Media?",""" Were Trump Tweets related to a story of National Left-Wing media?",Did these tweets discuss the subject of Trump news?,Did Twitter mention Trump news about National Left-Wing media?
Does it appear that the vaccine protects against death from this variant 6 times more than people who are not vaccinated?,Have most vaccines in the world prevented death from this variant in humans?,Are vaccinated people at a higher risk of death than people who are not vaccinated?,Is there evidence to suggest that those who are vaccinated have a much better chance of getting this variant than those who are not vaccinated?
Is Robredo worried about chaos in the event of a loss?,Is Robredo worried that a loss would cause chaos?,Does Robredo not rule out a loss in 2022 elections?,Did Robredo warn that the election in 2022 would be chaotic?,Would Robredo be able to avert a defeat in 2022 elections?
Has Rahul Gandhi been married?,Has Rahul Gandhi had two children?,Is Rahul Gandhi married to this woman?,Is Rahul Gandhi married to this woman?,Are Rahul Gandhi and this woman related?,Does Rahul Gandhi have children?,Has Rahul Gandhi ever given birth?,Is Rahul Gandhi married to this woman?
Was this claim based on American polling?,Was this claim based on American polling?,Has this claim been confirmed by any American polling?,Does this claim hold true?,Did this claim contain any specific information about Russian President Vladimir Putin's approval rating?,"Do these results support Trump's claim that Putin has an ""80 percent approval rating""?"
Did income in the United States be flat in constant dollars since 1979?,Is income in the United States flat in constant dollars since 1979?,Did the US income rate fall during this period?,Is income in the United States flat in constant dollars since 1979?,Can this information be derived from official data?,Would this data be accurate if reconstructed using a modern methodology?
Do all Indians have equal voting rights?,Are all Indians a member of the Indian Parliament?,Are Indian people more likely to have a political record?,"Would the total spending on the statue amount to Rs. 1,200 crores?","Would each citizen get Rs. 14,81 crores?",Would each citizen be able to vote at the level of one per cent of population?
Was there a percentage of eligible voters for South Africa's elections?,Did 30 percent of eligible voters actually vote?,Were other elections triggered after the elections?,Did the Election Commission estimate that 30% of voters would vote?,Did the Election Commission estimate there was a margin of error in their estimate?,Did these elections have an effect on the voting population?
Is Thessaloniki in Greece the home of Albert Bourla's parents?,Did the majority of the inhabitants of Thessaloniki go through the Holocaust?,Is Albert Bourla a father of a son who was killed by the Nazis in Thessaloniki?,"Is Thessaloniki, Greece the location of the Holocaust massacre?"
Have you found anyone offering to double your investment in 45 minutes through Facebook?,Has any of the Facebook Facebook accounts been taken down?,Have people in Nigeria been tricked into investing in these Facebook accounts?,Was this post attributed to any specific Facebook account?,Has this claim been proven?,Has this claim been supported by any official Facebook account?
Did Obama pardon this felon?,Is the felon responsible for murdering his girlfriend?,Were the murder charges brought forward immediately after Obama's pardon?,Is this alleged gun / drug-related incident a crime?,Was Obama re-arrested three months after this incident?
Is the Philippine Coast Guard attempting to drive away a Vietnamese fishing vessel?,Did the Vietnamese vessel sail into the Philippines in May 2023?,Did the Philippine Coast Guard take control of the Vietnamese fishing vessel on this expedition?,Did the Philippine Coast Guard leave the Vietnamese fishing vessel in the Philippines?,Was there a Vietnamese fishing vessel found in the Philippines in May 2023?
Did Laxalt take cash from drug companies?,Has Laxalt been charged with any crime?,Did Laxalt take cash from drug companies?,Is Laxalt associated with any drug or gun related crimes?,Does Laxalt still serve as a drug & gun officer?,Did Laxalt take money from drug companies?
Did Ryan cut Pell Grant scholarships for nearly 10 million students?,Would this cut cut Pell Grant scholarships for all students?,Has this cut cut affected any other students?,Does this cut cut apply to all Pell Grant recipients?,Would this cut cut impact any other federal student grants?,Is there evidence this cut will impact any students?
Was Trump's supporters not to gather outside restaurants?,"Does the city of DC closed all hotels, restaurants, grocery stores, gas stations, and convenience stores on the fourth and fifth of January?",Did Bowser want to prevent Trump supporters from putting their group together?,Did the city close all grocery stores and gas stations on the fourth and fifth of January?
Did Simpson tweet a video showing support for the SAG-AFTRA actors?,Did Simpson tweet a video that said he would join them on the picket lines?,Did Simpson write that his intentions were to join the SAG-AFTRA actors during this strike?,br>Does Simpson have other plans for the SAG-AFTRA actors during this strike?
Did Raphael Warnock have a beagle in 2020?,Was Raphael Warnock's ad featured a beagle?,Did Raphael Warnock appear in a campaign ad featuring himself with a beagle?,Did Raphael Warnock's ad feature himself with a beagle in 2020?
Is Trump transferring more money to the Build the Wall emergency than to the opioid National Emergency?,Does Trump have a plan to raise more money for the Opioid Emergency as a result of the budget?,Has Trump used all of his unused money to fund the opioid emergency?,Did Trump specifically transfer money to the opioid emergency?
"Has Norway deported 1,600 Somalis because the situation in their home country has improved?",Is Norway deporting Somalis to other countries?,Is Norway responsible for any Somali deportations?,Have any Somalis ever received citizenship after being deported from Norway?,Has Norway treated Somalis any differently in this regard than other countries?
Did people break TV in Pakistan after losing the Asia Cup 2022 match from India?,Was there a large public outcry following the loss?,Did people in Pakistan do not understand what was happening in the match?,Was the defeat of Pakistan largely in spite of public perception of it?,Did people in Pakistan break tv after the loss of the Asia Cup 2022 match?
What would happen if CO2 levels were cut in half?,What is the consequence of cutting CO2 levels in half?,What are the negative effects of CO2 levels cutting in half?,Is there evidence that we are entering into a carbon sink in the environment?,Did the six great ice ages begin with CO2 levels higher than now?
Did social media highlight the end of the West African Marburg virus outbreak?,Did the West African Marburg virus outbreak conclude on September 15?,Did the outbreak be monitored by the African Union?,Did the outbreak be reviewed by the IAEA?,Did the outbreak have a negative impact on international trade?,Did the West African Marburg virus outbreak end on September 15?
Can taxpayers who owe the IRS still file Form 8944 to get refund?,Did the IRS stop printing Form 8944 in 2017?,Have the taxpayers who used Form 8944 for refund filed a refund with the IRS?,Is 8944 still available for IRS refunds for 2011?
Is the medicine shown in the viral post effective in treating stones?,Can the medicine treated stones in 4 hours?,Does this medicine cure stones in 4 hours?,Is this medicine effective in treating stones in 4 hours?,Do these stones usually last in the body for longer than 4 hours?,Does the medication used in this post cure stones in 4 hours?
Does the Austin metro region will lead the nation over the next 30 years?,Will there be more people in the metropolitan area over the next 30 years than a 30 year time span?,Will there be more people in the metro area over the next 30 years?,Has the population for the metro area more than doubled in the past 30 years?
Was Pelosi's statement true?,Is it true that there are fears of voter intimidation of Trump?,Are there concerns with the use of election results?,Is it possible for voters to make a decision in 2020?,Was Pelosi involved in any discussions with Trump regarding his legacy?,Is there evidence to support Pelosi's statements?
Is the video credited as a demonstration of Indian astronaut jumping from Chandrayaan-3?,Did the person in the video get a message from the person in the video?,Is the name of the individual in the video based on the person's name?,Is the video backed by a documentary?
Did Meyer die short of taking ill?,Did Meyer take ill before his death?,Did Meyer recover from this illness during his death?,Was Meyer not admitted to the hospital following his death?,Did Meyer die before Meyer arrived?,Did Meyer attend a chemo clinic for several hours after his death?,Did Meyer make any admission to the hospital during his time there?
Did Rishi Sunak lighting candles on Downing Street for Diwali take place in 2020?,Did Sunak lighting candles during Diwali take place in the 2020 year?,Did Sunak lighting candles during Diwali take place in the 2019 year?,Does Sunak lighting candles on Downing Street for Diwali take place in the 2018 year?
Would Trump's plan suspend the 7.65% your employer matches?,Would this not affect employees' wages or salaries?,Would this not occur under Trump's plan?,Is there any evidence this would occur under Trump's plan?,Does Trump agree with this?,Would this plan be in line with Trump's previous stances on the economy?
How much money was raised in 2013 and how much money was given to a specific cause?,Did the Clinton Foundation raise more money than in 2012?,Did the Clinton Foundation give more than 10% of its funds to direct aid?,Did the Clinton Foundation give less than 10% of its funds to direct aid in 2013?
Did Obama announce his intention to run for Kenya president in 2021?,Does Obama have a clear record of presidential and political activity in Kenya?,Did Obama win the Republican primary in 2020 for reelection?,Is Obama in a running mate position?,Is Obama looking to run for reelection in 2020 for reelection in 2020?,Is Obama a proponent of tackling climate change?
Did this claim come from an Irish news site?,Has monkeypox been confirmed by researchers outside Ireland?,Have these claims been tested by scientists outside of Ireland?,Are the results based on confirmed cases or true stories?,Can a monkey pox virus live on door handles and toilet seats?,Can monkeypox infections be detected on door handles and toilet seats?
Is vaccinating seniors against Covid-19 in the lower 1% of the population?,Are 70% of seniors fully protected from the virus?,Was vaccinating seniors against Covid-19 in the low 1% of the population when I was sworn in?,Is this percentage statistically accurate in comparing current vaccination rates to previous estimates?
Has the money in the reserve increased by more than 226 percent?,Has the fund benefited from the tax cut as a result of the bill's passage?,Is the treasury's response to the bill surprising?,Is there evidence that the treasury is not meeting its obligations?
Did Obama spend the money on hot dogs?,Did Obama ever use the money for other items?,Was Obama responsible for the money spent on hot dogs?,Was the email published in a newspaper?,Did Obama use any of the money for other uses?,Was Obama responsible for the money spent on other items?,Did Obama or anyone from the White House use the money on these items?
Did Joe talk about Medicare-for-all costing $30 trillion?,Will Medicare-for-all costs be $50 trillion over 10 years?,Did Joe say that the status quo will be $50 trillion in 10 years?,Are there many differences between Joe’s and Bill Clinton’s predictions regarding Medicare-for-all costs?
Is this stonework 1400-years-old?,Was this stonework created by the same person?,Is the person sitting in front of a computer in this stonework?,Did this stonework have any special properties that indicate it was likely made in the late 1400's?,Have these stonework inscriptions made this stonework so well known that they are still being read in linguistics class?
Has Pakistan ever had more nuclear warheads than Great Britain?,Does Pakistan currently have hundreds of nuclear warheads?,Are nuclear warheads in Pakistan a common force weapon?,Are Pakistan's nuclear warheads currently comparable to those of Great Britain?,Are nuclear warheads in Pakistan a common force weapon?
Did the last five years of construction have the same amount of tarmac as the previous 50 years?,Did the last 50 years of construction have the same amount of tarmac as the previous five years?,Did the last 50 years of construction have any more tarmac than the previous five years?,Did the construction of tarmac by the last five years result in a larger total amount of tarmac than the previous fifty years?
Does a video show conservatives looting Target over pride merchandise in 2023?,Are there any other types of merchandise targeted by conservatives?,"Is there evidence of people stealing t-shirts, bags and other merchandise?",Did Target employees try to purchase items with these items?,Is there evidence of people stealing other items from Target?
Does bike lanes in Austin reduce crashes by 38%?,Do bike lanes in Austin increase pedestrian and cyclist safety?,Are bicycle lanes in Austin effective?,Is it clear that bike lanes help in reducing crashes in Austin?,Are bike lanes in Austin a good investment for urban areas?,Are there other factors that contribute to cyclist safety in Austin?
Would Trump's announcement that all of the troops would be out in 6 months take place?,Does Trump confirm that it would take a year for troops to leave?,Is Trump's announcement that all of the troops would be out in 6 months correct?,Are any of the troops expected to be removed before July 2020?
Does this poll come from a nationally known source?,Has this poll been conducted in any country other than the United States?,Do 66% of people believe news organizations fabricate stories about the President?,Do any American political figures appear in these polls?,Are these polls based on interviews?,Are all of these polls true?
Did the FDA admit that 70% of chickens sold in the U.S. contain arsenic?,Did the FDA release data on the arsenic content of poultry?,Did the FDA report a reduction in chicken chicken sales?,Is there any other evidence the FDA is claiming in this article?
Does the body experience rapid dehydration during the equinox?,Do equinoxes occur on specific dates?,Do the equinoxes cause body temperatures to drop to a dangerous point?,Does the body have a certain amount of time to hydrate?,Are equinoxes associated with dehydration?
Can a person die within one year of receiving a vaccination against COVID-19 if they fail a test?,Will insurance companies not pay claims if a person dies within one year of receiving a vaccination against COVID-19?,Is it true that the life insurance companies will not pay claims if a person dies within one year of receiving a vaccination against COVID-19?
Has this teenager ever raped a person?,Was the person a Muslim refugee?,Was the victim of this attack in America?,Did this person have an active mental illness?,Was this person raped?,Did the person in question have any criminal records?,Did this person have an active mental illness?
Did the June 2019 Virginia Beach shooter wear a MAGA hat and a Trump 2020 bumper sticker?,Was it an accident that he wore a MAGA hat and a Trump 2020 bumper sticker?,Are these items common motifs of the Virginia beach shooter?,Did the Virginia beach shooter have other items?
Does the US have better a handle on COVID-19 than Europe?,Is COVID-19 in Europe less deadly than in the US?,Is this claim based on data from case fatality data?,Is this based on data from CDC data?,Is this claim based on data from the World Health Organization?
Did the vaccine prevent the flu?,Can the vaccine help prevent influenza?,Does the vaccine help prevent flu?,Is it unlikely most people will die from influenza because of the vaccine?,Do many people who die from influenza receive the vaccine despite the vaccination?,Does the flu vaccine make people less likely to develop the flu?
Did Giuliani claim voter fraud was at the four seasons total landscaping instead of Four seasons hotel?,Did Giuliani falsely claim voter fraud was at the Four seasons total landscaping instead of the Four seasons hotel?,Was Giuliani referring to election fraud when he referred to voting fraud at the Four seasons total landscaping instead of the Four seasons hotel?,Did Giuliani provide an evidence to support his claim to voter fraud at the four seasons total landscaping instead of the four seasons hotel?,Did Giuliani provide an evidence to support his claim to voter fraud at the four seasons total landscaping instead of?
Is there evidence that he made unwanted sexual advances on a female sheriff’s deputy?,Did two separate judges rule on these allegations?,Did the sheriff’s deputy in question come forward at some point during this time?,Did two judges rule on this issue in the original incident?,Are any other accusations of this nature ever investigated by another judge?
Is Bihars Rituraj Choudhary a cyber criminal?,Has Bihars Rituraj Choudhary previously been arrested or charged with a crime?,Was Bihars Rituraj Choudhary named a person in the media?,Is Bihars Rituraj Choudhary a victim of a cyber attack?
Does Spike cause at least eight different medical problems?,Can Spike persist in the body for weeks or months after someone gets vaccinated?,Can a person be exposed to Spike for weeks and months?,Can Spike make people sick?,/ / / / / / / /?
Did Jaishankar refuse to quarantine despite two of his team members testing positive for Covid?,Did Jaishankar meet US Secretary of State and British Home Secretary during the G7 summit?,Did Jaishankar violate Covid protocols by meeting US Secretary of State and British Home Secretary during the G7 summit?
Did Einstein receive a rejection letter from the University of Bern?,Did Einstein receive a letter from the University of Bern?,Did Einstein receive a letter from the University of Bern?,Are there any other institutions that Einstein could have received rejection letters from?,Did Einstein receive a letter from any other institution besides the University of Bern?
Did the m62 and m60 cameras go live on 8 January?,Is there any information on how long the cameras have remained in place?,Does there any information regarding the reliability of the cameras?,Is there any news about the availability of the cameras or the use of the cameras?,Is there any information on the m62 and m60 cameras?
Was any Broward County commissioner arrested for accepting millions in trade for illegal favors?,Are any Broward County commissioners still charged in this crime?,Was any Broward County commissioner arrested in this crime?,Is there any evidence that the FBI has ever arrested Broward County Commissioners for accepting millions of dollars in trade for illegal favors?
Did Trump call the Coronavirus the China virus on Fox News?,"Did Trump call the Coronavirus the Chinese virus on Fox News on March 16, 2021?","Did Trump call the Coronavirus the China virus on Fox News on March 16, 2021?","Did Trump call the Coronavirus the China virus on Fox News on March 16, 2021?"
Did the address change in 2016?,Did the White House stay at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue in 2016?,Did the White House change its address in 2016?,Was the new address in 2016 a more racial oriented name?,Did White House change address in 2016?,Did White House change the address in 2016?
Is there any video showing people accepting Islam in Qatar?,Has the video been released in Qatar?,Is it true that there are 120 non-muslims in Qatar?,Has the video been posted on a news website?,Has the video been viewed over 1 million times?,Has the video been shared widely online?
Did remains of people or aircraft be found at the Pentagon or in Pennsylvania after the attacks?,Have any human remains or aircraft debris been found at the Pentagon or in Pennsylvania after the attacks?,Is there any evidence linking the events of September 11 to the 9/11 attacks?,Is this information verified by an independent source?
Was 4% unemployment effective in helping black women?,Did veterans in Iraq and Afghanistan make an 8% to 9% reduction in jobless?,Was 4% unemployment effective in helping black veterans?,Does 4% unemployment mean that there are more black workers in poorer cities?,Does 4% unemployment mean that black women are less likely to find work?,Does the 4% unemployment rate mean that there are more veterans coming out of Iraq and Afghanistan than in the overall nation?
Would Ukraine be forced to stop the gas transit to the US by 2021?,Are there any other countries that could use gas transit to the US?,Is a gas transit to the US in 2021 feasible?,Are any other countries that could use gas transit to the US in 2021?,Does a natural gas transit to the US likely mean that the American gas transportation system is viable?
Did 9 companies have an offer to buy the electricity department?,Is Adani a company who has made an offer?,Has the electricity department been bought yet?,Do govt. employees have access to the electricity grid?,Do other government entities have access to the grid?,Are there plans to purchase the electricity department?
"Would ending federal funding for National Public Radio jeopardize 9,000 jobs?","Was there a national government-sponsored campaign for NPR that resulted in the loss of 9,000 jobs?","Is the loss of 9,000 jobs associated with ending NPR funding a direct result of increasing the federal government budget?"
Does COVID-19 have letters that stand for Artificial intelligence?,Does the COVID-19 stand for Certificate of Vaccination ID?,Does the COVID-19 stand for Certificate of Vaccination ID?,Is the COVID-19 stand for Certificate of Vaccination ID?,Is COVID-19 the name of the computer code?
Since John Lennons death was gun crime in US?,Did gun crime in US increase after John Lennons death?,Are there more gun deaths after John Lennon's death than before Lennon death?,Is there a significant increase in gun violence since Lennons death?,Is John Lennons death a national-level event?
Did a participant in a clinical trial of the Pfizer/BioNTech COVID-19 vaccine develop a painful skin reaction on her foot?,Was the pain of the skin reaction due to COVID?,Was the COVID-19 vaccine approved in the U.S. for use in patients?
Did Rubio vote for this bill?,Does Rubio know full well he voted for it?,Did Rubio say he voted for the bill?,Did Rubio say he voted for it?,Did Rubio vote for this bill?,Did Rubio approve of the bill?,Did Rubio vote for the bill?
Is there footage indicating truckers in Spain would rather be part of a convoy in 2022?,Is it known that truckers in Spain are trying to join the convoy in 2022?,Were there video indications that the truckers in Spain were joining the convoy in 2022?,Did the video show truckers in Spain trying to join the convoy in 2022?,Were there video indications that truckers in Spain are trying to join the convoy in 2022?
Is McCain speaking tough about earmarks?,Are all earmarks the same?,Is McCain willing to limit earmarks?,Can McCain be seen in an objective and unbiased manner?,Can McCain work in a transparent manner to end earmarks?,Can McCain work in a transparent and unbiased manner to end earmarks?,Is McCain's stance towards earmarks neutral or biased?
"Did every major drug introduced between 2000 and 2016 come from "" National Institutes of Health funding?",Did the pharmaceutical industry come from NISH funding?,Did many drug companies receive funding from the NISH between 2000 and 2016?,Did all drug company funding come from NISH?,Was there anything regarding the NIH funding promoting the use of drugs in the 2000s?
Was MS Dhoni confirmed to play in the 2020 T20 World Cup?,Was Dhoni eligible to participate in the tournament?,Would MS Dhoni's retirement be affected by his participation in the 2020 T20 World Cup?,Did Dhoni miss out on a role in the 2020 World Cup?
Are American military costs higher than the next eight nations combined?,Do all countries spend more money on their military than the United States?,Is the U.S. military more expensive than eight other countries combined?,Do the next eight countries spend more than the United States on their military?,Have all the nations mentioned in the above statement had higher military costs than the United States?
Did Romney have an insurance debt of $245-million?,Did Romney have other financial problems than health care?,Has Romney lost any significant amount in tax or insurance payments since his re-election?,Did Romney have a significant reliance on health care?,Did Romney leave Massachusetts with a significant reliance on health care?
"Did the Libyan government pass a budget on June 15, 2011?",Was the Libyan government in the middle of a civil war?,Did the Libyan government pass a budget in the middle of a civil war?,"Did the Libyan government pass a budget on June 15, 2011?",Did the Libyan government pass a budget in the middle of a civil war?
Does the video message suggest that Prakash Raj is opposed to the Congress in the 2023 Karnataka elections?,Was the video message sent in the presence of some Congress leaders in the Karnataka election?,Has Prakash Raj ever asked Congress members to vote against him during a Karnataka elections?
Is current labor force participation rate under 60%?,Has the labor force participation rate not been this low since the 1970s?,Is the labor force participation rate the lowest level since the 1970s?,Is the percentage of the workforce that is actually working or looking for work below 63%?,Are the number of jobs that are lost due to the lack of jobs above 63%?
Is there evidence that Vick served more prison time than all the Cops that killed the last 493 unarmed Black Men?,Is there evidence that Vick served a longer prison sentence than all of the Cops that killed the last 493 unarmed Black Men?,"Are the 493 unarmed Black men killed by cops overwhelmingly due to police tasering, murder and torture?",Is there evidence that Vick served longer than all of the Cops that killed the last 493 unarmed Black men?,Is there evidence that Vick abused the police in regards to the 3?
Are there different ways to wear a surgical mask?,Do many people prefer the white side out in regards to medical products?,Is it common for people to wear a surgical mask to be sick?,Do the medical product companies offer a large selection of surgical masks?,Are there any benefits of wearing a surgical mask?
Has WhatsApp received funding?,Has WhatsApp received funding for their new messaging app?,Does WhatsApp have a specific use case for their new messaging app?,Do current WhatsApp users have any access to this product?,Is this service fully developed?,Does any data currently available show a specific usecase for WhatsApp?,Is WhatsApp accessible to Android users?
Did Mark Zandi write a report criticizing Trumps economic proposals?,Did Zandi serve on McCain's economic advisers?,Is Zandi's report a criticism of Trumps economic proposals?,Does Zandi work for McCain?,Is Zandi a former advisor to McCain?
Do Hobby Lobby store employees believe they will be safe from the COVID pandemic?,Did Green's wife have a message from God?,Is Green considered religiously insane?,Are Hobby Lobby store employees viewed negatively by the general public?,Are Hobby Lobby employees a primary source of anxiety in the COVID pandemic?
"Is there a total of 100,000 UI claims in the last year?",Do UI claims increase during a pandemic?,Is it a normal pattern for UI claims to rise?,Are UI claims higher during a pandemic?,Is there a normal pattern for UI claims to decline?
Does sneeze travel up to 10 feet?,Does the new coronavirus drop to the ground once it sneezes?,Is it innocuous to sneeze using a contact lens?,Is it possible to find sneezed objects in a room in which sneezing occurs?
"Has the Democrats failed to submit budgets in the past 1,000 days?",Has there been any deficit during this period?,Have any Republicans failed to submit a budget?,Have any Republicans failed to submit a budget in this period?,Have any Republican failed to submit a budget in the past 1000 days?,Are any Democrats in the Senate failing to submit a budget in this period?
Are more Americans expected to receive insurance through the workplace than if we didn't?,Are the costs of individual insurance in America going down?,Are all individuals going through workplace insurance coverage?,Will all individuals need health insurance?,Will all employers offer health insurance?,Can these workers choose to get insurance through the workplace?
Did the suicide rate drop 37% after Logan Paul's Youtube video?,Was the suicide rate dropped in the country of Brazil?,Was there a drop in the country of Sweden?,Did there a drop in the world of Spain?,Can you describe the reasons for the suicide rate drop in the country of Brazil?
Did the gates survive each of these disasters?,Did each of these gates survive multiple other disasters?,Did this type of door survive any of these disasters?,Did these gates survive any other disasters?,Did the different types of doors also survive?,Did one of these types of doors survive any type of natural disaster?
Was this congressional booth vacant in the 2020 UP assembly election?,Was this congressional booth vacant during the 2020 Punjab and UP assembly election?,Did this congressional booth remain vacant following the 2020 Punjab and UP election?,Have these Punjab and UP elections also been a sexy election?,Has the Congress booth in this state been vacant in recent years?
Did there actually have riots in DC?,Did Trump supporters with disabilities participate in the January 6 riots?,Was the police-led protest backed by Trump?,Does Trump support the Trump line of disability?,Was the protest of Trump supporters with disabilities endorsed by Trump?,Did Trump supporters with disabilities demonstrate in the Jan. 6 Capitol riots?
Did the photo show the crying father and daughter together?,Was the photo captured in Iraq in 2017?,Did the photo show this father and daughter together in the photo?,Did the photo show any violent acts at the scene of this photo?,Was this photo of this father holding his daughter violent?,Was there any evidence that this photo was taken in the year prior to this photograph?
Did SAA spend 98% of its funding on white-owned firms?,Did SAA buy 98% of its funding on white-owned firms?,Was SAA spending 98% of its funding on white-owned firms?,Is there sufficient information about how much money is used to procure white-owned firms by SAA?
Did students in Srinagar cancel their degrees because they raised pro-Pakistan slogans?,Exactly how many medical students were cancelled because of the slogans?,Was there evidence that the students were protesting pro-Pakistan?,Did the student protesters speak against the university in question?,Did this student cancel their degrees because they raised pro-Pakistan slogans?
"Is this clip from the movie ""War to Win""?","Is this clip from the movie ""War to Win"" based in someway on a Ukrainian soldier going to war?","Is this clip from the movie ""War to Win"" from a different country?","Is this clip from the movie ""War to Win"" from a different country?"
Did fans in Iceland welcome home the national soccer team in 2016?,Did fans in Iceland welcome home the national soccer team in 2016?,Did Iceland hosts the national soccer team in 2016?,Did Iceland host the national soccer team in 2016?,Did Iceland host the national soccer team in 2016?,Was this country's national soccer team part of the 2016 FIFA World Cup?
Did the tax cut go to people at the top and corporations?,Was tax cut money used in the nation?,Is it true that tax cuts are used by corporations and not by individuals?,Is the tax cut money not used by individuals?,Is tax cut money not used by corporations?,Is the tax cut money used in the nation?
"Did the Royal Navy lose at least 20,000 men by fighting slave traders?",Did any Royal Navy members ever die by dying from slavery in any way?,Did many members of the Royal Navy have to fight for their country?,Are any Royal Navy members currently serving abroad?,Would the Royal Navy have saved many people by fighting slave traders?
Does the Affordable Care Act cover cancer treatment after age 76?,Are there restrictions on cancer treatment eligibility after age 76?,Is there a provision in the law that says you are no longer eligible for cancer treatment after age 76?,Does the law prohibit a person from receiving cancer treatment after age 76?
Is it true that 80% of children born in developing countries die of cancer?,Is it true that more children in developing countries die of cancer than any other age group?,Is it true that most children in developing countries die of cancer?,Were there any additional cases of cancer in children born in developing countries?
Is this phrase the premise of an article about the hundred days?,Is this article about an artificial barrier discussed in the media?,Is this article about the only one concerning the hundred days in news?,Does this article discuss any other issues?,Do I think this article is legitimate?,Are other people suggesting this topic?
Did Omar advise Iran to attack Trump-branded hotels in the world?,"Was Omar a member of the ""Iran tehranny""?",Did Omar actually vote in the 2020 election for the position of Rep?,Do Iran and Omar have an inseparable relationship?,Was Omar responsible for a tweet about Iran attacking Trump hotels?
"Will 55,000 Americans die from COVID-19 coronavirus disease?",Is this prediction based on a prediction from Trump's tweet?,Are there any other tweets that suggest this is a likely result?,"Have any tweets remarked ""someone let me know "" about this?"
Did Time Magazine make a cover featuring Colin Kaepernick as Person of the Year for 2018?,Was Kaepernick named Person of the Year for 2018?,Is Kaepernick not a person?,Has Kaepernick never been mentioned by Time Magazine in connection to the magazine's cover?,Does 'Time' have an overall cover featuring Kaepernick?
Did an attorney for NRA say Rick Sanchez was fired by a Jew?,Does Sanchez's claim have any basis in fact?,Does Sanchez's attorney work for NRA?,Would Loesch think Sanchez was fired by a Jew?,Did Sanchez fire any others?,Did Loesch's tweet contain a reference to a Jewish man firing reporters?
"Did the CBC remove the scene featuring Trump from its Dec. 2019 broadcast of the movie ""Home Alone 2?",""" Did the CBC cover it for political reasons?",Did Trump have an identifying character on the scene in question?,Did Trump have an item of property on the scene in question?,"Did the movie CBC cut from its December 2019 broadcast of ""Home Alone 2"" include a scene featuring Trump in it?"
Did Hussain appeal for help in the video?,Was there any arrests in this video?,Was the incident reported on the same date of February 27?,Were there arrests or acquittals during this incident?,Will any new legislation impact these videos?,Is there any evidence that other videos were shot in this incident?
How did these states pull CNN's broadcasting license?,Did any state issue these licenses for CNN?,Was there any evidence to suggest that these states did pull CNN's broadcasting license because the network failed to be truthful?,Was this state of fact a fact in a newspaper?,Did any state pull CNN's broadcasting license because of this falsehood?
Did Pelosi remove the sign from the entrance to the U.S. House of Representatives Chamber?,Was it old or was it from the 1840's?,"Did the sign read ""In God We Trust""?",Did Pelosi remove the sign from the entrance to the U.S. House of Representatives Chamber?
Is this fake post a fabricated poster of a trans rights organization on 4Chan?,Is this fake post in an attempt to censor Trans rights activism?,Is this fake post in an attempt to censor Trans rights activism?,Is this fake post in an attempt to censor Trans rights activism?
Does the 1954 heatwave in the US demonstrate that climate change is not happening?,Is the 1954 heatwave a heat wave?,Does the 1954 heat wave in the US mean that climate change is not occurring?,Does climate change have a negative impact on the United States?,Do the 1955 and 1996 heatwaves in the United States support the claim that climate change is not happening?
Did these officers receive an arrest in the photo?,Are there other photographs of police officers arrested in this country?,Will this photo be used as a reference for other police officers arrested in this country in 2022?,Does the police officer arrested in this picture have a background of a criminal record?,Has the police officer arrested in this picture committed any criminal acts?
Did Michael Bloomberg say that Hillary Clinton would have beat Donald Trump in 2016?,Are Sanders supporters aware of Michael Bloomberg's comments?,Is the majority in the Senate unfavorable toward Clinton?,Did Michael Bloomberg say that Sanders supporters knew of his comments?,Did Michael Bloomberg say Sanders supporters had strong ties to Donald Trump?
Is the video showing the man shoot to death within 15 minutes of the incident?,Is there a court order for the man to be placed on death row?,Was this man arrested for rape?,Was this man in possession of the video?,Did the video contain photos or written statements of this person?
Did these tanks arrive in Ukraine from Russia?,Did this material date to the decade of 2019?,Was this material released on the internet?,Are there any records of Russian-Ukrainian supply of Soviet-era tanks shipments?,"If this material is authentic, are other video showing the shipment to Ukraine authentic?"
"Are there 30,000 scientists who have signed a petition arguing that there is no convincing scientific evidence for anthropogenic climate change?",Does this petition include individuals from the US and some other countries?,Does the petition claim that climate change does not exist?,Does the petition state that the climate is still vulnerable to change?
Did all surviving members of the 1972 Miami Dolphins open champagne every time an undefeated NFL team lost their first game?,Did all surviving members of the 1972 Miami Dolphins open champagne on a first loss each year?,Did all surviving members of the 1972 Miami Dolphins ever open champagne after a first loss?
Is it possible for women to receive the pension from age 60?,Is the new age of pensions for women considered ideal?,Is it a good idea to lower the pension age for women?,Is this solution likely to create jobs?,Is there a consensus on the age for women to receive pensions?
Did Israel start training teachers with guns?,Was there one school shooting in 44 years?,Is Israel currently training teachers to carry guns?,Has Israel begun training teachers to carry guns?,Has the total number of school shootings in 44 years been lower than the number of school shootings?,Is Israel a country where teachers carry guns?
Is the NSFAS R2.4 billion in 2008 to R9.5 billion in 2014?,Did NSFAS increase from 2008 to 2014?,Is the NSFAS R2.4 billion in 2008 to R9.5 billion in 2014?,Is the NSFAS R2.4 billion in 2008 to R9.5 billion in 2014?
Did Betsy Ross make the first American flag?,Did Betsy Ross oppose slavery?,Did Betsy Ross's flag identify her as a Quaker?,Did Betsy Ross's flag distinguish her from other flags?,Did Betsy Ross make any other American flags?
Do France riots have any relation to the ransacked supermarket?,Did the ransacked supermarket involve large areas outside of the capital city?,Did the ransacked supermarket have any connection to the 2023 riots?,Did the ransacked supermarket take place outside of the capital city?,Did the ransacked supermarket in the 2023 riots involve large areas outside of the capital city?
Does eating one egg constitute harm against cigarettes?,Does eating one egg constitute harm to your health?,Does eating one egg constitute harm to your health as a whole?,Is the cost of eating one egg equal to cigarette purchase?,Is the consumption of one egg equal to the cost of cigarettes?,Is the consumption of one egg equivalent to smoking 5 cigarettes?
Is Madhya Pradesh CM Shivraj Singh Chouhan celebrating Indian Independence?,Did CM Shivraj Singh Chouhan hoist the BJP flag?,Did this flag originate in the US?,Does this flag exist in Canada?,Did the flag originate in the US?,Does this flag come from the US?
Did the Kenya Revenue Authority collect close to $600 billion in 2002?,Did the National Rainbow Coalition take over power in 2002?,Were the revenues from the Kenya Revenue Authority collected within this timeframe?,Are there records of the revenue collected by the Kenya Revenue Authority?,Is the percentage of revenue that the Kenya Revenue Authority collects over this timeframe in dispute?
Is this video of the Tokyo Olympics based on actual footage from the Olympics?,Is the fireworks display in this video meant to be a replica of the original Olympic display?,Was the fireworks display used by the Olympics in the Olympics?,Is this video of the Tokyo Olympics from another era?,Is this video of the Tokyo Olympics from another era?
"Did all 325,000 people detained and held for questioning?","Did all 325,000 people detained and held for questioning have more than one murder?","Are there other records showing that all 325,000 people detained and held for questioning were involved in two murders?",Was there any alleged re-assembly of a criminal?
Is Crist raising taxes on the middle class?,Is crist raising taxes on the middle class?,Has crist raised taxes on the middle class in the past?,Does Crist raise taxes on the middle class in the past?,Does crist raise taxes on the middle class in the past?,Did Crist raise taxes on the middle class in the past?
Do counties and cities in Florida have a choice in how to raise taxes?,Are there other fees in Florida that may be higher than the federal tax?,Does amendment 4 have a significant impact on Florida's cigarette and tobacco industries?,Is tax hike a major part of the Amendment 4 budget?
Did this increase imply more than 63 million households?,Have these additional homes been connected?,Did this increase account for the 6.3 million additional households that have been connected?,"In a nutshell, did these additional households contribute to the increased in number of connections?",Was this increase a result of the increased number of households connected?
Did Biden call Poroshenko at least three times after Burisma was raided?,Did Biden also call the president after Burisma was raided?,Is Biden still in office after Burisma was raided?,Is Biden still in office after the government of Ukraine investigated Burisma?
Did Morarji Desai become the chief minister even after losing the presiding assembly elections?,Did Tribhuvan Singh become the chief minister even after losing the presiding assembly elections?,Did Shibu Soren become the chief minister even after losing the presiding assembly elections?,Did this person become the chief minister even after losing the presiding assembly elections?
Was the person from Pakistan a member of MENSA and passed the test?,Was there a previous record of the person that passed the test in the previous year?,Has Tara passed the test more than anyone else?,Has the girl from Pakistan previously passed the IQ Level Test of MENSA?,Has the girl from Pakistan been accepted by MENSA as a member?,Was the IQ test related to Oxford University?
Did $700 billion of Medicare money be used for ObamaCare?,Was the $605 billion portion of Medicare money used for Obamacare?,Did this part of Medicare fund the cost of the insurance program?,Was the $600 billion part of Medicare used for Obamacare?,Did ObamaCare pay for most of this cost?
What were the political differences of this individual?,Did they oppose a flawed strategy in Iraq?,Did they call for change?,Did they have political ambitions?,Did they oppose the strategy that was the prevailing policy?,Did this individual reaffirm his opposition to the strategy?,Did this individual have courage to call for change?,Did this individual call for change?,Did this individual accept that the policy was flawed in some way?
Did Rick Perry spend a million on lobbying?,Did Rick Perry use lobbyists in D.C. to ask for more federal money?,Does Rick Perry live in a luxury house?,Does Rick Perry spend a lot of money on D.C. lobbyists?,Was the total amount of money spent by Rick Perry for D.C. lobbyists calculated correctly?
Are British Army veterans 54 times more likely than Republicans or Loyalist paramilitaries to be prosecuted for offences prior to the 1998 Belfast Agreement?,Do the Irish Government statistics in respect of the alleged offences that the Irish Republican Army has prosecuted prior to the 1998 Belfast Agreement?,Do these statistics cover cases for which the British Army veterans were involved?
Did Nepal shoot down the Indian jet & killed any Indian pilots?,Did Nepal shoot down the Indian jet & killed any Indian pilots?,"Moreover, what happened to the Indian pilots?",Did Nepal shoot down the Indian jet & killed any Indian pilots?,Did Nepal shoot down an Indian jet?
Did Walmart lose $1.2 Billion in one day after banning gun rights?,Did Walmart have any loss from the ban?,Did Walmart lose any amount from the gun ban?,Were gun rights legal or not in the United States?,Did the ban cause this loss?,Were gun rights legal or not in the United States?
Does the Merkur den Kaufpreis für einen Wespe für 50.000 Euro berechnen?,Is this amount of money enough to ensure a sustainable economy?,Is this amount of money sufficient to guarantee the survival of every person?,Is this money sufficient to ensure a sustainable economy?,Is the Merkur's hattlicher Vorschläge in vielen Tageszeitungen erkannter?
"Are there more than 850,000 sex offenders registered in the United Kingdom?",Is the United Kingdom a country that has more sex offenders compared to many of the other countries?,Do more sex offenders in the UK have convictions?,Is there sufficient evidence that there are more sex offenders in the U.K.?
Has the coronavirus disease 2019 virus been identified yet?,Has the coronavirus disease 2019 virus been identified since 2016?,Is the coronavirus disease 2019 virus in the human body?,Does the coronavirus disease 2019 virus infect humans?,Is there any evidence the coronavirus disease 2019 virus is responsible for the outbreak?
Did Gaga attend the 2023 Met Gala?,Did Gaga do well at the 2023 Met Gala?,Was Lady Gaga wearing a pink tuxedo for this event?,Did Gaga pose for photos during this event?,Does this event have a male or female audience?,Is there an indication the Met Gala will hold an all-male event?
Did this crash occur in Ukraine?,Did there any other crashes involving helicopters?,Was the interior minister included in the number of victims?,Has this crash happened at many other locations in Ukraine?,Are there other aviation accidents in Ukraine?,Did any other recent crashes involve helicopters?,Did this crash take place in Kiev?
What is the record level for deportations between 2008-2017?,Is this a historic level of deportations?,Are there any previous presidents who have deported more than 2 million people?,Has this deportation level seen a significant decline over the last ten years?,Is the deportation rate a record?
Was there a Russian Soyuz rocket stolen by a Ukrainian farmer in 2022?,Has any photos of Russian Soyuz rockets been published in Ukraine?,Did Russia steal any Soyuz rockets in 2022?,Did Russia steal any Soyuz rockets in 2022?
Did the Gallup report report that nearly 50 percent of small business owners aren't hiring because of regulatory uncertainty?,Is this report accurate?,Can it be concluded from other research?,Does this report agree with the majority of small business owners that say'regulatory uncertainty' is behind these hiring restrictions?
Is the UK retain an obligation to pay pensions to those that have paid national insurance?,Are the UK's pension requirements different from those provided by private insurers?,Is the UK's pension obligation different from private insurer's pension requirements?,Did the chief secretary to the treasury speak directly with the Governing Body in regards to the pensions provided by private insurers?
Did incomes fall by 6% under Republican economic policies?,Is this information reliable?,Do you have sufficient data to support this claim?,Do you have a study of the relationship between income and income inequality?,Is this information reliable?,Is this information based in direct evidence from a peer-reviewed source?
Did the man who killed a motorist who fatally struck a 2-year-old have a felony record?,Did the man who killed a motorist who fatally struck a 2-year-old have a felony record?,Is it true that the man who killed a motorist who fatally struck a 2-year-old only served two years in prison for a bank robbery?
Did the patient consult Dr. Udwadia before he infected the staff at Hinduja Hospital?,Has the patient since come down with a bug at Hinduja Hospital?,Has the patient exhibited any symptoms?,Was the patient's trip to Dubai a complication at the hospital?,Was the patient diagnosed with a virus at the hospital?
Did the total number of patients with over four hours for a bed increase between 2010 and 2018?,Did the number of patients with over four hours for a bed increase between 2010 and 2018?,Did the number of patients with over four hours for a bed increase in both 2010 and 2018?,Does the hospital have a quota for the number of beds it can accommodate in cases of over four hours for a bed?
Did they study how the DNA is extracted?,Did they use private funds?,Would they have spent more money with private funds?,Would there have been more revenue if they had spent public funds?,Were the funds used for research?,Are there other projects that will have an additional cost?,Are their research findings available to the public?
Does drinking ice water in an instant increase the risk of micro blood vessel explosion?,Does ice water have the same risk of micro blood vessel explosion as drinking a cup of coffee?,Has ice water caused any kind of health problems?,Does this condition apply to all micro blood vessels?,Would someone with an ice water infusion in cold weather be at greater risk?
Is there any data to support these claims?,Does a smart meter emit harmful EMFs?,Do smart meters spy on users?,Can smart meters control individual energy use as part of net zero compliance?,Have smart meters ever been tested?,!Did someone test these claims?
Did they sail the boats on a river?,Are there any boats named after Diwali?,Did boats go over the river after the festival?,Did the boats go over the river before a festival?,Was the festival the day before the boats went over the river?,Did 240 lit up boats go over the river after the festival?
Did they sit outside for 3 hours before leaving the house?,Did they wait outside for a few hours after the game?,Did they leave after the game?,Were they left after the game?,Did they wait outside for more than 30 minutes after leaving the home?,Did they wait outside in order to avoid being punished by the house?,Did the CM allow the football team to leave after the game?
Is it illegal to drive while smoking cigarettes?,"Can the fine be more than $2,500?",Is the ban on smoking while driving effective?,Is a ban on smoking while driving true?,Were the drivers of Canada already banned from smoking?,Could this act be changed?,Can the ban be waived for the first time?
Did Madej see graphene in the COVID-19 Moderna vaccine?,Did Madej claim that the COVID-19 Moderna vaccine contains a creature with tentacles?,Did Madej claim that the COVID-19 Moderna vaccine contains graphene?,Did Madej claim that the COVID-19 Moderna vaccine contains graphene?
Have IVR vaccines caused myocarditis in children?,Have vaccinations caused myocarditis in adults?,Are COVID-19 vaccines safe for children?,Do IVR vaccines cause myocarditis in adults?,Can vaccines cause a child to develop myocarditis in adulthood?
Did Obama win the 2016 election?,Did the Republicans receive a majority in this election?,Did Obama win the 2016 election?,Did the Democrats win in this election?,Did the poll not include Gov Kasich in it?,Did the poll do a close-up on Kasich?,Did the poll give voters a better idea of a political trend?
Is this video an example of a Ukraina invasion?,Are there any comments about military service?,Are there any videos showing Ukraina soldiers saying goodbye?,Is this video a confirmation of Ukraina's military assault on Russia?,Is there a video showing Ukraina soldiers leaving loved ones?
Is it true that 70 million Americans have a criminal record?,Is the number one reason for having a criminal record among adults?,Are there other reasons why people have a criminal record besides a criminal record?,Do women have a criminal record?,Have any teenagers been arrested?,Do all women have a criminal record?
Did the Supreme Court of Canada agree to hear a case against Trudeau?,"Did Trudeau, Ford and other civic officials commit crimes against humanity due to COVID-19?",Would the Supreme Court of Canada approve of this case?,Would Trudeau and Ford personally face charges for crimes against humanity due to COVID-19?,"Did Trudeau, Ford and other civic officials commit crimes against humanity due to COVID-19?",Would all of the civil officials face charges due to COVID-19?
Did DeSantis drop out of the presidential race?,Has DeSantis won a race in 2020?,Was this a factual statement?,Will DeSantis win the 2020 presidential election?,Is DeSantis preparing to return to the race?,Does DeSantis plan to have a negative effect on Donald Trump in 2020?
Did the concealed gun permit law cause a decline in gun homicides since the law passed?,Does the reduction in gun homicides have any direct effect on the armed forces?,Is the reduction in gun homicides a direct consequence of the concealed gun permit law?,Were more guns purchased and killed before the concealed gun permit law was passed?
Is there a record of a declaration of emergency for the six counties directly affected in the Panhandle?,"Was a declaration of emergency for the Sarasota County extended into this county, then?",Was it extended beyond the 6 counties that were directly affected in the Panhandle?,Is this declaration of emergency a record?
Does it have to be taken two weeks to lose 15 pounds?,Is it possible to lose a person's total body weight with this juice?,Is it safe to consume this juice?,Is this juice a safe way to lose weight?,Is consuming this juice on a regular basis healthy?
Did Iran believe that the deal was what they understood it to be?,Did Iran agree with the deal as to what it essentially was?,Are Iran's views of the deal different from those of the US?,Does Iran claim that the deal is a good deal?,Are there any concerns over Iran's political positions regarding the deal?
Is the title of the article from the New York Post “YOU'RE FIRED”?,"Is the image of Donald Trump on the cover of the NY Post ""YOU'RE FIRED""?",Was the headline used on the cover of the NY Post by a newspaper editor?
Did Sanders pay his interns $12 per hour?,Did Sanders pay his staff interns $15 per hour?,Did Sanders pay his staff interns $13 per hour?,Did Sanders pay his interns $13 per hour?,Would Sanders pay interns $12 per hour?,Would Sanders pay his interns $15 per hour?
"On what date did Betty White say "" Eat healthy and get all your vaccines. I just got boosted today ""?","Was Betty White the last person to say, ""Eat healthy and get all your vaccines. I just got boosted today "" on Dec. 28, 2021?","Is Betty White the last person to say, ""Eat healthy and get all your vaccines. I just got boosted today."" on Dec. 28, 2021?",Does Betty White eat healthy and get all their vaccines?
"Did Tubman say ""I freed a thousand slaves. I could have freed a thousand more if only they knew they were slaves""?",Did Tubman describe slaves?,Did Tubman agree that slaves were freed?,Are there other aspects of Tubman's quote that might have caused slaves to be freed?
Did the veterans benefit from this motorcycle parade?,Did Biden agree to end the tradition?,Did Biden plan to revive this event in the future?,Is there another parade for veterans?,Did Biden personally attend this past Memorial Day?,Is it a tradition to perform a motorcycle parade on this anniversary?
Did Grothman and Leibham vote for this compromise?,Did Grothman and Leibham vote for this compromise?,Did this compromise cost the state more money in electricity costs?,Did Grothman and Leibham vote for this compromise?,Did Grothman and Leibham vote for this compromise?
Did a YouGov.com poll confirm this statement?,Is the poll based on a single person or a larger number?,Was the poll a non-task survey?,Did you resend the poll to a different group?,Was the poll included as part of a website?
"Was the number of births in  Australia lower in 2021 than normal, in a population of 23,000 to 26, 000 monthly?",Are there multiple variables affecting the number of births in a country?,Did the national statistician make this information clear?,Is the number of births expected to increase in a country or a region?
"Did Johnson take $225,000 from polluters?",Did Johnson lead the fight to let polluters release unlimited amounts of carbon pollution?,Was Johnson responsible for cutting down on carbon pollution in general?,Are some polluters still in business?,Is it true that Johnson has received a large amount of money from other polluters?
"Was the fertilizer plant that exploded in West Texas, which has been inspected by the Texas Department of Public Health for more than a decade, uninspected since 2006?","Was the fertilizer plant in West Texas, which has been inspected for more than a decade, not inspected since 2006?"
Is there a prototype car that gets up to 150 miles per gallon?,Is this car currently being developed?,Will this be available in a couple of years?,Will this car be in garages soon?,Is it expected that this car will be available in a couple of years?,Are these cars going to cost a lot to produce?
Is pregnancy higher in teens compared to the general population?,Is there evidence to show increases in pregnancy between ages 0 and 19?,Are there any age limits for pregnancy?,Did females aged 14 years have less pregnancy compared to 18 years?,Are men in particular more likely to get pregnant?
Did it indicate that Kobe Bryant and his four children had died from a helicopter crash?,Was Kobe Bryant's youngest daughter still a baby?,Did Kobe Bryant and his four children die in the helicopter crash?,Did Kobe Bryant's daughter die in the helicopter crash?,Are there any reports linking Kobe Bryant and his four children to the helicopter crash?
Did this video show this worm in Somalia bananas?,Did the worm have some effect on humans after eating the bananas?,Will this worm cause brain death?,Is there any proof of this worm being present in Somalia bananas?,Was this worm responsible for this worm?
Was there a protest prior to three officers being killed in Baton Rouge?,Was there a protest prior to three officers being killed in Baton Rouge?,Did protesters in Baton Rouge call for dead cops before shooting?,Has this protester contributed to the debate about police in Baton Rouge?,Has it led to protests against Baton Rouge police in the future?
Have people poll high at the beginning of the presidential elections?,Do people with a high polling position end up being the nominees?,Do people who poll high at the beginning end up being the nominees?,Are people with a high polling position overwhelmingly supported by voters?,"Is the ""few presidential elections"" the most recent presidential election?"
Did Ginsburg get nominated and confirmed within 43 days of an election?,Did Ginsburg win a seat on the US Supreme Court by the time of the vote?,Did Ginsburg win this seat on a non partisan basis?,Did Ginsburg win any other judicial positions?,Are there any other examples of Ginsburg's tenure in this United States?
"Did Biden owe nearly $50,000 a month to live at the house?","Is it plausible Biden paid $50,000 a month to live at the house where classified documents were discovered?",Is Biden's claim regarding his payments unclear?,"Did Biden owe less than $50,000 a month to live at the house where classified documents were discovered?"
Are 35k acres of Puri Jagannath temple land sold by the BJP government?,Was the article related to the sale of Puri Jagannath temple land in Odisha?,Is the Puri Jagannath temple land for sale within the State of Odisha?,Did the state of Odisha publish the article related to the sale of Puri Jagannath temple land in Odisha?
Has a 7.8 magnitude earthquake occurred in Alaska?,Have multiple photos and videos been shared on social media and in news reports alongside claims that they show damage?,Has this event happened on a specific date?,Have multiple photos and videos been shared in varying news reports and social media accounts?,Has this event been characterized as an earthquake?
Is it true that the 92 million Americans on the sideline are not part of the workforce and are not part of our economy?,Is it true that Americans are not a part of our economy and are not part of our economy?,Are Americans who are not part of our economy a silent nation of jobless Americans?
Did the P195 million go to poor people?,Did the P195 million go to the poor?,Does the Commission on Audit want Robredo to testify against her?,Is Leni Robredo an official of the Philippine government?,. Does the Commission on Audit file charges against Leni Robredo?
Was the Obama administration forced to rebuild their London embassy?,Did the Obama administration sell the best embassy for less money than anticipated?,Was this new embassy built outside of London?,Was this embassy in London considered to be the embassy of the Trump administration?,Did the Obama administration build this new embassy for less than expected?
Was Ma optimistic during 2020?,Did Ma say this in the past?,Did Ma offer any reason for this positive prediction?,Was Ma optimistic when in 2020?,Was this prediction accurate?,Did Jack Ma make this prediction?,Did this person think in the past?,Did Ma agree with the 2020 prediction?,"Posted in Political, Business, World on June 14, 2018?"
Do the verses recited by the Muslim community indicate an appeasement of Muslims?,Did the Muslim community receive the verses recited by the Gandhi team?,Did Gandhi say the verses were in the form of a prayer before the rally?,Has this event been publicized?,Did Gandhi raise funds for charities during this event?
Does Canada issue more high skilled visas than the United States?,Does Canada have a larger population than the United States?,Is Canada responsible for nearly 80% of the high skilled visas issued by the United States?,Is the rate of higher skilled visas than the United States similar to Canada's?
Was the article published on People-today.com?,Is the story based on a true story?,Did the story take place over time?,Was there a conclusion to the true story?,Did the mother recover the child?,Was there any other information in the article?,Is the information provided in this article true?
Did Ukraine fire at civilian helicopters at Sievierodonetsk?,Did Ukrainian air defenses fire on civilian helicopters in Sievierodonetsk?,Did Ukrainian air defenses shoot down helicopters in Sievierodonetsk?,Did Ukraine fire a taser against the helicopters at Sievierodonetsk?
Is the woman who threw eggs at Simon Cowell in 2013 a music composer?,Is the woman who threw eggs at Simon Cowell in 2013 a singer in any other way?,Is there any evidence that the women who threw eggs at Simon Cowell in 2013 was actually on a show for Disney+?
Did the protester wearing the Ralph Lauren Polo jacket face a riot police officer on horseback in this photo?,Did the protester wear a Ralph Lauren Polo jacket during this photo?,Is the photo from July 2021?,Is the protester wearing a Ralph Lauren Polo jacket during this photo?
Did Dantani host Kejriwal for a dinner?,Does Dantani have a portrait of PM Modi on his wall?,Was Dantani associated with the incident?,Was Dantani a political figure?,Was Dantani connected to Kejriwal's alleged misdeeds?
Did the Philippine Navy send warships to challenge Chinese Coast Guard vessels on this Shoal?,Did any Philippine Navy warships attack China's coastguard vessels?,Did the Philippine Navy deploy warships to attack Chinese coastguard vessels on this Shoal?,Did this Shoal contain any Chinese Coast Guard vessels?
Was $1 trillion spent on anti-poverty programs in 2011?,"Would $1 trillion be enough to give every poor American a $22,000 check?",Is any of the money spent on anti-poverty programs for children?,Is any of the money spent on anti-poverty programs for children?
Has an earthquake of magnitude 7.2 occurred on Mt Apo in the southern Philippines?,Has an earthquake of magnitude 7.2 occurred on Mt Apo in the southern Philippines?,Has an earthquake of magnitude 7.2 occurred on Mt Apo in the southern Philippines?,Is 7.2 earthquake expected to hit Mt Apo in the southern Philippines?,Is it true that an earthquake of magnitude 7.2 has occurred on Mt Apo in the southern Philippines?
Did the government have an opportunity to reduce the trade deficit in the 2000-2011 period?,Did the trade deficit increase by 25% if the deficit was reduced in 2000-2011?,Will any reduction in the trade deficit result in GDP growth at all?,Does the trade deficit increase the GDP by 10%?,Is the increase in GDP one point?
Does the video show rain falling on one spot?,Does the video have one location on it?,Did the video have a timer running for the rain to fall?,Has the video had rain on this location in the past?,Has the video footage also had rain on this location before?,Has this video captured all of the rain?
"Did Rohingyas need to travel 1,769 Km to enter India or 2 Km to enter China?",Is Rohingya prone to a road accident?,Do Rohingya people have a high risk of traffic accidents?,Do Rohingya people usually stay on their land for a time before moving?
Is it true that the same boy died of COVID-19 in three different countries?,Is it true that the same boy died of COVID-19 in three different countries?,Is the boy named Thomas Lee?,Is the boy named Thomas Lee?
Are 99 people from the Department of Taxation cut out of the jobs budget?,Is the announcement made after the announcement of the jobs budget?,Was the Department of Taxation shut down before the announcement of the jobs budget?,Was the department cut out prior to the announcement of the jobs budget?,Are 99 employees of the Department of Taxation being laid off before the announcement of the jobs budget?
Did Kissinger confess that Hitler was buried in Spain?,Did Kissinger confirm or deny that Hitler was buried in Spain?,Did Kissinger have information about the truth of this information?,Did Kissinger believe that Hitler was buried in Spain?,"Do any other pieces of evidence supporting the claim of ""dos deathbed confession"" include any evidence regarding Hitler's life?"
Did WHO correctly detect the Omicron variant in November 2020?,Did WHO make corrections to the WHO table to resolve the typographical error?,"Immediately after the revisions to the WHO table were made, did the Omicron variant resurface in other countries?",Have any of the other countries in Europe responded to the WHO report?
Would someone in the room be able to give you a pepperoni pizza if you're scared to do so?,Would you be able to get a pepperoni pizza even if you're scared to do so?,Do you have to dial 911 for a pepperoni pizza?,Is there a safe way to dial 911 for a pepperoni pizza?
Do magnetic poles reversals cause a cataclysmic event on Earth?,Do magnetic poles reversals occur after the Earth flips vertically?,Are magnetic poles reversals associated with Earth tilts?,Are magnetic pole reversals associated with Earth rotation?
Did five billionaires buy the US?,Was this a published article in 1927?,Did this article report on the sale of the US?,Did this article report any transaction between five billionaires?,Were these five billionaires the most valuable people in the United States?,Did any of the five billionaires who acquired the US at the time own their own stock?
"Did Trump test positive for COVID-19 on Sept. 18, 2020?",Did Trump have a COVID-19 test in October of 2020?,Did Trump announce in October that he tested positive for COVID-19?,Did Trump use his Twitter account to confirm his COVID-19 test?,Did John Cammo claim Trump had tested positive for COVID-19?
"Did the Russian company purchase 70,000 copies of Trump Jr.'s book, ""Triggered""?",Did Trump Jr. write the book?,"Did the Russian company buy 70,000 copies of Trump Jr.'s book?",Is there any other information to back this up?,"Could the Russian copper company have bought more copies of Trump Jr.'s book, ""Triggered""?"
Does the photo apparently show Muslims laughing in front of Notre Dame?,Was the photo allegedly taken before or after the Notre Dame was destroyed?,Was the picture doctored?,Was the photo clearly an image of Muslims laughing?,Was the image authentic?,Was the photograph doctored?,Was the original image published for public viewing?
Did the Treasury announce that a new $20 bill featuring the face of Confederate general Robert E Lee was being produced?,Was the new $20 bill to feature the face of Lee a one-time portrait of Lee?,Will this $20 bill be a one-time portrait of Lee or will Lee eventually be seen on other pieces of United States currency?
Did the state budget contain no fees increase during 2011-13?,Did the Wisconsin budget have any fee increases during 2011-13?,Did the 2011-13 state budget contain any fees increases during 2011-13?,Has there been any fee increases for the 2011-13 state budget?,Was any rate increase during the 2011-13 state budget?,Did any state government revenue increased in the 2011-13 state budget?
Did Will Smith urge Nigerians to 'fight' for Obi in the 2023 elections?,Did Will Smith speak negatively of Obi prior to or after the 2023 elections?,Does this article support any of the alleged comments from Smith?,Has Smith made any comments in support of Obi since the 2019 election?,Did Smith make any remarks in support of Obi prior to the 2019 election?
Is it true that all 50 Republicans in the Senate are against the Medicare Act?,Is it true that Biden and most Democrats want to cap insulin prices at $35 per month?,Is it true that all 50 Republicans in the Senate are opposed to the Medicare Act?,Does any Republican in the Senate have a position on this matter?
Did 95% of high schoolers ever earn a diploma or equivalent?,Are more students pursuing a diploma or equivalent?,Is there a larger percentage of students who do not ultimately earn a diploma or equivalent?,Are there more high school students who do not eventually earn a diploma or equivalent?
Did the 3310 have 70% charge when it was switched on after 20 years?,Did the 3310 charge 70% of it's batteries?,Did the 3310 charge 70% of its batteries when plugged in?,Did the 3310 charge 70% of the battery when it was turned on after 20 years?,Did the 3310 charger have 70% of its batteries when it was switched on after 20 years?
Did Seema Samridhi Kushwaha qualify to become one of World's 6 talented women?,Did Kushwaha participate in a competition that was held internationally?,Does Kushwaha appear on the list of World's 6 talented women?,Did Kushwaha win a competition that was organized internationally?
Did a Goodwill executive have a court order for this offence?,Is it true that this offence took place in 2020?,Was the offence in a large municipality?,Was it a large organization?,Were all of these Goodwill executives held on suspicion of stealing donated goods for years?
Does Baucus plan have a positive impact on middle-class families?,Would 13 percent of what middle-class families make be directly taken from paychecks in Baucus' plan?,Are all of those questioned about Baucus plan to face max tax?,Does the Baucus plan actually have a positive impact on middle-class families?
Has Ayodhya been painted saffron ahead of the Ram Temple foundation laying ceremony on August 5?,Has any major ceremonies scheduled before this foundation ceremony taken place?,Has any other significant ceremonies taken place before this foundation ceremony?,Is this announcement true?,Will these additional events include a shrine of Shiva?
Was it possible to find out who paid the labourers?,Was it true the AAP paid 350 to labourers?,Did AAP pay these laborers for the protest in the 2018 election?,Was there any further reason to believe that there was an increased interest in the protest?,Did the AAP actually pay these labourers to join the protest?
Did Biden and Weiss get a felony fraud conviction in 2010?,Do these facts make sense to have been involved in fraud in 2010?,Were Biden and Weiss ever convicted?,Did this conviction occur in the same year as Biden and Weiss?,Do we know what this conviction was for?
Is Tan a business tycoon?,Is Tan donating millions of dollars in cash?,Is P12 million used for a raffle?,Will the people won by Tan's money do a benefit to the raffle?,Was P12 million the amount that was given for a raffle?
Is this photograph from New York?,Was the cat caught in the city?,Is the cat in the photograph from the city?,Is the animal weighing 40 pounds?,Is there another person that has captured this creature?,Do I have an image of a larger photograph?,Is this photograph from NYC?
Was Omar dancing when she was at the 9/11 memorial?,Is the video posted below the law?,Is Omar married to a member of the 9/11 memorial?,Is the video in good quality?,Is Omar a pro-lifer?,Did Omar publicly condone violence?
Did Wisconsin's economy shrink?,Was that the trend for this year?,Did the number of layoffs increase under this governor?,Are those layoffs more than in the 2014 year?,Did this year's economy look better?,Are there higher numbers of layoffs under this governor?,Did the number of layoffs be higher than in all of 2014?
Did the unemployment rate increase by 33% under Buhari's administration?,Is unemployment above the average for Nigeria?,Are there more jobs created than lost due to unemployment under Buhari's administration?,Are there more jobs created under Buhari's administration?,Do employment levels under Buhari's administration fall below the average?
Was there an image of this event?,Was this an event in which someone was beheaded?,Was this event in which someone was killed a Muslim boy?,Is this person from North India?,- The picture provided shows that this person was killed by a Muslim boy. - Is there any other evidence indicating that this person was killed?
Is it legal to sign a recall petition if you have already signed another recall petition?,Is there a limit on the number of signatures?,Is it necessary to sign a recall petition if I have already signed another recall petition?,Is there a limit on the amount of signatures that count?
Was the number of employees lost to Georgia greater in 2014 than in 2011?,Has Georgia's rate of employee loss increased in the last 3 years?,Does this percentage reflect the number of employees made redundant in the state during this period?,Does the percentage of lost employees represent an aging workforce in Georgia?,Has Georgia lost any of its employees since 2014?
Is it true that 123 African-Americans were shot dead by police in 2012?,Is it true that 326 whites were killed by police in 2012?,Is it true that 123 African-Americans were shot dead by police in 2012?,Is it true that 326 whites were killed by police in 2012?
Did the Indian Chronicles report detail this telefraud scheme?,Was the story of this telefraud scheme covered in a magazine?,Was this story based on a film?,Was this story the only instance where a telefraud scheme was covered?,Was this story reported in the Indian Chronicles?
Did employees of a private firm who died of Covid receive a minimum of Rs 7 lakh under this scheme?,Would employees of a public company who died of Covid be eligible for this money?,Can employees of a private firm who died of Covid receive a maximum of Rs 7 lakh under this scheme?
Are there images of Brazilian truckers who would join Canada's 2022 Freedom Convoy?,Did this 2022 Freedom Convoy originate in Brazil?,Was the 2022 Freedom Convoy able to travel through Brazil?,Are there any evidence that this 2022 Freedom Convoy is a political statement?,Did this 2022 Freedom Convoy originate in Brazil?
Is this statement based on information from sources other than the quoted passage?,Did Jefferson say the government would be corrupt and full of liars?,Did Jefferson say that the people would flock to the one that tells the truth?,Is the quote from Jefferson accurate?,Do people flock to the ones that have the truth?
Was it possible for 947 succulents or cacti to be attached to her body?,Was the person convicted of trying to smuggle these items?,Were there multiple convictions for this crime?,Was the person convicted of this crime responsible for the sentence?,Are there any other charges?
Are 10 users of SBI being rewarded for their good service?,Will SBI give out 5 lakh rupees for giving out this gift?,Will SBI reward each user with Rs. 5 lakh?,Currently a survey on SBI's services. Do other service providers offer similar surveys?,Did SBI conduct these survey before?
Did South Africa's president demand that all foreign nationals leave by June 2020 because of the COVID-19 epidemic?,Did President Ramaphosa have a stance on COVID-19?,Did the president of South Africa ask all foreign nationals to leave by June 2020 due to the COVID-19 epidemic?
Did Barrie cite their letter stating that Freddie and Fannie were not in danger of collapse?,Did the letter mention any potential economic problems with these two companies?,Did the letter mention the housing market as a potential threat?,Did the letter include a discussion of the mortgage crisis?,Did any of the senators write letters saying this kind of thing?,Did the letter include any senary that did not sign up for this letter?
Are all of Texans ages 18-24 registered to vote?,Is there a population that is disproportionately aged 18-24 in Texans voting to VOTE?,Does the total of Texans 18-24 years voting to vote for the election exceed 50%?,Is the percentage of Texans 18-24 years registered to vote in a majority of counties?
Did the state education agency estimate that the expansion of WInswers school voucher program could cost nearly 2 billion annually?,Does this state budget include funding for the program?,Is this state budget backed by Republicans?,Is this state budget considered to be Republican backed?,Can schools with high costs find another source of funding?
Did the GOP strip $40 million from the budget for lead pipe replacement because it helped Milwaukee too much?,Did Republicans strip $40 million from the budget for lead pipe replacement because it helped Madison too much?,Did the GOP strip $40 million from the budget for lead pipe replacement because it helped Madison too much?,Did Republicans strip $40 million from the budget for lead pipe replacement because they thought it helped Madison too much?
"Did you know that one cat can father 420,000 kittens in five years?",Did this claim only apply to males?,Does this claim apply to female cats?,Do the statistics on this claim only apply to males?,Is the claim only applicable to male cats?,Are there any studies that demonstrate the fact that this is true?
Is she saying the US Senate is “dominated by millionaires” and he is “not one of them?,” Is there evidence she is not a millionaire?,Is there evidence that she is a millionaire?,Has there been any change in her views from what Trump says?,Is there evidence that Trump is a millionaire?
Was Tiwari right to say if the Modi govt weren't ruling petrol would cost Rs 200 today?,Was Tiwari's statement accurate?,Is it true that Tiwari said if the Modi govt weren't ruling petrol would cost Rs 200 today?
Is the estimated incidence of heart disease of males over 50?,Is there such a number?,Does the estimated incidence of heart disease differ between females and males?,Are the females who have heart disease less likely to develop heart disease?,Have men with heart disease increased or decreased over their 50 year old age?
Did Biden pull down his mask to communicate something at an anniversary ceremony?,Was Biden wearing the COVID-19 mask while attending a ceremony?,Did Biden remove his COVID-19 mask during the ceremony?,Did Biden's mask reflect his name?,Did Biden reveal what he did during the ceremony?,Did Biden announce anything for the upcoming 20th anniversary anniversary ceremony?
"Did Ohio director of job creation claw back about $900,000 from companies that made promises and they didn't keep them?","Did Ohio director of job creation claw back about $900,000 from companies that made promises and they didn't keep them?","Did Ohio director of job creation claw back about $900,000 from companies that made promises and they didn't keep them?"
Did Laxalt refuse to sue the company responsible for the 400 million pill shipment?,Has Laxalt previously referred to the opioid industry as a source of drug abuse?,Did Laxalt take donations from the opioid industry?,Did Laxalt fund his campaign despite receiving money from the opioid industry?
Did the group receive 500K in donations during this period?,Did this organization receive any criminal charges or investigations in the wake of the investigation?,Did this group ever have money laundering allegations or charges?,Does this group use all donations collected from the public for personal use?,Have these charges been filed in any other jurisdiction?,Has this group been investigated for any other types of crimes?
Can illegal immigrants have free health insurance?,Will this tax on illegal immigrants start before 2020?,Will this tax increase help pay for illegal immigrants?,Can illegal aliens get free health insurance?,Will this tax increase help pay for illegal aliens?,"Will the state be able to collect $98,000,000 from this tax to pay for free health insurance for illegal aliens?"
"Did the Pittsburgh synagogue attack raise more than $190,000?",Are the amounts raised in the category of religious groups?,Did American Muslim groups have money designated for the victims of the Pittsburgh synagogue attack?,Did the funding total for the funds in the category of religious groups exceed the totals raised in other organizations?,Did American Muslim groups receive money from the Pittsburgh attack that affected the United States?
Did the discount last for more than a year?,Is this deal for buying a Hy-Vee product?,Were all of these sales from Hy-Vee going to be the same for the next year?,Are there any other discounts at all this year?,Were all of the discounts for the 2018 Hy-Vee year marked down from the 2017 version?
Do multiple records indicate that there are thousands of registered voters over 110 years old?,Have there been any registrations of voters over 219 years old?,Do records indicate that multiple registered voters under 110 years old are in the state of North Carolina?,Have some of these registered voters been documented in previous elections?,"Was the person with which this claim is made, a person with which this claim is made, a person who is in the age range of the voter?"
Is it true that 228 House Democrats voted to allow illegal aliens to have the right to vote?,"Is it true that 228 House Democrats voted "" to allow illegal aliens to have the right to vote ""?",Did partisan differences affect the vote?,Do partisan differences affect the vote?
Did Georgia's smoking rate drop nationally?,Did the smoking rate drop nationally?,Did Georgians still smoke less than 15% of the time in the year before 2012?,Did the smoking rate drop nationally by more than 18% in the previous year?,Is there any evidence of a greater decline in Georgian smoking?
Would that amount of money be available to entrepreneurs and business people to create jobs and build and expand businesses?,Would that amount of money be available to entrepreneurs and business people to build and expand businesses?,Would that amount of money be available to entrepreneurs and business people to create jobs and build and expand businesses?,Would the amount of money be available to entrepreneurs and business people to make jobs and build and expand businesses?,Would that amount of money be available to entrepreneurs and business people to use to create jobs?
Did it crash in Uttarakhand or in any other place?,Was it a helicopter?,Has the cause of the crash been named?,Did the helicopter crash near Kedarnath?,Is the helicopter listed in any medical records?,Did the helicopter crash near any other place?,Are there any pictures from this crash?
Was this campaign contribution a part of this lawsuit?,Were Abbott and his friends in this lawsuit in any way related to the drug-taking neurosurgeon?,Were Abbott's actions related to the drug-taking neurosurgeon?,Have Abbott and his lawyers dealt with this lawsuit before?,Is this lawsuit related to the drug-taking neurosurgeon?
Did the petition demand that doctors stop receiving money based on payment schemes?,Did Canadian doctors sign the petition in February/March 2018?,Did the petition demand the cancellation of pay deals?,Was there any specific reason this petition could not be cancelled?,Would these pay deals have benefited doctors in the past?,Does the petition suggest that doctors should continue receiving money based on payment schemes?
Did a solar eclipse cause the fire to be engulfed in flames?,Is the church lit by fire?,Is there a record of a solar eclipse in New Zealand?,Is this a photo of a fire in the US?,Is this a photo of a fire in France?
Is it true that dollars  printed before 2021 will be banned starting in 2023?,"Is it true that if this ban is implemented, then the bills will not change?",Is it true that $ 1 bill printed before 2021 will also be banned starting in 2023?,Is it true that $1 bills printed after 2021 will also be banned starting in 2023?
Is it true that we have dozens of counties in America that have zero insurers?,Are there any counties in America that have no insurers left?,Are there any counties in America with no insurance left?,Do these counties have multiple insurers in a particular state?,Do any counties in America have fewer than three insurers in a single state?
Is Joe Biden alive or dead?,Was Joe Biden replaced by his twin?,Is Joe Biden alive?,Did Joe Biden live in the United States for 4 years?,Has Joe Biden died and has he been replaced by another person?,Is Joe Biden still alive and in the US?
Is Donald Trump's father arrested following a Ku Klux Klan-related altercation in 1927?,Did Donald Trump's father face charges of trespass in public in 1927?,Is Donald Trump's father currently incarcerated?,Did Donald Trump's father ever take a plea deal to federal court?
Did an undocumented immigrant arreste on suspicion of arson in (the) Wine Country fires that have killed at least 40 residents?,Was the fires caused by natural gas?,Did the fires kill humans?,Did at least 40 people die?,Has the Wine Country fires caused injuries?
Did the patient in this incident have an injury related to First World War?,Was the patient of this incident a member of the French military?,Has there ever been a medical evacuation in a medical facility?,Have any previous medical evacuations been attempted?,Has the hospital since re-opened?,Is this facility located in a state that has not had a medical evacuation?
Does this asteroid hit the Earth on November 2?,Would this asteroid hit the Earth on the day prior to the United States Presidential election?,Are the United States Elections generally every November 2?,Has the asteroid hit the Earth on any of the prior dates?,Are there any other dates on the calendar associated with this asteroid?
Did the Congressional Budget Office review this proposed plan and say it was deficit-neutral?,Did the Congressional Budget Office have a broader analysis of this proposal?,Does this plan have a surplus over 10 years?,Does this plan involve any other provisions?,Did the Congressional Budget Office analyze this proposal and say it was fiscally conservative?
Did this general spend any time training this troops?,Did any of the generals spend any time training this troops about wokeness?,Are there any records of these trainings?,Is this a true statement from someone who is well-known to be a woke general?,Would this training have led to this response from this general?
Would this increase be effective?,Will raising the top tax rate result in increased income for all of these people?,Would raising the top tax rate be effective in raising income?,Does this increase increase income specifically?,Was this increase in income effective under Obama's plans?,Is the increase effective only for certain types of income?
Did this claim come from an independent source?,Did this claim use numbers?,Did this claim use statistics?,Are there any studies to support this claim?,Does this claim take an amount for an asylum claim?,"Alternatively, is this claim unsubstantiated?",Is there any evidence that the information presented is reliable?
Did Allen attack liberals in a Facebook post in August 2019?,Did Allen’s Facebook post attack Democrats?,Did Allen’s post attack Republicans as well?,Is Allen known to use sarcasm on Facebook?,Did Allen write a Facebook post in response to a Republican political attack?
Did 90% of the applicants for asylum in the US fail to attend their hearings?,Did a majority of asylum applicants do not attend their hearings?,"Did the overwhelming majority, plus-90 percent, do not attend their hearings?",Was the majority not present for their hearings in the past year?,Was there an overall high number of individuals who failed to show up for their hearing?
Is this claim true?,Have the extremists hijacked the popular revolution in Iran?,Are the extremists a major force in Iran's current regime?,Are there evidences for this assertion?,Is this argument true or false?,Have the extremists established a new regime in Iran in 1979?
Is there a certain number of Nigerian players in the NBA?,Has Peter Obi been interviewed about these statistics?,Are any of these stories true?,Is Obi a fact checker regarding these statistics?,Has Obi discussed these statistics before?,Is Obi a fact checker regarding these statistics?
Is there video that shows dissenting Kenyan electoral commissioners' lawyers being thrown out of the Supreme Court presidential results hearing?,Does there still appear to be dissenting Kenyan electoral commissioners' lawyers being thrown out of the Supreme Court presidential results hearing?,Do there still appear to be dissenting Kenyan electoral commissions' lawyers being thrown out of the Supreme Court presidential results hearing?
Did the test test in the Netherlands kill 297 birds due to high frequency?,Did the test testing cause more deaths than the 312 deaths reported in the previous article?,Was the test attempt in the Netherlands conducted after all bird deaths?,Have tests in the Netherlands failed to kill or damage the number of birds that died on the test?
"Did House Democrats approve their so-called ""stimulus"" that included an astounding $335 million?",Is this sum the same amount as the $108 million in the House Democrats' 2009 legislation?,Does this amount cover all the prevention programs the House Democrats proposed for sexually transmitted diseases?,Did House Democrats' 2009 spending plan include a total of $236 million to fund sexually transmitted diseases prevention programs?
Do the trials on Covid-19 vaccines in the United States currently take place?,Are any of the CDC’s Covid-19 vaccines being tested on humans?,Are any of the CDC’s Covid vaccines being tested on humans?,Do the Covid vaccines in the United States currently take place in clinical trials?
Would this cut in Medicare help fund part of McCain's health care plans?,Will this amount equate to $882 billion in overall cut-ins in Medicare?,Is this amount worth what McCain would use to pay for health care plans?,Would this amount help pay for a single health care plan?
Is the World Bank stating that Covid-19 will continue until March 2025?,Is the COVID-19 virus in any way associated with this?,Is the World Bank stating that the COVID-19 virus is a major threat to the global public health?,Is this information consistent with the World Bank's statement?
Has the private sector lost millions of jobs since February 2009?,Has the federal government increased by hundreds of thousands?,Has the private sector experienced a decrease in jobs overall since February 2009?,Does the federal government's growth in jobs reflect their reduction in private sector jobs?,Is the federal government in need of a surplus of jobs?
"Are 350,000 troops being dishonorably discharged for refusing the Covid-19 vaccine?",Is it clear why these soldiers are being discharged for refusing?,Was this vaccine covered by a US government copay?,"0 comments to "" 350,000 troops being dishonorably discharged for refusing the Covid-19 vaccine ""?"
Did the picture shows Modi meeting the displaced Hindus?,Was this historic photo taken during the last 15 years?,Was this particular image published previously?,Is this particular image the only one of its kind?,Did this image originate in the 1990s?,Is this photograph of this image available on any internet site?
"Did VAERS collect data to confirm that COVID-19 vaccines killed 150,000 people?","Did CDC data suggest COVID-19 vaccines killed 150,000 people?",Is there any evidence that these claims were made by a VAERS representative?,Would CDC have been liable for the deaths of COVID-19 vaccines?
"Did it state for people making $50,000 and $75,000 a year that their taxes were going up $5,000 because they will pay more in new taxes to Medicare for All?",Did the statement provide information about specific people or groups?,"Was the report referring to tax rates for someone that would be able to afford more than $50,000 a year?",Were they referring to specific tax rates on people?
Was it today that Zelensky made a joke about Putin?,Does Putin like the joke?,Did Putin applaud Zelensky at the time?,Does Zelensky still make jokes about Putin?,Does Putin still favor Zelensky?,Is Zelensky still making jokes about Putin today?
Did photos show that the U.S. service members killed in the 2021 suicide bombing in Kabul did not die at all?,"Was the suicide bombing in Kabul, specifically, intentional?",Did the U.S. service members killed in the 2021 suicide bombing in Kabul die of injuries related to their service?,Did the attack include one U.S. service member?
Did a photo show truckers praying in 2022?,Did a photo show truckers praying in 2022 in this picture?,"Originally posted on May 4, 2016 at 9:31am: Do photos of truckers praying in this picture imply that the year 2022 will be a religious year?"
Did President Trump's proposed 6 billion cut of NIH funding include any funding increase?,Did Congress increase funding for NIH in any way?,Did Congress make a deal last night to not go along with a cut of 6 billion of NIH funding?,Do Trump's proposed $6 billion cuts of NIH funding include any funding increase?
Did ABP have an opinion poll on Himachal Pradesh assembly election 2022?,Did the poll predict a Congress victory?,Did the polls predict a victory for Congress?,Did the polls predict a Congress victory for Himachal Pradesh?,Did the polls predict a win for the Congress?
Will Boehner be proposing that the stimulus be canceled?,Will the middle class benefit from the tax increase?,Will Boehner reintroduce the stimulus plan?,Is there an income threshold for this type of tax increase?,Do I have to be rich in order to be affected by this bill?
Did 864 ballots go to dead voters?,Are there any other results?,Does this statement relate to the primary?,Were any of the dead voters elected in the August 4 primary?,Did the primary vote bring together the dead and voting people?,Will the primary vote have a major effect on the primary race?
Does Nelson support making $500 billion from Medicare less available to pay for new government programs?,Does Nelson support reducing Medicare funding?,Will a proposed bill to cut Medicare costs $500 billion?,Has Nelson voted in favor of the Affordable Care Act?,Is Nelson voting against lowering Medicare costs?,Is Nelson a supporter of lowering Medicare costs?
"Did the earthquake begin before February 12, 2021?",Did the earthquake last for more than 2 years?,Did any buildings collapse in Afghanistan?,Did any buildings collapse in Afghanistan during the earthquake?,Do any buildings collapse in Afghanistan before this event?,Did there collapse in Afghanistan after this event?,Did the earthquake affect all of Afghanistan?
Is this claim true?,Is the state’s secretary of state known to have a stance on this issue?,Are there 17 million registered voters in New Mexico?,Is this subject primarily covered in the Post?,Do any other sources report similar information about New Mexico’s political system?,– The Post?
Were more than 27 outbreaks of Ebola in the world?,Did the outbreaks never spread outside of the countries originally affected?,Were the outbreaks most severe in West Africa?,Were outbreaks in countries outside West Africa serious?,Have the outbreaks in the West African countries never spread beyond the countries that initially were affected?
Are 89% of Americans under 45 of this age group saying that the 1969 Moon landing never happened?,Do 89% of those under 45 say that the 1969 Moon landing was a real thing?,Is the average age of this group less than 45 years old?,Does a majority of Americans in this age group believe the 1969 Moon landing never occurred?
Did Djibouti soldiers go directly to protect citizens during the Ethiopia conflict in 2021?,Is it clear that the Ethiopia conflict did not begin in Djibouti?,Did Djibouti citizens come to the U.S. to protect their citizens?,. Are Djibouti residents now under a different nationality?
Does unemployment pay a minimum wage of $24 / hour even if it's lower?,Has unemployment been increased since this article's introductory period?,Does the minimum wage for unemployed workers equal or exceed $24?,Does unemployment pay a minimum wage for employees who are paid a minimum wage?,Did the Minimum Wage for unemployed workers increase in 2017?
Did these women drop out of the workforce due to this pandemic?,Did the women drop out of the workforce due to this pandemic?,Has this pandemic impacted many other occupations besides women?,Does the pandemic effect the number of jobs women have?,Is this pandemic associated with a decrease in women's productivity?
Did Ron Johnson oppose faster broadband in small towns?,"Did Johnson get nearly $90,000 in campaign contributions from telecom special interests?",Was Johnson's campaign finance record unconvincing?,Did Johnson receive funding from telecom special interests?,Did Johnson receive money from telecom special interests?,Did Johnson receive money from telecom special interests?
How much has the Marcos administration spent on their budgets?,Is the total budget of the Cory administration?,Was the Ramos administration budget larger than the Marcos administration’s?,Is the budget of Ramos’ administration greater than Marcos’ administration’s budget?,Is Cory’s government larger than Ramos’ government’s budget?
Is it true that Akhilesh Yadav is going to London on March 11 a day after the UP assembly polls counting?,Are the polls being counted in India?,Will the polls have been counted in any other countries?,Is the election date after March 11 of this year?,"Is the election date on March 11, 2019 after the polls counting?"
"Did Tata say 2020 is the year to survive, he didn't mention profits and losses?",Did Tata say 2020 is the year to survive?,"Did Tata say 2020 is the year to survive, he didn't mention profits and losses?","Did Tata say 2020 is the year to survive, he didn't mention profits and losses?"
Are we waiting on a conviction for Ekweremadu's sentence for the UK?,Has Ekweremadu been sentenced?,Is Ekweremadu serving jail time for his crime?,Does the UK law require that a conviction be for more than 10 years?
In which Michigan precincts did voter turnout exceed 100%?,Is it true in all Michigan precincts that voter turnout exceeded 100%?,Was this data representative of all precincts?,Is this data representative of all Michigan precincts?
Did the flu require a million soldiers to join active duty?,Have the flu been responsible for a million soldiers being called to active duty?,"Currently, how many military personnel have had flu-related illnesses?",How long have the flu-related illnesses been unaffected?,Have any flu-related illnesses prevented soldiers from returning to service?
Do the Chinese government plans to kill twenty thousand patients infected with the coronavirus?,Is there a plan for the Chinese government to kill 20 thousand patients infected with the coronavirus?,Is there a plan for the Chinese government to kill 20 thousand patients infected with the coronavirus?
Is there any evidence that Gingrich and Pelosi co-sponsored a bill?,Was Pelosi the co-sponsor of this bill?,Is there any evidence that Gingrich and Pelosi are the co-sponsors of this bill?,Is this bill connected to the one child policy?,Is the bill related to a U.N. program?
Has footage showing burned ballot papers been posted online?,Has this video footage been retweeted by other online users?,Is this video footage available for use by the public?,Does this video footage have footage retweeting in the public domain?,Are these photos of burning ballot papers published in any other way?
Did Biden have an inward expression when he was speaking on the anniversary of the Capitol attack?,Did Biden have a pinched face while speaking in Washington?,Was Biden smiling during his speech?,No Answer>No Answer>No Answer>No Answer>No Answer>No Answer>?
Is the COVID-19 caseload higher in the U.K. than in India?,Is the COVID-19 caseload in the U.K. greater than in India?,Is the COVID-19 caseload in the U.K. lower than in India?,Have more people been vaccinated?
Did the Bush administration give the car companies $13 billion by the time Obama took office?,Did the Bush administration allocate the money to the car companies?,Did Obama specifically announce the allocation of the car companies?,Is it true that Obama only announced the allocation of the car companies?,Is there any information about Obama accepting the administrations offer of the money?
Did he die of the disease of Covid 19?,Did he die after the disease of Covid 19?,Was he found not to have died due to the virus of Covid 19?,Are there any known records of covid 19?,Are these records in agreement with this report?,Did he die of Covid 19?
Did the stimulus bill send tax credits overseas?,Did the tax credits go toward a solar company?,Does a solar company build a plant in Mexico?,Do other countries receive these tax credits for solar?,Has any other country received these tax credits for solar?,Does this report support the Congressional claim that a solar company built a plant in Mexico?
Does Floyd look bald in this shot?,Is the male actor bald on this image?,Has Floyd ever been bald in these photographs?,Has Floyd ever made any statements regarding baldness or baldness?,Are the bald images of Floyd in these shots true?,Is Floyd bald in the actual shots?
Do mail-in ballots require postage stamps?,Do mail-in ballots require two postage stamps?,Can mail-in ballots be counted if the envelope is postmarked?,Are mail-in ballots scanned at polls?,Are postage stamps required in order to count mail-in ballots?
"Did Obama issue over 1,000 executive orders?",Did Obama authorize a total of more than one million executive orders?,Has Obama signed as many executive orders as any president in history?,Is Obama the first president to have issued as many executive orders?,"Can Obama issue over 1,000 executive orders?",Can Obama claim to have enacted a majority of executive orders in the last decade?
Did he support this crime bill?,Did he support the ban on assault weapons in this crime bill?,Did he support this crime bill?,Was he responsible for the passage of this crime bill?,Did Clinton support these crime bills?,Are there any other crime bills that are considered similar to this crime bill?
Is it true that 13 million (health insurance) rebates went out in all 50 states last year?,"Is it true that 8.5 million rebates are being sent out this summer, averaging around 100 bucks each?",Is the average for health insurance rebates around $100?,Has there been an increase in health insurance rebates last year?
Was the information broadcast by India TV?,Were the victims of the attack Pakistan Oil tanker?,Was the donation made in India?,Did the Indian tv broadcast the donation to the victims in Pakistan?,Is Shahrukh Khan related to the terrorists who attacked the Pakistan Oil tanker?,Are the victims of the attack in Pakistan Oil tanker?
"Did the crew of Air Force One refuse to fly President Obama 6,000 miles to play a round of golf?","Did a spokesman for Air Force One say the plane refused to fly President Obama 6,000 miles?","Did the spokesman for Air Force One say the plane refused to fly President Obama 6,000 miles to play a round of golf?"
Has the US-American Red Cross banned blood donations from people who are HIV positive?,Does the US-American Red Cross restrict blood donations of people who are HIV positive?,Has the US-American Red Cross banned blood donations of people who are HIV negative?,Does the US-American Red Cross prohibit blood donations from people who are HIV positive?
Did a House committee destroyed records?,Did this committee report any records destroying?,Was this committee involved in any crime?,Did this committee receive criminal charges for records destroying?,Does this committee receive a disciplinary report for records destroying?,Did this committee report destroying records for these charges?,Did this committee receive a disciplinary report for these charges?
How much money did it cost to build the national assembly complex?,Were the renovations included in the N37 billion?,Was the building of the national assembly complex constructed after 200% of the amount?,Did the N37 billion renovation help improve the quality of education?,Did the N37 billion renovations not cost any money?
Did the exact same experts claim that global warming occurred in 1977?,Does this group claim that global warming is taking place now?,Is the majority of experts in this area claiming that global warming is taking place now?,Can this group of experts claim to have been influenced by global warming in 1977?,Describe the reason for your own doubts with this claim.?
Did Congress pass a new elections law?,Could Pence have approved 2020 election votes on the condition that Congress passes an election law overhaul?,Is the requirement that Congress pass an election law overhaul a requirement for 2021 voting?,Are there no other restrictions that prevent the vote approval that Pence could be required to approve in order to avoid the 2020 voting ban?
Did the active ingredient used by Sweetgum balls come from shikimic acid?,Did Sweetgum balls help kill SARS-CoV-2?,Did Sweetgum balls contain the same active ingredient as Tamiflu?,Did sweetgum balls contain the same active ingredient as Tamiflu?,Does SARS-CoV-2 contain the same active ingredient as Sweetgum balls?
Did this couple have a custody battle prior to this event?,Did this couple seek protection for this case in court?,Did this couple get to this point because of a legal argument?,Did this couple decide to have the marriage?,Has this wedding taken place?,– Did this couple have a prior court battle in the past?
Is there any evidence that this video of a ransacked Chicago Walmart was taken in 2023?,Was this video taken by a certain person?,Did this video show any merchandise on the floor?,Were sirens heard as the perpetrator was being chased?,"Was this incident, and this footage, recorded from outside the store?"
Did all eight measures approved by Bush become law?,Was there one measure signed into law?,Does he support the groping measure enacted by Trump?,Did Trump vote to prevent groping at airport security checks?,Does the bill bar the states from allowing sanctuary cities?,Has Trump's work on these measures affected Texas?
How much does it cost us on average to lock somebody up a year across the country?,Is the average annual cost for a lockup a different amount in California than in the United States?,Do most states have a cheaper total annual cost per lockup?,Does California have a higher annual cost per lockup than the United States?
Did Obama advise Americans not to hold 9/11 victim tributes because of a violation of Muslim rights?,Is this statement based on President Obama's stated views?,Is Obama's statement based on his stated views?,Was Obama's statement based on facts that did not support his statement?
Did the student celebrate the victory by celebrating the Pakistan team?,Was there no reports of this incident on that date?,Was the alleged attacker from a Pakistani state?,Did the attack take place within Pakistan?,Did this student's identity be released?,Was there any information available to identify the person who was allegedly attacked?
Did this military take over be confirmed or confirmed prior to the announcement?,Do the political leaders who support this military takeover support the military's takeover of Egypt?,Would this military takeover create political stability in Egypt?,Would this military takeover be facilitated by a centralized government?,Will this military takeover increase economic growth?
Does the survey from the National Small Business Association include a quote concerning how many small businesses spend $83k to comply with regulations every year?,Has the survey resulted in a quote or not?,Are there data showing how many small businesses spend the majority of their spending on regulations in their first year of existence?
Does the shark have teeth?,Did the shark live in the Arctic Ocean?,Is there any evidence the shark existed prior to this date?,Did a fossil specimen contain other animal life?,Is there evidence that the shark has teeth?,Has there been any other evidence for this date?,Did anyone report this news?
Did the House vote for these $60 billion dollars within 10 days of the storm?,Did House Republicans vote on these $60 billion dollars on a voice vote?,Was this budget approved for hurricane Katrina on a voice vote?,Did anyone change the original vote in this case?,Does this report clearly prove the claim?
Did the vacuum cleaner partially emasculate the man?,Did the Boston man sue Dyson for money?,Did the vacuum cleaner affect the Boston man's health?,Was the Boston man able to return to his home?,Did Dyson deny liability in the Boston man's lawsuit?,Was this person able to return to their home?
Did Perry travel to five cities?,Did Perry fly to these five cities with taxpayers’ expense?,"Did Perry deliver $2,325,000 in checks to his constituents?","Did Perry receive a $1,526 donation from these five cities as a result of his travels?",Is Perry's travel a result of his income from campaign contributions?
Did a police officer arrest these girls?,Has a cop shown any sign of misconduct?,Is this incident isolated to one area?,Do the girls involved in this incident have any other charges for re-offending?,Is the officer able to identify the girls involved in this incident?,Are any of the girls involved in this incident able to be identified in the photos?
Did this video show violence during protests?,Did this video show any assault of children?,Did this video capture the violence during the protests?,Did this video show protesters and members of Antifa at the Texas Children's Hospital during protests?,Whether the assault happened during spring 2020?,Did the protesters take any physical damage?
Did Biden use CGI or green screens during his appearance on March 16?,Did Biden use CGI or green screens while answering questions from reporters?,Was Biden utilizing CGI or green screens during his appearance on March 16?,- Was Biden utilizing CGI or green screens during his appearance on March 16?
Did the Kenyan MP condemn the false claim that 16 year old daughter died by suicide?,Did the Kenyan MP claim that the 16 year old daughter died by suicide?,Did the Kenyan MP claim that the 16 year old daughter died by suicide?,Did Jumwa respond to this claim as a true statement?
Did Obama ever support the suppression of democratic discourse?,Did the media continue to cover dissent?,Did both Democrats and Republicans perpetrate the persecution of Americans?,Did any of those who were targeted by these partisan political racial biases attempt to fight back?,- Will there be a change in the media landscape?
Is it true that in the UK 1 million children have been gang raped?,Are there any other statistics about the number of children being gang raped and groomed?,Have any of these statistics been matched or validated?,Are these statistics taken from a common occurrence by law enforcement?
Did at least 50% of ballots lack evidence of signature verification?,Did large bags and coolers cause a security issue?,Did larger bags and coolers cause a security issue?,Is there any reason to think large bags and coolers caused a security issue?,Was there any significant change in the voting system?
Was Biden sad to welcome Bongbong Marcos to the White House?,Did Biden relive his tears as Marcos came to the White House?,Did Biden break down with emotion after Marcos arrived?,Did Biden relive his feelings after Marcos arrived?,Did Biden ever make a tearful return to the White House?
"Do the $250,000 funding projects make any difference?",Does any of the funding projects make a difference in the state of Rhode Island?,Is this project funded by the state government?,Are the projects listed on this page all funded by public money?,Are the state government funded funds a sole source for these programs?
Did 18 people die in the attack?,Was there any indication that the clown was planning an attack?,Was it reported that the clown had a weapon?,Was the clown accused of assaulting 18 people?,Was the clown charged?,Did the clown plead guilty to the charges?,Is the clown's identity unknown?
Did Robert Mueller's team have any Republicans on it?,Did the team have any Democrats on it?,Did the team members that Mueller's investigation had in regards to Republicans support Hillary Clinton?,Are any of the Republicans included on Mueller's team?,Are any of the Republicans on Mueller's team Republicans?
Did Obama's policy on younger immigrants result in these children coming across the border?,Was Obama's policy directly responsible for these children coming across the border?,Was Obama's policy specifically motivated by the idea that children will come across the border?,Is this claim based on an allegation?,Were the children coming from countries other than the United States?
Do 70% to 75% of people support keeping Confederate statues?,Do 75% of people support removing Confederate statues?,Do 70% to 75% of people want to see Confederate statues remain up?,Are 64% of Americans against de-seating Confederate statues?,Is 75% of people not in favor of removing Confederate statues?
Does vaccines against COVID-19 cause serious side effects?,Are there no studies supporting the claims of this vaccine?,Does this vaccine cause serious adverse reactions?,Are there evidence that this vaccine is not safe?,Did this vaccine cause injuries during testing?,Does vaccine in general have side effects?,Has this vaccine caused any injury in people other than patients who were vaccinated against COVID-19?,Are vaccines against COVID-19 safe?
Did all of the coverage have a 30% chance of rain?,Did only 30% of the coverage experience rain?,Was it within the 30% chance of rain to experience any rain?,Were there specific percentages of rainfall during the study period?,Does all of the rain occur within the 30% chance of rain?,Did 1% of the rainfall occur within the 30% chance of rain?
Did unemployment drop in every single city and county during Nixon's term in office?,Did unemployment drop in most rural areas of Virginia?,Was unemployment in every single city and county dropped?,Was there a drop in the percentages of unemployment in the rural areas?,Have the rural areas experienced a drop in unemployment?
Did the law in question require that children have consented to sex with adults?,Is there any evidence that this law did not support sexual exploitation in the French population as a whole?,Is it considered moral to consider children to be capable of consenting to sexual exploitation?,Is the law currently in effect in France?
Is Dangote the name of the foundation that is inviting individuals to apply for this grant?,Is there anything else that makes this grant a complete scam?,Is there any indication that people who apply for this grant were scammed?,Is there any reason to believe that the grant is a scam?
Does 75% of the rainforest in the US lose resilience?,Is most of the US rainforest considered vulnerable compared to savanna?,Can 70% of the US rainforest be converted into savanna in a matter of decades?,Is 80% of the US rainforest considered vulnerable compared to savanna?
Did the 40 people who tested positive for COVID-19 who were rescued from the Air India plane crash test positive?,Was the positive result of the test due to COVID-19?,Does the COVID-19 test occur after taking blood samples from passengers who have tested positive for COVID-19?
Are Trump supporters chanting to stop the count or count the vote?,Is Trump supporters being filmed chanting to stop the count or count the vote?,Do any Trump supporters have issues with the counting process?,"Does Trump supporters chant ""stop the count"" or ""count the vote""?","Does this footage show a video that shows Trump supporters to be chanting ""stop the count"" or ""count the vote""?"
"Did the government report in 2013 that the number of children affected by child labour still remains at an estimated 821,000?",Do those children remain affected by child labour?,Does this government's estimate of the number of children affected by child labor reflect what they consider the average number of affected children per year?,Is the estimate used by the government a factual estimate or is it calculated by an independent source?
Does this scholarship pay for five years?,Will the scholarship be paid for five years?,Will the scholarship cover more than this amount for five years?,Will the scholarship pay for doctoral study in some cases?,Would this scholarship pay for any other part of your studies?,Would the scholarship cover up to this amount?,Do the scholars receive a stipend for these grants?
Does cyclone-hit Yangon in May 2023 have an image?,Did cyclone-hit Yangon in May 2023 have a video?,Does this video include the images and a description of cyclone-hit Yangon?,Did this video cover the entire cyclone-hit Yangon?,Is cyclone-hit Yangon part of the world?,Is the video available for anyone to view?
Is this a specific projection in regards to Pfizer?,Did Pfizer's CEO suggest that by 2023 the world population will be reduced by 50%?,Is Pfizer's projection based on this goal?,Has Pfizer discussed using genetic engineering to reduce population rates?,Does this increase in population numbers occur in Pfizer's opinion?
Did this government report the exact number of child labour victims?,Did this government report the number of children affected by child labour in 2013?,Did this government report the number of children affected by child labour in 2013?,Is this government a proponent of child labour?,Is this government proponent of pro-child labour?
Is Rhode Island Treasurer Gina Raimondo responsible for raising the mortality rate from 65 to 87?,Has Rhode Island Treasurer Gina Raimondo used the Annuity Chart of 1994?,Were Rhode Island Treasurer Raimondo's actions in this regard?,Was Rhode Island Treasurer Raimondo's actions related to the pension crisis?
Does taking sips of water every 15 mins will prevent the new coronavirus from entering your windpipe?,Did an experiment in which people took sips of water every 15 minutes stop the coronavirus from entering their windpipe?,Did studies where the results in people taking sips of water every 15 minutes stop the new coronavirus from entering their windpipe?
Is the BBC the source of information about 9/11?,"Is 9/11 a scripted, actor based reality?",Does the collapse of World Trade Center 7 in this scenario mean that there was a 9/11 script?,"Does this scenario indicate that 9/11 was a scripted, actor based reality?"
Has salaries of residents not working for the city government not gone up in past years?,Are the salaries of Austin residents that work for the city government going up in past years?,Are the salaries of residents in Austin who don't work for city government going up in the last several years?,Are the salaries of Austin residents who work for the city government going up in the last several years?
Was Jumanji subject to class action suit for the paranormal alleged forces in it?,Did Jumanji settle a class action suit alleging that the game threatened to kill everyone?,Did Jumanji settle a class action suit alleging that the game threatened to kill everyone?,Was Jumanji the only game to settle a class action suit alleging paranormal forces?,Did Jumanji settle a class action suit alleging that the game threatened to kill people who played it?
Did Christie receive legislative approval to begin funding pensions in 2018?,Did this happen by the beginning of 2018?,Was this done in concert with the law that was passed?,Have Chris Christie's previous years made any changes in funding pensions?,Do these changes reflect an expectation by Governor Christie of effective funding?,Will these changes bring significant change to state pensions?
"Was COVID-19 in 1,500 [COVID-19-positive] samples?",Is COVID 19 fictitious?,"Was COVID 19 in 1,500 [COVID-19-positive] samples?",Is the COVID-19 infection a flu strain?,Does the fictitious COVID 19 virus occur naturally?
Are there any records of Pfizer inquiring about this practice?,Were these inquiries made in the first place?,"Is Pfizer using ""the force of government and the culture of fear to jab children under 5 -- with zero basis in science — to make billions of dollars?",""" Did Pfizer report this practice to the FDA or any other public entity?"
Did Ukraine suffer similar destruction in 2022?,Did the video show a combine harvester in the field in 2014?,Does the video indicate any destruction in 2022?,Is it necessary to mention that the destruction is clearly in the first '14 video?,Is the timeframe of the video representative of this?
Is this statement correct?,Are these two individuals the only former government officials who sold the West Philippine Sea to China?,Is it true that former president Aquino III sold the West Philippine Sea to China?,Did Aquino III and Justice Carpio negotiate this sale?,Did this offer to sell the West Philippine Sea come from other countries?
Has Texas had more crimes committed by illegal immigrants since 2011?,Has Texas had more homicides than any other state?,Have homicide rates in Texas increased significantly since 2011?,Have there been more crime committed by illegal immigrants since 2011?,Does Texas have a homicide rate higher than a national average?
Did Scholten praise the rioters after the demonstrations?,Did Scholten praise the rioters after protests in Grand Rapids?,Did Scholten praise the rioters in Grand Rapids?,Were other events that happened in Grand Rapids the same time that Scholten praised them?
Was an explosion reported at the Azot plant in Severodonetsk in 2022?,Did the incident happen outside of Ukraine?,Did the cause of the explosion reportedly lie within a third of the Azot plant?,Was there a significant amount of waste gas generated from the plant?
Has CNN settled with Covington Catholic High School student Nick Sandmann?,Was CNN's settlement with Covington Catholic High School student Nick Sandmann?,Has CNN paid out more than $275 million to Covington Catholic High School student Nick Sandmann?,Has CNN settled with Covington Catholic High School student Nick Sandmann?
Did all three abducted children in Rustenburg arrive at the truck that was being held?,Has any of the children been arrested?,Were any of the kidnapped children in the truck?,Did any of the abducted children have ID?,Did the truck appear to be a vehicle of someone's own?
Did the VC who signed PM Modi's MA degree from Gujarat University expire in 1981?,Did the person who signed PM Modi's MA degree from Gujarat University cease employment in 1981?,Did the person who signed PM Modi's MA degree from Gujarat University leave office in 1981?,Had this person served a longer term of time?,Did the person who signed PM Modi's MA degree from Gujarat University die before the graduation ceremony for his MA degree?
Has the state of Texas spent 45 of its 180 school days in mandated testing?,Has the state of Texas spent a percentage of its 180 school days in mandated testing?,Does the state of Texas spend more than half its 180 school days in mandated testing?,Does the state of Texas spend less than half of its 180 school days in mandated testing?,Does the state of Texas spend an average of 45 of 180 school days in mandated testing?
Did Rihanna wear the Pentagram in the 2023 Super Bowl Halftime Show?,Did the Pentagram have a connection to Satanic worship?,Were these five-pointed stars associated with Satanic worshipping?,Did Rihanna wear the Pentagram as part of her Super Bowl halftime show?
Does Joe Biden support the Green New Deal proposal?,Is the Green New Deal proposal included in Biden's 2020 2020 Democratic presidential race?,Is Biden currently supporting the Green New Deal proposal?,Can Biden support a green economy?,Is Biden opposed to the Green New Deal proposal?,Is Biden against reducing greenhouse gas emissions?
Does one eye belong to each child?,Is there any evidence that this is the case?,Did this mother donate her other eye to a child?,Does this mother have children of her own?,Is there any evidence of this mother identifying the child who had donated an eye?,Can this mother identifie the child who had donated an eye?
"Did Republicans approve 12 times larger tax breaks for ""people making over 350 grand"" than for ""the average middle-class person?",""" Did Republicans approve 12 times larger tax breaks for ""people making over 350 grand"" than for ""the average middle-class person?",""" Did Republicans approve 12 times larger tax breaks for ""people making over 350 grand"" than for ""the average middle-class person?","""?"
Did Obama lose millions of jobs per month?,Did Obama have a record for gaining hundreds of thousands of jobs per month?,Is Obama making millions more per month than Bush?,Does Obama have a record for having fewer jobs per month?,Has Barack Obama had a record for gaining hundreds of thousands of jobs per month?
Are spiked drinks usually unusable and floating ice can not be used?,Are all ice in drinks spiked with drugs and/or other substances safe to drink?,Is there any evidence to suggest that ice in drinks spiked with drugs is unusable and floating ice is not safe to drink?
Does Fauci continue to ignore scientific data on natural immunity with COVID-19?,Are there any documented instances of Fauci ignoring scientific data on natural immunity with COVID-19?,Are any documented instances of Fauci ignoring scientific data on natural immunity with COVID-19?,Is any evidence of Fauci ignoring scientific data on natural immunity with COVID-19?
Did King Charles III sign a proclamation stating Trump won the 2020 presidential election and is the rightful president?,Does King Charles III signed any other proclamations?,Did King Charles III sign any other proclamations?,Have any other proclamations been issued by the King?,Has any previous proclamations been issued by the King?,Is any of the previous proclamations on the subject of the 2020 election already in effect?,Is the King in the process of preparing the 2020 proclamations that will be issued?
Is there a statistical relationship between the occurrence of lost children in the first trimester and the number of jabs?,Is the occurrence of lost children in the first trimester correlated to the overall incidence of STIs in women?,Has the study been replicated by others?
Is this the reason for Fauci's removal?,Did Fauci's actions influence Obama's decision to remove this person from his workforce?,Did Fauci's resignation directly affect Fauci's job performance at NIH?,Can Fauci's firing reverberate far beyond Trump's actions?,Can Fauci's ties to Communist China be cured without a political trial?
Did Soros not pay their bail?,Did Soros not pay his bail in any way?,Was the protestors' bail paid?,Did the protestors file a lawsuit against Soros?,Will Soros pay their bail?,Did any protestors take legal action against Soros?,Does Soros pay bail?
Did this man spend seven hours at the Golden Corral?,Did he eat more than seven hours of the buffet?,Did he receive any sort of punishment from the Golden Corral?,Will this man be recouping money from this buffet?,Will this man's lawsuit be filed in the state of Arizona?
"We should be seeing numbers in the 500,000 jobs created per month. Is April 2012 the total from April?","Is the unemployment rate of 500,000 jobs created per month right for the recovery?",Should the unemployment rate be higher than that for an effective recovery?,"Is this a good reason to keep the unemployment rate down, and continue lowering it?"
Was O'Rourke within 2% of Cruz?,Was O'Rourke polling within 2% of Cruz?,Did Cruz have a much lower number of support in the poll?,Did Cruz have a lot of support in the poll?,Did Cruz have any other negative opinions or remarks in the poll?
Did Radinovich fail to pay the court fines?,Did Radinovich do these offenses frequently?,Are these offenses common?,Was Radinovich ever cited?,Was Radinovich ever indicted?,Has Radinovich been charged with these crimes?,Has Radinovich paid any of these fines?
Did Morgan Freeman say that Black History Month is ridiculous?,Did Morgan Freeman say that Black History Month is ridiculous?,Did Morgan Freeman say that Black History Month is ridiculous?,Was Morgan Freeman interviewed on 60 Minutes?,Did Morgan Freeman say any negative things about Black History Month on 60 Minutes?
Did France have a higher casualty rate in one year than the entire two administrations of Barack Obama?,Did French have an increase in the casualty rate in the 1st year of the 2nd president's presidency?,Was there a decrease in casualty rates in the 1st year of the 2nd president's presidency?
Was the stock market in record highs on Election Day?,Is Mainstream Media reporting on this story?,Did the stock market hit a record high on Election Day?,Is this article about the media bias or misinformation about the market?,Is it true that this information is often misrepresented by mainstream media?
Did the net worth of Americans take a $5.5 trillion hit mainly due to declining home prices?,Did any other events affect the net worth of Americans?,Are people who live in a home less likely to have an inflated net worth?,Have low-home-values contributed to the drop in net worth?
Did the photo show a crowd in full march in support of Tommy Robinson?,Was this protest in support of Robinson a big crowd?,Is the picture from a specific location?,Was this protest a large crowd in support of Robinson?,Was the photograph taken in England?,Is this protest in favor of the UK Constitution?
"Did the panel stating George Soros, Bill Gates, and the Rockefeller Family created the COVID-19 virus in Peru?","Did the panel stating George Soros, Bill Gates and the Rockefeller Family create the COVID-19 virus in Peru?",Did any of the accused creators actually produce the COVID-19 virus in Peru?
Did the wrestlers' protest during May 28 have anyone pinned?,Was the wrestler pinned before leaving his spot?,Did all of the wrestlers protesting against Malik end in a physical altercation?,Was Malik pinned to the ground during the protest?,Did there other wrestlers participating in the protest?
Did Obama surrender his law license to escape charges of lying on his bar application?,Did Obama surrender the law license to avoid being prosecuted?,Did Obama surrender the law license to avoid being prosecuted for lying on his bar application?,Was Obama arrested for lying on the charge of lying on his bar application?,Did Obama surrender the law license to avoid being prosecuted for lying on the charge of lying on his bar application?
Does Article 30A restrict teaching of Gita and Ramayana in schools?,Has Article 30A restricted the teaching of Gita and Ramayana in public schools?,Is there any evidence that the Government restricts the teaching of Gita and Ramayana in public schools?,Does Article 30A require any exceptions to this rule?
Did Scott faced a record budget deficit in Virginia in 2014?,Did Scott mention the amount of monies the state faces that he needs to spend?,Did Scott meet with a record budget deficit?,Did Scott publicly support the deficit in 2014?,Was the state fiscal year 2014 budget under funding?,Are any of these records accurate?
Did the list of disqualified presidential aspirants in Nigeria have to be published?,Did the list of disqualified presidential aspirants in Nigeria come out first?,Did this list come out first?,Did all of the disqualified presidential aspirants in Nigeria speak for their government?,Is this list included in the 2015 election program?
Did this poll have the largest voter turnout in California?,Is the number of California voters registered less than the estimated 1.7 million?,Is this report an accurate report of voter turnout in California?,Can this poll be read by a non-partisan body?,Is this report based on data from a source other than Judicial Watch?
Is the department missing money?,Will the P67 billion be in jail?,Will any of the missing funds be recovered?,Is this the second time that Duque has gone to jail?,Have the three people arrested by the Department of Health ever been indicted in this regard?,Is the Department of Health going to a total of 1 year and 5 months jail?
"Is it true that Wisconsin lost almost 4,000 manufacturing jobs in 2017?",Did the losses represent a large percentage of Wisconsins economic growth in 2017?,Did Wisconsin enact a plan to replace all of the manufacturing jobs lost?,Did Wisconsin enact any measure to prevent economic decline in 2017?,Does the report provide specific data on manufacturing losses in 2017?
Did the matric pass rate increase between 2009 and 2011?,Did the matric pass rate increase from 2010 to 2011?,Is the passing rate higher now than in 2009?,Do any other colleges offer a comparable pass rate?,Do any colleges offer a similar pass rate?,Do any other colleges offer a comparable pass rate?
Is the man in the RSS uniform indicted for parading two women naked?,Was there evidence of him performing a ritual for the women?,Was the man in the RSS uniform charged for the ceremony?,Does the statement say that the rituals took place at a temple?,Did he have legal authority to perform the ritual?
Did Trump say not paying tax made him smart?,"Did Trump say that not paying taxes made him ""smart""?",Has Trump been on public record asserting that he was not paying taxes?,Have there been any other statements by Trump supporting not paying taxes that are similar to Trump's statements during the first debate?
Is Advani from the BJP?,Has Advani ever voted for an opposition party?,Did Advani vote for the Congress?,Did Advani vote for the Congress in the 2019 elections?,Would this be true if he had been a member of the BJP?,Are there any other sources of information about Advani?
Did RuPaul claim he was groped by Donald Trump at a party in 1995?,Did Trump grope RuPaul in the 1990s?,Did Trump grope RuPaul after a party in 1995?,Was RuPaul a drag queen?,Did RuPaul's claim come out during Trump's presidency?
"Is George Stinney ""innocent"" in 2014?","Does George Stinney's 2014 conviction reflect his ""innocence"" as a young man?",Was George Stinney executed in 1944?,"Did a judge from the same court write down George Stinney's ""innocence"" as a young man?"
Did Republicans cut teachers' pay?,Did a majority in the state legislature cut teachers' pay?,Are there current teachers who are paid below pre-Recession pay levels?,Does this percentage represent pre-recession pay?,Are these higher levels still higher than pre-Recession pay levels?,Does this percentage reflect a higher percentage of teachers in the state?
Did Obamacare lead to more paperwork than expected?,Do we know how much this paperwork would take each year?,Does this volume of paperwork translate into less amount of building time?,Are the Obamacare mandates more of a burden than we can ever imagine?,Are there any other estimates for this volume of paperwork?
Is this claim based on direct and alleged facts?,Are there other facts cited indicating that this claim is false?,"Will 400,000 middle-class Rhode Island families see their federal income taxes increase if the House of Representatives fails to extend middle-class tax cuts?",Are these estimates based on direct and alleged facts?
Did the estimate compare the wealth of the poor with the richest?,Is there a difference between the rich and the poor?,Did the wealthy do very well?,Are the rich the richest in the country?,Was the estimate based on the wealth of each group of people?,Would the rich be well off?
Did this list include all staff calligraphers?,Did the White House have a National Security Director?,"Is it true that the National Security Director is paid $55,000 each year?",Is this number inaccurate?,Is there any information about the total salary of each staff calligrapher?,Is this figure accurate?
Are Americans expected to pay more in taxes in 2011?,"Is the amount spent on groceries, clothing and shelter combined more than the amount in taxes?",Is the amount spent on shelter combined more than the amount in taxes?,"Have the amount spent on groceries, clothing and shelter combined increased since 2010?",Does the amount spent on shelter combined increase after 2010?
"Did the company laid off over 3,000 workers?",Did the company pay off executives with millions?,Did the company pay off executives with millions?,Does Flores support the concept of the layoffs and the financial compensation of those whose jobs were lost?,Do the findings in this report support the claims made by Flores?
Did the United States government provide mental health services to families?,Were mental illness services provided to families from the Department of Health and Human Services?,Was the New Jersey Department of Health willing to provide mental health services in this state?,Is the United States Department of Health in violation of this claim?,Has the Department of Health complied with this claim?
Did the 9-year-old kill his parents after they turned off Wi-Fi in their home?,Did the 9-year-old kill his parents for stealing cell phones?,Did the 9-year-old kill his parents for playing basketball?,Did the 9-year-old kill his parents for stealing cell phones?
"Did Cuomo call the COVID vaccine ""bad news""?",Did Cuomo write the following about the COVID vaccine in response to Pfizer's assertion?,Did Cuomo support Pfizer's COVID vaccine in the event of a recall?,Did Cuomo call the vaccine bad news?
Did Vermont barbequing Soleimani do this?,Did Vermont barbequing Soleimani do this in the past?,Did Vermont barbequing Soleimani do this in the past?,Does Vermont have a post that speaks about barbequing Soleimani?
Did UDAN add more airports since December 2016?,Is there any information on when these airports were completed?,Is the total number of airports in the country higher than 75?,Do airports in the country are still in service?,Is there an average of how many airports are there every year?
Did the Wisconsin State Assembly vote to decertify the 2020 U.S. election electoral college votes for Biden?,Did the Assembly vote to decertify the 2020 U.S. election electoral college votes for Biden?,Did the Wisconsin State Assembly vote to decertify the 2020 U.S. election electoral college votes for Biden?,Did this vote occur during the period in which Biden had votes?
Has the unemployment rate decreased since the Republicans took over government?,Has the unemployment rate decreased since Governor Walker took over?,Have the unemployment rates increased since Walker took over?,Do all Wisconsinites with job losses after Walker take over have lost their job?,Has the unemployment rate increased since Walker took office?,Do many of those who have lost their jobs have family members who have lost their job?
Was the woman buried in a Phallus - shaped coffin in Ghana?,Did she have ten children from men in Ghana?,Did the family members have ten children in Ghana?,Did the family members live in the same country in Ghana?,Is the family of 10 from Ghana male or female?
Was Wasim Rizvi beaten for filing a plea to remove 26 verses from the Quran?,Was Wasim Rizvi beaten up for filing a plea to remove 26 verses from the Quran?,Was Wasim Rizvi beaten up for filing a plea to remove 26 verses from the Quran?
Are African children 18 percent of the nation's public school population?,Are black children 40% of the children suspended and expelled?,Has black children made up a larger portion of all public school dropouts?,Has black children made up a larger portion of the nation's public school students?,Has the percentage of African children dropouts increased in the last 3 years?
Is there a single Muslim nation that doesn't have discrimination against women or against gays?,Do all of the Muslim nations have discrimination against LGBT people?,Do any of the Muslim nations have subjugation of other religious beliefs?,Are all of the Muslim nations equal in terms of racial and sexual diversity?
"Did the new order state all businesses can open Monday, May 4?",Did it state any guidelines to follow?,Was it required to follow any changes to any of the new guidelines?,Has any new guidelines changed?,"Are there any Missouri businesses that will be allowed to open Monday, May 4 under the new order?","Are any Missouri businesses required to open Monday, May 4 under the new order?"
Did an illegal bike be bulldozed in New York in June 2022?,Did motorcycles destroyed in Lagos in Nigeria be bulldozed?,Did this video show cars being destroyed in Nigeria in June 2022?,Did this video show illegal motorcycles being destroyed in Nigeria in June 2022?
Was Saunders associated with the negotiations with teachers?,Are the negotiations about teachers free salary negotiations in which they work?,Was Saunders responsible for finding solutions for teachers?,Is Saunders' work a part of the effort to provide for teachers during budget crisis?,Are Saunders' recollection of budget crisis a useful part of that effort?
"Did Prince record 37,000 hours of Bill Joel cover songs?",Is there any evidence that this shows?,Is there any evidence that this shows is true?,Is there a positive influence from this record?,Is this music recognizable by people in the music business?,Is there any evidence that this song is being played at this time?
Does the health insurance reform bill cut the deficit by $1.2 trillion over the second 10 years?,Is there a specific budget-related number of projected cuts from the health insurance reform bill?,Can the health insurance reform bill be expected to cut the deficit by $1.2 trillion over the second 10 years?,Does the health insurance reform bill call for federal funding that will be secured by the Affordable Care Act?
Did the girl go missing for seven months?,Was the cabin disguised in log pile?,Did she have any apparent trauma?,Was the cabin full of items the girl may have needed?,Did a video show her in the cabin?,Was the video released in video format?,Did the cabin have a cabin or cabins that included multiple cabins?
Did the Spanish flu epidemic cause most deaths as a result of bacterial pneumonia?,Did Dr. Fauci co-authored the letter that claimed masks caused most deaths as a result of bacterial pneumonia?,Was the letter published in any news outlet?,Was the letter produced by Fauci?,Did Fauci receive the letter from a doctor?
Is Obama attempting to fund this expansion of health care for children that Bush vetoed?,Does Obama have money to fully fund this expansion?,Is Obama's stated goal for expansion of health care for needy children an objective?,Did he meet this goal by using all of his available resources for this project?
Do more than half of women under 30 who give birth do so outside of marriage?,Does this percentage exclude women in low income categories?,Have the statistics to support this claim been reported?,Do these statistics reflect the overall population for this age group?,Do these statistics represent actual data?,Are there any other types of age groups for this gender demographic?
Was this chyron broadcast on CNN in January 2021?,Was this tweet in response to a rally?,Was this tweet attributed to Antifa?,Do these statements inherently mean that Antifa was responsible for the rally?,Did Antifa stormed Capital Hill?,Do these statements imply that a mass rally took place in the name of Antifa?
Did the infamous Lion Hunter Slip and Fall 100 Feet to his death?,Did the infamous Lion Hunter fall on the ground during the hunt?,Did the infamous Lion Hunter die from complications with the injury?,Did the infamous Lion Hunter die from other causes?,Did the infamous Lion Hunter take a drug before and after his death?
"Did Deal say: ""We have paid 30 billion in expansion funds, it's our money and Nathan Deal wants Washington to keep it.""?",Is there more than $30 billion in expansion funds?,Does Deal have any reason to think this may have been intentional?,Is there more than $300 million in expansion funds?
Was an elephant on the road?,Did someone fall from their bike because of an elephant?,Are there any other sources of information regarding this incident?,Was the incident in Nainital a total loss?,Did this incident occur in Ramnagar?,Was this incident an isolated incident?,Are there any other reports of similar incidents?
Is ethanol a car engine corrosive?,Is it safe for car engines to be contaminated by 15% ethanol?,Will ethanol cause engine damage?,Do vehicles in the U.S. contain more ethanol than in other countries?,Will ethanol result in engine problems?,Would ethanol in food cause engine damage?
Did Ronaldo move bottles of Coca-Cola out of view during the news conference?,Did Coca-Cola's stock drop more than $4 billion after Ronaldo moved two bottles of Coca-Cola out of view in the news conference?,Does Ronaldo have any other products that could have caused this effect?
Did Clinton Foundation carry out the port of Baltimore port of entry for immigration?,Did the port of Baltimore have access to the Clinton Foundation?,Did the Clinton Foundation cargo ship harbor illegal immigrants?,Did the Clinton Foundation ship carry out the raid?,Did the Clinton Foundation ship harbor illegal immigrants?,Are there more than 460 indicted immigrants in Baltimore?
Did Sanders propose a 42% tax on minimum wage income?,Do Sanders propose taxing minimum wage income?,Is Sanders' plan only a proposal to tax minimum wage income?,Is Sanders' proposal in support of an 1% wage rate?,Are Sanders' proposals compatible with 1% wage rates?,Are Sanders' plans compatible with 2% wage rates?
Did Oklahoma educators receive the lowest pay in the US?,Do Oklahoma students receive the same salary as teachers across the country?,Do Oklahoma students receive a lower standard of education than teachers in many other states?,Is this assertion accurate?,Can this assertion be verified with data?,Is the state that this assertion is made from known to be part of America's poorest teacher countries?
Did Neerja Bhanot evacuate passengers during the Pan Am 73 hijacking?,Was Neerja Bhanot known as an ally in the hijacking?,Did Neerja Bhanot help evacuate the passengers of Pan Am Flight 73?,Did Neerja Bhanot die shielding children from gunfire?
"Did MacGinnitie vote in the Republican primary for a longer amount of time, before 2008?",Was the 2012 primary not the last primary MacGinnitie voted in?,Did MacGinnitie vote in any primaries after the 2008 primary?,Did MacGinnitie vote in the 2012 Republican primaries before the 2008 primary?
Does the tax on feminine hygiene products in Germany come in the form of a 7% tax?,Is tampon packaging common in Germany?,Is the tax on feminine hygiene products in Germany more like the tax on books?,Is the German tax on feminine hygiene products comparable to the one on books?
Has New Jersey had fewer employees in state government than it had when Christie Whitman left office?,Does Whitman say NJ has fewer employees now than it did in 2001?,Was this process of attrition unimpeded?,Has Whitman made any changes to the state government in regards to job creation?
Was Hillary Clinton the person who expressed her misgivings in Bosnia?,Did Hillary Clinton ever regret her remarks?,Is it likely that Clinton is currently on vacation?,Is it likely that Clinton was in the area when Bosnia was on fire?,Was this an actual event?,Is it likely that Clinton was in the area of Bosnia when Bosnia was on fire?
Did Biden receive a sudden influx of votes?,Is there evidence of Biden getting a sudden influx of votes?,Did Biden get a sudden influx of votes while Donald Trump did not?,Is Biden getting votes for Trump while Biden is receiving votes for Hillary Clinton?
"Has President Bola Tinubu approved a 114% salary increase for the President, governors and other public officeholders?","Has President Bola Tinubu approved any other wage increase for the President, governors and other public officeholders?","Has President Bola Tinubu approved any salary increase for the President, Governors and other public officeholders?"
Did the United States spend trillions on economic improvement since 1965?,Does the poverty rate haven’t budged since 1965?,Do more poverty rates exist today than there were in 1965?,Does the US spend trillions on economic improvement since 1965?,Do most of these trillions come from the social welfare program?
Did Biden administration halt deportations for all illegal aliens?,Did Biden administration halt deportations for MS-13 gang members?,Are all illegal aliens deported under Biden administration?,Are all illegal aliens deported under Biden administration?,Is Biden administration halting deportations for all illegal aliens?
Did this occur at a Meijer in Shelby Township?,Did this occur at a Meijer in Shelby Township?,Did anyone else in the bathroom have drugs or a gun?,Was this a drug-related crime?,Did this woman get drugged?,Did this woman ever leave the bathroom?
Did the American Conservative Union give Ryan a dismal 0.0 percent rating for the billions he has contributed to our national debt?,Does the American Conservative Union give Ryan a 1% rating for the billions he has contributed to our national debt?,Have any of the billions Ryan has contributed to our national debt been withdrawn?
"Did large machinery move 500,000 pounds of earth for one Tesla battery?","Did large machinery move 500,000 pounds of earth for one Tesla battery?",Are there any other data-related statistics?,"Did any data-related statistics contradict the figures of the ""large machinery required to move 500,000 pounds of earth for one single Tesla battery""?"
"Did Lil Nas X release a version of his music video ""Industry Baby""?",Was Lil Nas X the actor who performed naked in the music video?,Did Lil Nas X's music video include any other actors?,Did Lil Nas X's music video include any other rappers?
Did 85 percent of immigrants attend court hearings or call to schedule hearings?,Did 85 percent of immigrants have a court hearing?,Was the percentage of immigrants who did not attend a court hearing a problem for many in the country?,Was a % of the immigrants who did not attend a court hearing a problem for some in the country?
Did Sisqo have a long life when diagnosed with advanced lupus?,Did Sisqo die at a young age?,Did Sisqo die from cancer?,Did Sisqo live beyond his death?,Did Sisqo die when diagnosed with advanced lupus?
Has 87 percent of poultry carcasses tested positive for E. coli?,Was this 100% accurate?,Does the USDA recommend that this product be tested to ensure that it is safe?,Can you confirm that this is a serious problem?,Are any states offering support that states should not use this product?,Is this FDA approved?
Did Biden tweet the 2020 presidential election was rigged?,Did Biden tweet that the 2020 presidential elections were rigged?,Did Biden think that the 2020 presidential election was rigged?,Did Biden think that the 2020 presidential election was rigged?,Does Biden support the 2020 election being rigged?
Did Helen Hulick wear slacks to court in 1938?,Did she do this for all of her legal cases in 1938?,Did Hulick ever receive a jail sentence for this crime?,Did Hulick receive a jail sentence for this crime?,Did Hulick ever get a sentence in this crime?
"Did this group of ""antifa"" infiltrater's plot a violent attack at the Richmond, Virginia, pro-gun rally?",Did the organizers try to gather information?,Did a group of antifa infiltators plot violence?,Did the protesters attend the rally in person?
Did Baldwin support the Iran deal?,Did the Iran deal give large amounts of money to a state sponsor of terror?,Did Baldwin support the Iran deal?,Did Baldwin support the Iran deal after the Iran deal?,Did Baldwin support the Iran deal after the Iran deal?,Did Baldwin support the Iran deal after the Iran deal?
Did these lungs bear witness to someone who has smoked marijuana for 10 years?,Did the person smoking marijuana have a distinctive look to them?,Does the person in this image possess medical marijuana certification?,Do these lungs bear witness to any previous pot smoking?,Has this person been smoking marijuana for 10 years?
Did photographs show injuries by a victim of the September 2016 St. Cloud stabbing?,Did the photograph show the injury victim sustained a second time?,Did the photograph show the victim sustained injuries by a second time?,Did the photograph show the victim having other injuries?,Did the photograph show the victim had more injuries from the stabbing?
Did the group attack the girl?,Did Ansari burn the girl alive?,Did Ansari have an accomplice?,"Is the incident in Tonk District, Rajasthan, located in Rizwan Ansari's district?",Was Ansari associated with the girl raped?,Did Ansari have a weapon?
Are there cases of murders in Macomb County?,Are any other serial killers believed to be lurking in this area?,Is the vigilante a serial killer?,Do local police believe the serial killer is a vigilante?,Is there any pedophiles in Macomb County?
Did his administration go beyond the constitutional requirement by increasing the percentage of shareable revenues between counties?,Did this increase help Kenya achieve a low tax rate?,Does this raise any doubt of a national law in Kenya that requires counties to pay a share of revenue back to the government?,Did the increase from 15% to 34% involve other counties?
Will this increase in property taxes from Robin Hood be enough to finance local schools?,Will the revenue from local property taxes be enough to fund Austin ISD?,Will this increase in property taxes be enough to fund Austin ISD?,Will Robin Hood be able to recoup his funding in 2018?,Would Robin Hood be able to recoup his funding in 2018?
Did 96 percent of New Jerseyans support expanding background checks?,Did 95% of gun households in New Jersey support expanding background checks?,Are 95% of New Jerseyans opposed to expanding background checks?,Has 95% of New Jerseyans supported expanding background checks?,Does 95% of New Jerseyans support expanding background checks?
Would the bill force states to adopt universal mail-in ballots?,Would the bill force states to adopt universal mail-in ballots?,Would the bill force states to adopt universal mail-in ballots?,Would states have to wait an extra three days for the first mail-in ballots?,Does the bill require states to wait an additional three days for the first mail-in ballot?
Is this claim backed up?,Did Christie come up with a new agenda for ethics reform in September 2011?,Did Christie's agenda include allowing more information to be released about his ethics policies?,Does Christie appear to have approved new ethics reform legislation that he will be announcing during the November election?
Was Mark Ibrahim forced from his job because of the Capitol protest?,Was Mark Ibrahim actually indicted by DEA?,Was Mark Ibrahim arrested due to his presence at the Capitol protest?,Was the capitol protest actually part of Mark Ibrahim's job?,Was the Capitol protest part of Mark Ibrahim's job?,Did Mark Ibrahim attend the Capitol protest?
"Are 600 people more often a result of heat than floods, hurricanes and tornados combined?","Are there more people impacted by heat than floods, hurricanes and tornadoes combined?",Has heat been identified as a major cause of death for U.S. people?,Are heat deaths associated with other weather-related problems?
"Was there as few as 2 percent of 50,000 children who entered US illegally this year?",Did they go home?,Would the children have to be imprisoned to return home?,Have those children returned?,Has the US stopped providing aid to these children?,Have any of the children been resettled?
Is Cuban referring to millennials voting for Democrats because they fact check everything?,Are there any other millennials that will probably vote for Democrats in 2016?,Does Cuban think millennials will vote for Democrats because they fact check everything?,Are there any millennials who will vote for Democrats because they fact check everything?
Did Abe tweet before his death that he had evidence that would lead to the arrest of Hillary Clinton?,Did Abe tweet before his death before he died?,Was Abe alive before 2022?,Did Abe tweet before his death?,"Did Abe tweet before his death on July 8, 2022?","Did Abe tweet before his death on July 8, 2022?"
Would it be unforgivable to throw 24 million people off of health insurance?,Would it be unforgivable to throw billionaires a massive new tax giveaway?,Would it be unforgivable to throw billionaires a massive new tax giveaway?,Does the tax giveaway have to occur before the change is implemented?
Did FIFA announce a plan to extend World Cup matches in Qatar by 10 minutes?,Did the United States support the plan?,Did FIFA's plans imply the Qatar matches would be cancelled?,Was the Qatari announcement about the extended Qatar match date a response to the United States proposal?,Did Qatar not support the Qatari plan?
Has the clip of firefighters saving dehydrated deer existed in any calendar year that happened before 2023?,"Is the clip of firefighters saving dehydrated deer, published before 2023, correct?",Are the fires in the year 2023 associated with this clip of firefighters saving dehydrated deer?,"Is the clip of firefighters saving dehydrated deer, published before 2023, accurate?"
Did Edison invent the lightbulb?,Is Biden referring to a black man?,Was Biden referring to a white person?,Are Biden's remarks attributed to someone of Biden's race?,Is Biden's alleged claim about Edison’s invention true?
Did this collage consist of many images?,Did the images depict injuries related to the protests?,Did these images show injuries involving groups other than protests?,Did any individuals get hurt during this protest?,Was there controversy over whether the images are for this protest?,Did this collage show demonstrations on a large scale?
Did Trump win the US elections in 2020?,Was Trump a candidate?,Did Trump declare victory in Times Square?,Did Trump advertise his victory in Times Square?,Did Trump win US elections in 2020?,Did Trump display a logo in Times Square?,Did Trump display a slogan in Times Square?,Did Trump represent Trump in Times Square?
Is the phone in this picture shown in any part of the movie?,Is the phone shown in this picture displaying a date other than 9/10/2001?,Does the phone in this picture show other events other than 9/10/2001?,Does this phone still remain in the movie?,Would a phone display this date in any other part of the movie?
"Did the tax increases go into effect on Jan. 1, 2015?",Does the tax increase have anything to do with Obamacare?,Is the law that passed tax increases under the Affordable Care Act known as Obamacare?,Did the tax increase come with a mandate?,Did the tax increase include an individual mandate?,Did the tax increase come with an individual mandate?
Did Modi impose president’s rule more than 39 times during his time as PM?,Is the number of times President's rule was imposed by Indira Gandhi different from how many times it was imposed by Modi?,Does the number of times that President's rule was imposed by Gandhi differ from how many times Modi imposed it?
Did the woman have sex with her husband while he was suffering from a heart attack?,Did the woman perform oral sex with her husband while he was suffering from a heart attack?,Did the woman get her husband into a coma?,Did the woman die of a cardiac arrest?,Did the woman have a significant relationship with her husband in any way?
Did the 102 year old man build his own helicopter?,Was the 102 year old man in uniform with his helicopter in the video?,Did this 102 year old man build his own helicopter?,. Does this 102 year old man currently have a license as an air force veteran?,Have any previous air corps veterans built their own helicopters?
Is it a legal requirement that people can discuss non-chemo cancer treatments?,Does it mean that people are prohibited from discussing non-chemo cancer treatment?,Are there other legal restrictions on cancer treatment?,Has there been no significant change since the law's repeal?,Did the act allow people to discuss non-chemo cancer treatments?
Does Sanders agree on what percentage of the income tax he will collect?,Does Sanders support this claim?,Does Sanders agree with the stated goal in his statement?,Does Sanders support this claim?,Is there any evidence that Bernie Sanders' stance was based on an actual report?,Is it true that Bernie Sanders says he is going to tax people at 90 percent?
Is the U.S. worse economically than all other nations going through COVID-19?,Is the U.S. worse economically than any other country in the world going through COVID-19?,Is this country going to experience a worse economic trough?,Does this country have a worse economic trough?
Did Delhi and Uttar Pradesh Governments arrange 100 or 200 buses to ferry migrants during COVID-19 lockdown?,Did all of this depend on the transport infrastructure?,Is a shortage of migrant buses available?,Does India have a higher than average rate of immigration than Uttar Pradesh?,Does COVID have a lower rate than Uttar Pradesh?
Did the dog rescue 10 people in Turkey after Monday’s earthquake?,Did the dog need to be groomed before this incident?,Were there any reports that the dog was rescued with a hose?,Do dogs have different personalities?,Did the dog have any other injuries in the earthquake?,Did anyone in the area have a dog?
Do six other countries permit abortions on demand at 20 weeks?,Are any of these nations in the United States?,Is it true that the United States permits abortions on demand at 20 weeks?,Have any other nations reacted differently to this statement?,Is the United States one of the seven nations that allow abortion on demand at 20 weeks?
Is this the first time China has asked the Supreme People's Court for approval to euthanise coronavirus patients?,Does this require approval from the Supreme People's Court of the People's Republic of China?,"Do 20,000 coronavirus patients in China have been euthanised?"
Does it appear the monk in question is in a state of deep meditation or has he been deceased for years?,Did it appear the monk has died because of natural causes?,Does it appear the monk is in a state of deep meditation or has he died due to natural causes?,Does it appear that the Monk will be buried in a state of deep meditation or has he died because of natural causes?
Is there evidence that texting while driving causes a significant amount of car accidents?,Can texting while driving cause as many car accidents as any other type of driving?,Are there studies that support this claim?,Do any of these studies claim that texting while driving causes a significant amount of car accidents?
"Did 35,000 veterans die from adverse effects from the Anthrax vaccine that they were mandated to receive?",Did the number of veterans die directly from the Anthrax vaccine?,Does the government report from 2008 describe the true number of vets who died directly from the Anthrax vaccine?,Has an article in the past written about the death of veterans?
"Is it true that images shared widely in September 2019 showed people easily climbing the same fence, or same type of fence, Trump said 'can't be climbed'?",Was Trump's statements regarding climbing the fence not accurate?,Was the fence in question the same fence or type of fence?,"Was the fence in question the same fence or type of fence that Trump's ""can't be climbed""?"
Do water and salt dissolve the COVID-19 virus?,Can drinking water and salt dissolve COVID-19?,Is vinegar effective in removing COVID-19?,Are vinegar and water effective to remove COVID-19?,Is vinegar effective in removing COVID-19?,Are vinegar and salt effective in removing COVID-19?
Did the show implode before it ended?,Did any of the men in the show have success?,Did this show have women in it?,Was this show the most popular in the United States?,Did the cast of this show have a strong social influence?,Do men in this show seem to have been successful in this endeavor?
Did Sunak perform religious rituals before entering 10 Downing Street as UK PM?,Did Sunak perform religious rituals prior to entering 10 Downing Street as UK PM?,Was Sunak religiously disciplined before entering 10 Downing Street as UK PM?,Did Sunak perform religious rituals prior to entering 10 Downing Street as UK PM?
"Did a single glass of tap water containing fluoride be comparable to toothpaste, which is toxic?",Did the toothpaste have fluoride levels similar to those from eight glasses of tap water?,Is toothpaste toxic?,Is it safe to ingest fluoride from tap water?,Has fluoride been shown to increase levels of cancer?
Did people die in Thailand after eating meat infected with lumpy skin disease?,Did the death count of people infected with lumpy skin disease exceed 4?,"Was the illness a ""direct cause"" of the death?",Did the disease affect all people eating meat infected with lumpy skin disease?
Did Sahdev get a car as a gift?,Did Sahdev play Bachpan Ka Pyar on the internet?,Did Sahdev release a new song in 2014?,Did Sahdev release another song in 2014?,Has Sahdev previously released music with the same title?,Did Sahdev release a new song in 2014?
Is this a national event?,Did this store close on September 11?,Did this store offer a commemorative act?,Did this store have any commemorative items?,Is this store located in a city of Houston?,Does this store include this organization?,Is this event held in Houston?,Was this store opened on September 11?
Did turkey weigh more in the ‘30s than in the present?,Did Turkey weigh less in the ‘30s than in the present?,Do you have more or less data for your reasoning?,Was there any evidence that Turkey weighed more in the ‘30s than in the present?,Is the estimate accurate?
"Was the median pay for a McDonald's employee in 2017 $7,500?",Was the CEO of McDonalds paid $21.8 million?,Is the median income of McDonald's employees less than the minimum wage?,"Would a $15 minimum wage be a ""moral outrage""?",Does a $15 minimum wage make more sense for Americans than the current $18.00 wage?
Did Mars make a remarkably close approach to earth in the past?,Will Mars make a remarkably close approach to earth in 2018?,Will Mars make a remarkably close approach to earth on Aug 27?,Do the chances of the planet making this close approach to earth have a significant effect on space exploration?
Did this child tax credit help 97% of families living in poverty under Biden?,Did this credit pass under Biden?,Have the tax credits passed under Biden impacted the average child in families living in poverty?,Has the child tax credit helped 97% of families living in poverty?,Does the child tax credit currently exist?
Does voter fraud occur in these eight states?,Are there any other states where voter fraud is visible?,Did voter fraud occur in these eight states?,Is voter fraud visible in these eight states?,Would you believe that these eight states have voter fraud?,Are these eight states a good candidate for voter fraud?,Do these states seem likely to benefit from the vote?
"Does the Greenlight Pinellas 1-cent sales tax ""is permanent, we never get to vote on this again?","Does the Greenlight Pinellas 1-cent sales tax ""is permanent, we never get to vote on this again?","Was the Greenlight Pinellas 1-cent sales tax "" permanent""?"
Does Trump propose cutting a half a billion dollars of local police support?,"Does Trump claim there are 40,000 police officers in America?","Did Trump claim there are 40,000 police officers in America?","Are the 40,000 police officers currently in America paid by these government funds?",Is there a reason to think that this is the best position on this issue?
Does the 1951 United Nations Convention Give Migrants the Legal Right to Enter the United States?,Does this Convention also give the right to migrant children to enter U.S.?,Does this Convention grant children who are fleeing violence in their home country the legal right to enter the United States?
Was the federal budget balanced in 2005?,Did he say they balanced it at that time?,Did he ever say the federal budget balanced it?,"Did he ever say any of his ""chief architects"" had a role in making the federal budget balanced?",Was the federal budget balanced at any time prior to 2005?
Did the person who burned Koran and his 'killer' have any other alleged actions?,Did the person who burned Koran and his 'killer' live in Sweden at the time of the burnt Koran?,Did anyone else know about this alleged event at the time of the burnt Koran?
How many people do the water crisis in California affect?,Are there large gaps in access to clean water?,What percentage of people in California are deprived of clean water to bathe in or drink?,Are any of these California cities unable to have clean water?,Are there any cities in the state in which 90% of the population does not have clean water to bathe in or drink?
Did Saudi Arabia order six school girls to be beheaded for celebrating their birthday with boys?,Is it possible that they would celebrate their birthday with boys?,Has Saudi Arabia imposed the death penalty for celebrating birthday with boys?,Were there disciplinary issues between Saudi Arabia and boys celebrating their birthdays?,Were there any punishments for celebrating their birthday with boys?
Did Swamy reveal that Gandhi and Singh illegally sold 2 tonnes of thirium to China during their regime?,Did Swamy have any contact with the Gandhi and Singh aides on this issue?,Did Swamy publicly reveal any connection between Swamy and the aides on this issue?,Did Swamy disclose any other details on this issue during the tenure of the Gandhi and Singh aides?
Does this report support the assertions of the article?,Did this individual's marriage partner divorce him due to a DNA test?,Did this individual's partner divorce him due to a DNA test?,Did this individual's spouse testify in support of this claim?,Would this individual have been able to survive a divorce after a DNA test?
Did Dr. Phil claim that women who support Trump are damaged?,Does Phil claim women who support Trump are damaged?,Did Phil endorse Trump?,Did any of the women who support Trump support Trump?,Did the women who support Trump support the president?,Did Dr. Phil use this statement in his series?,Did Phil make a statement regarding Trump's supporters in the last month?
Does Romney have a corporate office in Bermuda?,Has Romney made a claim to have a corporation in Bermuda?,Did Romney fail to declare any advetint of a corporation in Bermuda on any advetint financial disclosures?,Did Romney reveal a corporate office in Bermuda on any advetint financial disclosures?,Did Romney provide any advetints of a corporation in Bermuda on any advetint financial disclosures?
Does the seawater get COVID-19 infected dead bodies to the sea?,Do COVID-19 infected dead bodies get thrown into the sea by sea water?,Does the COVID-19 infected dead body go into the sea by fishes?,Are these fish infected by COVID-19?
Is there a picture of a Kikuyu woman carrying a colonial settler in Kenya in 1943?,"No, it is a photo of a Kikuyu woman from India in about 1900. Is this Kikuyu woman carrying a colonial settler in Kenya in 1943?",Yes.?
"Did Hanks expose the role his father, Tom Hanks, supposedly played in the Maui wildfires?",Did Hanks identify his father?,Did Hanks reveal that his father played a part in the Maui wildfires?,Did Hanks play any role in the wildfires?
Did Buono vote for raising taxes on anything?,Does Buono vote 154 times to raise taxes?,Is Buono in favor of raising taxes on income?,Do I need to raise taxes on health care?,Is Buono a supporter of raising the cost of living?,Did Buono vote in favor of higher tax rates for health care?
Was the strong room in Sabzi Mandi a single vehicle?,Did the strong room include multiple vehicles?,Did the strong room include other vehicles?,Did the strong room contain other vehicles?,Did the strong room contain a vehicle?,Did the strong room have a vehicle?,Did the strong room contain any additional vehicles?
Has the digital altered image been altered?,Have a picture of the digital altered image been published?,Does the digital altered image resemble the original image of Trump?,Is there evidence of Trump using the image in an anti-racism campaign?,Is Trump promoting the election of 2020?,Is there evidence of Trump using the image in an anti-racism campaign?
Did McCain support war in Iraq in the aftermath of 9/11?,Was McCain a leading supporter of an invasion and occupation of Iraq on 9/11?,Did McCain support a major invasion and occupation of Iraq on 9/11?,Did McCain support a major invasion and occupation of Iraq on 9/11?,Were McCain's views based on a specific time and date?
Was Kanye West's score against wheelchair basketball team?,Was West's score against wheelchair basketball team the same as his total score?,Did West score all of the points in his wheelchair basketball game?,Did Kanye score all of the points in his wheelchair basketball game?,Are there any records for West's score in wheelchair basketball games?
Are these athletes fined for serious crimes?,Are these athletes sentenced light?,Were these college athletes sentenced harshly for serious crimes?,Did these high school athletes get lightly sentenced for crimes?,Did these college athletes get light sentences for minor crimes?,Has this family been in prison before for committing a minor crime?
Did Amazon sell off pallets of DHL parcels?,Does Amazon sell off pallets of DHL parcels?,Is there any indication that Amazon is selling off DHL parcels?,Is this a restocking of DHL packages?,Are any of these packages not sold to Amazon?
Did Walmart steal children’s shoes and sell them?,Does this imply they are buying kids’ shoes and reselling them?,Are kids’ shoes being sold by Walmart at a lower price than the rest of the retail market?,"Can you purchase a girl’s shoe for $5,000 at Walmart?",Can you order “girls shoes” from Walmart and have them shipped to your home?
Did the United States spend $10 billion on the Iraqi electrical grid?,Has the Iraqi electrical grid been fixed since 2002?,Do Iraqians still receive 5 hours of electricity a day?,Does Iraq's electrical grid provide a lot of electricity?,Has Iraq's electrical system survived the war?,Would this be the case if the power grid is fully functional?
Did the two boys disappear?,Did the boys disappear from their homes?,Did the boys find a treasure map?,Was the treasure map recovered?,Do the two boys have the same name?,Have there been any other documented disappearances from this home?,Are these two individuals in this photo?,Did the boys leave their homes after being given a treasure map?
Is Lizzo likely to be collaborating with BTS?,Is Lizzo in high demand from music fans?,Was Lizzo recently interviewed about BTS?,Did Lizzo mention the possibility of having sex with BTS?,Are Lizzo and BTS considered close and a close group?,Did Lizzo say she might not be able to make it through the studio session?
"Would a ""hard-working law-abiding citizen who earns $80,000, doesn't get a stimulus check "" but would a ""convicted murderer or rapist sitting in jail, does get a stimulus check?","""?","Would a ""convicted murderer or rapist sitting in jail "" get a stimulus check?"
Did there any presidents with African American ancestry prior to Obama?,Did any president in history have at least one African American ancestor?,Did any African American ancestors become a vice president prior to Obama?,Did any African American leader ever have a double nationality?
Did Ben Carson have conjoined twins?,Did Ben Carson actually lose the battle for separation?,Did Ben Carson win elections in his own country?,Has this evidence been used in a press release?,Has this evidence been used in court?,Is this evidence being used by politicians?,Has the majority of photos shown a photo of this person?
Would half of the proposed federal tax breaks go to the wealthiest 1 percent?,Are all the proposed tax breaks proposed for the wealthy?,Would any of the proposed federal tax breaks go to the wealthiest one percent?,Would all proposed federal tax breaks go to the wealthiest 1 percent?,Would all of the proposed federal tax breaks go to the wealthiest one percent?
Is this photo on a stationary object or person?,Are protesters gathered in this area on a stationary object?,Do people demonstrate in this area during this time frame?,Is there any indication that the protests are taking place in this area?,Have these protestors been arrested in this location?
Is Neru Deshpande the girl who was clicked for Parle G biscuit when she was 4 years old?,Was Deshpande a Parle G biscuit girl when she was 4 years old?,Has Deshpande been in the Parle G biscuit for a long period of time?
Did this picture show devastation caused by a blast in Peshawar?,Did the blast in Peshawar cause this image?,Did the bombing in Peshawar cause this image?,Did this picture show the extent of damage in Peshawar?,Did this picture show the extent of damage in Peshawar?
Did the Ukraine receive more than 70% of the humanitarian aid?,Did the Ukraine distribute some aid from the EU?,Was the city of Krivoy Rog an example of this?,Did this city receive any humanitarian aid from the EU?,Was the city of Krivoy Rog an example of this?,Does the EU contribute to humanitarian aid?
Has 331 of these bills passed into law?,Is it true that Gillibrand has put a significant number of bills in Congress?,Can you cite any specific bills passed in Congress?,Does this statement reflect a specific number of bills?,Have all of Gillibrand's bills passed into law?
Was Arnold the first person in British history to be convicted of a speeding offense?,"Was Arnold arrested after driving above 2 mph in Tunbridge Wells, Kent?","Was Arnold convicted after driving over 2 mph in Tunbridge Wells, Kent?",Did Arnold receive a fine or dismissal from court for his speeding offense?
How much one-time money was used in the budget?,Did the money balance in the budget at that time?,Did the money balance in the budget at the time of this reporting?,Was this budget balanced in the past?,Did this budget have an annual budget?,Did this budget balance in the past?,Do any of the budget numbers indicate this is the case?
Did the Covid-19 vaccine cause twice as many deaths in 6 months as deaths in 15 months?,Did these deaths result from more covid 19 vaccines than those deaths?,Do deaths in 6 months and 15 months result from more covid 19 vaccines than deaths in 15 months?,Are there any other factors that have contributed to people vaccinated with the Covid-19 vaccines?
Was an 80% of WI residents referendum or resolution in favor of fair maps?,Did all of the jurisdictions represent about 80% of WI residents?,Did the resolutions in favor of fair maps pass in any jurisdiction?,Was the overall average vote in favor of fair maps over 80%?,Has the overall average percentage of WI residents in favor of fair maps been higher than 80%?
Is there any proof that the inflatable pig at the Roger Waters show featured Star of David in the show 10 years ago?,Was the inflatable pig featured in the live performance of Roger Waters?,Did Roger Waters perform with the inflatable pig at the Roger Waters show 10 years ago?,Was there a recording of Roger Waters and the inflatable pig at the Roger Waters show 10 years ago?
Did this person ejaculate in his boss' coffee every day for 4 years?,Did this person have any criminal records?,Are these facts true?,Is this man suspected of this behavior?,Were these allegations true?,Has this person been charged with any crime?,Have these accusations been proven?
Did Trump cut US aid to South Africa?,Is there any evidence that Trump cut US aid to South Africa?,Did Trump's response to South African attacks on white people cause the aid cuts?,Have any countries that Trump has visited cut aid to South Africa?,Has Trump said that there was a lack of response to South African attacks in terms of the aid cuts?
"Does China seek approval to start the mass killing of 20,000 people in order to stop the spread of new coronavirus?","Does China want to start the mass killing of 20,000 people in order to stop the spread of new coronavirus?","Is China seeking approval to start the mass killing of 20,000 people in order to stop the spread of new coronavirus?"
Did Trump say this in 1991?,Was Trump quoted saying this during this same period in 1991?,Did Trump make this statement more than ten years after the quote?,Did Trump have this saying in 1992?,Did Trump ever use this comment after this statement?,Did Trump want women to behave similarly to men?,Has this statement been used much differently over time?
"Did Barack Obama say Hillary Clinton would ""say anything and do nothing""?",Did Obama mention Hillary Clinton did not make a commitment on her campaign?,Does this statements accurately reflect the statements of President Obama?,Are these statements accurate?,Did Obama say Hillary Clinton was not qualified for the presidency?,Did Obama mention any specific issues related to Hillary Clinton?
Are there trends in the homeownership rate for African American families?,Was the Fair Housing Act signed into law in 1968?,Was the homeownership rate for white households in America unchanged from 1966?,Was the homeownership rate for black families in the United States unchanged from 1996?,Did the homeownership rate for white households in America increase during 2008?
Did the effectiveness of Pfizer’s COVID-19 vaccine become “negative” within five months?,Did the effect of Pfizer’s COVID-19 vaccine destroy immunity acquired from prior infection?,Did the effect of Pfizer’s COVID-19 vaccine permanently affect immune status?,Did this study focus solely on the effectiveness of Pfizer’s COVID-19 vaccine?
Did the Amazon rainforest produce 20% of the worlds oxygen?,Did the Amazon rainforest produce all of the oxygen the worlds oxygen supply?,Did the Amazon rainforest contribute to the atmosphere’s oxygen supply?,Would the Amazon rainforest contribute to the Earths oxygen supply?,Did the rainforest account for 20% of the earths oxygen supply?
"Did Dinklage play the voice of a wake-up call for Elaine on ""Seinfeld""?",Did Dinklage get credit for this role in 1995?,Did Dinklage do this voice job in an uncredited role for this episode?,Were Dinklage's voice roles for this episode for a regular voice role or in an uncredited role?
Do FBI agents admit to committing this crime in the video?,Does anyone else in this case admit to this crime?,Was this information circulating on the Internet before the FBI took the video?,Was there any video of this crime circulating in the media before the FBI took the video?,Is this video of this crime available?
Was there an estimated $5.3 million of economic loss for a few hours of shutting down the border?,Is there an estimated billions of dollars of economic consequence if we continue with this rhetoric?,Did this report include specific figures?,Did the estimates represent economic loss totals?,Did this report include estimates of a million or billion in economic effect?
Would Robredo bring back the government PNO did from 2010-2016 and from 2022-28?,Would Robredo bring back the government PNO did from 2010-2016 and from 2022-28?,Does Robredo think that PNO did better than Robredo from 2010-2016?
Was this video released in any format?,Was this video part of the demonstration for Hindus?,Was this protest part of a rally?,Was this protest part of a larger event?,Was this rally part of a larger political gathering?,Are there multiple people mentioned on this video?,Was this event part of a larger rally?
Would the bill allow for an absentee ballot to be mail to anyone without a voter ID?,Would the bill allow people to choose from absentee ballots without proof of ID?,Are there other requirements if the bill passes?,Can someone have an absentee ballot without proof of ID?
Has this video been viewed by anyone else?,Has this video been viewed by many people?,Is this video a live recording?,Are these people all related to each other?,Does Muktika Ganguly know how to sing or have any experience with singing?,Does this video have any special effects?
Is Albert Bourla's claim that two Covid-19 shots will offer very limited protection?,Is it true that the Covid vaccine does not offer protection against this disease?,Is it true that Covid vaccines are available to prevent this disease?,Is it true that the Covid vaccine is very limited in protecting this disease?
Is it true that Aquino's remains will be flown back to the Philippines in November 2022?,Is it true that Aquino will be flown back to the Philippines in November 2022?,Is there any confirmation from the police of a person who would be able to confirm the information?
Is there evidence that this Russian plan is a ruse?,Is there proof that this ruse is a ruse?,Are there 50 former national intelligence folks that say this is a ruse?,Is there evidence that there was an actual ruse?,Does anyone believe the ruse?
Are 27 states going to receive tax payer money if the legislature refuses to expand Medicaid?,Is the expansion of Medicaid a good deal for Virginia's citizens?,Is the expansion of Medicaid a positive deal for Virginia's citizens?,Does the state that receives the Medicaid money pay for care?
"Has Biden released over 7,000 illegal aliens who were COVID positive in just one Texas city?","Is biden's border policies ""endangering not just the people of Texas, but people all across the country""?",Is Biden's border policies a factor in this situation?
Did State of Washington get the Quonset Business Park free for the state of Massachusetts?,Is it the case that there are a zero monetary gain from the Quonset Business Park?,"Did Gov. DeWitt get Quonset for free, therefore he didn’t make any money?",Did Gov. DeWitt have money to spend because of Quonset?
Did Biden claim that private insurance plans would not be affected by his plan?,Did Obamacare cause loss of private insurance plans?,Did Biden claim that his plan was the cause of many of the losses for private insurance providers?,Did Biden claim that Obamacare caused losses for private insurance providers?,Did Biden claim that Obamacare has resulted in a drop in private insurance providers?
Has there been a documentary about fake voting in Karnataka election?,Did the Muslim booth in this election contain fake votes?,Were fake votes being done in any of the Muslim booths that were in this election?,Was this election held in 2018?,Did fake votes have any effect on the 2023 elections?
Are the Philippines on track to attain a middle-income status by 2023?,Is the pandemic a factor in the Philippines' track?,Is the global economic downturn contributing to the Philippines' track?,Will the Philippines' progress towards achieving a middle income status by 2023 be due to government intervention?
Is it true that Hutchins was scheduled to work on a documentary about Hollywood pedophile rings?,Is there evidence that Hutchins' death was caused by suicide?,Was Hutchins diagnosed with a mental illness before her death?,Did Hutchins die in the shortest time during her career?,Was Hutchins' death a suicide?
Are only 30% [of students] getting the marks required [sic] to get into [university]?,Do a majority of students need these marks?,Did a majority of students need these marks to get into [university]?,Is there sufficient evidence to support the claim that a majority of students need these marks to get into [university]?
Did the protesters make a daily income from the protests?,Will protesters have to be paid for sitting in the demonstrations?,Will protesters receive Rs 500 per day for sitting in the demonstrations?,Will the protesters need to register to participate in the protests?,Will the protesters be paid for sitting in the demonstrations?
Is Beto O'Rourke voting in favor of a $10 a barrel tax on every barrel of oil produced in the state of Texas?,Did Beto O'Rourke vote in favor of this tax?,Was Beto O'Rourke in favor of this tax?,Is there any evidence that O'Rourke voted in favor of this tax?
Did Phoenix work as System Engineer at TCS for 6 months?,Did Phoenix play The Joker on any television shows?,Did Phoenix work as System Engineer while preparing for The Joker?,Did Phoenix work for TCS while preparing for The Joker?,Did Phoenix work as System Engineer during his time at TCS?
Do you have to hold your breath for 10 seconds to check if you have coronavirus?,Is there a specific test that is used to check if you have coronavirus?,Have there been any tests that have been used to determine if someone has coronavirus?,Have there been any tests that have been used to determine if someone has coronavirus?
"Was this $5,000 penalty for not having health insurance?","Was this $5,000 the entire fine that this person was charged?","Has this $10,000 been re-used for anyone?",Did Trump end the stealing?,Did Obama/Biden penalize this person?,Was this money used for anyone else?,Are the penalties that this person had to pay for their health insurance not overturned?
"Did 13,516 Marines apply for White House duty since Trump’s inauguration?",Did no Marines volunteer for White House duty under President Obama?,Has this same number of Marines applied for White House duty since Trump?,Does this quote show that Marines have applied for White House duty more than once in the past decade?,Did any Marines volunteer for White House duty in Obama's administration?
Did the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention admit that 98 million Americans were given a cancer virus through the polio vaccine?,Did the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention acknowledge that 98 million Americans were given a cancer virus through the polio vaccine?,Are there any other facts about the polio vaccine that may raise a question in the public’s mind about the health risks attached to it?
Did Mann become the youngest Punjab CM?,Did Mann ever lose elections?,Did Mann ever hold office longer than 48 years?,Did Mann have a younger successor before Mann was elected?,Are there any records of Mann's previous tenure?,Are there any records of his prior work?,Have there been any instances of Mann being the youngest Punjab CM?
Does a fire incident in Indonesia cause the death of two children?,Did the fire occur at the site of the crash?,Was a driver or vehicle responsible for the crash?,Did the fatality occur in the state of Indonesia?,Did the driver or vehicle intentionally cause the fire?,Did the driver/vehicle cause the fire?
Did the recent increase in tourism be significant?,Is the amount of tourists who entered the country much higher than this estimate?,Did the tourism increase over the last year or less?,Have the tourists that came into the country decreased in the last year?,Is there any other data about the past year?,Does the tourist increase have any cause?
Did Meena win the prize money of 70 liras after gambling on a casino mobile app?,Did Meena ever claim winnings?,Did Meena win the prize money after gambling on a casino mobile app?,Is it possible to win 70 liras without gambling on a casino mobile app?
In what year was this interview?,Did John say this in June 2023?,Is there any documentation this was published in?,Did John tell us these events took place in other countries?,Did John say this was the reason he would no longer perform in the U.S.?,Did this interview take place in April 2023?,Is this the year Elton John said he would no longer perform in the U.S.?
Are there now nearly 1 million students in higher education?,"Did students who are enrolled in higher education increase from 500,000 to 1 million in 1994?",Did these students enroll in higher education before 1994?,Was there a discrepancy between 1994 and 1994 in the number of students enrolled?,Does this change in student numbers reflect larger changes in enrollment over time?
Did Obama support a minimum wage indexed to inflation?,Were minimum wages indexed to inflation?,Would those wages be indexed to inflation?,Would workers still be making $20 an hour today if the minimum wage was indexed to inflation?,Has a 5% inflation rate reduced this number since Obama last month?
Did Trump smash the Oval Office after the election?,Did Trump smash the Oval Office after 2020?,Does Trump smash the Oval Office after the 2020 election?,Has Trump smashed the Oval Office after 2020?,Did Trump smash the Oval Office after 2020?,Did Trump smash the Oval Office after 2020?,Did Trump smash the Oval Office after 2020?
"Are government aids for hurricane relief 5,000 as a limited time offer?",Did the government aid money only last a couple of days?,Has the government given relief funds to hurricane victims before?,"Is the aid money for hurricanes 5,000 as a limited time offer?",Is the relief funds provided for hurricane victims under limited time offer?
Would staying home at Mar-a-Lago cost more than $1.8 million a year?,Will Trump's absence for just one weekend pay off for the entire Missouri meals on wheels budget?,Would Trump's absence at Mar-a-Lago for only one weekend bring a budget shortfall to Missouri?
Has California had over 30% or one third of people living at or below poverty in the country?,Are there more people living at or below poverty in California than the country as a whole?,Is California the only place in the country to experience less than a third of people living in poverty?,Can more people afford to live in poverty in California than in any other state?
Is the Ukrainian Synagogue in Uman the place to deposit weapons?,Is there evidence to suggest the Ukrainian authorities use the synagogue for storing military equipment?,Are Ukrainian authorities using the Synagogue as a place for depositing weapons?,Is there evidence for the Ukrainian authorities using the Synagogue as a place for holding military equipment?
Is the man from India?,Did he say that he has 15 children?,Did the man merely say 15 children?,Did the man merely say that he had 15 children?,Did the video include any other content related to the man's statement?,Did the man merely say 15 children?,Did the video include any other content related to the man's statement?,Did the video include any other content related to the man's statement?,Did any other videos include content similar to the man's statement?
Was Warren's election campaign statement true about Zuckerberg endorsement?,Did Warren's election campaign say Zuckerberg endorsed Trump?,Did Zuckerberg endorse Trump?,Did Warren call Zuckerberg a traitor?,Was Zuckerberg an actual person?,Will Warren's election campaign claim Zuckerberg endorsement?,Will Zuckerberg resign from Facebook?
"Was AI121 sent to rescue Indians in Ukraine on Feb 24, 2010?","Did AI121 rescue Indians in Ukraine on Feb 24, 2010?",Did AI121 receive a report from the Ukrainian government?,Did the Chinese government provide aid to AI121?,Did AI121 participate in the rescue operation in Ukraine?,Was the Chinese government involved in the rescue operation in Ukraine?
Did Hanks wear a t-shirt bearing liberal slogans on a Facebook post?,Did the shirt show Hanks' political views?,Did Hanks wear the t-shirt with liberal slogans on it?,Did Hanks wear the shirt in January 2018?,Do you think Hanks' shirt was a Democratic t-shirt?
Are there 22 million illegal aliens living in the USA and voting illegally?,Is it true that there are 22 million illegal aliens living in the USA and voting illegally?,Did the total number of illegal aliens increase in the US since 2014?,Is there any evidence that the Trump administration made this statement?
Did the game between Argentina and India win any games during this match?,Did Argentina win this game?,Does this video contain any other content?,Is this game a regular season game?,Was this video posted by an outsider?,Did this video contain any content by a company not associated with this tournament?
Is Cornyn the same person as Obama?,Did Cornyn vote twice in support of Obama's amnesty plan?,Is the Amnesty Plan approved by Cornyn?,Does Cornyn support the Amnesty Plan?,Is it true Cornyn did vote in support of Obama's amnesty plan?
Did Pakistan allow India to use its airspace to carry relief aid to Turkey?,Did Pakistan restrict India's airspace to allow a C-17 to carry aid to Turkey?,Is India's C-17 a humanitarian aid air vehicle?,Is Pakistan's airspace banned for humanitarian aids?
"Did ""antifa"" wear ""Trump supporters"" when the attack occurred?","Did this event take place on a date prior to January 6, 2021?",Did Antifa have any prior decorations?,Has this incident been documented in a documentary?,Did this event occur before the January 6 attack?,Is it possible for this argument to be true?
Do child deaths occur every 20 seconds because they lack access to clean water and sanitation?,Do these numbers reflect an average yearly average for these causes of child death?,Has there been an increase in the death rates due to access to clean water and sanitation?,Does this information reflect an average yearly average for these causes of death?
Have there been any cases of rural residents making their living solely from agricultural activities?,Is the percentage of population in rural areas higher than 90%?,Does this statement mean that 70% of rural residents earn a living from agricultural activities?,Is it true that 90% of rural residents make their living from agricultural activities?
Did this aid come without approval from Congress?,"Did this aid come ""quietly"" to Palestine?",Has this aid prevented Israeli attacks in Palestinian territories?,Has there been a ceasefire on this aid?,Did this aid obligate Congress to rescind this aid?,Did President Obama receive the aid without approval?
Was Mr Andrew not found?,Is there anything you can share about the Facebook user?,Is the missing man's dog with him?,Does the Facebook user have any photos of Mr Andrew or his dog?,Did the missing man have a description of his dog on Facebook?,Were there any other alleged missing people on Facebook?
Does Rodrigo Duterte say he will shut down voting precincts if Robredo is re-elected?,Is Rodrigo Duterte saying he will shut down voting precincts if Robredo is re-elected in the 2022 elections?
Is the park ranger taking a selfie with the gorillas?,Is the park ranger protecting the gorillas?,Does this park ranger normally take a selfie?,Does the park ranger take a selfie with the gorillas?,Is this park ranger a local politician?
Did this information come from an Inquirer.net graphic?,"Will local land, air, and sea travel to and from Metro Manila be suspended?",Is there any information to suggest that there will be limited travel from or to Metro Manila during this time?,Can local land travel be resumed once the suspension is lifted?,"Will this closure begin March 15, 2021 or April 14, 2021?"
"Did Jane Goodall say, ""We can solve climate change by having 7.5 billion humans inhabiting the earth""?",Does Jane Goodall say that this would solve climate change?,Did Jane Goodall say this at the World Economy Forum in Davos?,Does this video depict Jane Goodall's belief that human activity can solve climate change?
"Did the townhouse have 70,000 beer cans and boxes discarded?",Was the townhouse in a affluent area?,Was the townhouse in a poor area?,"Did the townhouse have a total of 70,000 beer cans and boxes discarded?",Was there any evidence that the townhouse has been used as a model for littering?
Ivermectin can cause sterility in 85 percent of men who take it. Ivermectin can cause sterility in 85% of men who take it. How much is the incidence of sterility in men who take ivermectin?,Ivermectin is a prescription medicine. Does ivermectin cause sterility in men who take it?
Do the amendments to Missouri laws apply to all of the states?,Do the amendments to Missouri laws apply to only one state?,Do the amendments to Missouri laws apply only to St Louis?,Could the auditor's office merge these two districts without any adjustments?,Would this merging affect the voters of St Louis?
Did the video claim Kenya's former electoral commission chair would open 2022 election servers?,Did the video claim Kenya's former electoral commission chair would open 2022 election servers?,Will Kenya's 2022 election servers be open?,Do these elections usually require servers in Africa?,Is it likely that this video claim is true?
What did the previous government spend $16 billion on?,Is there still no power?,Was the power purchase agreement in place for this investment?,Did the government implement this program in a reasonable way?,Did the government proceed with this initiative with sufficient funds?,Did this government levy much revenue on the power sector?
"Are there more than 10,000 km of new roads in the goverment?",Have the goverments of Addo and the current government built more roads in 5 years?,Have there been more improvements in the infrastructure in 5 years?,Are any improvements in the infrastructure in 5 years?,Are there any improvements in the infrastructure in the current period?
Has this 1 crore corona patients been treated for free?,Does the number represent all 1 crore corona patients treated by the PM's healthcare team?,Is this number true?,Is the bill amounting to the entire number of corona patients treated?,Has the bill been funded by any government entity?
Did Obamacare save $1 trillion over the course of 10 years?,Would repealing Obamacare save $1 trillion over the course of 10 years?,Would repealing Obamacare save $1 trillion over the course of 10 years?,Have any states made similar proposals?,Have any states made these proposals?,Has any one company made such a proposal?
Is there any video evidence of this attack?,Is Moscow formally attacked?,Is Moscow on the verge of declaring war?,Did Russia declare a state of emergency?,Has Moscow called military action to counter the threat?,Did Russia respond positively?,Has this video been released?,Is this the first video to report an attack on Moscow?
Has Congress had a duty to count electoral votes for any state?,Is Congress not expected to be the primary elections authority?,Have states failed to count their electoral votes for a majority of elections?,Is Congress specifically tasked with tagging electoral votes for any state?,Do states vote in the election for both major political parties?
Did Congress have power to grant the superintendent the power of taking over failing schools?,Did Congress authorize the superintendent to take over failing schools?,Did Congress offer any powers to the superintendent of public instruction in 2009?,Have the current superintendent's powers ever been removed?,Does the current superintendent have the power of taking over failing schools?
Did Nancy Pelosi vote against allowing troops stationed overseas to vote in U.S. elections?,Did Nancy Pelosi say that troops stationed overseas should no longer be allowed to vote in U.S. elections?,Did Pelosi make any specific comments regarding the number of troops in U.S. military?,Is Nancy Pelosi still the speaker of House of Representatives?
Did Texas cut its budget by $73 million?,Did this budget cut lead to the closing of clinics?,Was this budget cut due to fiscal prudence or other factors?,Does this information come from a third party?,Is there any other information about the decision related to family planning services?,Whether or not this was the decision of this government or a private party?,Does this government report mention any specific state agencies?
Does this video show how one of the alleged murderers of Kanhaiya Lal was brutally thrashed?,Did anyone get injured as a result of this assault?,Does this video show any other details of this assault?,Was this video re-filmed?,Was this video used to slander this man?,Is the video available to download or stream?
Was Hallie Biden able to say that election results were rigged?,Did Biden think voting in 2020 was rigged?,Did Biden say that voting in 2020 was rigged?,Did Biden think voting in 2020 was rigged?,Did Biden claim voting in 2020 was rigged?
Did the government purchase too much PPE?,Did the PPE cost the government more money than expected?,Did this cost come from the government implementing a cut in PPE costs?,Can an estimate of the PPE spending by the government be accurate?,Was the government successful in its efforts to reduce PPE costs?
Do tax rates vary for each age group?,Is it true that 30 % of men pay tax on average and 30 % pay tax on average for women?,Is there any evidence that Mukesh Ambani is paying tax at a much lower rate?,Is the average rate of tax for average men at a much higher rate than for women?
Is Trump the first sitting U.S. president in 56 years to not attend a wreath laying ceremony on Veterans Day?,Was Trump aware of Veterans Day was on Nov. 11?,Has Trump attended a wreath laying ceremony on Veterans Day in the last 56 years?,Has Trump made any other statements regarding Veterans Day to date?
Did Mandalay Bay file lawsuits against mass shooting victims?,Was Mandalay Bay responsible for this incident?,Did Mandalay Bay offer assistance to those wounded by the shooting?,Was Mandalay Bay responsible for this shooting?,Did Mandalay Bay file suit on behalf of victims of this shooting?,Were Mandalay Bay or another hotel involved in the shooting?
Is this statement true?,Was this statement endorsed by anyone?,Did this statement originate from a person involved in this event?,Did this statement involve anyone from another location?,Is this statement true of this teenager?,Is this statement based on actual events in this case?
Is 94 percent of the members of the NRA support background checks?,Did the majority of Americans say background checks should be required for gun purchases?,Are 74 percent of members of the NRA support background checks for gun purchases?,Is there a difference between the number of Americans and the numbers of NRA members that support background checks for gun purchases?
"Did the murders increase by 11 percent, the robberies by 28 percent and the rapes by 51 percent in Nevada in the last term?",Was Nevada the third most dangerous state in America when Cortez Masto was Attorney General?,Did Cortez Masto place Nevada in the third position in American safety?
Did ethanol reduce gas prices by 89 cents per gallon in 2010?,Did ethanol reduce gas prices in 2010?,Could ethanol be the reason for higher gas prices after the discovery of ethanol?,Has ethanol reduced gas prices in any way?,Does ethanol cause lower fuel prices than gasoline?
"Did 10,000 clusters for organic farming in the period 2015-18?",Did the PKVY clusters cover 2 lakhs hectares area for organic farming?,Did the PKVY clusters cover more than 2 lakhs hectares area for organic farming?,Did PKVY clusters cover more than 2 lakhs hectares area for organic farming?
"Has Sen. Manchin owned a $700,000 D.C. luxury yacht?",Is Senator Manchin the owner of the DC luxury yacht?,Does the D.C. luxury yacht have a legal tender?,Is this boat legal?,Are any federal agencies involved in the regulation of these boats in the D.C. area?
Did the mother shoot the killer?,Did the killer kill the pedophile?,Did the person rape the child?,Did the murderer commit suicide?,Is there evidence of the pedophile killing the victim's child?,Can the mother have a defense?,Is it true that the crime did not commit suicide?
Does 6 months of age exclude drinking water for babies?,Is it a legal requirement for baby to have water before 6 months old?,Is there any evidence proving this?,Does consuming water for babies restrict drinking?,Is drinking water for babies restricted after 6 months old?,Does any medical advice indicating babies cannot have water after 6 months old?
Did 36 % of taxes collected on petrol go to the state government?,Were there any differences between those taxes collected in each state and those collected in the center?,Did the government make money from the revenues received from the petrol taxes?,Were there differences between the two states as regards the taxes collected in each state?
Can Chicagoans afford much tax?,Did Chicagoans pay the greatest tax?,Was the tax on the economy increasing over the years?,Are Chicagoans on average paying the least tax?,a comment on the article.?,Would Chicagoans pay the most taxes in the country?,if Chicagoans don't pay the most taxes?
"Are temple priests receiving Rs 15,000 every month from the government of Assam?",Do temple priests receive money from the state government?,"Is Assam providing Rs 15,000. every month for temple priests?",Does the state government plan to provide more for temple priests?,Does the state provide a large number of temple priests?
Was the contractor ordered to be arrested?,Did the contractor take any action against Ghana's President?,Was the video recorded in a public place?,Was the road damaged by the contractor?,Is the video evidence of the contractor's actions?,Are any witnesses involved with this video?,Was the video shot in public?
Did Obama's nominees meet his 60 vote standard?,Did Kagan and Sotomayor meet the same standard?,Did Obama's nominees meet the same standards as Sotomayor and Kagan?,Did the standard that Obama's nominees met come from an organization that had ties to the Trump administration?
Did the number of Internet users in China exceed 500 million?,Did the number of bloggers in China drive discussions on issues relevant to China?,Did Chinese blogs drive discussions on issues relevant to China?,Did Chinese bloggers drive discussions on issues relevant to China?,Is this number greater than 80 million?,Did China's internet users drive discussions on issues relevant to China?
Did the CIA agent commit the 9/11 bombing?,Was the CIA agent the person who made the confession?,Did the CIA agent blow up WTC 7 during the 9/11 attacks?,Did the CIA agent have the authority to blow up WTC 7 during 9/11 attacks?,Did the CIA agent die within days of the 9/11 attacks?
Did Cyril Ramaphosa order foreigners to vacate the country by June 21 due to COVID-19?,Was a majority of foreigners at risk from COVID-19?,Was a majority of foreigners at risk from COVID-19 during the time of Ramaphosa's administration?
Did Texas legislators increase state education spending in 2011?,"Did Texas legislators increase state education spending in 2011, 2012, or 2013?","Is the increase in education spending in 2011, 2011 even reported in the federal report?","Is this increase a direct result of the Texas legislature's decision to increase state education spending in 2011, or does this report only say that Texas legislature increased state education spending in 2011?"
Has student debt grown by 102% since 2010?,Has real wages declined by over 8% since 2010?,Did this increase take place in the prior year?,Was this increase due to the recession?,Did this increase help the economy in general?,Is this increase in student debt a direct result of the recession?
Did this figure include food stamps?,Was this figure only for food stamps?,Is this data comparable to previous government reporting?,Does this figure include every federal government department?,Is this information accurate for the U.S.?,Are the costs for these programs comparable to previous government reports?,. Are government spending and government services significantly different?
Has there been a 20 000 case of myocarditis in the United States?,Has there been a 2100 case of climbing in the United States?,"Is there evidence that there are 21,000 cases of myocarditis in the United States?","Is there evidence that there are 21,000 cases of climbing in the United States?"
Did US drop nuclear bombs on Japan?,Have Japanese citizens been boycotting products from the US since 1945?,Have US products in Japan been affected by these bombs?,Have Japanese citizens boycotted US products since 1945?,Have the Japanese boycotted US products in Japan since 1945?,Does Japan boycott US products in general?
Do vaccines prevent infection and life expectancy?,Will all mRNA vaccines guarantee life expectancy?,Are mRNA vaccines more effective than whole vaccines for COVID-19?,Does the amount of life lost due to this vaccine depend on the vaccines?,Do vaccines prevent illness or death in the same way that a disease does?
Is it good to stay at home two weeks after getting the flu vaccine?,Is it good to stay at home two weeks after getting the flu vaccine?,Is staying at home on a regular basis ok after receiving the flu vaccine?,Are there any other reasons for staying at home after getting the flu vaccine?
Did the President of the United States have a phone that the first astronauts on the moon were on?,Did the President of the United States have a phone that the first astronauts on the moon were on?,Was the President of the United States involved in the 1969 moon landing?,Are the first astronauts on the moon part of a fake mission?
Did incomes for rich families increase at the same rate in the 19th century?,Does income for poor families increase at the same rate in the 20th century?,Did incomes for wealthy families increase much faster in the 20th century?,Did the 19th century raise the incomes of rich families?,Has wealth for wealthy families increased since the 1990s?
Did BJP workers show a trailer of Bengal's golden future?,Was BJP workers at the event with a trailer of Bengal's golden future?,Are there any other comments about the event?,"Besides these comments, did any media outlets comment on the events?",Did the BJP workers share any information about the events?
Did Falwell tweet racist pictures of himself and others as a Ku Klux Klan official?,Was Falwell’s tweet related to blackface?,Did Falwell also tweet a picture of a Black Panther protester?,Did Falwell post this image on Twitter?,Did Falwell post this picture as an apology for the Klan’s actions?,Did Falwell post this photo before his resignation in May?
Are photos proving Aiyaz Sayed-Khaiyum visited a ballot paper printing facility before elections are set to occur?,Has Aiyaz Sayed-Khaiyum ever visited a polling place during the 2022 elections?,Is it possible for Aiyaz Sayed-Khaiyum to have visited a polling place before elections?
"Is the spike proteins generated by the body in response to the Covid-19 vaccines a ticking time bomb for cancer, blood clots and other ailments?","Does spike proteins generated by the body in response to the Covid-19 vaccines cause cancer, blood clots and other ailments?"
Is this prediction true or not?,Are the researchers predicting an entire population of 80-9 million people?,Is this prediction accurate?,Did the scientists involved in this prediction ever actually test a hypothetical population of people who will be killed by a major incident in the future?,Are these predictions still based on data?
"Did Ukraine ask Canada to send 30,000 Military Age Men to fight Russia?","Did Ukraine ask Canada to send 30,000 Military Age Men to fight Russia?","Did Ukraine ask Canada to send 30,000 Military Age Men to fight Russia?","Did Ukraine ask Canada to send 30,000 Military Age Men to fight Russia?","Did Canada ask Ukraine to send 30,000 Military Age Men to fight Russia?"
Have there been medical ethics codes that have established the right to refuse vaccines in South Korea?,Does any medical ethics code make it compulsory to refuse vaccines?,Is there evidence that South Korea has had restrictions on the right to refuse vaccines?,Is South Korea currently in a period of religious observance that prohibits vaccinations?
"Did the 21-yo woman live in Pingla, West Medinipur, West Bengal?",Did she die of rape in the post poll violence?,Was any of her family members or close friends involved in the violence?,Is it clear from the article that the woman was murdered in a post poll violence?,"Was anyone injured in the post poll violence in Pingla, West Medinipur, West Bengal?"
Did the introduction of the carrier bag levy in 2012 reduce the number of carrier bags distributed in Northern Ireland?,Did this initiative create fewer carrier bags in Northern Ireland?,Is the amount of reduced carrier bags over the last two years less than the number before the introduction of the carrier bag levy?
Was Nirav Modi a victim of the BJP..?,Did BJP help Nirav Modi flee the country?,Did BJP help Nirav Modi flee the country?,Did BJP help Nirav Modi flee the country?,Did Nirav Modi confess that he acquiesced to being aided by BJP during the flee?
Was the aircraft on a runway or runways?,Was the airport a popular destination to travel to when the crash took place?,Did a passenger board the plane after the crash?,Do any other witnesses mention the crash?,Was the pilot on the plane before the crash?,Did the plane crash at the Pokhara airport?
Is there a provision under the bill that anyone over the age of 74 needs to go before a death panel?,Is there a provision in the bill that anyone under 74 has to go before a death panel?,Is there a provision in the bill that anyone under 74 needs to go before a death panel?
Did he introduce legislation for the national minimum wage?,Will this legislation bring higher wages for 6 million workers who are under paid?,Does this legislation make it easier for workers to save money?,Is this legislation intended to be a substitute for the minimum wage level of R20 an hour?,Would this legislation help some poorer workers?
Was a video shared by a high-profile Israeli official filmed in Syria in 2018 – not Gaza in 2021?,Did a high-profile Israeli official record the video in Gaza in 2021?,Has the video been uploaded on social media or through other channels?,Has the video been shared on social media or via other channels?
Has the GOP consistently agreed with 80 percent of what's in the bill?,Did the GOP ever agree with less than 80 percent of what's in the bill?,Does this statement support the actual bill?,Does it contain language in which the GOP agrees?,Does this claim support any of the policies proposed in the bill?
Did this walk raise more than 15.6 million?,"Did this walk have more than 750,000 people donate?",Is the number of people who donated raised a significant amount?,Is this charity walk associated with any sporting events?,Is the money raised a significant amount of money for the charities?,"Are there more than 750,000 people donating to this charity?"
"Did Qassem Soleimani command forces that killed five U.S. service members, including Capt. Brian S. Freeman, in an attack in Karbala, Iraq, in January 2007?",Did Qassem Soleimani kill five U.S. service members?,"Did Qassem Soleimani command forces that killed five U.S. service members, including Capt. Brian S. Freeman, in an attack in Karbala, Iraq, in January 2007?"
"Did Huckabee have the highest tax rates in America, surpassing Bill Clinton?",Has Huckabee ever voted against tax hikes a la Bill Clinton?,Did Huckabee support tax hikes a la Bill Clinton?,Did Huckabee support tax hikes a la Bill Clinton?
Did a poster that seems to be from the government suggest recompense for decline in health after the vaccine?,"Has a report on a poster by the government suggested recompense of people who have notice ""declining health"" since their Covid-19 vaccine and weren't made aware of the risks?"
Is this video from Warren?,Is this video released by Warren?,Did this video appear in a video with an infamous character?,Does this video show the character of a GOP voter?,Is this video from Warren?,Is this video about limiting GOP voting in the 2020 election?,Does this video contain a graphic revealing a Republican voter?
Did more than 50 percent of youth that received grants think daily marijuana use poses any serious risk of harm?,Did the majority of youths in these grants not agree daily marijuana use poses any serious risk of harm?,Was there a large increase in youths that reported believing in the seriousness of marijuana use as a result of their participation in research?
Has government consumption of U.S. economy risen to 37% today?,Have government consumption increased so much that we can no longer be a free economy?,Is this trend trending towards a free economy?,Are governments contributing 37% of U.S. economy right now?,Is there a positive relationship between government consumption and economic growth?
"Did the analysis of the KBV data show an increase of unsolved deaths in 2021, since the start of the Covid-19 - Immunization?","Did the KBV analysis show a significant rise in deaths in 2021, since the start of the Covid-19 - Immunization?",Was the KBV analysis based on data from other sources as well?
Did the Golden State Warriors unanimously vote to skip a visit to the White House after winning the NBA championship?,Was the Golden State Warriors' decision to skip a visit to the White House a purely politic decision?,Did the Golden State Warriors' decision to skip a visit to the White House a purely politic decision?
Does the federal government have an economy greater than the 15 largest?,Will this government have a government that disburses $803 billion in benefits this year?,Does this government have a government greater than all 15 world's economies?,Is the government larger than 15?,Is the federal government smaller than any other country?,Is the government larger than 15 of the world's economy?
Did the state of Florida have a violent crime rate of 3 minutes and 45 seconds per person?,Did crime in Florida typically equate to a 3 minute and 45 second per person?,Would crime rate be less in other states?,Did Florida have a crime rate of 3 minutes and 45 seconds per person?
Did British MPs receive a bonus for their role in the Covid-19 crisis?,Did MPs receive bonuses to cover 'expenses' during the Covid-19 crisis?,Is there any evidence that MPs received a bonus during the Covid19 crisis?,Are MPs allowed to award bonuses for their roles during the Covid19 crisis?
Was the video from 2023 a viral video?,Did this video include multiple targets on Maui?,Did this attack involve direct energy weapons?,Was the directed energy weapon attack on Maui the only attack involving direct energy weapons in 2023?,Finished: (A) No. 1). (B) Yes. (C) No.?
Was Memorial Weekend this year 29 percent more expensive than last year?,Has Obama's policies led to grocery prices going up in any country?,Is Obama's policy of raising prices for gasoline a primary factor behind an increase in grocery costs?,"Is Obama's policy of raising prices for food related to his ""war"" on obesity?",Does this increase in grocery prices have anything to do with Obama's policies?
Is this an image of Namaz on the road in Nainital in 2022?,Has the image been used for any social media platforms?,Did the photo occur in Nainital?,Is the person in this image providing prayers?,Has the person in this photo been killed?,Would this be an ideal environment for Namaz?
Did some fireworks go off on the same day in San Diego?,Did all the fireworks go off at the same time?,Was the video recorded in July?,Was the video taken on a mobile device?,Are fireworks usually done using the camera?,Are the fireworks normally loud?,Did the fireworks go off in the vicinity of several locations?
Do both Republican and Democratic presidential candidates face the same legal problem?,Is the image of Trump's sexual assault case taken from the right-wing newspaper?,Is this image the official portrait of President Trump?,Was the image shared on Facebook?,Were multiple witnesses interviewed in this image?,Was this image taken from an official portrait?
Is this projection accurate?,Will Medicare go bankrupt by 2017 if current projections are correct?,Are estimates for this projection accurate?,Will Social Security bottom out by 2037 if current projections are accurate?,Is this projection accurate?,Are estimates for this projection accurate?,Is this projection accurate?
"Did Kaine propose tax increases on people earning as little as $17,000?","Did Kaine increase taxes on individuals earning as little as $17,000?","Did Kaine propose tax increases on individuals earning as little as $17,000?","Did Tim Kaine propose tax increases on individuals earning as little as $17,000?",Does Kaine have a record of tax increases?
Did the Karnataka police arrest pro-hijab protesters?,Did the Karnataka police arrest 40 percent of the protesters?,Did the police arrest more pro-hijab protesters because they have children in their group?,Was the Karnataka police rehabilitating these protestors?
Did any soldiers from these brigades leave the country?,Has the capture of these soldiers affected the Armed Forces?,Are any of these soldiers mentioned to be captured?,Did this document contain any information about the personnel captured by the United States Armed Forces?,Are any of the captured soldiers named in this document identified as being from the United States Armed Forces?
Was Sajid Muhammed jailed for a year for allegedly setting a woman on fire for eating a bacon sandwich?,Did Muhammed serve time in prison for the crime he set a woman on fire for eating a bacon sandwich?,Has Muhammed remained free since resentencing?
Has Romney proposed a policy change while raising his tax rates?,Does Romney support this policy change?,Has Romney proposed any specific taxes that he would raise versus lower them?,Do Romney proposals to raise taxes in his states impact the tax rates in his states?,Has Romney proposed to raise the tax rates in state and local governments?,Do Romney proposals for raising taxes in states impact the tax rates in the states?,Do Romney proposals for raising taxes in state and local governments affect the tax rates in the states?
Did the trophies he killed cause him to be eaten alive by lions?,Did the trophies he killed cause him to kill three baboon families at Ingwelala Private Nature Reserve?,Was the trophy he killed in March 2019 the one he lost to lions?,Is the Ingwelala private nature reserve a private wildlife reserve?
Did these two suspects have the same gender?,Did the white suspect serve two years in jail?,Did the black suspect spend 26 years in prison?,Did these two suspects get the same sentence from a same judge?,Did these two suspects do the same crimes?,Did either of these suspects have the same race?
Do these 2 Ankeny moms know Qanon?,Are these moms anti-vaxx conspiracy theorists?,Did these two Ankeny moms know Qanon?,Does this article state that these Ankeny moms are known conspiracy theorists?,"(4). Is this woman, Angela Campbell, an anti-vaxx conspiracy theorist?"
Did protesters die in Iran?,Did protesters in Iran have a death in Iran?,Did protesters in Iran protest against the death in Iran?,Did the protesters in Iran die in Iran?,Did Iran use the death in Iran as a launching point for protests?,Did Iran's morality police release more protesters from the country?
Did Rihanna employ five planes in support of the fire control?,Did Rihanna use all water available in the Amazon rainforest?,Did Rihanna purchase water only from the Amazon rainforest?,Has Rihanna ever said she donated water to the Amazon rainforest?,Is Rihanna affiliated with the fire control movement?
Are there more BJP leaders arrested?,Did they aid Maoists?,Have these BJP leaders been charged?,Were these BJP leaders responsible for this attack?,Did this incident occur in Chhattisgarh?,Was this incident in Chhattisgarh a coordinated attack?,Are there any others convicted for this attack?
Did the Supreme Court deny the petition to hear case alleging fraudulent elections in 2020?,Is this ruling an indication that there was fraud in the 2020 election?,Are the allegations based on a single election?,Are there any other allegations relating to the 2020 election?,Were any of these claims ever published?
Did Lowe's have any grants for minority-owned businesses to reopen?,Did lowe's give money to the Trump campaign?,Are these grant funds part of the same program as Home Depot's grants for minority businesses?,Does Home Depot have any grants for minority-owned businesses reopening?
Did the billboard fall because of heavy rain?,Did two motorcycles crash because of the billboard?,Was the billboard damaged?,Will there be another billboard falling from the sky on this city?,Did this happen on a weekday?,Will this happen in every year?,Did this happen anywhere else?
"Is it true that compared to direct sales by manufacturers, consumers save an average of $500 per car sold through the dealership model?",Did consumers save as much as $500 per car sold through the dealership model in comparison to direct sales by manufacturers?,Was there any other evidence that this quote was inferred?,Was the actual quote from the quote accurate?
Did the study include a placebo?,Was this study used to determine the effect of eggplant on obesity?,Was the diet and exercise regimen discussed based on any data?,Do studies use eggplant for weight loss?,Would this study result in additional weight loss or obesity?,Are there other evidence-based studies that support these claims?
Did NASA release a picture of the Chandrayaan-3 mission landing on the moon?,Are there any images from the Chandrayaan-3 mission landing on the moon?,Was the Chandrayaan-3 manned mission successful?,Are there any video clips of the Chandrayaan-3 landing on the moon?
Has the VA budget increased by 85 percent since your first election?,Is this percentage only true when the population is all under the age of 66?,Is the VA budget significantly higher than the average budget?,Have veterans spent more money on VA programs than the average public budget?,Is this policy consistent with other veterans budgets?
Do bats appear on the reverse of the US quarter issued in 2020?,Do bats appear on the reverse of a US quarter issued in 2020?,Is COVID-19 a government plot?,Is the U.S. quarter issued in 2020 a U.S. quarter?,Is the U.S. quarter issued in 2020?,Is COVID-19 a government plot?
Is it true that election officials are sending 80 million ballots all over the country?,Do they call these ballots ‘unsolicited’?,Are these ballots not collected by polling stations?,Are these ballots not used by polling stations?,Do these ballots come from a list?,Do these ballots come from official elections?,Do these ballots come from other lists?
Was this story published in 2019. Did this news story report on people who were not directly connected to the health insurance agency?,Did this news story include all reshared stories?,Did this story include all reshared stories?,Did this story lead to calls for resignations?,Did this story focus mainly on resigning government employees?
Does Congress intend to nominate Obama to another term in the US Senate?,Is Congress expected to appoint Obama to a third term in the US Senate?,Does Obama currently have a seat in the US Senate?,"Is this a ""moving agenda"" for Congress in 2016?",Was Obama previously a candidate for a third term in the US Senate?
Did police stop a vehicle?,Did the individuals who were carrying the vehicles undergo a police check?,Did the individuals who were transporting the vehicles undergo a police check?,Are the individuals who were transporting the vehicles covered by any other security measures?,Would this policing have prevented these individuals from accessing the public streets?
Are there vaccines that contain polysorbate 80 and 20?,Are any of these vaccines linked to cancer in animals?,Are any of these vaccines found in vaccines that contain polysorbate 80 and 20?,Is any of these vaccines contaminated with polysorbate 80 and 20?,Is contaminated polysorbate 80 and 20 linked to autoimmune issues and infertility?
Have death threats been received after singing the song 'Har Har Shambu'?,Is 'Har Har Shambu' the only song Farmani Naaz has performed for Indian Idol?,Do any of the death threats involve Naaz in sexual relations with the lead singer?,Is 'Har Har Shambu' the only song Farmani Naaz has performed for Indian Idol?
Did the private sector job growth in the state of Nebraska exceed the rate of the state's overall private sector job growth?,Did Pennsylvania's private sector job growth average over all of the US in 2013?,Are there any other states similar in terms of private sector job growth?,"Is the public sector job growth in the state of Pennsylvania the largest, most successful?",Are there other examples of a state similar in terms of private sector job growth?
Is Cuomo refusing to buy ventilators?,Is Cuomo refusing to buy ventilators?,Is Cuomo refusing to buy ventilators for pandemic preparedness?,Is Cuomo refusing to buy ventilators for pandemic preparedness?
Did most physicians say they will quit if health care reform passes?,Were most doctors in 2016 less reliant on health care than in 2008?,Are the doctors who say they'll quit reliant on health care reform in 2016?,Was a large number of doctors (45%) unable to continue to practice as a result of health care reform?
"Did Bragg call up 38,000 officers?",Did Bragg shut down New York City?,Did Bragg spend $200 million in city funds?,"Did Bragg call up 38,000 police?",Did Bragg close FDR Drive?,"Did Bragg call up 38,000 police officers?","Did Bragg call up 38,000 police officers?"
"Have 90,000 Russian troops been killed in Ukraine?",Are there any reports of Russian forces launching attacks in Ukraine?,Can Ukrainian authorities say with certainty that the tens of thousands of Russian troops have been killed in Ukraine?,Were Russian troops killed in Ukraine in an attack?,Are there reports of Russian troops being killed in Ukraine in an attack?
Did Gimenez have more than one son working at the construction company?,Did Gimenez have a son who lobbied for the construction company?,Did Gimenez pay more money to the construction company than to the construction company?,Did Gimenez receive a $130 million contract from the construction company after a bridge collapse killed six people?
Does Marcos instruct Cabinet Secretaries to continue cash assistance and subsidies to poor Filipinos?,Has the Government of the Philippines responded to this announcement to halt cash assistance?,Is this information widely reported?,Does this move appear to be an indication that a government initiative was planned?,Are these actions based on Marcos' belief that the economy is in good shape?
Was Wells the first African American newspaper owner?,Did Wells go on to own a newspaper that was predominantly African American?,Did Wells oppose abolitionists?,Was Wells a Republican?,Are there any other interesting aspects about Wells?,Were there other interesting aspects about Wells?
Did 51% of filers pay zero income tax?,Did 51% of tax filers pay zero income tax?,Is it true that 51% of tax filers paid zero income tax?,Is it true that 51% of tax filers paid zero income tax?,Is it true that 51% of tax filers paid zero income tax?
Did the World Health Organisation study find that the increased risk of suffering serious adverse events due to the Covid-19 vaccine outweighs the reduced risk of being hospitalised with Covid-19 itself?,Does the increase in risk of serious adverse events as a result of the Covid-19 vaccine outweigh the reduced risk of being hospitalised with Covid-19 itself?,Does the increase in risk of serious adverse events as a result of the Covid-19 vaccine outweigh the reduced risk of being hospitalised with Covid-19 itself?,Does the World Health Organization study conclude that the increased risk of suffering serious adverse events as?
Are biological boys more competitive than girls?,Are biological boys more competitive than girls?,Do hormone treatment affect biological boys?,Are biological boys more competitive than girls?,Are biological boys more competitive than girls?,Is the 1.5-mile run faster than the 3.5-mile run?,Are biological boys more competitive than girls?,Is the 1.5-mile run faster than the 2.5-mile run?
Did Sprouse's Instagram photo depicting his naked butt?,Did Sprouse alter his Instagram photo in any way?,Did Sprouse edit his Instagram photo after it had been published?,Did Sprouse change the original Instagram picture?,Did Sprouse change the original Instagram image from an Instagram image?
Did Trump threaten the death penalty for the January 6 offenses?,Did Trump threaten the death penalty for the January 6 charges?,Did Trump threaten the death penalty for the January 6 charges?,Did Trump threats the death penalty for the January 6 charges?,Did Trump threaten the death penalty for the January 6 charges?,Did Trump threaten the death penalty for the January 6 charges?,Did Trump threaten the death penalty for the January 6 charges?
Were these cuts in taxes a result of Obama's policies?,"Are all tax cuts in this country ""tax cut""?",Did these cuts result in 1.3 million jobs?,"Are all tax cuts in this country ""business tax"" based?",Have these tax cuts allowed Trump to create over 1.3 million jobs?
Did COVID-19 cause claims to go up?,Is COVID-19 responsible for generating an increase in claims?,Did Illinois jobless numbers go down in response to COVID?,Did these statistics reflect the severity of the recession?,Did the Department of Employment Security experience similar high levels of claim in response to COVID?
Did an ice skating rink get a morgue at the rink?,Did this rink have more body bags than normal for the ice skating rink?,"Do body bags cost $400,000?",How many body bags were delivered to ice skating rink during the coronavirus pandemic?,Did anyone die?
How long is the statutory maximum sentence for conspiracy in the U.S.?,Would it be up to 20 years for a person to plead guilty in order to commit this crime?,Would it be up to 20 years for a person to plead guilty in order to commit this crime?,Would a person be able to plead guilty in order to commit this crime?
Is White household earnings at least 5 times more than black household earnings in South Africa?,Can black household earnings be at least 5 times more than white household earnings?,Is black households earning a lower percentage of income than white households?,Does Statistics South Africa provide any data on this?,Can statistical data from Statistics South Africa provide information regarding income levels for white households in South Africa?
Did Republicans have problems filling seats vacated during the administration?,Have the Republican's plans changed?,Will additional elections cost millions of dollars?,Is the Republicans plan to fill these seats in the current form?,Will the Republicans change the laws for these new elections?,Was the first rule changed to fill the seats for the administration?
Does the proposed budget include $1 billion for new state funding?,Is the proposed budget full of funding for education?,Are other schools benefiting from this new state funding?,Does the proposed budget include any state funding for other schools?,Did the Governor's proposal include state funding for education?,Were other schools benefiting from this new state funding?,Did the Governor recommend new state funding for education?
Did Modi have a digital camera?,Did Modi transmit pictures in 1987-88?,Did Modi have a digital camera in 2008?,Did Modi transmit photographs in 2010?,Did Modi have a digital camera in 2014?,Did Modi have a digital camera in 2015?,Did Modi ever do well in the art world?
Did the Ohio train have a chemical banned in 1974?,Did the chemical that the train was carrying contain the chemical in a safe quantity?,Did the train transport the chemicals during the period listed for this chemical?,Did the chemical use for this chemical include any other types of abrasives?,Did the chemical used for this chemical contain any diluents?
Was this the only time you had to trade pants back and forth?,Did this happen multiple times?,Did the two brothers-in-law find more creative ways to wrap each other's pants?,Did they find better ways to wrap each other's pants?,Are there any other examples of the two brothers-in-law trading pants back and forth?
Did Dick Morris write a column about details in a 2008 campaign ad narrated by President Clinton?,Did Morris find details in a 2007 campaign ad narrated by President Bill Clinton elided in a letter?,Did Morris write a letter to the New York Times about details in a 2007 campaign ad narrated by President Bill Clinton?
Is there a 7 million Floridian with pre -existing conditions?,Would GOP repeal the Affordable Care Act?,Will the repeal affect the cost of health insurance?,Is the repeal repealing a new law?,Does the repeal repealing laws in all 50 states?,Would repeal repealing laws affect Florida?
Do sections 294 and 509 of the IPC punish people for staring at a woman for more than 14 seconds?,Are there any other types of charges for staring at a woman for more than 14 seconds?,Is staring at a woman for more than 14 seconds a serious crime and can result in jail?
Does video have DPP candidates talking about their starting a business for 20 seconds?,Has the Democratic presidential candidates talked about starting a business before?,Would there be any other video clips that show Democratic presidential candidates talking about starting a business for 20 seconds?,Will the Democratic presidential candidates have started a business if they are discussing starting a business with their audience?
Was the Supreme Court ruling unanimous in that it ruled 5-3 that schools may not teach Sharia law to students?,Does the Supreme Court rule that the law should not be taught in schools?,Can schools teach Sharia law?,Was the Supreme Court ruling unanimous in that it ruled 5-3 that schools may not teach Sharia law to students?
Are there 4 million 17 year olds that turn 18 before the November election?,Are 4 million 17 year olds that turn 18 before the November election predominantly from the North?,Are 4 million 17 year olds that turn 18 before the November election predominantly from the South?,Are there four million 17 year olds that turn 18 before the November election predominantly from the South?
Did this vaccine cause any more myocarditis than the virus?,Did this vaccine cause any more myocarditis than the virus?,Was this vaccine less effective than the virus?,Is there evidence that the COVID-19 vaccine causes a higher rate of myocarditis than the virus?
Did the US Women’s National Soccer team turn their backs on the flag?,Did the US Women’s National Soccer team participate in the 9/11 celebration?,Did the US Women’s National Soccer team participate in the 9/11 memorial ceremony?,Did the US Women’s National Soccer team make any concessions in the 9/11 commemoration?
Is this photo a picture of migrants heading towards the U.S. border in May 2023?,Are there any additional details about the date or location of this photo?,Is there any data on the exact date of the photo?,Has this photo been seen on a website?,Is there any information available on the date of this photo?
Is there any evidence that the 2021 Nuclear Threat Initiative exercise proves that the monkeypox outbreak was planned?,Is there any evidence that the 2021 Nuclear Threat Initiative exercise proves that the monkeypox outbreak was planned?,"a. Yes, the 2021 Nuclear Threat Initiative exercise is the only instance that has been documented that proves monkeypox outbreak was planned. b. No, it is not proven that the 2021 Nuclear Threat Initiative exercise proves monkeypox outbreak was planned.?"
Is Obamacare mandated to not give major medical procedures to anyone over 75 unless approved by an ethics panel?,Is Obamacare mandated to not give major medical procedures to anyone under 75 unless approved by an ethics panel?,Is Obamacare mandated to not give major medical procedures to anyone over 74 unless approved by an ethics panel?
Did Nainital have an increase in Muslims in 2010?,Is Nainital now overcrowded by Muslims?,Was Nainital sparsly populated in 2010?,Did Nainital have a spike in Muslims in 2010?,Is the number of Muslims in Nainital currently overcrowded?,Is the number of Muslims in Nainital in 2009 increasing?
Did 24 people fall ill in Tejas Express?,Are there any other symptoms of food poisoning from the food that was served in Tejas Express?,Did 3 people in ICU in the hospital as a result of the food poisoning?,Was there any other incident related to the food poisoning in Tejas Express?
Was Jeanne Shaheen involved in a plot with Lois Lerner and President Barack Obama’s political appointee at the IRS to lead a program of harassment against conservative nonprofit groups during the 2012 election?,Was Lois Lerner part of a plot to lead a program of harassment against conservative nonprofit groups during the 2012 election?
Would this scheme benefit gang members?,Would this proposal work in Syracuse?,Is this scheme available in other states?,Could this scheme work in other cities?,Were gang members previously prohibited from receiving this scheme?,Are gang members expected to pay this amount if they are free of trouble?,Are other states considering the same proposal?
Is it possible to stop terror suspects from buying dynamite and an AK-47?,Can the FBI stop terrorists from buying an AK-47?,Is there a way to stop the FBI from stopping terrorists from boarding flights?,Does the FBI have the power to stop terrorists from buying explosives?
Are federal minimum wages currently at an all-time high of $12 an hour?,Do minimum wages presently amount to $12 an hour?,Does the minimum wage currently amount to 12 an hour in today's dollars?,Do federal minimum wages currently amount to 12 an hour in today's dollars?,Do the minimum wages currently amount to $12 an hour?
Has the governor experienced benefit reductions this specific group?,Were there other groups whose benefits have been reduced?,Is this governor in the middle of a political war?,Does anyone have any other ideas about his actions?,Are there any other stories that support his statements?,Does this man have an agenda?
Was there more evacuee deportations under this administration compared to other administrations?,Did the U.S. deport twice as many evacuees under this administration as a previous administration did?,Does this statement imply that the U.S. deported more evacuees than any previous administration did?
Did the Affordable Care Act reduce cancer eligibility for those under age 76?,Is cancer treatment rationed according to age?,Is there evidence that the Affordable Care Act restricts cancer care eligibility for the elderly?,Is there evidence that reducing eligibility for cancer treatment will decrease cancer mortality?,Is there evidence to support the Affordable Care Act's limits on age-based cancer treatment?
Did Pfizer's document confirm that COVID-19 vaccines have caused death?,Has the document confirmed that VAEDs have contributed to millions of deaths?,Does the government documentation and Pfizer's information provide any evidence to indicate that COVID-19 vaccines have contributed to millions of deaths?
Are about 300 housing discrimination investigations conducted by the Department of Housing and Urban Development annually?,"Have settlements from these cases resulted in $150,000 per individual?",Have the settlements in this year been in the form of lawsuits?,Have any of these settlements resulted in any money being paid?
Did Hillary Clinton co-sponsor legislation to jail flag burners in 2005?,Does Hillary Clinton support this legislation?,Did Hillary Clinton pass this legislation herself during this period?,Did Hillary Clinton co-sponsor this legislation for many years?,Was Hillary Clinton an opponent of the flag burning laws?,Did Hillary Clinton agree with the position of the National Guard?
Did all four volunteers develop Bell's palsy after receiving Covid 19 vaccine?,Did Pfizer's Covid vaccine have adverse effects on patients with Bell's palsy?,Did Pfizer's Covid vaccine appear to reduce the risk of Bell's palsy?,Are Covid vaccines generally believed to cause Bell's palsy?
Did Barony raise graduation rates to almost 90 percent?,Did Barony do it only for one district?,Did Barony do any community service work?,Did Barony take part in any community service?,Did Barony give any grants?,Does Barony have any other awards or recognitions?
Was this temple part of a road widening exercise?,Did the temple contain any artifacts?,Did the road widening exercise involve any other temples?,Was this temple in Ayodhya?,Would this temple have been destroyed if the road widening exercise was conducted?
"Did Brown collect over $400,000 in campaign contributions?",Does Brown have any ties to oil?,Are other parties related to his oil company?,Is Brown's oil company a subsidiary?,Has Brown raised money for his campaign before?,Are other candidates related to his oil company?,Does Brown have any ties to the oil company?
Did the man in the photo protect his car?,Did this person commit a crime?,Did this person leave or go to a crime scene?,Was this person committing a crime?,Did the man in this photo do so in person?,Did this person leave a record of the crime?,Did this person remain under police supervision?
Does spending on entitlements and debt services more than defense?,Does defense spending amount to three times as much as entitlement spending?,Does defense spending constitute an equal share of government spending?,Does the average US taxpayer spend over $1 trillion on entitlements?,Are military spending levels comparable to entitlement spending?,Did a 2010 poll reveal that spending on entitlements and debt services was twice as much as defense spending?
Is there evidence that these agents will enforce the new healthcare legislation?,Is there any indication that a lot of the new IRS agents have experience enforcing health care legislation?,Are there any rumors that these agents are currently employed with the IRS?,Is there evidence that a number of these agents are currently employed with the IRS?
"Does Biden say he is responsible for the abandonment of 10,000-15,000 Americans in Afghanistan?",Has Biden's actions contributed to the abandonment of Americans in Afghanistan?,Does Biden's actions directly contribute to the abandonment of Americans in Afghanistan?,Is the amount of abandonment by U.S. citizens in Afghanistan an accurate estimate?
Did Pacquiao take three months to finish his bachelor's degree?,Did Pacquiao graduate from college?,Did Pacquiao lose a match in his first year of a law degree?,Did Pacquiao win a match in his first year of a law degree?
Did Bill Nelson vote for Obama for 98% of the time in 2010?,Did Nelson vote with Obama for 98% of the time in 2011?,Did Bill Nelson vote for Obama for 98% of the time in 2010?,Was the percentage of Nelson voting for Obama for 98% of the time in 2011?,Did Bill Nelson vote overwhelmingly in support of Obama for 98% of the time?
Did Lewinsky offer to perform oral sex for her team to get impeached?,Did Lewinsky offer to perform oral sex for her team in order to get impeached?,Did Lewinsky offer to perform oral sex for her team to get impeached?
Does Rick Scott's budget include funding for teachers?,Does Rick Scott's budget include funding for teachers?,"Would 20,000 teachers be affected by the proposed budget?",Is there a current governor's plan for laying off teachers?,Is the proposed budget for laying off teachers a reputable idea?
"Did workers who worked between 1990 to 2019 receive 80,000 rupees in benefits from the EPFO?",Was the EPFO compensate for workers who worked under the GST Act?,Did the EPFO compensate for workers working for more than four years?,Is the EPFO compliant for workers working on a day to day basis?
"Was it predicted that by 2041, out of India’s total population, Muslims would account for 84%?",Has there been evidence that Muslims are being underrepresented among Indian population despite the aforementioned statistics?,Did the Institute of World Demographics Research report on India’s population in general?,Has there been evidence that any of the predictions had incorrect data?
Did the dog lie next to an arm of a person trapped under rubble caused by the earthquake in Turkey on 06 February 2023?,Is there a human under the rubble?,Is the dog frightened of the person?,Is the dog at least 100 yards away?,Are there other witnesses?
Has the primary source of income in Mexico ever been Mexicans working there?,Do the primary source of income in Mexico always have to come from Mexicans working here?,Do many of these Mexicans work in Mexico?,Does this fact reflect current prevailing economic conditions in Mexico?,Are Mexicans working in Mexico often considered illegal?
Was Jacob Blake shot by a police officer in August 2020?,Did the Chicago Code Blue Facebook page post a meme mocking Jacob Blake?,Is Jacob Blake shot by police in Wisconsin?,Was Jacob Blake shot by any police officer?,Was a Chicago Code Blue Facebook page meme mocking Jacob Blake?,0?
Did the women work for the Red Cross?,Are the women working for the Red Cross working towards a common goal?,Did the women come directly from the Red Cross organization?,Did women have roles in the Red Cross?,Has there been any discussion of this picture?,Was this photo taken in 1944?,Did any women volunteer in this photo?
Did this video exist prior to 2021?,Did this person not execute people during this time?,Did this person commit this crime in the previous year?,Did this person commit this murder in the year after this?,Did this person not have the opportunity to execute many people after this time?,Was this person executed in the year after this time?,Was this person killed while pursuing a task or after this time?
Are 59 people in a church believed to have died?,Is it reported that 59 people died from the coronavirus?,Is it reported that Dettol was used to prevent the coronavirus infection?,Is it reported that the church was located in a residential area?,Is it stated that Dettol was used to avoid the coronavirus infection?
Has crime in all areas of Atlanta decreased by 10 percent or more?,Does this percentage reflect all the people who were detained?,Has Atlanta taken action to reduce crime resulting in arrests from this type of group?,Is it true that the mayor pledged to make Atlanta safer?,. Do any other cities or states have taken similar steps to cut crime in this area?
Does this regulation require that all motorcycles be equipped with 75 MPH governors by January 2017?,Does this regulation prohibit parked motorcycles in cities that are prohibited from parked at 75 MPH?,Is there no regulation requiring that the maximum speed of motorcycles is 75 MPH by January 2017?
Did the COVID-19 vaccine cause multiple children to die?,Did the COVID-19 vaccine cause multiple children to be seriously ill?,Were there more children in India dying from COVID-19 vaccines?,Did the COVID-19 vaccine cause multiple children to become seriously ill?,Did the COVID-19 vaccine cause multiple children to die from COVID-19 vaccines?
Did 60% of the collected revenue come from the businesses and industries in Nairobi?,Was all of the collected revenue used for research purposes?,Does the GDP of Nairobi account for all of the collected revenue?,Is the GDP calculated by subtracting revenue from expenditures?,Do all of the collected revenue comes from the businesses and industries in Nairobi?
Did 79 people in the U.K. get blood clots after receiving the COVID-19 vaccine of AstraZeneca?,Did there appear to be people unable to receive the COVID vaccine because of their blood clots?,Was the COVID vaccine of AstraZeneca sold through a hospital?,Are there any other drugs that have been shown to cause blood clots?
Did Gates visit Epstein's Island on any number of occasions?,Did Gates visit Epstein's Island any number of times?,Did Gates visit Epstein's Island at an appropriate age?,Did Gates have an extended stay on Epstein's Island at this point?,Was Gates at Epstein's Island at the time of this report?,Was there any evidence in this report that Gates visited Epstein's Island?
Was a proposed Member of the Redistricting Commission able to accept a bribe from somebody?,Could a proposed Member of the Redistricting Commission be removed from this commission?,Would a proposed Member of the Redistricting Commission take a bribe from someone?
Does the Ministry of Labour and Employment offer benefits for workers who worked between 1990 and 2020?,Is the benefit for workers in India from the Ministry of Labour and Employment available under any state law?,Has the government introduced this benefit for workers in the last five years?,Was the benefit for workers in the last five years limited to working between 1990 and 2020?
Is this image the official photograph of Wickremesinghe for re-election in 2020?,Was this photo taken by a private photographer?,Was this picture captured by a group of private photos?,Is this image the official photograph of Wickremesinghe for re-election in 2020?
Did Mitt Romney locate the missing teenage daughter of a Bain Capital partner?,Did Romney help locate the missing teenage daughter of a Bain Capital partner?,Did Romney actually locate the missing teenage daughter of a Bain Capital partner?,Was Romney the one who gave support to locating the missing teenage daughter of a Bain Capital partner?
Was this pastor trying to reassure church goers that this dose of dettol is effective to prevent coronavirus?,Did this pastor have any interaction with the coronavirus prior to the death of the 59 people?,Can this pastor be considered reliable as to the current health of his congregation?
Did Rachel Maddow tweet that Hillary Clinton died?,Did NBC use this hashtag in a live interview?,Did Rachel Maddow tweet that Hillary Clinton died?,Was the tweet in question from the Twitter account of NBC?,Did the tweet mention that Hillary Clinton was suffering from multiple heart attacks?,Did this tweet have a lot of people arguing about Hillary Clinton's health?
Is there any evidence that Sheesha Sahu killed two rapists to save herself?,Did she kill two rapists in order to save herself?,Did the two rapists live?,Did Sahu's mother testify against the rapists?,Was Sahu known to rape rapists in the past?
Did this video contain Queen Elizabeth II flinging food at children?,Did this video specifically mention that this was a British colony?,Did the queen fling food at children during this incident?,Did this video have a long caption that featured Queen Elizabeth II flinging food at children?
Did more children suffer a severe reaction to the Covd-19 vaccine compared to the amount of children required oxygen therapy for Covd-19?,Did more children die from severe reactions to the Covd-19 vaccine compared to the amount of children required oxygen therapy for Covd-19?,Did more children die from severe reactions to the Covd-19 vaccine compared to the amount of children required oxygen therapy for Covd-19?
Can 5G networks be used to detonate lithium battery powered vehicles?,Can 5G networks detonate batteries for electric vehicles?,Can 5G networks detonate batteries for electric cars?,Can electric cars be detonated with 5G networks?,Are 5G networks safe from electric cars detonation?
Does Walmart offer $500 grocery cards for $2 in stores?,Does Walmart help with rising prices by providing $500 grocery cards?,Has Walmart been criticized for this practice before?,Is Walmart not always averse to giving 500 grocery cards for $2?,Is this practice common in WalMart stores?,Are Walmart and other stores trying to do things to help in raising prices?
Did a new investment by hedge funds close down the factory in Wisconsin?,Was the money re-invested back into the plant?,450 people lose their jobs?,Was the capital from the new investment used for a specific purpose?,Did these concerns change the economic situation in the community in general?
Did Kim Jong Un actually pass away?,Was Kim Jong Un responsible for passing?,Did Kim Jong Un have multiple medical complications?,Did Kim Jong Un die within a year?,Was Kim Jong Un responsible for the death of his child?,Is Kim Jong Un a recognizable leader?
Did Trump's tax bill affect companies that shipped production overseas?,Did Trump's tax bill reduce the profits of companies that shipped production overseas?,Did Trump's tax bill reduce exporting profits of foreign manufacturers?,Does Trump's tax bill affect companies that shipped goods overseas?,Can companies export products from countries other than the United States?
Are all US airstrikes against ISIS reported as '75 percent of combat missions return to base without firing a weapon'?,Is this a realistic estimate for the return rate of airstrikes against ISIS?,Is there a specific percentage of these combat missions that returned without firing a weapon?
"Did the Taliban not implement any of the following actions: vaccines, social distancing, PCR testing, masks, or business closures during the pandemic?",Did the Taliban do these things to the people they recaptured during the pandemic?,Did this result in mass deaths?
Did the Cincinnati Bengals tweet about not selling tickets to Vegas Raiders fans?,Did the Cincinnati Bengals make it clear that they will not be selling any tickets to a game in Las Vegas?,Was there any evidence that the Cincinnati Bengals did not want any people to purchase any tickets?,Was any evidence that the Cincinnati Bengals intended to prohibit any fans of the Raiders from purchasing tickets in Las Vegas?
Did this policy come from the 2008 San Francisco policy?,Did this policy lead to this outcome?,Does this policy have an unintended consequence?,Was this policy unintended?,Did this policy have a negative effect on undocumented youth?,Did this policy result in an unintended consequence?,Sarah Brown: Is an Unidenity Report on Immigrants A Good Thing?,Sarah Brown: Are Immigrants a Bad Thing?
Can viruses live on your hands for less than 5 to 10 minutes?,Is it important to wash your hands frequently because the virus can live on your hands for less than 5 to 10 minutes?,Can the virus spread from one person to another person?,Are there other things that can spread the virus from one person to another person?
In 1993 the Republicans embraced a health plan that proudly features an individual mandate as its main component. The main component of the plan is this mandate. Is this mandate a purely individual mandate policy?,Are they currently working on a plan that includes a separate mandate to cover health benefits for individuals?
Have county health officials received census data to enhance vaccination enforcement protocols?,i have asked about this data. i have asked about this data. and answered. does this information support this claim?,"ii if this information is accurate, why did cdc obtain this data?",iii if the data are accurate then how will these data be used?
Do Walmart offer a discount for filling out a survey?,Is Walmart giving a discount in this advertisement for using a Facebook Survey?,Does Walmart offer the coupon to social media users on Facebook?,Is there no other way to purchase the coupon?,Do Walmart social media users have to sign up for an account to receive the coupon?
Has unemployment increased or stagnated since the stimulus bill was signed?,Has the unemployment rate remained at 9 percent or higher for 21 consecutive months?,Has there been more than a million job losses since the stimulus bill was signed?,Has unemployment been down since the stimulus bill was signed?,Is there evidence that this labor force participation is at risk?
Did the job growth be consistently better than what's been reported?,Did Obama win the election?,"Peter D. Smith.' ""Do the United States economy have a better economic performance now than it did in 2008?","Peter D. Smith. "" ""When did the last election have the longest duration of job growth?","Peter D Smith. "" "" Do the numbers used in this paragraph represent actual statistics or projections for the U.S. economy?"
Did malaria spread by mosquitoes decrease from 2003 to 2023?,Has malaria been eradicated since 2003?,Are there any reports of malaria in the year after 2023?,Is the number of cases of malaria dropped between 2003 and 2023?,Have there been any reports of malaria in the years after 2003?
Is there a larger deficit with China now than before?,Does China have a bigger GDP than the United States?,Does this trade deficit with China exceed America?,Would this trade deficit with China increase in 2020 if China began a trade war?,Would the US trade deficit with China be higher than it was in 2019?
"Is it true that the Supreme Court will have 3 branches in Chennai, Mumbai, and Calcutta?","Is it true that the Supreme Court will have 3 branches in Chennai, Mumbai, and Calcutta?","Is it true that the Supreme Court will have 3 branches in Chennai, Mumbai, and Calcutta?","Is it true that the Central Government has decided to expand branches of the Supreme Court to 3 locations in Chennai, Mumbai, and Calcutta?"
Did the video show revolt and 200 policemen resigned from the Delhi Police?,Did the video show how much money was allegedly paid to protestors by the police?,Does the video show protestors using riot police?,Did the video show protestors using riot police?,Did the video show protestors using riot police?
Is there a new law that allows people to permanently erase debt older than 2 years from their credit records?,Does this law allow individuals to have their debts permanently erased?,Has anyone been able to permanently erase debt for less than 2 years on their credit record?,Does the law allow individuals to permanently erase debt for less than 2 years?
Will 25 million to 30 million people be allowed to access a national health insurance exchange?,Is there a total estimated number of people eligible to access a national health insurance exchange?,Can the people in the final estimates have access to a national health insurance exchange?,Does the estimated amount of people eligible for this service vary by state?
Did the man have 15 children?,Does this man have a law on population control in India?,Is this man famous?,Does this man have a religion?,Are there any laws in place to prevent population increase in India?,Is this man famous?,Are any religions against a law on population control in India?
Did this previous administration spend over $7 billion trying to upgrade the air traffic control system?,Did this previous administration spent the money on an effort to upgrade the system?,Did this previous administration have other issues with the upgrade effort?,Has the previous administration raised the question of whether or not an upgrade effort was successful?,Was this previous administration committed to upgrade the air traffic control system?
Has the federal workforce increased in any way since Obama took office?,Has the federal workforce increased in any way since Obama took office?,Has the federal workforce lost jobs in any way since Obama took office?,Has the federal workforce increased in any way since Obama took office?,Is Obama's increase in the federal workforce 10% since he took office?
Has Lake been appearing at rallies with neo-Nazis?,Has Hobbs been found guilty of racial discrimination?,"Is Lake also the founder of ""The Knights Templar""?",Does Lake have a history with neo-Nazi groups?
"Is it true that 3,000 ballots were not found floating in Lake Erie?",Is the majority of ballots floating in Lake Erie likely to have been thrown away?,Is the majority of ballots in Lake Erie likely to have been tossed away?,Was Lake Erie ever tested as a test site for ballots?
Did Bellamy quote questioning human responsibility for global warming in 2008?,Is Bellamy quote based on latest science?,Did Bellamy quote questioning human responsibility for global warming in 2008?,Did Bellamy quote questioning human responsibility for global warming in 2008?,Does Bellamy quote questioning human responsibility for global warming based on latest science?
Does Goa ban drinking alcohol on beaches?,Did Goa put a fine for the violation of this ban?,Would the fine be for a total violation of this ban?,"Does the fine include a minimum of 5,000 to 50,000?","Is the fine in the range of 5,000 to 50,000?"
Is there enough qualified applicants in order to fill 3.6 million jobs?,Is the number of qualified applicants needed to fill 3.6 million jobs largely due to the need for more job applicants?,Can there be a reasonable amount of qualified applicants in order to fill 3.6 million jobs?,Could there be a reasonable amount of qualified applicants?
Did 158 Indian soldiers die during the attack in Sikkim?,Did this attack involve a direct hit on Indian soldiers?,Was this attack by Chinese forces?,Are there any other rocket attacks that may have caused this death?,Has any person posted pictures of the devastation caused by this attack?,Did these pictures take place in India?
Did Denzel Washington vote in the 2016 presidential election?,Is it true Denzel Washington is switching his support to Donald Trump?,Did Denzel Washington ever endorse Trump?,Was Denzel Washington a liberal or a conservative?,Did Washington support Trump in 2016?,Are there any other notable celebrities who are supportive of Trump?
"Has global warming, pollution and over-development caused 90% of the coral reefs to disappear?",Has global warming contributed to 90% of the loss of coral reefs?,Does bleaching have a positive impact on coral reefs?,Can global warming affect the global food supply?,Is it estimated that 90% of the world's coral reefs will disappear in the next 35 years?
Is billionaire a known criminal?,Were hundreds of crimes uncovered?,Is one gangster who rapes a baby sentenced to jail?,Is one gangster charged with murder after a murder conviction?,Did a man who stole a rack of ribs serve time?
Did 99 percent of Catholic women use contraception?,Is the number of women using contraception higher or lower than the total amount of women?,Are there records of women who have avoided using contraception?,Are contraceptives used more frequently in Catholic women than in non-Catholic women?,Are statistics of what percentage of women has used contraception different in between Catholic and non-Catholic women?
Is there any evidence of Galveston County in Texas having a higher retirement income than average?,Are these people paying more into Social Security than other counties?,"Are people making at least 50% more money than normal in Galveston County, Texas?",Does Galveston County have more income than the average for all counties?
Does looking for a gap between an object and its reflection distinguish two-way mirrors from ordinary mirrors?,Can a gap between an object and reflection be found in an ordinary mirror?,Is this observation based on a hypothesis?,Are there two-way mirrors versus ordinary mirrors?
Did 70% of Trump supporters think the media fagged news stories?,Is 70% of Trump supporters blaming the media for fake news stories?,Did 70% of Trump supporters think the media fagged news stories?,Is 70% of Trump supporters supportive of the media?,Is 70% of Trump supporters critical of the media?
Did Moi elect Ruto to be a youth leader in 1991?,Did Ruto participate in the 1991 presidential election?,Was Ruto's name on that list?,Is Ruto listed as a youth leader during Moi's presidency?,Was Ruto's position established at the 1991 presidential election?
"Did 53,000 dead people die in Florida?",Did this include all Florida voter rolls?,Did it take years for this to happen?,Did some people die because of alleged homicides?,Does this report reflect any changes to the polls?,Did the Trump administration release this info before he did this report?,Was the Trump administration prepared to release this info before he did this report?
Did the pilot of Malaysia Airlines Flight 370 reappeared in Taiwan two years after the plane disappeared?,Did the pilot of Malaysia Airlines Flight 370 still work at the airline the two years following the planes disappearance?,Was the airline pilot still working with the airline at the time of the missing flight?
Did the Mardi Gras parades come back after COVID-19 was canceled?,Does some of the trend also continue to be an example of “Yardi Gras”?,Did it take some time to spread this trend?,Is this trend still an example of this trend in this year?
"What is the name of the combined administrations of Jomo Kenyatta, Daniel arap Moi and Mzee Kibaki?","Did Mo Mo Kenyatta, Daniel arap Moi and Mzee Kibaki increase this national cake to KSh 4.5 trillion?",Is this the same amount in a span of 50 years?,Was the same amount in a span of 50 years?,Is this the same amount in a span of 50 years?
Was there a direct 3C Corridor train traveling through Ohio in 1935?,Did the 3C Corridor train spend an hour and 15 minutes more than a New York Central train traveling through Ohio in 1935?,Did the 3C Corridor train take longer time to travel across Ohio compared to a New York Central train in 1935?
Was the plan to reduce the world population 95% successful?,Was the plan to reduce the world population in place of the population control in Cairo?,Did the 1994 population conference in Cairo require an 80% reduction in world population?,Do we know if this is the only world population reduction plan ever implemented?,Was the 1994 population conference held in the year 2001?,Did the population conference in 1991 have a plan to reduce the world population?
Did spending on Medicare increase by $600 billion annually after it fell to $600 billion?,Did spending on Medicare increase by more than the $600 billion annually drop?,Will spending on Medicare go over $1 trillion again?,Is the government predicting deficit spending will increase to $1 trillion again?,Is the government predicting spending on Medicare to go over $600 billion annually?
Is a Saudi man awaiting trial for performing oral sex on a camel?,Is a Saudi man awaiting arraignment for performing oral sex on a camel?,Did a Saudi man perform oral sex on a camel?,Did the Saudi man receive lashes for performing oral sex on a camel?
Did unemployment double during Perry's presidency?,Did joblessness double in the state after Perry's presidency?,Is this statistic accurate?,Can we confirm the accuracy of this data?,Do the figures used in this article relate to employment rates for all age groups in Texans?,Are the figures accurate in relation to other studies?
Could the unemployment rate be 10 percent if people who have quit looking for work were added to the national labor force?,Does Obama support a reduced unemployment rate if people quit looking for work?,Does the percentage of people who quit looking for work be equal to the overall U.S. unemployment rate?,Would the overall U.S. unemployment rate be 10 percent if people who quit looking for work were added to the national labor force?
Did the Government of India increase the retirement age for Central Government employees?,Does India have a retirement age increase for Central Government employees?,Is there evidence that there is a decrease in retirement age?,"Did this change take place prior to October 1, 2017?",Did this change affect any other employees?,Did this change affect all private sector employees?
Are more households in this bracket benefiting from this deduction?,Do most states offer a state and local tax deduction?,Does this deduction benefit moderate income households?,Does the tax rate vary for certain income groups?,Is it true that most states offer this tax deduction to lower income families?,Is this tax deduction a major benefit to a small amount of the working population?
Is kicking a man’s testis painful?,Is there evidence that pain is an immediate occurrence after kicking a man’s testis?,Is there evidence to suggest that this pain is a long-lasting and severe form of pain?,Does this pain result in some form of death?
Did the mobile device receive the blast?,Does the mobile device call the number 767888999?,Was the mobile device knocked off the phone?,Did the mobile device receive any type of device action?,Did the mobile device receive any damage?,Did the mobile device explode during the blast?,Was the mobile device knocked off due to the blast?
Was there evidence that Haley had committed a crime during the January 6 riots?,Was Haley released from jail early after footage proved he didn't commit a crime during the January 6 riots?,Did Haley commit any offense during the January 6 riots?,Was there evidence that Haley's arrest was a lie?
Is Biden intentionally in Afghanistan?,Did Biden want to change the body politic permanently?,Can Biden bring in millions of ilhanomars?,Is there any evidence to support Biden’s claim?,Was Biden lied about in his statement about ilhanomars?
Is it true that 2.9 lanes would be added to Sunset Highway without Westside MAX?,"Is it true that without Westside MAX, we would need to add 2.9 lanes to Sunset Highway?",Is it true that west side MAX has a much larger impact on traffic than eastside MAX?
Did Biden force the U.S. Attorney for the Eastern District of North Carolina to resign after 24 people were charged with election fraud?,Did the mainstream media never even bat an eyelash after this alleged fraud?,Did Biden force the U.S. Attorney for the Eastern District of North Carolina to resign after 24 people were charged with election fraud?
Did most Omikron cases where an Impfstatus known survive?,Did the Virus have a good chance of spreading from infected animals?,Was only 188 Virus-cases ungeimpft?,Did Virus a better chance of spreading than the virus itself?
Did the Oregon Convention Center's hotel subsidy increase in closed-door sessions?,Did the Oregon Convention Center receive a $1 billion in taxpayer subsidy for closed-door sessions?,Did the Oregon Convention Center receive a $1 billion in taxpayer subsidy in closed-door sessions?,Has the taxpayer subsidy jumped in closed-door sessions?
Did H-E-B give a free $80 coupon per family to celebrate its 50th anniversary?,Was H-E-B giving a free $80 coupon per family to celebrate its 50th anniversary?,Did H-E-B donate a free $80 coupon to celebrate their 50th anniversary?
Is the $11 billion spent on this program by castor?,Has Castor ever advocated for this type of program?,Was Castor elected to represent a state in the House of Representatives?,Was the amount spent on this program funded by any money raised by the U.S.?,Is there any evidence that Castor sponsored this project?
Did Hawaii announce that drivers from out of state would have to take new driving tests before they rent a car and drive?,Will Hawaii ban out of state drivers from visiting and residing in the state?,Did Hawaii announce that visitors and new residents would have to take new driving tests?,Will out of state drivers have to take new driving tests before they can rent a vehicle and drive?
Was the number of outstanding title deeds for Nelson Mandela Bay greater than the national average?,Are all current title deeds issued by the DA in Nelson Mandela Bay?,Is Nelson Mandela Bay a metropolitan metro?,Has the DA made strides in the past regarding the number of outstanding title deeds?
Was Scott's resignation effective after he was sentenced to a $1.7 billion fine?,Was Scott forced to resign after pledging guilty to massive amounts of systematic fraud?,Did Scott plead guilty to more felonies?,"Did Scott plead guilty in connection to the ""systematic fraud""?"
Did the number of people waiting on waitlist fluctuate between 1 and 1?,Did the number of people on waiting list fluctuate as well?,Are there many people with children in this state?,Is there any evidence that charter schools are becoming more common in the state?,Were children in this state able to attend charter schools as soon as they were born?,Is there anything that proves charter schools are more common in this state?
Have there ever been any Republican members of this legislature?,Is there any record of this legislator being in harmony with the ACLU?,Is it true that Nolan has a 100% record of being in harmony with the ACLU?,Were there any other records of no alliance with the ACLU during this time?,Are there any other examples of this?
Is this election between two of the biggest political parties in the country?,Is there any difference between the number of voters in this election?,Was this election between one of the biggest political parties in the country?,Was this election not on a re-run?,"Is it true that Rahul Gandhi was in the election to elect the Congress leader as Vice President of India in 2009, but received only 13 lakh votes for this election in this constituency?",Was this election between two political parties in the country?
"Is it ""legal"" for the media to lie to the public under the 2012 law?","Is the ""legal"" period listed in the quote from Bartram?",Is the 2012 law in effect since Obama's signature?,Does Bartram mention other aspects of Obama's 2012 law that are cited?
Did this woman birth 11 babies?,Has this woman produced these babies?,Would it be a reasonable assumption that 11 babies were born at the same time?,Has anyone in this country born this many babies?,Is it possible to be certain that this woman has had at least 11 babies during this period?,Would this woman have produced these 11 babies?,Is there anything in this country that would be in any way capable of being attributed to these 11 babies?
"Did China want to kill 20,000 coronavirus patients?","Did China kill 20,000 coronavirus patients?","Has China sought to kill 20,000 coronavirus patients?","Did China kill 20,000 coronavirus patients?","Was China able to kill 20,000 coronavirus patients?","Did China kill 20,000 coronavirus patients?"
Did Trump construct this fence?,Did the fence reduce smuggling by 90%?,Is there evidence that Trump constructed this fence?,Is the Trump Border Fence widely used?,Did the Trump Border Fence affect the U.S. immigration system?,Is this fence ineffective?,Is Trump's border fence effective in other states?
Did the picture exist or was it a fake?,Were the T-shirts authentic?,Was the illustration human testicles?,Did Zelenskyy own the T-shirt?,Would Zelenskyy have a sexy t-shirt adorned with an illustration of human testicles?
Did all of the opposition parties boycott the inaugural ceremony?,Did the inaugural ceremony include the participation of all opposition parties?,Did all of the opposition parties participate in this inaugural ceremony?,Was this new parliament a success?,Was this parliament a success?,Does the Indian Parliament have its own media presence?,Did any of the opposition parties participate in this inaugural ceremony?
Does an employee have to pay tax on their wages?,Do workers who pay tax on their wages receive money to live comfortably?,Is 8% of the employee's income from yearly tax and national insurance paid for in the employee's life?,Is $8840 of the employee's income from yearly tax and national insurance paid for in the employee's life?
Did Dr. Dre send a cease and desist letter to Rep. Marjorie Taylor Greene in relation to a tweeted video?,Does Dr. Dre have legal rights against the tweet and/or the song?,Does Dr. Dre have any legal rights regarding this song?,Does Dr. Dre have legal rights to the song?
Did rifles contribute to 297 deaths in the U.S in 2022?,"Has constipation contributed to 2,167 deaths in the U.S in 2022?",Did rifle deaths in the U.S. in 2022 disproportionately result in more than 2% of the total deaths?,Can we say that guns contributed in almost twice as many deaths as constipation deaths?
Did people from all over the country show up to a man’s 100th birthday party?,Did dogs at this event line around the block?,Did this event attract a large crowd?,Are all dogs in this event expected to show up?,Have dogs from other countries shown up to this event?,Have dogs from more than one country participated in this event?
Does the amount of money spent for all Latin America represent a fraction of the US spent in Iraq?,Is the amount of aid and assistance America spent in Latin America less than the United States budget for Iraq?,Is the amount of aid and assistance he made for Latin America less than the United States budget for Iraq?
Did Boeing cancel a plane it hasn't built?,Did Boeing cite the cost of the 747 as out of control?,Did Boeing cancel the order?,Did Boeing cancel the 747 project because of these costs?,Did Boeing say the costs would decrease after the cancellation?,Did Boeing tell the Air Force One would not fly?
Did Chandrayaan-3 capture this video?,Did Chandrayaan-3 capture this video from Earth?,Was Chandrayaan-3 associated with this video?,Was this video captured by this video?,Did this video show this video by the moon?,Did this video show a moonside image?
Did the death toll rise by 111 in one day or was it higher overall?,Did Hancock say that the death toll was the lowest since the lockdown began?,Did Hancock say that the death toll was the highest overall since the lockdown began?,Did Hancock report that the death toll increased by 556?,Did Hancock make the statements in accordance with his belief?
Did National Geographic pay 1 million dollars for this rare video of an eagle sheltering eggs?,Has any other eagles sheltering eggs been reported in this video?,Does the eagle that sheltering eggs have some kind of immunity to predators like mice and ants?,Do eagles typically shelter eggs if it is a threat to its own health or well being?
Is this a single video or does it show police abusing students returning to school?,Is the video from Myanmar?,Is the video released in a country that has a history of violent ethnic groups?,Is this footage from Myanmar?,Did this video show the abuse by police as a direct result of returning to school?
"Was the aid from stimulus money spent on a government board that made recommendations that would cost 378,000 jobs?",Would the aid from stimulus money have prevented the losses of sales in the US?,"Did the aid from stimulus money fund the government board that made recommendations that would cost 378,000 jobs?",Would the aid from stimulus money cost $28.3 billion in sales?
Is it not true that a 5 percent increase in domestic production would increase the world supply by less than 1 percent and do almost nothing to our dependence on foreign oil?,Would a 5% increase in domestic production increase the world supply by less than 1 percent?,Would a 5% increase in domestic production decrease the price of gas at the pump?
Did a video posted to Twitter in August 2023 show a pyramid on top of a Scottish mountain?,Did any of the people in the video see the pyramid?,Does the video'report' that someone in Scotland actually made a pyramid on top of a Scottish mountain?,Did anyone in the video (or other people) say the video had been faked in the post?
Did CDC say 7 out of 10 Americans are 'declining' to get COVID-19 vaccines?,Did CDC say 7 out of 10 Americans are 'declining' to get COVID-19 vaccines?,Did CDC say 7 out of 10 Americans are 'declining' to get COVID-19 vaccines?
Did the video show thick dark clouds before the February 2023 train derailment?,Was the footage uploaded to Youtube the day before the derailment?,Is the video accurate for the time period portrayed?,Did the video show the location of the train?,Would the Ohio train derailment have caused a similar weather phenomenon if the video had been posted the day before the derailment?
Was the sound scary for more than 10 days?,Did the locals flock to the mountain to scare away dragons?,Was the sound scary for more than 10 days?,Was this an uncommonly heard occurrence in China?,Did this sound affect the native people in this area?,Did the sound occur before this event?
Has the coalition completed any projects to date?,Has the coalition completed any projects to date?,Did the coalition complete any project to date?,Has any other significant projects been completed in connection with the coalition?,Has the coalition completed any large projects to date?,Has any other large projects been completed since coming to power?,Has the coalition completed any large projects in connection with the coalition?
"Did the Black Forest have 15,000 missing persons cases last year?",Did these cases last for more than 2 years?,Did the Black Forest have many people missing in total last year?,Do these statistics support previous claims?,Do these statistics support the Black Forest's claim that the Black Forest caused many missing persons in its history?
"Have 350,000 US military personnel been discharged for refusing the COVID-19 vaccine?",Have there been any previous cases involving military personnel who refused to get the vaccine?,Are there records of other people who have been discharged?,Does the US military use the COVID-19 vaccine?,Does the US military consistently use this vaccine?,Does this vaccine contain human immunodeficiency virus in humans?
Did any state raise their gas tax except Virginia?,Has any state raised their gas tax except for Virginia?,Is Virginia an exception to this?,Do state gas taxes increase without precedent?,Is the federal gas tax the same as in other states?,Is there any evidence this is the case?,Has there been evidence that the federal gas tax is the same in Virginia?,Are there signs to indicate that the federal gas tax is increasing in Virginia?
Does anyone know whether this will be used in Argentina?,Will this video help you access your phone?,Was the video specifically written to enact this legislation in Argentina?,Has the law been passed in Argentina yet?,Does this video hack your phone in a matter of seconds?,Will this video help you access your phone?
Did this person force this woman off the bus?,Did this person make this act illegal?,Did this person act alone?,Has this person ever been charged with any offense?,Has this person been arrested on suspicion of any crimes?,Has this person ever been charged with a crime?,Does this person have other charges against them?
Is the Balenciaga designer dressed in a devil-like outfit?,Did the designer wear these red dolls?,Was the designer the top designer for Balenciaga?,Do Balenciaga designers use devil costumes on their models?,Can any Balenciaga designers be seen in pictures wearing the aforementioned outfits?
Is Coons saying that a 911 call should be taxed?,Is it true that Coons felt that 911 calls should be taxed?,Is it true that Coons would not support a tax on 911 calls?,Do all 911 calls cost someone money?,Is it true that Coons would support a tax on 911 calls?,Is it true that Coons thinks that 911 calls should be taxed?
Did a selfie by a monkey win the 2020 iPhone Photography Awards?,Did the selfie win the selfie category in the 2020 iPhone Photography Awards?,Did the selfie in question have any effect on the outcome of the selfie contest?,Did the selfie win the selfie category in the 2020 iPhone Photography Awards?,Did the selfie win the selfie category in the 2020 iPhone Photography Awards?,Did the selfie in question have any effect on the outcome of the selfie contest?
Did the pole have a hole of 40 feet?,Do the poles typically freeze?,Did the poles always stay above 30 feet in temperature?,Would more snow have been needed in some areas?,Would a lot of more snow have been needed in other areas?,Does the pole always get very icey in winter weather?
Is it true that knowing a classmate who sells cannabis is more common than knowing a classmate who sells alcohol?,Is there evidence that these findings support what they claim?,Can one use the information presented in this article to conclude the conclusions drawn by this study?,Will these findings prove that marijuana is still an illegal substance?
Did voters in Maricopa County not visit voting centers on Election Day?,Did voters go to voting centers on Election Day?,Did voter registration numbers drop compared to 2016?,Was voting the same day as 2016?,Did voters attend voting centers on Election Day?,Were votes from voters cast in 2016.?,Did voters return to voting centers during 2018?
"Does the DWS program aim to train 15,000 young people as artisans?",Can it be concluded that a significant number of young people are training as artisans?,Is the DWS program aimed to curb water wastage?,Does this project require a centralized water recycling system?,Can the DWS program be concluded as a significant initiative?
Did Trump imply that the stunt would cost US $200M?,Will the troops be able to have a Thanksgiving with families?,Did Trump's stunt incur a cost to the US?,Have Trump's actions incurred another expense?,Have these causes had a significant impact on the US budget?
Was a nude sunbather injured by a bird?,Did the predatory bird rip away a testicle?,Did the sunbather wear clothing in which the testicles were exposed?,Did the sunbather have a collar in his clothing?,Did the bird rip away the testicle while he was sunbather?
Is this bill approved?,Does this bill affect police councils nationwide?,Will this bill directly affect the United Nations?,Is this bill intended to benefit national police systems?,Will this bill affect local police?,Would this bill include any other laws or constitutional amendments?,Would this bill affect individual police unions?
What does'most populated day' refer to?,Does the most populated day of voting in early voting occur during the last three days of early voting?,Does the last three days of early voting typically be when most people vote?,Does the average size of the most populated day of voting in early voting fluctuate?
Is this amount increased by President Obama alone or are all of these spending increases combined?,Does this increase include all spending that the failed stimulus did?,Is this amount increased by President Obama in general and all of his spending increases in particular?,Is this increase increased by Obama in particular?,Can we reasonably be sure that this increases the number of spending?
Is Adani Agri Logistics Ltd. setting up grain silos in Punjab after three farm bills passed in the Parliament?,Is it possible to find any other agricultural projects for Adani Agri Logistics Ltd.?,Is it possible for Adani Agri Logistics Ltd. to set up grain silos in Punjab?
"Will this plan allow 25,000 asylum seekers to enter the country?",Would this plan give a reprieve to this type of people?,Will this policy help to solve these people's problems?,Will this plan take into account some underlying concerns to the immigration community?,Will this plan provide protection for this type of people?
Was Trump's Oval Office destroyed after the 2020 election?,Was Trump's Oval Office destroyed after he lost the 2020 election to Biden?,Was Donald Trump's Oval Office destroyed after he lost the 2020 election to Biden?,Was the Oval Office destroyed after Trump lost the 2020 election to Biden?
Does this photo have any indication as to whether Priyanka Gandhi Vadra is in a party?,Does this photo of Priyanka Gandhi Vadra wearing Indira’s saree suggest that Bihar Assembly elections – 2020 are coming up?,Did the photo even occur before or during the upcoming Bihar Assembly elections?
Did this campaign support a rally sponsored by the wife of the Supreme Court Justice Clarence Thomas?,Did the group of bus riders have to pay for an alternative route to the rally?,Did this group of bus drivers receive compensation for any of their work?,Did this group of drivers receive a discount on their travel expenses?
Is the health insurance for Oregon children affordable?,Did the bills pass?,Did any other bills pass in addition to the Oregon children’s health care bill?,Is there any other issue relating to Oregon’s children’s health care bill?,Is there any evidence that states that this bill is affordable?
Did Trump sign the legislation that would clean up tons of trash from oceans and lakes?,Did the mainstream news media have any mention of the legislation?,Did the media cover any of the issues surrounding the legislation?,Did anyone mention the legislation by name on the media?,Has Trump's signature legislation ever been reported on in the mainstream media?
"Does the Senate GOP plan not raise taxes for Americans earning less than $70,000?","Does the Senate GOP plan raise taxes for Americans earning less than $70,000?","Has the Senate GOP plan also raised taxes for Americans earning less than $70,000?","Did the Senate GOP plan raise taxes for American earning less than $70,000?","Has the Senate GOP plan also raised taxes for American earning less than $70,000?"
Did only 42 percent of young Georgians have a college certificate or degree?,Did 60 percent of jobs require some college credential?,Are the percentages of young Georgians who have a college certificate or degree smaller than other ethnic groups in Georgia?,Are the percentages of young Georgians who have a college certificate or degree larger than other ethnic groups in Georgia?
Did the time it would take for the $1 trillion to be distributed after the 1st hour of any given year?,"If you were to pay out $1 trillion at $1 per second, would it take 31,000 years?",Is $1 per second equivalent to $1 per century?,Is there an answer to the question of how long the payment time would be?
Did someone affix contaminated roses on cars in Kentucky in late 2019?,Did anyone post on Facebook that roses were contaminated?,Is there any indication that roses were used in the sex trafficking scheme?,Is the post relevant to the sex trafficking scheme?
Is Rhode Island one of the 10 strictest states?,Is Rhode Island a constitutional state?,Were Rhode Island’s gun laws tougher than all of the states?,Is Rhode Island a constitutional state?,Did Rhode Island put a ban on the sale of guns in 2013?,Would Rhode Island implement a ban on guns?
Does the video insinuate that the Filipino public can start receiving their pensions as early as 40 years old?,Are there any underlying documents indicating that this video suggests starting pension payments as early as 40?,Does the video appear to insinuate that the Filipino public can start receiving their pensions as early as 40 years old?
Was Francis Pelle stripped and beaten?,Was Pelle alive?,Was this event reported in the media?,Was Pelle a French priest?,Did Pelle survive his attempted lynching?,Did this event occur in France?,Was Pelle hospitalized?,Did this event take place in France?,Did the French priest survive?
"Does this Tesla subsidy allow for a family to purchase a Tesla for an amount of $800,000?","Is this Tesla subsidy in favor of a company making less than $800,000?","Does this Tesla subsidy allow for people to purchase a Tesla for as much as $800,000?"
Is it true that three massive coils of pipe from the D-Day war helped win the war?,Is it true that D-Day helped invent this invention?,Does the D-Day invention have any known health problems?,Was the D-Day invention inherently dangerous?,Did the D-Day invention have a significant effect on the war?
Did BlackRock own any shares of Fox News?,Did BlackRock pay Tucker Carlson a fine?,Did BlackRock pay Carlson a fine for its role in the lawsuit?,Did BlackRock terminate the relationship between Tucker Carlson and Fox News?,Did BlackRock ever fire Carlson?,Is there any evidence that Carlson's company is in debt to BlackRock?
"Did American Screening LLC recall more than 150,000 units of hand sanitizer?",Did the manufacturer of the hand sanitizer make this recall?,Does the manufacturer make hand sanitizer in a lot of countries?,Did consumers repurchase the hand sanitizer because of this recall?
Did the Federal Reserve Building in Washington create this wall?,Did the wall have this effect?,Are high interest rates a reason for protests by the Federal Reserve?,Were there protesters gathered outside the Federal Reserve Building in response to higher rates?,Do the protesters have a wall against them?
Is Channel 4 likely to do just fine without the taxpayer?,Will Channel 4 be successful in terms of the tax break it receives?,Does tax aid inherently provide a benefit to the channel?,Will tax break allow channel 4 to continue to operate?,Does a fiscal benefit to channel 4 come from a tax break?
Did Sky News air this video?,Did this video take place after the airstrike on this church?,Do these film props resemble concrete?,Did the video air on a national television station?,Was there any footage of this video on a network other than Sky News?,Was the video broadcast by Sky News?
Is this claim false?,Did I cast a decision in regards to extending Medicaid?,"Did I vote to extend Medicaid to 50,000 people?",Was my vote a decision on Medicaid expansion?,Did I vote on Medicaid expansion?,Is my voting on Medicaid expansion in any way related to immigration?,Did the vote result in an increase in Medicaid coverage?
Did there exist any arrests of these financial industry figures?,Did any of these financial institutions bring down the economy?,Did any of these financial institutions produce any bad news for the US economy?,Are there any banks from these companies that are not committing illegal crimes?,Did these banks receive any penalties for committing these crimes?,Was this company involved in any crimes during these times?
Did 90% of educators and staff belong to the American Federation of Teachers?,Did 90% of educators and staff receive vaccinations?,Is the percentage of employees who received vaccines lower than that reported by the author?,Are there any questions about this claim by the author?,Are there any comments from the author?,Can we use this information for purposes other than deciding on vaccines for teachers?
Has the first murder hornet nest been eradicated in the US in this area?,Is the Department of Agriculture responsible for eradicating the murder hornet nest in the US?,Did the Washington State Department of Agriculture eradicate the murder hornet nest in the US?,Did the Washington State Department of Agriculture eradicate the first murder hornet nest found in the United States?
Did labor amend the Sex Discrimination Act to make it possible for schools to expel students because of their sexuality?,Was the Sex Discrimination Act changed at any point in history?,Did the Sex Discrimination Act contain any protections for LGBT people?,Did Labor amend the Sex Discrimination Act in 2013?
Did Rick Scott pay down the debt by $2 billion?,Did Crist pay down the debt by $5 billion?,Does Rick Scott have the highest debt ratio?,Do both Rick Scott and Charlie Crist have debt ratios that have gone up?,Does the ratio of debt ratio between Rick Scott and Crist differ by party?
Did McCarthy implement a pay raise for members?,Is there any evidence that McCarthy raised his pay raise for members?,Does this raise circumvent the Constitution?,Is this pay raise illegal?,Is this raise illegal?,Is the pay raise illegal?,Have Members ever been paid a significant pay raise?
"Did 7,000 millionaires ""game the system to pay no income taxes""?",Did these millionaires game the system?,Did all these millionaires game the system?,Has there been any proof to support these allegations?,"Did the 7,000 millionaires game the system by paying no income taxes?",Whether or not they paid income taxes?
Did the election remain far from over in November 2020?,Was there any uncertainty about the outcome that could keep Donald Trump from winning?,Was the election still far from over in November 2020?,Could Trump still claim victory?,Would Trump have qualified to claim victory in 2020?,Did the election remain close in November 2020?,Did President Trump declare victory in 2020?
Did Gandhi take offence when he wrote praise for Modi's tenure as PM?,Did Modi's political advisors and his aides object to Modi's opiony?,Did Gandhi make disparaging remarks about Modi?,Is the sentence true?,Is the picture of Modi's address a source of offence?
Did the car crash happen in the county where the moms and children were killed?,Was the fatality rate in the nearby county in this crash listed in the media reports?,Did the crash take place in a location that has a high rate of traffic?,Has this incident been reported in the past?,Would this type of accident typically have a high fatality rate?
Is Velu Nachiyar from Sivaganga an Indian ruler?,Did Velu Nachiyar become the first Indian ruler to fight the British?,Did Velu Nachiyar previously fight for Tamil Nadu?,Did Velu Nachiyar previously fight for the British?,Did Velu Nachiyar win any battles in his fight with the British?
Did Romney create that little amount of jobs in Massachusetts under Mitt Romney?,Was the jobs created in public sector six times as high than in the private sector?,Was the job created in public sector 6 times as high as in the private sector?,Did Romney actually do this in Massachusetts during his time as governor?,Was it because of the tax cuts?
"Did Georgia have more than 700 law enforcement agencies, and fewer than 20 percent of them were state certified?","Did Georgia have more than 700 law enforcement agencies, and fewer than 20 percent of them were state certified?",Was Georgia's law enforcement industry well known among other states?,Are Georgia's law enforcement agencies recognized internationally?
Is it true that the first tear to be shed from one's right eye is a harpedy?,Is there any reason why the first tear to be shed from one's right eye would be a harpedy?,Has it ever occurred to the average person that there is nothing to be gained from the first tear shed from one's left eye?
Did Mallya deposit an amount of 35 crore into BJPs fund before fleeing to London?,Did Mallya deposit money in any other bank accounts before he fled to London?,Did Mallya deposit money in any other bank accounts before fleeing to London?,Has any report ever been made of Mallya depositing funds in other banks before fleeing to London?,Does this report contain any data to support this claim?
Did this administration's policies make a big difference against ISIS?,"Compared to the previous administration, how much has this administration spent to date against ISIS?",Was the previous administration more active against ISIS than this administration?,Did the administration's actions in fighting ISIS affect the current administration?,Did this administration conduct more of these actions than the previous administration?
Is this amount the highest ever amount of foreign direct investment by an Indian government?,Did the Modi Government of India receive the highest amount of foreign direct in 2019-20?,Did the Modi Government receive any FDI amount that exceed $ 64.37 billion?,Did this money come from abroad?,Did this amount of foreign direct inflow come from home countries?
Is this a statement from someone?,Will the $500 billion cut in Medicare support the flawed health care law?,Will this cut fund Medicare?,Does it make sense to pay for this flawed health care law?,Can we afford to fund this healthcare law?,Is this a statement from someone who is very politically connected?
Did this image portray a 17-year-old girl being beheaded by a Muslim boy?,Can this image be viewed on a smartphone or computer?,Did this image provide an accurate portrayal of the girl being beheaded?,Did this image portray any photos of Muslims in general?,Have other media reported similar images of this girl?
Is Taylor the only person to survive a Niagara Falls plunge?,Has any person other than Taylor survived a Niagara Falls plunge?,Do any people claim that Taylor was the first to ply Niagara Falls?,Is Taylor the first person to ply Niagara Falls?,Have any people jumped or made a fall at Niagara Falls?
Does the president want to freeze interest rates for five years?,Does the president want to freeze interest rates for five years?,Does the President want to freeze the rate for five years?,Is the interest rate freeze a requirement to be for five years?,Do any of the people who voted for the policy freeze already plan to do the same?
Did Shah tweet this response?,Was the response directly influenced by Shah's tweet?,"Did Shah publicly call the government ""traitors""?",Does the government demand tax on oil worth Rs 60?,Will farmers demand MSP for their hard work?,Has Shah come under fire for his comments?,Will the government consider the requests of the farmers in this regard?
Did Hazel Moder turn 16?,Did Hazel Moder turn 16?,Is Hazel Moder a replica?,Is there evidence of an internet advertisement?,Is Hazel Moder a Julia Roberts model?,Was Hazel Moder a model?,Is it possible that Hazel Moder was a Julia Roberts replica?
Are each state's gun homicide rates different?,Are any of these states' gun homicide rates higher than average?,Do any of these states' gun homicide rates reflect economic inequality?,Can any of these states' gun laws be read as being tight?,Is there data on these states' gun laws?
"Does Obama think every income tax bracket should increase on Jan 1, 2011?",Will Obama's income tax increase all brackets?,Will Obama's tax increase all brackets?,Will Obama's income tax increase all brackets?,"Did Obama vote for a tax increase on Jan 1, 2011?",Did Obama's income tax increase all brackets?
Did the Indian economy shrink from 3rd to 6th largest in 2017?,Did India's GDP fall from 3rd to 6th largest in 2017?,Is the growth slowing in the US?,Was the US economy the largest in 2017?,Will India continue to shrink in the future?,Has India's economy experienced a rebound in growth in the past 3 years?
Did these six states get N6 trillion within six months?,Did these six states get a significant amount of their GDP within six months?,Is it true that these 6 states received a significant amount of their GDP within six months?,Has N6 trillion been in the pockets of these six states?,Were these six states successful in increasing their revenues?
Did Canada make an extra $100 billion dollars from Trade with the U.S.?,Did Canada make a profit from the trade?,Was this extra income generated by the trade?,Did this extra income come from the exports?,Do these numbers reflect the actual trade volume from both Canada and the U.S.?
Did the testing that showed cases were 95% for safety reasons?,Have other tests confirmed cases 99 percent for safety reasons?,Did the testing that showed cases 99 percent for safety reasons make them unsafe to use?,Would this testing confirm most of the cases of the viral respiratory syndrome?,Have other tests showed cases 99 percent for safety purposes?
Is this new system a solution for an emergency that hasn't yet been addressed?,Does the New Technology Tracking technology monitor the phone call?,Will the New Technology Tracking technology be offered at all U.S. call centers in the future?,Will this new technology feature track your location?,Will this new technology be available in Canada?
Did Luos want Kurian to move out of Migori?,Does this claim have any validity?,Was the front page of a newspaper falsified?,Does the story have any basis in reality?,Was this claim faked?,Is this claim true?,Has Luos revoked a ruling?
"Can people get an additional $2,400 per month from the CARES Act?","Can people receive an additional $2,400 in a month from the CARES Act?",Is the CARES Act available to everyone?,Is the CARES Act available to any group?,"Is there a certain tier for people to be eligible to receive the additional $2,400 per month?"
Did Trump support separatist groups in Nigeria?,Did Nigeria donate money to Biden's campaign because of this?,Did Biden receive funding from Nigeria under this circumstance?,Was Biden's presidential campaign hampered due to this event?,Does Biden have financial resources to pay these expenses?,Was Biden's 2016 campaign made by someone who supported separatists?
Did Nintendo sue the boy for $200 million?,Was the man doing work related to gaming or had he been involved in gaming before making an analog cardboard Gameboy?,Was this the third time the boy had been sued for a cardboard Gameboy?,Were any of the other cases involving the same boy filed?
"Did Pennsylvania have 205,000 more votes than voters in the U.S. election?",Was Pennsylvania the only state to have these numbers in the 2019 election?,Was Pennsylvania one of the states in which voting occurred in the 2020 election?,Did Pennsylvania have more voter than Pennsylvania in the 2019 election?,Is there any evidence to support this claim?
Did Congress split the Dakotas into two separate states?,Did Congress divide the Dakotas into two separate states?,Did Republicans gain 4 more senators from the splitting of the Dakotas?,Did Congress split the Dakotas into two separate states by design?,Did Democrats gain 4 more senators from the splitting of the Dakotas?
Was Malcolm X murdered in 1965?,Did the NYPD and FBI conspire against Malcolm X in any way?,Did the FBI and NYPD conspire with the NYPD?,Did FBI and NYPD conspire against Malcolm X in any way?,Did any member of the NYPD or FBI attend Malcolm X's funeral?
Did the United Nations offer aid to Ecuador after it legalized abortion?,Did the United Nations make a conditional offer?,Did the United States or the Ecuador government agree to the offer?,Is there evidence that the South American country has agreed to the offer?,Did the article assert that the South American country has agreed to the offer?
Is this a photo of a Pagoda or Maha Molu?,Did the photo take place in the Himalayan mountains of Tibet?,Does the photo depict the Maha Molu flower?,Did the photo originate from Tibet?,Did the photo of the Maha Molu flower occur in any other locations?
Did Zuckerberg say Jai Shri Ram is written on Facebook more than 200 times a day?,Was this statement directly from Zuckerberg?,Has Zuckerberg stated that Jai Shri Ram has been written on Facebook more than 200 times a day?,Did Zuckerberg have access to Facebook data when he posted this statement?
Did the Police activate the amber alert?,Did the Missing girl have an ID?,Did the missing girl leave an exit?,Did the alarm activate to find the missing girl?,Did she have a bag?,Did the police ask for help in finding Ashley?,0 Do you know if Ashley's Amber Alert will be activated?
Did Gration resign due to his personal use of emails?,Was Gration forced to resign because of his personal use of emails?,Is Gration currently serving a term as U.S. Ambassador to Kenya?,Is Gration currently serving a term as U.S. Ambassador to Kenya?
Did I spend more than the 25% of the Unesco recommendation funding for education while serving as Kano governor?,Did I spend more than the 25% of the Unesco recommendation funding for education while serving as Kano governor?,Is there any evidence that I spent more than 25% of the Unesco recommendation funding for education while serving as Kano governor?
Does this include the new note with Messi's face?,Is it true that the Note has been issued since Argentina's 2022 FIFA win?,Is the denomination of the note the same as the current Note?,Is there any proof of the banknote being issued?,Is the note endorsed by Messi's family?
Did the photo include any of the world's most expensive bottles of water?,Was the water sold at an average price?,Did Ambani wear the bottle of water she was using for the photo?,Was Ambani wearing anything at the time of the photo?,Were any of the rims on the bottles of water covered in a print?
Did Schrader vote in favor of Obama's sequester?,Did Schrader spend $1.6 million on video games?,Did Schrader support video games?,Did Schrader have an opponent in this race?,Did Schrader make a similar move in a previous race?,Were those actions attributed to an event prior to the 2014 election?
Do the percentages of schools in Madhya Pradesh vary between 1 and 90%?,Are all the schools in the state due to close?,Are all the schools in the state to close?,Is any part of the Governments in Madhya Pradesh likely to shut down schools?,Will the closure of schools in Madhya Pradesh result in a loss in revenue or jobs?
Did the federal budget increase 21 percent over the past three years?,Did federal spending increase 21 percent over the past 3 years?,Did federal spending increase 21 percent over the past 3 years?,Did the government increase 21 percent over the past 3 years?,Did government increase 21 percent over the past three years?,Did the government increase 21 percent over the past 3 years?
Was the President of the United States Donald Trump?,Did the president endorse the President?,Did Cobain endorse the President of the United States during the presidency of the United States?,Did Cobain endorse a President of the United States during the term of the United States President?,Did the president of the United States vote for Trump?,Did Cobain endorse Trump following the election of the United States president?
Did Scott Walker take $1.6 billion from schools?,Did the rich receive over $2 billion from schools?,Was Scott Walker in charge of putting money towards taxes?,Did Scott Walker have authority to give tax breaks to the rich?,Did Scott Walker have a plan to do so if they won?,Did Scott Walker take any money out of schools for taxpayers?
Has there been a single court ruling that has made it clear that it is unconstitutional to ban someone between the ages of 18 and 20 from buying an AR?,Has there been any precedent that prohibits purchasing ARs between the ages of 18 and 20?,Is there any precedent that prohibits purchasing ARs between the ages of 18 and 20?,Are there any examples of similar cases?
Did Virginia save $300 million by rebidding a Metrorail construction project to exclude guaranteed union contracts?,Was this project successful in achieving this goal?,Did this project result in a lower cost than previously estimated?,Was this particular project successful in achieving this goal?,Was this project a large project?
Does the bill criminalise cartels and collusion?,Is the law effective on 1 May?,Will the punishment be up to 10 years?,Does the bill involve serious sanctions?,Is there anything more detailed regarding the bill?,Was the bill finalized in any way prior to its execution?,Did the bill have significant legal implications?
Did Yoho say this in response to the 2010 allegations that a majority of African Americans vote in one-fifths of votes.?,Did Yoho have a prior statement on this issue that is unrelated to his 2016 statement?,Did Yoho say that all African American voters vote in one-fifth of all votes?
Are there any videos showing bridge collapses in Assam?,Are any videos featuring bridge collapses in Assam available for download?,Do any videos highlighting bridge collapses in Assam require an audience to provide consent?,Can any bridge collapses in Assam be witnessed in person?,Did this bridge collapse due to floods in May 2022?
Did Elon Musk rehire Ligma and Johnson?,Did Musk regret firing Ligma and Johnson?,Did Elon Musk regret firing Johnson?,Did Musk rehire Ligma and Johnson?,Are there any other controversies surrounding this matter?,Did Elon Musk ever rehire Johnson?
"Did Modi imply he would show the poor dreams, tell lies, make them fight one another and then rule?","Does Modi claim to have told the poor dreams, tell lies, make them fight one another and then rule?","Was Modi talking about giving poor dreams, tell lies, make them fight one another and then rule?"
Did BBC News censor footage from the People's Vote March in March 2019?,Has there been any evidence of censored footage?,Was the People's Vote march censored before being released?,Was BBC Politics not responsible for censoring footage from the People's Vote march?
Would this cost be about the same amount as U.S spending in Afghanistan?,Is this the largest cost that India has ever spent on building a Library in Afghanistan?,Is this the largest cost that the U.S has ever spent on building a Library in Afghanistan?,Are there multiple cost estimates for building the library in Afghanistan?
Was Donald Trump visiting Hawaii after August 2023 wildfires?,Was Donald Trump visiting Hawaii after August 2023 wildfires?,Did Donald Trump visit Hawaii after August 2023 wildfires?,Is Donald Trump unable to support the actions of Trump against these wildfires?,. Is it true Donald Trump is not considered a threat by these wildfires?
Did this man die after claiming he had an affair with Barack Obama?,Did this man die in a car crash after claiming he had an affair with Barack Obama?,Was it common to be involved in these types of car crashes in this day and age?,Is this man's car likely to be involved in future crash cases?
Did the photo in Basel contain an outdoor restaurant area?,Was the food prepared by the people featured in the photo?,Did all of the people featured in this photo are wearing masks?,Did the subject matter of the photo in Basel concern people without masks?,Did the subject of the photo in Basel have a religious affiliation?
Did Obama create more than 500 jobs in the U.S.?,Did Obama create more than 500 jobs in the U.S. during the 2007 campaign?,Did Obama make any claims about creating jobs during this campaign?,Does any of these statements have an opinion on the state of U.S. unemployment in the United States?
Did the two people hop off of Space Mountain in the moment the ride was in motion and pretended to die?,Did the prank only involve one person?,Did the two people pretend to die as a prank?,Did the prank take place during the time when the ride was in motion?
How many American soldiers have lost their lives in Afghanistan in the last 27 months?,"Is the combined total of the nine years before more than 1,000?","Is it true that 1,000 has more than 1000 American soldiers?",Are there more American soldiers in Afghanistan than nine years before?,Is this data accurate?,Do data from other countries show the same facts?
Was there any physical book detailing the contents of Biden's abandoned laptop?,Was the book available in bookstores?,Did Biden sell any of the laptop parts in the physical book?,Did Biden sell his laptop in the physical book?,Do Biden's parents own any of Biden's laptops?
"Did the Governor create 50,000 new private sector jobs in the first year of the Governor's 2011 budget?","Did the Governor create 50,000 new jobs since the first Budget in 2010?","Was the Governor's first Budget for the state of Oregon created 50,000 new jobs since the initial presentation?",Is there any evidence that the Governor's budget was an increase in private-sector employment in the state in the first year of the administration of Governor Bill Richardson?
Does Perry have a plan to turn Fort McPherson into a film and television studio?,"Is it expected that the film and television studio will create over 8,000 new jobs in Atlanta?",Does the entire redevelopment of Fort McPherson include renovations of the city's existing buildings?,"Is the construction of the new film and television studio expected to create over 8,000 new jobs in Atlanta?"
"Have vaccines in the US killed at least 125 children and injured 50,000 children?",Did vaccines in the US kill children or injured children?,Was the vaccines effective in preventing COVID-19?,Was the vaccine effective in treating COVID-19?,Has COVID-19 contributed to the death of children?
Did the Democrats give Iran 150 billion dollars and get nothing?,Can the Democrats not give $5 billion dollars for National Security and a Wall?,Would the Democrats be able to give that amount to Iran?,Can any government use that amount to deter crime?,Were Obama's administration and his administration attempting to deter crime?
Did FBI agents use Jan. 6 to agitate?,Did the FBI agents have anything to do with the Jan. 6 uprising?,Did FBI agents play a role in the Jan. 6 uprising?,Did those involved in the Jan. 6 uprising take actions towards the police?,Did people outside of the insurrection act as political agitators?
Did federal policy allow local governments to require employees to pay for health insurance?,Does this policy change the way local governments must pay for health insurance?,Does this policy change how local governments pay for health insurance?,Does the policy require local governments to pay for health insurance?,Does this policy affect all local governments in Wisconsin?
Do Russian paratroopers land in Ukraine during an attack in February 2022?,Has a video of Russian paratroopers landing in Ukraine during an attack in February 2022 existed?,Is this video an example of a video of Russian paratroopers landing in Ukraine in February 2022?
Have 122 vicious prisoners returned to the battlefield since the Obama administration released them from Gitmo?,Do any of these prisoners have ties to Syria or terrorism?,Have 122 vicious prisoners returned to the battlefield since the Obama administration released them from Gitmo?,Does Syria have a nuclear arsenal?
"Is the Lagos state in Nigeria has 5,000 registered private schools?",Is the state the largest private school in Nigeria?,"Is it true the Lagos state has 5,000 registered private schools?",Did any state record more private schools than the state of Lagos?,Are any state private schools in Nigeria registered?,Is there a comprehensive government plan to boost private school in Lagos?
"Does this program involve training more than 15,000 young people as artisans?",Does this program use this funding to purchase water purification technologies?,Was the water purification equipment purchased by the Department of Water and Sanitation purchased by the public?,Was the funding for this project covered by the Public Finance Corporation?,Has this program resulted in any water savings in terms of water usage?
Did the CDC claim that only 6 % of deaths in the U.S. were due to COVID-19?,Is the total number of deaths attributed to the virus COVID 19?,Was there a significant increase in CDC deaths due to COVID-19?,Did the CDC determine that only 6 % of deaths in the U.S. was due to COVID-19?
Did a number of weeks in the year where flu cases decreased by 95% decrease in?,Is the decline in flu cases due to the COVID-19 virus?,Did the decline in flu cases occur in a group of weeks where COVID-19 has a high incidence?,Did the COVID-19 flu virus decrease in the week when flu cases decreased by 95%?
Did PolitiFact report that 95% of what Donald Trump said was a lie?,Was 95% of Donald Trump's rhetoric a lie?,Was 95% of Donald Trump's rhetoric a lie?,Did PolitiFact claim that 95% of Donald Trump's rhetoric was a lie?
Is this a picture of protesters?,Is there evidence that a protester defacing traffic signs?,Is this a photograph of protesters?,Is the protester shown on camera?,Is this protester wearing a T-shirt?,Is this protester wearing a suit?
Did a gay pride vote in 2005 result in discrimination?,Did discrimination happen in the area that was the target area for the gay vote?,Did the election have any effect on LGBT rights in that region?,Is the gay pride vote considered discrimination?,Does the LGBT community have any responsibility to deal with discrimination?
Did the researchers estimate 300 babies with this condition return home yearly in the US?,Did the researchers say this condition is the most common birth defect in the United States?,Was the condition diagnosed in only 300 children?,Does the diagnosis indicate how well the baby can pass?,Does the research suggest it is a better solution for the situation?
Does French children have a higher ADHD rate than American children?,Is there any data to show the difference between American and French ADHD rates?,Have ADHD rates in American children fallen significantly in recent years?,Is the ADHD rate in American children higher than that in French children?,Have France children with ADHD had lower ADHD rates than in American children?
Do people who have SARS-CoV-2 eliminate their virus through gargling?,Does gargling with warm water and salt or vinegar eliminate the virus?,Does gargling with warm water and salt or vinegar eliminate the virus?,Does gargling with warm water and salt or vinegar eliminate the virus?
Does Shelby County donated 44 schools to Memphis?,Was the city of Memphis able to get the schools from Shelby County?,Has Shelby County provided education to these communities?,. Are any of these schools in Shelby County operated?,. Have the schools in Shelby County been used to educate children?,. Is Shelby County the sole provider of these schools?
Did Biden admit this plan was being worked out?,Did Biden admit this plan has been in his plans all along?,Did Biden admit this plan was being done on purpose?,Does Biden admit this plan was being worked out all along?,Has Biden been to this state with a plan?,Does Biden support this proposal?
Has at least 87.5 percent of cases of schwangerne have been lost following the administration of coronavirus?,Is the number of such cases confined to schwangerne?,Is the majority of cases of schwangners lose their children after the administration of coronavirus?
Did the prime minister say that 33 crore bank accounts were opened in Chhattisgarh?,Have those accounts helped to increase the money supply in Chhattisgarh?,Did the Prime Minister indicate that there were 337 CR banks open in Chhattisgarh?,Did the Prime Minister say that Chhattisgarh had a record of increasing the amount of money flowing into the state?
Did this hurricane damage $10 billion of our nation's economy?,Are there more hurricanes than this one?,Are there more hurricanes than this one?,Are these people's incomes higher than this one?,Can this hurricane damage this much of our economy?,Does the hurricane damage represent 10 percent of our economy?
Is it safe to talk in an unsafe situation?,Do you have to call 999 before you have to call 55?,Do you need to wait until the emergency responders arrive for you to say anything?,Do you need to call 55 in order for you to have a voice call?,Are there other ways to make a voice call besides calling 55?
Did the Congressional Budget Office say that 7 million people will not have health insurance coverage under the Senate health care bill?,Is it true that the Congressional Budget Office said 7 million people won't have health insurance coverage under the Senate health care bill?,Would Congress take into account this fact in deciding whether 7 million people won't have insurance in the Senate health care bill?
Is this information accurate?,Will anyone be paid to stay in bed and smoke weed?,Will people be paid for staying in bed and smoking weed?,Does this information pertain to any specific person?,Did NASA pay to stay in bed and smoke weed?,Will the money be paid by NASA?,Will the money be paid for staying in bed and smoking weed?
Did New Zealanders use zinc sulphate as an inhalation treatment during the 1918 Spanish flu pandemic?,Did New Zealanders need proof of zinc sulphate inhalation treatment to use trains during the 1918 Spanish flu pandemic?,Did New Zealanders need proof of zinc sulphate inhalation treatment to use trains during the 1918 Spanish flu pandemic?
Did an arrest occurred in California?,Can we tell for sure that police are looking for a person in California?,Can we say that we were in California when there was an incident?,Can we say that the victim had some money taken from the store?,Can we say that the incident was in a city that had low crime rates in California?,Is there evidence of police trying to find anyone in the area?,Is this a true description?
Did a beggar test in Delhi for the first time?,Did a beggar test for the second time?,Did this find change the test?,Was the test a reliable one?,Did this test show a higher rate of false positives than most other tests in Delhi?,Does this test result change the outcome of test selection?
Did India have less economy growth in 2011?,Has the economy growth in India changed since 2011?,How would the economy be in 2021?,Can India still be the third largest economy?,Does India still have a large economic growth in 2021?,Is the economy still growing in 2021?,Does India still have a large economic growth in 2021?
Did the stimulus bill provide tax credits overseas?,"Was the "" half a billion"" credit sent to an electric car company?",Did the electric car company create hundreds of jobs in Finland?,Is there evidence of the tax credits going to other countries?,Can you say this bill is in effect in all countries?,Did Obama send more tax credits abroad?
Is the information claimed to be accurate?,Was the man who claimed to have fathered the children a married man?,Is it true that 14 men fathered the children?,Is the claim true?,Are any of the fathers reported in the story?,Is there evidence proving the claim is true?
Did Johnson say that Kitt was targeted by the CIA following her fight against the Vietnam War?,Did Johnson say that Kitt was targeted by the CIA after her speech at the White House about the Vietnam War?,Did Johnson say that Johnson spied on Kitt after her speech?,Did Johnson say Kitt was targeted by the CIA after her speech at the White House about the Vietnam War?
Did solar generate over 90% of the electricity in 2008?,Did solar generate 90% of the electricity in 2012?,Was solar the only source in 2008 that generated over 90%?,Would solar continue to be a source for all on-grid electricity?,Would wind be the only source for all on-grid electricity?
Did Sanders fly on a private jet in April 2016?,Was the private jet used for this trip?,Did Sanders serve a lavish meal during this trip?,Was Sanders flying on a private plane?,Has any other political candidate been to Rome?,Did Sanders fly on a private jet when this trip occurred?
Did a 1989 medical textbook list the common cold as a disease caused by coronaviruses?,Did a 1989 medical textbook list the common cold as a disease caused by coronaviruses?,. Does a 1989 medical textbook list the common cold as a disease caused by a virus?
Does Johnson say that he is going to perform an Abhishek of Shri Ram on August 5?,Will Johnson perform an Abhishek of Shri Ram on the occasion of the foundation stone laying ceremony?,Will Johnson perform a large number of Abhisheks at various places?,Do you have any reason to question whether or not Johnson's Abhishek will be successful?
Was Trump mentioned in this statement that he did not get an Emmy for his TV show in three years?,Did Trump tweet in this statement that he thought the Emmys were rigged?,Did Trump claim that he did not get an Emmy for his TV show in three years?,Is the term rigged used to describe the alleged rigging of the Emmys?,Was Trump retracted from his tweet?
Does the COVID-19 vaccine have a death rate 174 times higher than the COVID-19 death rate?,Are all COVID-19 vaccines 100% effective?,Are there any adverse events associated with the COVID-19 vaccine?,Did the COVID-19 vaccine provide a death rate that was 176 times higher than the COVID-19 death rate?
Was Daisy the dog that rescued hundreds of people from the damaged World Trade Center towers on 9/11?,Was Daisy responsible for this rescue?,Did Daisy ever rescue other people from the damaged World Trade Center towers on 9/11?,Did Daisy do this on multiple occasions?,Was this dog responsible for this rescue?,Was Daisy involved in this rescue on multiple occasions?
Is there any evidence that Trump was convicted of sexual assault at a time other than when he ran for President?,Has Trump never been prosecuted for sexual assault?,Do any legal documents exist to prove that Trump sexually assaulted any women during his presidential campaign?,Is there any evidence that the sexual assault allegations were made during Trump's presidency?,Did Trump admit or deny the sexual assault allegations in any way prior to he running for President?,Did Trump admit the sexual assault accusations in any way prior to running for President?
Was Trump's name on the ballot on multiple occasions?,Are there any other people in the list running for speaker of the House?,Was this person's name on the ballot on several occasions?,Have you heard of any of the people running for this position?,Does Trump have a record as a speaker?
Is Scott Walker a republican?,Can two tax credits that help the poor and elderly be excluded?,Can the axed tax credits be reclaimed?,Does Walker support a plan to repeal these tax credits?,Is a plan to repeal these tax credits legal?,Have Republicans voted for this proposal in favor of this policy?
"Was Wright's voice of Sebastian in the 1989 animated film ""The Little Mermaid""?",Did Wright die in 2021?,When did Wright die?,Did Wright voice Sebastian in the film?,"Did Wright die on May 24, 2021?","Did Wright's death in 2021 lead to the movie ""The Little Mermaid""?"
What percent of the tax cut would you pay if Eastman eliminated it?,"Is the tax cut $2,500 after Eastman eliminated it?",Does Eastman know what percentage of the tax cut would happen after eliminating it?,Are there any additional ways I can contact Eastman regarding tax cuts?,Were the tax cuts eliminated after Eastman eliminated them?
Was Bernie Sanders arrested for throwing eggs at protesters?,Was Bernie Sanders arrested for throwing eggs at black protesters during 1964?,Was Bernie Sanders arrested for throwing eggs at black protesters during 1964?,Was Bernie Sanders arrested for throwing eggs at black protesters during 1964?,Is there evidence that Bernie Sanders was arrested for throwing eggs at black protesters during 1964?
Did Mark Neumann vote to increase our debt as a congressman?,Did Mark Neumann vote on tax hikes as a congressman?,Did Mark Neumann vote on tax hikes as a congressman?,Did Mark Neumann vote on tax hikes in other legislatures?,Has Mark Neumann voted for any other bills?
Did Trump advocate never washing hands after using the restroom?,Did Trump advocate not washing hands after using the restroom as a power play in his 1987 book The Art of the Deal?,Was Trump's 1987 book The Art of the Deal written while he was an unemployed man?,"Did Trump advocate not washing hands after using the restroom as a power play in his 1989 book, The Art of the Deal?"
Did more households own electricity in 1994 compared to the current year?,Did more households own electricity in the year prior to the current year?,Have more households owned electricity since the date of the 2004 report?,Are more households using electricity in the year after the 2004 report?,Have more households have access to electricity in the year following the 2004 report?
Did they claim that we received the highest percentage of federal funds?,Does COVID money go to businesses?,Does Covid-19 amount to 1% of the federal budget?,Are corporations given 100% of the money after COVID?,Do companies receive the most money?,Are states that receive COVID relief paid the most by the federal government?
Did a 1956 video predict that 'A New Virus Will Rise' by 2020?,"Was the prediction made in a video, and did it actually happen?","Was this video recorded by one person, and did it exist in 1956?",Have any resemblances to this film?,Has this resemblance been established by the majority of scientists?
Could the border patrol be larger than the FBI?,Could Border Patrol agents be distributed more evenly?,Could Border patrol agents have access to every 250 feet of the FBI?,Would any of these factors affect the size of the Border Patrol?,Would the Border Patrol get larger or smaller in size with any of these proposals?,Are these changes required before this bill is taken into effect?
Is Trump facing the death penalty in his federal indictment on Jan. 6?,Does Trump face the death penalty in federal indictment on Jan. 6?,Is Trump not facing the death penalty in his federal indictment?,Do the federal indictments contain a statement that the death penalty would be available in the state?,Do the federal indictments include a statement that the death penalty would be available in the state?
Is training on what to do with your firearm less than 30 percent of the time?,Was training on how to target firearms and other weapons more than 30 percent of the time?,Was it any more than 30 percent of the time trained police could have hit the target?,Did the training recite information relating to firearms and other firearms?
Did the Indian Navy change the red St. George's Cross ensign?,Did the Indian Navy re-include the red St. George's Cross during the Congress Government?,Did the Congress Government change the Indian Navy ensign?,Did the Congress Government change the Indian Navy ensign prior to 2004?
Did Walmart reward everyone with $75 coupon to celebrate its 125th anniversary?,Has Walmart ever issued a reward to any customers?,Did anyone win the reward?,Would this discount be available to customers who bought a $75 gift card?,Did this coupon offer a cash back offer?,Did Walmart ever issue a discount in honor of its 125th anniversary?
Did these arrests not come from Kenosha?,Has the rioting industry developed?,Have the arrests in Kenosha caused economic harm?,Have the arrests in Kenosha caused economic harm?,Has rioting become an industry?,Has any city had higher levels of violence?
Did the poverty rate in 1935 range above 50%?,How is today's poverty rate defined?,Did 40% of elderly population live in poverty in 1935?,Was the poverty rate in 1935 higher than today's?,Is the poverty rate for all ages in 2013 higher than in 1935?,Did 80% of elderly population in 1935 experience poverty in America?
Is the video referring to the earthquake in Turkey?,Did a video of people rushing into the street show the earthquake?,Was the video made following the quake?,Did the earthquake have an associated hashtag?,Can people in other cities report the quake?,Can videos of the tsunami have the hashtag?
"Is using E-Verify more expensive, about $20 for each person that does not match?",Is it a fair amount of cost to use E-Verify?,Is using E-Verify more expensive than some other forms of background checks?,Is using E-Verify a good option for employers looking to make sure their workers have the necessary information?
Did a bill increase calls to the hotline 66 percent?,Has any law prevented people from committing human trafficking in Oregon?,Has any legislation stopped or prevented human trafficking in Oregon?,Does any law prevent people from committing human trafficking in Oregon?,Was any bill aimed at stopping human trafficking in Oregon?
Is it true that this video shows the Kuki community firing at security personnel?,Is the Kuki community armed with such weapons?,Are these weapons banned in Manipur?,Is this video from a specific province?,Is this video from outside of Manipur?,Does this video exist in the Philippines?
Is there an upcoming requirement for an Aadhaar card for persons older than 5?,Are there any pending expiry dates for Aadhaar cards?,Can the upcoming expiry dates be used to update existing Aadhaar cards?,Will issuance of Aadhaar cards continue for persons over 5 years?
Is this statement true?,Was this statement based on information from the 2008 presidential election?,Did the administration close any corporate tax loopholes?,Has this administration been successful in this area?,Does this statement cover other government taxes?,Has the Obama administration closed this same loophole?,"Earlier, did this administration claim that it closed all loopholes?"
Does the New York Times report factually that he traveled with a 17 year old woman?,Does the article state this is true?,Did the New York Times provide data to prove this is true?,Has the New York Times made any public statements that they could not have been true?,Has the New York Times reported this factual information for a story previously published?
Did the 86 year old woman practice yoga for a month?,Did the woman's back suffer because of her back?,Did the woman perform any type of yoga exercises during this period?,Did the 86 year old woman live to see the results of this yoga exercise?,Is the 86 year old woman's back still painful?
Was this pilot reported to have shot down 6 Russian planes?,Was this pilot celebrated for his heroic actions?,Is this man credited with these actions?,Has this man shown any photos of himself?,Does this man appear in any social media accounts?,Is this person associated with this story?,Was this person also attributed to shooting down Russian planes?
"Are there over 700,000 illegal immigrants in the state?",Are they costing us billions of dollars?,Are some illegal immigrants taking jobs from legal residents?,Are there many illegal immigrants in the state?,Do illegal immigrants in the state rob the U.S. of billions of dollars?,Are all illegal immigrants in the state contributing to the national debt?
Does Gov. Evers claim he cut taxes in this issue?,Did he attempt to increase taxes for heating homes?,Are other taxes included in this issue?,Are Republicans cutting taxes in this area?,Are other taxes included in this issue?,Do state lawmakers oppose any increase in state taxes for heating homes?
Did NASA stop exploring the ocean in 1978?,Was the completion of the space station a result of the NASA shutdown?,Did the Space Shuttle end operations after the Space station?,Was the space station completed prior to the end of the shuttle program?,Was the Saturn V rocket used in the Space Shuttle?,Did the Hubble Space Telescope still operate at the time of the Apollo 7 program?
Did Kejriwal speak to the media to describe the destruction?,Did the video show Kejriwal and the PM saying they would destroy each other if they ran for re-election in 2019?,Did the video show the PM and Home Minister on separate dates?,Is this video authentic?
Did the state have $2.4 billion of debt when Obama took office in 2002?,Did Republicans leave it out of state responsibility?,Did Obama have to raise taxes to pay for the debts?,Did Obama have to pay for the state debt before he took office?,Is the state debt after taking office higher than the $2.4 billion it was before taking office?
Does Bloomberg want to ban guns holding more than three rounds?,Does Bloomberg want to ban guns holding more than three rounds?,Did Bloomberg know Trump would ban guns holding more than three rounds?,Did Bloomberg know Trump would ban guns holding more than three rounds?,Did Bloomberg know Trump would ban guns holding more than three rounds?
Did vaccines cause 26.6 million injuries and 1.36 million disabilities?,Did COVID-19 vaccines cause the economy billions of dollars?,Did COVID vaccines cause injuries for the economy?,Did COVID vaccines cause all injuries?,Did COVID vaccines cause all disabilities?,Did COVID vaccines cause all injuries?
Is the amount of houses built by the UPA in its last four years a difference of 1 crore houses?,Is the amount of houses constructed by the BJP in its last four years a difference of 1 crore houses?,Is the difference in house building for each government in the country calculated?
Is Willa forecast to directly affect migrant caravans?,Is a potential storm likely in this area?,Are there any major migrators along this path?,Will Willa change the path of these migrant caravans?
Has the total government spending increased since Obama was in office?,Does the government spend 55% of the US population’s money on mandates?,Does the government spend 55% of the US population’s money on mandatory spending?,Does the govt spend 55% of the US population’s money on mandatory spending?,Does the govt spend all of the US population’s money on mandate spending?
Did this Linga originate?,Was this Linga discovered in Uttar Pradesh?,Did this Linga originally come from India?,Did this Linga originate in India?,Is this Linga of any significance?,Are these Lingas rare?,Did this Linga start in India?
Did all three prime ministers start the Polio Vaccination in 1995?,"Did Nehru, Indira and Gandhi begin Polio Vaccination in 1995?",Was Polio Vaccination introduced during any of these three prime ministers?,"Did Nehru, Indira and Gandhi start the Polio Vaccination after completing their respective terms in office?",Was Polio Vaccination introduced during any of these three prime ministers' tenures?
Did researchers provide a warning to people about the spread of donovanosis in August 2018?,Is this STD spread widely?,"Did people have to take this test to diagnose this ""Flesh eating STD""?",Is this STD spread highly prevalent?,Is it spread in the United States?
Are there any arrests for marijuana?,Are there any arrests for putting marijuana in a censer?,Are there any other events connected to the arrests?,Are there any arrests for putting marijuana in a censer?,Is the age of the altar boys in question?
Did the woman injured in the 2017 London bombing receive arrests at a vigil?,Did the woman injured in the London bombing receive arrests in 2021?,Is there any evidence that the woman in the pictured is arrested in 2021?,Do the details of this alleged arrest have any connection to the 2017 bombing?,Is the alleged arrest of the woman in the pictured part of the 2017 London bombing in questionable?
Did carpooling decrease between 1980 and today?,Did SUVs increase the proportion of vehicles sold in this country?,Are SUVs now more popular than carpooling in this country?,Is carpooling declining in this country?,Is there a correlation between carpooling and global warming?,Do SUVs increase in the US?
Was a federal omnibus spending bill in December 2020 included COVID-19 relief?,Was the omnibus spending bill required to start a 180 day countdown to a UFO report?,Was any UFO disclosure report deemed to be classified?,Does a UFO disclosure report currently awaiting certification by a government authority?
Are the company Facebook and Google establishing a brewery or factory in Nigeria?,Have there been any brewery closures in Nigeria?,Has there been an Anheuser-Busch InBev brewery closure in Nigeria?,Have there been any Kellogg's brewery closures in Nigeria?,Have these companies opened in Nigeria?
Do these Emergency Alerts give government access to user data?,Will this information be used to determine where a user is?,Will this information be used by the government to collect personal data about each user?,Are there specific elements of this application that might be useful in informing the government of events affecting user data?
Does over 10% of the U.S. military budget go to fighting international terrorism?,Did the Pentagon spend less than 10% of its overall budget on fighting international terrorism in 2017?,Does the United States have a higher military budget than the average in the world?,"Would the U.S. military not be ready for more national terrorism in 2017, and would it continue to use much of its military budget to fight international terrorism?"
Did the victims die in Yangon?,Did the pictures depict any victims who were burnt and killed?,Did the victims have the exact date of death in question?,Does this picture show any victims who died in the incident?,Does this picture show any victims who were not burned and killed in Yangon?,Does this picture show a picture of victims who were dying in the incident?
Would $65 billion be added to the deficit if we kept the cuts for people on the highest incomes?,"Were the cuts meant to lower incomes, would they impede economic growth?",Did these measures contribute to a higher deficit than limiting the cuts for people on the highest incomes?,Would $65 billion of additional deficit be added to the deficit if we cut programs for middle income income groups?
Do they predict future climate in terms of any individual?,Do they predict future climate in terms of the entire country?,Do they have any projections about this in the future?,Is this prediction based on data?,Are these predictions based on data from other sources?,Has climate change been identified as a cause of a major disruption in the environment?
Does the video of ballot-stuffing predate the 2023 presidential elections in Nigeria?,Did the video of ballot-stuffing take place before or after the 2023 presidential elections in Nigeria?,Was the video of ballot-stuffing after or before the 2023 presidential elections in Nigeria?
Did U.S. Steel call the speaker in regards to these improvements?,Did U.S. Steel have the option of replacing or extending existing facilities?,Did U.S. Steel have any option of replacing these facilities or expanding new facilities?,Was there any talk that U.S. Steel was about moving on with expanding existing facilities?
Did the mobile city have 1 million households that generated 80% of crime?,Did the urban population generate 80% of crime?,Did the urban population generate 80% of the crime in Mobile?,Do the metro urban households create 80% of the crime in Mobile?,Can a city have a lower urban population than another city if it has an increase in rural households?
Did a video of the killer taken down on 29 October 2020?,Did a police robbery happen at the Basilica church on 29 October 2020?,Did police arrest the attacker?,Did the police arrest the attacker?,Did the killer have a criminal record?,Is there a video that shows the police removing the attacker?
Does Gowdy have any information regarding the murders?,Did Gowdy have any knowledge of this killings?,Is Gowdy still working with these suspects?,Are all his investigators alive?,Are Gowdy's investigators currently alive?,Would Gowdy be in a position to provide information regarding these cases?
Will someone who completes the survey get a Michael Kors handbag for only $7.95?,Will the handbag be free?,Has this been done in the past?,Is there a minimum purchase necessary to receive this offer?,Is the handbag free?,Is the handbag expected to be in stock?,Is this free of charge for Michael Kors products?
Did the number of new business registrations in West Virginia grow nearly 11 percent in 2017?,Did 2016 see a 12 percent increase in new business registrations in West Virginia?,Has West Virginia had a 12 percent increase in new business registrations in 2017?,Have new business registrations in 2017 increased by more than 11 percent?
Was this amount a figure announced?,Was this a large escalation of this amount?,Has this amount been in negotiations?,Will this amount remain in negotiations?,Does this amount change over time?,Would this be another escalation in this amount?,Will this amount remain in negotiations?,Does this amount have a specific length?,Does this amount seem reasonable under the circumstances?,Did GE negotiate this?
Will I get my stimulus check?,Has the Census form been changed to accept tax payments from a foreign country?,Did the Census form need to be submitted after 2011?,Are there changes to the Census form available for 2019?,Is the Census form required to receive a stimulus check?,Have any alleged changes in the Census form made to the form?
Was Melania Trump hosting a white military moms event at the White House?,Did Melania Trump host military moms at an event in 2019?,Was Melania Trump hosting a White House event in 2019?,Did Melania Trump host a White House event in 2019?,Did Melania Trump host a White House event in 2019?
Is this a video of Trump getting booed at CPAC 2023?,Did Trump get booed on his way into this meeting?,Was this Trump event being held in a large plaza?,"Did this event host an event called ""Breaking News""?",Is Trump being booed at this event?
Did Prince Harry wear a Nazi costume?,Was this a fake costume?,Did Prince Harry wear a fake Nazi costume before?,Was Prince Harry born in 1945?,Were any of the images captured during this event?,Has the footage been released?,Did Prince Harry attend any of the parties described in this image?
Is Article 370 and 35 A to be restored in Kashmir?,Will the restoration of article 370 and 35 A require a law to be passed?,Will the restoration of article 370 and 35A be enforceable by the Indian courts?,Will the restoration of article 370 and 35A be enforceable by the Indian courts?
"Does the Environmental Protection Agency regulation that goes into effect on Jan. 1, 2012 cover dust?",Is the regulation in effect on the date in question?,Is this regulation regulated by other agencies besides the Environmental Protection Agency?,Is there other EPA regulations in effect?,Is the regulation based on a different category than dust?
Did Metropolitan do a study in 1998 regarding the life expectancy of correctional officers?,Did Metropolitan find life expectancy decreased in prisoners?,Have correctional officers been found to be significantly less likely to die in prison than other types of workers?,Will correctional officers still be in prison by 2020?,Is it safe for correctional officers to commit suicide?
Did Saudi Arabia ship 80MT of liquid oxygen to India due to the efforts of Congress leader Rahul Gandhi?,Did Saudi Arabia ship liquid oxygen to India due to the efforts of Congress leader Rahul Gandhi?,Has Saudi Arabia ever shipped liquid oxygen to India before?,Have Saudi Arabia and India ever signed bilateral agreements with respect to shipments of liquid oxygen?
Have you already had a sandwich that you wanted to make if you were in Wisconsin?,Is it true that the state of Wisconsin thinks you should wash your hands at least 28 times to make one peanut butter-and-jelly sandwich?,Did the state make this decision?,Do you think that you should wash your hands at least 28 times to make one peanut butter-and-jelly sandwich?
Has there been a 90% decrease in illegal immigration since Biden took office?,Did Biden have this effect on illegal immigration?,Was the rate of illegal immigration increased by Biden?,Are there any other negative effects in regards to illegal immigration?,Have there been any negative effects on illegal immigration?,Are there any other positive effects related to illegal immigration?
Was a garbage van carrying a Corona patient?,Did the garbage van have a person in it?,Was this person convicted of murder?,Was this person in the country of origin associated with this crime?,Were all of the victims of this crime criminally convicted?,Are there any records of this crime?
Are these ad clips from this ad available in the public domain?,Did this ad have an audio file from this ad?,Was the ad public domain?,Is this ad part of a broader effort?,Was this ad endorsed by the protesters?
Does any one of the top five holders of the NEET belong to any minority community in India?,Has any member of the minority community ever held a position in the NEET top five?,Can anyone who is a minority in India hold a top five NEET position?,Are any of the top five holders of the NEET a minority community?
How much has the national treasury funded these six counties over the last six years?,Have the counties received over 190 billion from the national treasury?,Are these counties all residents of the same household?,Has this county had any income that has come from taxation?,Has this county had any income from taxes or other sources?
Is the estimated $150 billion allocated to Iran repaid?,Are Walls possible with the $150 billion?,Are there any examples of Walls from Iran that can be built?,Would the $150 billion in Iran funds allow for the building of 30 walls?,Would these walls be cost effective?,Does Trump think Walls are cost effective?
Is this a promotional link from Verizon or Vodafone?,Will you need to sign up or pay for this data?,Will I receive any other charges related to this deal?,Will this offer have any expiration date?,Is there a limit to the amount of data you can use during this offer?
Did Modi authorize the release of Rs. 1000 every month to women above 18 in Punjab?,Did the Prime Minister directly endorse the project?,Has Modi supported the program?,Did the AAP backtrack on the pledge?,Is the money being provided by the AAP for women in Punjab sacrosanct?
Did cost-saving measures at Columbia/HCA reduce national health care inflation from 18% to 8% in seven years?,Did the health care inflation reduction in seven years happen through a single initiative at Columbia/HCA?,Did the cost-saving measures at Columbia/HCA reduce any other health care inflation in the seven years under question?
"Did Governor Pat McCrory take $500,000 out of the disaster relief fund?",Did President Trump and President Obama re-apply for the funds following the disasters?,Are any other individuals involved with the fund that made the same donation?,Is it true that McCrory took money out of the disaster relief fund for House Bill 2?
Did Biden reduce US oil prices?,Did Biden increase US oil prices?,Does Biden think Russia is better off paying US for oil than they are from the United States?,Does Biden say Russia makes more money from US oil than it does from Russia?,Did Biden make an announcement that they were lowering their oil prices based on Biden's statements?
Are there more pipelines to circle Earth than there are currently pipelines?,Was the gas pipeline construction a complete collapse?,Did the pipelines allow for the growth of energy capacity in the region?,Do these new pipelines increase the availability of natural gas?,Has this growth helped to address climate change?,Is oil and gas pipeline construction currently a problem in the United States?
Did this person have the means to afford $300 in cash when he voted for Clinton?,Does this person work in a halfway house?,Did this person pay for the $300 in cash he was promised?,Did this person pay for the $300 in cash they were promised?,Does this person have political views?
"Does a state tuition that costs $2,100 go to PERS?","Does tuition that costs $ 1,100 go to PERS?","Does tuition that costs $ 1,100 go to PERS?",Are tuition costs for tuition that are not used for PERS paid by an individual student?,"Are tuition costs for tuition that are used by multiple individuals at one university greater than or equal to $2,100?"
Did this week's report actually see a decrease in tourism spending compared to last year?,Did this week's report actually show a decrease in tourism spending compared to last year?,Did this week's report actually show a decrease in tourism spending compared to last year?,Did Wisconsin actually see a drop in tourism spending compared to last year?
Are there any laws in the eight states prohibiting the right of atheists to hold office?,Are the laws in these eight states restrictive?,Do any of these states have a state law to protect atheists from holding office?,Are there any laws in these eight states prohibiting atheists from holding office?
Does this video show 240 boats with lamps sailing in the river to mark Diwali?,Is the video shot in India?,Have these boats been on this river for hundreds of years?,Does this video show all boats with lamps sailing in the river to mark Diwali?,Is the boat set up for this celebration?
Are 80% of the oil discovered there?,Is oil located in other locations?,Has oil been discovered in other areas?,Has oil been discovered in other areas?,Is there evidence in this article that this is true?,Is there evidence that this is true?,Is there data to support this conclusion?
Does 60 million Americans live in a country where the water they drink is unsafe?,Does the country where the water they drink has a higher rate of water contamination than the country where the water is safe?,Are there any other sources of water contamination than people drinking tap water?,Are any places that receive the most water contamination characterized by high water contamination rates?
Did Watch Night church services begin in 1862?,Was the Emancipation Proclamation passed in the US before the U.S. Watch Night Church services?,Was the Watch Night Church Services held on a Monday for one day before 1863?,Would blacks have been waiting for the Emancipation Proclamation for a year in the late 1820s?,Would 1862's Watch Night be watched a year before 1863's Emancipation Proclamation?
Did Yogi Adityanath take office as UP CM in 2017?,Did Yogi Adityanath do anything prior to this incident?,Was there any other instances prior to this incident?,Did there a similar incident after this one?,Did Yogi Adityanath make any additional comments after this one?
Did the study analyze SARS-CoV-2 antibodies in 2019 blood bank donations?,Did the study have the authors' consent?,Does this study confirm that SARS-CoV-2 may have been present in the U.S. before scientists realized it?,Did this study uncover any additional information in support of their conclusions?
"Did Wuhan, China face another wave of COVID-19 cases in 2018?",Did a video involving the corpses of three children be recorded?,"Was Wuhan, China facing a second wave of COVID-19 cases?",Are these children the main victims of the COVID-19 virus?
"Did Obama tell the ad that he wanted to take 250,000 people from Syria?",Did Obama say that he wanted to bring people from Syria to the US?,Was Obama's stated intent to take people from Syria a general statement or specific statement?,"Did Obama mention that he wanted to take in 50,000 people from Syria in general?"
Is there an opportunity to receive a $150 coupon by liking and sharing a post on Facebook?,Will Dollar General be one of the shops on this deal?,"Do people have to ""Like"" and share the post in order to receive this offer?",Do the people that get this deal usually purchase items on this site?
Do Target donations money to school children for LGBT events?,"Will Target donate $100,000 to school children for LGBT events?",Will Target donate 100k to LGBT groups in the future?,Do gay people like the LGBT program?,Will Target donate more to the LGBT community for LGBT events?,Has Target endorsed the LGBT project in the past?
Will the bill Cut MO income tax for 1st time in over 100 years start it's 1st phase in Jan 1 2018?,Will the bill cut MO income tax for 1st time in over 100 years?,Has the bill started phasing in since jan 1 2018?,Has the bill begun phasing in since jan 1 2018?
Is 57 percent of registered Democrats in the new district from my old district?,Can all of this be verified?,Is this estimate based on a 2016 data collection?,Was this information provided voluntarily by the referring source?,Did any other data collection sources verify the assertions?,Will this data collection confirm these data?
Has KMC collect more money per day than all other outlets combined?,Has the KMC reported any increase in the number of transactions in the outlets during a calendar month?,Has KMC reported the same revenue collection for all the outlets?,Has the number of transactions increased in the outlets since July 2013?,Does this estimate reflect any increase in the type of transactions conducted in the outlets?
Will the debt load double in this district with these bonds?,Will the debt load double due to the new bonds?,Was this district in the midst of a debt crisis before the new school district bonds were proposed?,Does this bond need to be refunded?,Would this increase in the debt load be beneficial in the long run if this bond is approved?
Do jet flights give 2 free tickets for their 25th anniversary?,Are there other airlines that offer 2 free tickets?,Are there other companies offering 2 free tickets for their 25th anniversary?,Is there anything else about Jet Airways to help celebrate their 25th anniversary?,Can we assume Jet Airways is also trying to boost its profit in the meantime?
Did the banner ask people to not offer namaz on the road?,Did the banner tell people not to pray on the road?,Does the police arrest people who pray on the road?,Did the banner mention the reason for the arrest?,Was the mosque concerned about those who pray on the road?,Is the mosque in Meerut connected to the police?
Did Rubio flip on the vote?,"Did Rubio make a quick $200,000 selling house to the mother of the bill's lobbyist?",Was Rubio's vote on the bill after flipping on the vote?,Did Rubio flip on the vote after selling house to mother of the bill's lobbyist?
Does Sanders win California landslide?,Are 23 of his votes not counted?,Was Sanders voting against Hillary Clinton?,Are there multiple numbers of %s that were not counted in the California race?,Did Sanders win California landslide?,Did Sanders gain %s of %s of his votes from California voters?,Are these numbers correct?
Does the MMR vaccine kill more people?,Did the MMR vaccine kill 445 infants in 1 year?,Does the MMR vaccine kill more infants?,Are MMR vaccines deadly?,Do MMR vaccines kill more infants?,Are the MMR vaccines deadly?
Was the Times Magazine article accurate in describing the alleged conspiracy?,Is the conspiration alleged in the Times Magazine article alleged?,Is the conspiracy alleged in the Times Magazine article unfounded?,Is there evidence of the conspiracy in the Times Magazine article?,Is the article alleged in the Times Magazine article true?
"Did the cover of the 2012 issue of Newsweek Magazine include text that said, ""THE FIRST GAY PRESIDENT""?",Was the text accurate and did Obama have the same political views on this issue?,Was there a similar issue in the previous year?,Did the cover accurately depict Obama's political views?
Has this budget passed in the Texas House?,Has this budget passed in the Texas Senate?,Has there been a change to this budget?,Would the state's budget be able to handle this increase?,"Would 43,000 nursing home residents lose their right to stay in nursing homes?",Has any medical care been discontinued in this budget?
Did the artist make his sculpture prior to the 15th century?,Did the artist make his work prior to the 15th century?,Did the artist of the image expose his body?,Did the work of art attributed to the artist date back to the 15th century?,Was the original artwork original or fake?,Did the work of art in question have a date or time specific to it?
Did the tax burden of the state increase in 2009?,Did this increase in tax burden increase in 2009?,Did this increase increase in tax burden occur after an increase in the tax burden?,Was this increase in tax burden due to a change in the tax burden?,Would a tax burden increase in 2009 mean that the population is in greater numbers in New York?
Did Mohamed Atta participate in any 9/11 terrorist attacks?,Has Atta been released from prison by Israel?,Is Atta a terrorist convicted of participating in 9/11 terrorist attacks?,Is the American government responsible for Atta’s release?,Is Atta considered a terrorist convicted in 9/11 terrorist attacks?
Is there any evidence that Allen voted for the No Child Left Behind Act?,Did Allen vote to add $3 trillion to the federal debt?,Did Allen vote to raise the debt ceiling four times?,Did Allen vote for the No Child Left Behind Act while he was a senator?,Is there any evidence that Allen voted for the No Child Left Behind Act while he was a senator?
Is the number of revenue from internally generated revenue from 1999 to 2013 reported in the report?,Has the revenue from internally generated revenue from 1999 to 2013 increased by any significant amount?,Is the amount generated from internally generated revenue from 1999 to 2013 reported in the report?,Is the revenue from internally generated revenue from 1999 to 2013 reported in the report?
Was this woman charged after she ate her husband alive over three years?,Did this woman have a history of suicide?,Will this woman be held responsible if she dies?,Will this woman be held responsible for this death?,Is this woman known to have committed this kind of suicide?,Can you comment on this ad?
Did rubbish from the festival ever go back into the river?,Was the debris in the river clean?,Did the reeds get caught in the river and/or wash into the river?,Did the garbage in the river reeds wash into the river?,Did the reeds have any toxicity or contamination?
"Is there any evidence that more than 58,000 kids were abducted by non-relatives in one year?",Is this report reliable?,Are there any other reliable sources of this information?,Are these statistics from FBI studies published?,Have there any other studies in this area that have reported a higher percentage of kids being abducted?
Has Trump raised funds for children dying of cancer at St. Jude before the age of 30?,Has Trump raised funds for children dying of cancer before the age of 30?,Has Trump ever funded St. Jude before the age of 30?,Does Trump ever fund St. Jude before the age of 30?,Is Trump a Republican or was Trump a Hillary Clinton aide?
Did the economy fall short of capacity?,"Could a family lose $12,000 from the economy?",Can the economy fall short of capacity in more than one year?,Were the government attempts to keep the economy at capacity. Can the government save the economy?,Did the government reduce the economy?,Does this decrease affect the federal workforce?
Did the IRS audit Nancy Pelosi?,Did Gabbard venmo Pelosi?,Did Gabbard force the IRS to audit Pelosi?,Did Gabbard venmo Pelosi?,Has this occurred in the past?,Was this action initiated by the federal government?,Has this taken place prior to the federal government's official review?
Did voting machines that were hacked in a viral 2018 video end up being no longer widely used?,Are voting machines that are hacked in a viral 2018 video no longer widely used?,Are there any other questions that need to be answered to determine if voting machines that are hacked in a viral 2018 video are no longer widely used?
Does McCain plan to cut tax if the average Fortune 500 CEO?,Do most Fortune 500 CEOs receive tax cuts?,"Would the average tax cut amount to $700,000?",Will McCain's tax cuts be able to cover a large percentage of CEO's salary?,Are there limits on the amount of tax cuts that are eligible for CEO's?
Did this photo originate from 2023?,Did this photograph exist at the time this post was posted?,Are the photos from 2023 from this time period available in any form?,Does this photo in question include a large number of people in the photograph?,Did this photograph contain a massive crowd?,Is the image in question genuine?
Do the matches take 10 minutes?,Do these matches have a different time period?,Does this match time change all the time?,Did FIFA have to extend this match time by 10 minutes?,Does this match time change all the time?,Would extending this match time cause the match to be cancelled?,Does FIFA have a plan to extend this match time by another 10 minutes?
Did the 1980 obesity rates exist at an average of 28%?,Are current obesity rates high enough to warrant a reversal?,Would this change save Medicare trillions of dollars?,Do current obesity rates actually contribute to higher healthcare costs?,Would this change in the Medicare budget help fund new treatments for obese people?
Is that the budget that she balanced without raising taxes?,Did she balance that budget without raising taxes?,Was that budget included in her budget plan?,Did she balance that budget with new policy amendments?,Have any other politicians addressed the fact that she balanced a budget budget without raising taxes?,Would someone in Congress want to raise taxes to pay for this bill if it does happen?
Did Clinton supported nuclear agreement in India in 2006?,Did Clinton vote against nuclear deal in 2008?,Did Clinton vote against Indian nuclear deal in 2008?,Do the amendments voted for by Clinton in 2006 have been voted out of office in 2008?,Have Clinton's 2008 amendments passed?,Are Clinton's nuclear deal amendments passed or not?
Did Stanley Johnson write 'The Virus'?,Did Boris Johnson write this novel?,Was 'The Virus' published after 1982?,Has the plot of this novel been adapted into any other films?,Is the plot of this novel also similar to 'The Virus'?,Is the novel published in 1982?
"Did the California state auditor ""found"" that John Chiang lost track of $31 billion?",Did Chiang lose track of $31 billion while in office?,Was Chiang an effective state controller?,Are there other significant losses related to Chiang?,Would Chiang have been prosecuted for these losses if he had been in office?
Has each of the president's promises been fulfilled?,Are any of the president's pledges fully accomplished?,Are any of the president's pledges fully completed?,Is there one remaining promise in the president's plan?,Are any of the president's remaining promises fully accomplished?,Are any of the remaining presidential promises fully completed?
Did the news 24 channel apologize to Akhilesh Yadav for allegedly reporting Piyush Jain as a member of the Samajwadi Party?,Did a report by the news 24 elicit an apology from Akhilesh Yadav?,Has News 24 apologized for reporting Piyush Jain as a member of the Samajwadi Party?
Did there increase in nurses working in the NHS over the past 20 years?,Do there have any additional nurses working in the NHS since 2010?,Does there have an increasing number of nurses working in the NHS?,Do the jobs of nurses in the NHS have any longer durations?,Does this increase in nurses have an immediate effect on patients?,Do most of these nurses work in the NHS for a very short duration?,Are more nurses working in the NHS today than in 2010?
Is there footage of people dancing to a Hindi song in London during the 2019 Cricket World Cup?,Is the song that people are dancing to in the video related to the cricket team?,Are there other videos showing people dancing to a Hindi song in London during the 2019 Cricket World Cup?,Are the images from the video related to the Cricket World Cup?
Were 570 children placed in foster care in Los Angeles in 2013?,Did 570 children are placed in foster care in 2013?,Were 570 children taken from their parents and placed into foster care in 2013?,Have 570 children been killed by other states?,Are there other statistics about the number of children in foster care in 2013?
Did Sicknick die after being struck with a fire extinguisher?,Did Sicknick die after an incident that was described by Sicknick's friends?,Was Sicknick struck with a fire extinguisher while on duty in the Capitol?,Did Sicknick suffer serious injuries as a result of his death?
Did a video game controller used to operate Ocean Gate Expeditions' missing submersible use for exploring the wreckage of the RMS Titanic in June 2023?,Did Ocean Gate Expeditions' missing submersible use a video game controller?,Did Ocean Gate Expeditions' missing submersible use a video game controller to operate it?
Is this a statement she made before a public event?,Is White a person that prayed for birth control?,Did White give birth to children during these pregnancies?,Was White alive at the time of her prayers?,Did White receive a blessing during her prayer?,Is White related to any specific religion?
Was the photo taken in India?,Was the shooting part of a larger overall plan to control crime?,Was the person a Hindu police officer?,Did the person participate in the shooting?,Are there any other interesting aspects about this story?,Was this person's political ideology unclear in this story?,Are these details similar to those from other stories?
Is COVID-19 a worse virus than the flu in the states that agricult has more cases of it?,Has COVID-19 killed as many people in North Carolina as flu has in the states that agricult has more cases of it?,Does the flu outnumber COVID-19 in North Carolina?,Is COVID-19 a virulent virus in North Carolina?,Does the COVID virus have the potential to cause global pandemics?
"Did Biden fail to acknowledge or commemorate June 6, 2021?",Did Biden acknowledge the 77th anniversary of the D-Day landings?,Did Biden honor the 77th anniversary of the D-Day landings?,Did Biden acknowledge the 77th anniversary of the D-Day landings after he became president?
Are all the metals used in making the bell used in the bell being sent to Ayodhya?,Are the bells in Ayodhya made from metal in general?,Has the bells in Ayodhya been made for other people other than devotees?
Did Archibong skip meetings or be late for them?,Is Archibong the only one to be convicted of a crime?,Was Archibong convicted of a crime?,Did Archibong receive a pay raise for her actions?,Are there any other charges related to the disciplinary process?
Does the President's 2020 budget represent $3 trillion in savings over the course of the 10 years?,Does this budget represent the second largest proposed reduction in spending ever?,Is this budget the second largest proposed reduction in spending ever?,Does this budget represent the second largest proposed reduction in spending ever?,Has the 2016 budget produced any major budget cuts?
Did these Cannibals die after eating a Chinese engineer?,Did the Cannibals die from coronary artery disease?,Was the COVID infection the result of consuming a Chinese engineer?,Was the COVID infection the cause of death for these Cannibals?,Did anyone else die in this incident?
Did Runyan's plan increase Medicare costs?,Did Runyan's plan reduce Medicare costs?,Is there no plan to raise Medicare costs?,Is there evidence that Runyan's plan will reduce Medicare costs?,Is there any evidence that Runyan's plan would increase Medicare costs?
Is there evidence that Chris Rock was wearing a protective cheek pad before Will Smith slapped his face at the 2022 Oscars show?,Did Chris Rock attend the Oscars during the alleged incident at which Will Smith slapped his face?,Was there any photographic evidence of Rock wearing a protective cheek pad?
Did the government consume 27% of the economy under Kennedy?,Is the percentage today 37 %?,Does Kennedy’s administration continue to consume most of the economy?,Are these percentages at this level today?,Is this figure likely accurate?,- What percentage of the economy does the government consume today?,- What percentage of the economy does the government consume today?
Did state lawmakers file voucher proposals after the 1995 legislature?,Is it true all of the voucher proposals have failed to become law?,Has Texas legislature filed more than one voucher proposal since 1995?,Is there a reason for the lack of voucher proposals since 1995?,Did the voucher proposals for Texas legislators fail to become law?
Do the onion or onion and garlic combination cure colds and coughs?,Do onion and garlic mix cure colds and coughs?,Is it effective for colds and coughs?,Does onion and garlic mix cure colds and coughs?,Is it effective for colds and coughs?,Is onion and garlic mixed cure colds and coughs?
"Can black pepper powder, honey, and ginger juice suppress the effects of coronavirus?","Are there any other components of black pepper powder, honey, and ginger juice that would suppress the effects of coronavirus?","Are there any contraindications to taking black pepper powder, honey, and ginger juice?"
Was the cheque worth 98 crores?,Was it a cash donation to the Congress party?,Did the cheque originate from a bank?,Did the cheque belong to the Modi family?,Did Modi issue a cash donation to the party before fleeing the country?,Did the Modi family receive any cash donations after fleeing the country?
"Was the rally in Dearborn, Michigan a pro-ISIS rally?",Was the rally related to ISIS?,Did the rally happen on Christmas Eve?,"Did the rally take place on the same night as the ""infiltrating""?",Did the rally have enough participants to raise funds to support ISIS?
Is it true that an article in 2015 reported that comedian Michelle Wolf had been arrested for bestiality?,Has the article been released?,Was Wolf arrested for bestiality?,Is the article dated on the same date as the article?,Did Wolf go to jail after being arrested for bestiality?
Has there been any long term study examining the effects of gf/gbs care on children?,Does the fbi recommend these kind of treatment for children?,Is this statement based on research?,Is fbi suggesting or promoting this type of care for children?
"Has the Petroleum Industry Act, 2021 resolving an almost two-decade stalling on the management of our petroleum resources resulted in the enactment?","Has the Petroleum Industry Act, 2021 been effective?","Has the Petroleum Industry Act, 2021 provided equitable consideration to host communities?"
Did this Milkman father more than 800 children with his clients' wives?,Was this Milkman found guilty of any crime?,Is this milkman known for these crimes?,Is the milkman responsible for these crimes?,Were these crimes for which this Milkman was found guilty?,Was this milkman's innocence proven by DNA evidence?
Did Measure 82 and 83 authorize one casino?,Did both Measures authorize casinos?,Did Measure 83 authorize one casino?,Was there an amendment in Measure 82 that would authorize a casino in this state?,Is the amendment still valid?,"Currently, the state does not have any casinos. Is the amendment still valid?"
Did Obama say in 2004 that there was no difference between Obama and Bush on war?,Did Obama even say that there was no difference between Obama and Bush on war?,Did Obama call for Obama to make a war effort in 2004?,Did Obama specifically cite that Obama was a great opponent of war?,Was Obama a good opponent of war in 2004?
Did Biden participate in the push-ups?,Did Biden run a mile in 5 minutes?,Did Biden receive a medal?,Did Biden receive any other awards in this exercise?,"Did Biden wear a T-shirt that read ""Walk the Mile""?",Did Biden compete in the 5 mile run?
Can the spouse of a veteran without a bachelor’s degree obtain a Florida teaching certificate?,Can the spouse of a vet without a bachelor’s degree observe classrooms for 12 hours?,Is the minimum time required for obtaining a teaching certificate in Florida the same as in most other states?
Have hundreds of tax preferences and loopholes been added to the tax code since 1986?,Have those loopholes and preferences benefited many businesses or individuals?,Do all of the tax loopholes and preferences involve many businesses or individuals?,Has the increase in tax preferences and loopholes come from increased government spending or other tax incentives?
Did this woman have any other children to feed?,Was this woman in UP a farmer?,Did this woman have children of her own?,Were there any children of this woman?,Was the woman in UP pregnant with children?,Would having children have exacerbated her situation?,Did this woman have any other children?,Did this woman have any children at that time?
Do Georgia educators spend in the top 10 nationally on education?,Does Georgia spend in the top 10 nationwide on education?,Does Georgia spend in the top 10 nationally on education?,Does Georgia education 'hover in the bottom 5 '?,Does Georgia education spend in the top 10 nationally on education?
Is it true that the home minister of Madhya Pradesh has rebelled with his comrades?,Are those who rebelled with their comrades affiliated with other political parties?,Did this news story come from a video released by ABP News?,Does this news story contain any information about the comrades who reacted to the rebels?
Is that debt now more than KSh1.5 trillion?,Does that debt have a long tail?,Was there a debt crisis before Judicial took office?,Is this debt going up?,Have there been increases in debt since Judicial took office?,Is this debt a problem currently?
Is this video related to a UPS driver and a basketball?,Are all Tik Tok videos referenced in this video?,Is the UPS driver the only person doing this stunt in the Tik Tok video?,Was this video posted on ESPN?,Is this type of stunt only witnessed by professional WNBA players?
Is the photograph of Los Angeles traffic congestion taken in November 2017?,Is this photograph taken before and after Hurricane Ida?,Is this photograph taken outside of Louisiana in November of 2017?,Is this photograph taken on a public road?,Is this photograph taken between October 1 and December of 2017?,Is this photograph taken in between January and February of 2017?
Is this article from the same publication as Jones' statements?,Is this claim true?,Is this statement from this source true?,Is this statement true?,Did Alex Jones make this statement prior to Trump's election?,Is this statement true?,Is this statement true?,Did this claim come from this source?
Did Bill Gates denounce vaccines as dangerous in 2021?,Did Gates oppose the elimination of vaccines?,Did Gates think COVID-19 vaccines were dangerous?,Did Gates demand vaccines that could not kill?,Did Gates oppose COVID-19 vaccines?,Do Gates' critics think COVID-19 vaccines are dangerous?
Was Ohio's economic recovery in February 2010?,Did Ohio actually start its recovery?,Was Ohio's recovery successful?,Are there any issues that Ohio is facing?,Has Ohio experienced any financial crises over the past few years?,Is there evidence for the economic recovery in Ohio?,"Are the Ohio economy, financial issues, and other issues currently being addressed?"
Are the rockets launched in rapid succession a recent video or is the video older than the 2021 Israel-Hamas conflict?,Can the video be used as evidence that the rocket launchers were launching dozens of rockets?,Are there any other Rocket launchers in the area at the time?
Did Chinese tourists in Auckland receive a exemption from a COVID lockdown?,Did Chinese tourists in Auckland receive a COVID lockdown after the incident?,Are Chinese tourists in Auckland not exposed to COVID?,Have any incidents occurred in Auckland because of COVID lockdown?,Have any Chinese people been killed in the COVID lockdown?
Did Putnam endorse the Schumer-Obama Gang of Eight immigration amnesty?,Did Putnam vote against the Schumer-Obama Gang of Eight immigration amnesty?,Does this amnesty include restrictions on employers?,"Does this amnesty exclude alcoholics, those under 18 years of age and those deemed to have a genetic condition?",Did Putnam support the Schumer-Obama Gang of Eight immigration amnesty?
Did the video show a UFO in Kazakhstan?,Did this video get shared online?,Did the video originate from a certain country?,Did this UFO happen during the month of June?,"if yes, does this mean this video is from the US?","if no, does this video exist?","if yes, is this video the same date as the UFO?"
Did the non-Chick-fil-A donations to anti-LGBT groups include Christian groups?,Was Chick-fil-A making a statement that the donations were not to Christian groups?,Is there evidence to suggest that the donations were to anti-LGBT groups?,Has the non-Chick-fil-A donations to anti-LGBT groups included multiple groups?
Does Glucoactive contain vitamins?,Is there any evidence to support Glucoactive's claim of boosting a person's insulin production?,Does Dr. Leachon endorse Glucoactive?,Does Glucoactive work against Type 2 Diabetes?,Would the ingredients in Glucoactive be considered healthy?
Is there data to support the statement that there was a temperature drop while the airplanes weren't flying?,Is the temperature drop after the 9/11 terrorist attacks connected to commercial air traffic?,Was the temperature drop the week after the 9/11 terrorist attacks?,Is this a reliable resource for reliable air traffic data?
Will there be 180 million families under the government’s current plan?,Will they terminate 180 million plans?,Will most of these families have to make tough choices?,Does this plan rely on socialized medicine?,Will there be no choice as to whether to buy insurance?,Are the subsidies paid for by employers to fund the government?,Will the government have to pay for the subsidies?
Did a mother appear on television as the victim of children killed in three different mass shootings?,Did a mother appear on television as the victim of children killed in three different mass shootings?,Did the mother appear on television as the victim of children killed in three different mass shootings?,Did the woman appear on television as the victim or mother of children killed in three different mass shootings?
Did the Telangana Government use this image to send out a message to shops and shop owner?,Did Telangana gov't specifically mention that shops and shops will be closed from 6 pm to 8 am?,Did the Telangana Government use this image to send out a message to business?
Did Johnson block a report on Russian donors?,Has Johnson blocked any other reports on donations to the Conservative Party?,Did Johnson block the report on Russia donations?,Has Johnson blocked any other reports on Russian donations?,Is it true that the Russian donations from Johnson's party were not confirmed?,Did Johnson block any other reports on Russian donors?
"Did a man in attendance during the January 6, 2021, insurrection at the U.S. Capitol ever tase himself in the testicles?","Did a man in attendance during the January 6, 2021, insurrection at the U.S. Capitol ever die in the testicles?","Did a man in attendance during the January 6, 2021, insurrection at the U.S. Capitol die because of the accident?"
Did Paris Saint-Germain sell replica team jerseys after signing Lionel Messi?,Did Paris Saint-Germain sell replica team jerseys in 24 hours after signing Lionel Messi?,Did Paris Saint-Germain sell replica team jerseys in a year after signing Lionel Messi?,Have Paris Saint-Germain sold replica team jerseys in a year since signing Lionel Messi?
Did immigrant child detentions increase by 433 percent from 2010 to 2018?,Does the statewide increase in child detentions exceed 42% in the year prior to the 2012 census?,Are the children in child detentions under 6 years old or younger?,Has the year before the 2012 census decreased child detentions?
Was this video on a specific date?,Did this video only contain goofs?,Did Scindia goof up while campaigning for 2022?,Was this footage from the same event?,Would this video be in public?,Did Scindia's goof up occur at the same event as this footage?
Does this program offer free cell minutes?,Is there any other offer on this same program?,Does this program offer other subsidized cellular phone services?,Is this program available on all cell phones?,Is this program limited to all phones?,Is it true that Obama phones offer free minutes?,Is this program meant to offer only Obama phones?
Are people living on polluted land and water eligible to be removed under Agenda 2030?,Are there plans to force people to move?,Did the World Economic Forum and United Nations develop the Agenda 2030?,Is there evidence that such efforts could occur?,Have policies in achieving Agenda 2030 been adopted in the United States?
Was the claim about Disney shareholders losing $2.4 billion in stock value in one day based on a satire article?,Is the satire article about Disney shareholders losing $2.4 billion in stock value in one day true?,Did the satire article end on a happy note?,Was the satire article about Disney shareholders losing $2.4 billion in stock value in one day correct?
Did the note contain cash stuffed inside a spare tyre?,Did the bank pull the note?,Did the notes contain cash stuffed inside a spare tyre?,Was the money deposited from the 20 note?,Did the government of India make the 20 note official to use for cash?
Does the ICMR released 21 dos and don'ts on how to resume life after lockdown?,Has the ICMR released 21 'dos and don'ts' on how to resume life after lockdown?,Has the ICMR released 21 'dos and don'ts' on how to resume life after lockdown?
Is Corzine a Republican governor?,Was Connecticut's private-sector employment declining prior to Corzine's office?,Was Connecticut's private-sector employment declining prior to Corzine's office?,Is Connecticut's private-sector employment declining presently?
Did Feinstein say It’s legal to hunt humans with 30-Round Magazines?,Was Feinstein’s statement on this subject clear?,Did Feinstein agree with the words of a number of people who were against hunting with these magazines?,Did Feinstein disagree with a statement by John Hinckley Jr. that it was illegal to hunt humans with these magazines?
It was 'unheard of' for the Australian Defence Force to respond to an incident 20 years ago. Did this incident have a significant effect on the effectiveness of the defence force?,Were the Australian Defence Force personnel involved in the disaster that led to this statement?,Did the Australian Defence Force personnel respond to the disaster in a significant way?
Did 37 million bees die after planting a large GMO field?,Was the population of GMO plants greater than that of non-GMO crops?,Are any GMO crops more likely to cause a decrease in population?,Did GMO crops do well in studies?,Are other organisms likely to be more successful in growing GMO crops?
Did the Disaster Management Act pay compensation to legal dependents due to COVID-19?,Can legal dependents receive compensation from the Disaster Management Act?,Are there any other law that is similar to the Disaster Management Act in India?,Are there any other disaster related law in India similar to the Disaster Management Act?,Is COVID-19 a global threat?
Is there a photo of the protests?,Is there a photo of protesters protesting against the military's seizure of power?,Is there a photo of protests against the military's seizure of power?,Can you get an exact date of the demonstrations?
Did Lee Majors' will include money for the Trump campaign?,Did Lee Majors leave any money to his family in his will?,Did Lee Majors die before any money was made on his will?,Did Lee Majors' will include money for any political campaigns?,Did Lee Majors have a will?
Did two Democratic Party congressmen plan to murder President Trump?,Did the arrests come from state police?,Did all of the arrests take place in the state of Mississippi?,Are all states subject to state laws regarding detained witnesses?,Was the alleged plotting of the murder of Trump solely by state police?
Is this the same woman performing in the mud?,Is this woman doing it in the mud for a 'performance' at the Burning Man?,Does this individual have a name?,Did the act occur at the Burning Man?,Is this person a person?,Did the act occur on a public stage?
Has T.R. Baalu broken all of the temples mentioned in this article?,Is it true that T.R. Baalu believes all of the temples in his district are 100 year old?,Is it true that T.R. Baalu believes all of the temples in his district are 100 year old?
Did Johnson get his COVID-19 vaccine booster shot while the needle was covered by the blue cap?,Did Johnson receive his Booster COVID-19 vaccine booster shot while the blue cap was cover the needle?,Did Johnson receive his COVID-19 vaccine booster shot while the blue cap was covering the needle?
Did this storm lead to power outages in Texas?,Did these storms cover Texas in ice and snow?,Did this storm cause power outages in the state?,Did these storms also cause power outages in a southeastern area?,Did these storms cause power outages in the state of Texas?
Have some monkeypox cases been found in humans?,Is the mousepox virus widely spread in America?,Can it spread from 5 miles away?,Does this virus stay on door handles?,Does this virus spread from 1 to 5 miles away?,Is the monkeypox virus easily transferred?
"Do average families spend roughly $2,000 more a year on energy costs?","Is there evidence that the average family received a $2,000 energy tax in just seven years?",Was the average family eligible for any Bush tax cuts?,Does the average family receive tax cuts in the last seven years?,Did the average family receive any tax cuts in the last seven years?
"Did Trump ever say "" I never understood wind.""?",Did Trump ever have any disjointed remarks about wind power?,Did Trump's speeches focus on other things besides wind power?,Did Trump's speeches focus on other things besides wind power?,Did Trump's speeches discuss anything besides wind power?
Would H.R. 1 restore voting rights of violent felons?,Would the legislation restore voting rights of incarcerated felons?,Would the legislation restore voting rights of violent felons?,Did this legislation create a legal framework to address voting rights in incarcerated felons?
Did Trump send troops to the border prior to 2018?,Did Trump ask a congressional panel to verify these claims?,Does Trump approve of armed border security?,Is there evidence that Trump is involved with illegal immigration at this time?,Was this video based on a factual statement?,Was the video produced in 2018.?
"Did Begich only pass a bill, the naming of a building?",Did Begich pass all of his bills?,Does Begich consistently pass bills?,Does Begich's record in the Senate reflect this?,Does the Senate endorse a particular senator?,Does Begich have a large following?
Did Oregon rank at the bottom of children with untreated decay in 2007?,Did Oregon rank 7th from the bottom in children with untreated decay?,Is this count true?,Did some of the states in the list have data showing similar data?,Did many other states have similar data?,Is this list accurate?
"Did the White House say that if the Iran nuclear deal gets rejected, they would still get $150 billion?","Did the White House say in this interview that if the Iran nuclear deal gets rejected, they would still get $150 billion?","Did the White House say that if the Iran nuclear deal gets rejected, they would still get $150 billion?"
Did the photo appear on a June 5th?,Was there a short line for this location?,Was this location famous in the U.S.?,Is this location the main Apple store in New York City?,Did this location have a long line?,Does this location usually have large crowds?
"Did Joe Biden say ""No one fucks with a Biden""?",Did Joe Biden record the interview?,Did Joe Biden say this during an interview?,Are there any other videos associated with this interview?,Is Joe Biden known for having an affair?,Is Biden known for having an affair?
"Did Obama say more than 20 times, ""that he did not have the legal authority"" to act as he did?",Did Obama say in particular ways that he did not have the legal authority to act as he did?,Did Obama call for immigration policy changes because he was worried about the cost?,Did Obama make immigration policy changes because of the fear of immigration cost?
"Did Guinta vote to make middle class taxpayers pay over a $1,000 more in taxes a year?","Did Guinta vote to make middle class taxpayers pay over a $1,000 more in taxes a year?","Did Guinta vote to make middle class taxpayers pay over a $1,000 more in taxes?"
Did Rubio skip 18 defense votes in 2017?,Did Rubio back the Iraqi Kurds in the fight against ISIS?,Was Rubio the only one who voted against the Iraqi Kurds on behalf of their troops?,Did Rubio support relocating Kurds from Iraq to the United States?
Did Florida officials amend a contract from Lockheed Martin from 305 promised jobs to six?,Has the contract been modified since the contract was first issued in 2002?,Was the change effective?,Was the 305 jobs initially promised reduced by 6?,Was the original 305 job estimate revised?,Is a total of 6 people employed now?
"Did Trump Tweet that the President should be “shot in the sun” if the Dow falls more than 1,000 points in a day?","Are any repercussions expected if the Dow drops over 1,000 points in a day?","Did Trump tweet that the President should be “shot in the sun” if the Dow drops over 1,000 points in a day?"
Did this video show the car being caught fire or were there more than one cars involved in the fire?,Did this video originate in the US or was it in another country?,Do any other companies appear to have been involved in this fire?,Are there any other companies involved with this fire that aren't listed in this video?
Did Abdul-Jabbar criticize Will Smith for slapping Chris Rock?,Did Abdul-Jabbar criticize Will Smith for slapping Chris Rock?,Did Will Smith slap Chris Rock in March of 2022?,Did Will Smith slap Chris Rock at all before the narcotics trial?
"Are there 4,000 deaths because of COVID-19 vaccines?",Can a vaccine suppress the remission of COVID-19?,Can natural immunity trump vaccine immunity in COVID-19?,Is spike protein from the vaccines bad?,Is natural immunity better than vaccine immunity?,Can the spike protein from the vaccines cause infection?
Did Romney say he voted against the 2005 energy bill?,"Was Romney's 2005 energy bill a step backwards on the path to clean, renewable energy?",Did Romney support the 2005 energy bill?,Have other people supported the 2005 energy bill?,Is it true that Romney supported the 2005 energy bill?
Did 23 people in Norway die after the Covid-19 vaccine?,Is the Covid-19 vaccine approved for use in the U.S.?,Are vaccines approved for use in Norway?,Do the deaths from this vaccine coincide with national averages?,Has this vaccine been approved for use in other countries?,Does Norway have a total death rate of more than 100 deaths per year?
Was Pete Buttigieg arrested for killing several dogs?,Is Pete Buttigieg currently serving a felony sentence?,Was Pete Buttigieg arrested for killing several dogs?,Was Pete Buttigieg arrested for killing several dogs?,Have there been any criminal cases involving Pete Buttigieg?
Has an Indian helicopter crashed in Ladakh?,Did an Indian helicopter crash in Ladakh?,Did the Indian helicopter crash in Ladakh?,Has there been any reports of this helicopter crash in Ladakh?,Do any of these helicopters crash in Ladakh?,Is Ladakh home to more than 4 helicopters?
"Did ""How to Hit a Woman So No One Knows"" have 163 million searches on Google in 2020?",Did the majority of Google searches to this song occur on the day of the pandemic?,"Was the song ""How to Hit a Woman So No One Knows"" popular in 2020?"
Did the White House support the bill?,Could the bill be voted on in the near future?,Does Sen. Lindsey have any doubts that the bill will be passed?,"Moreover, did Lindsey support the bill as a way of protecting people's life?",Has the bill already been voted on?
Does having a flu shot in the last 3-5 years increase your odds of developing COVID-19?,Are flu shots used to provide protection from COVID-19?,Do vaccines containing flu shot ingredients increase the likelihood of developing COVID-19?,Is there evidence of these facts being true?
Did Obama spend this much money?,Did Obama do this project for free?,Did Obama do this project for free?,Are there specific facts about Obama's efforts?,Is this information based on the facts available?,Is this information based on statistics from the Obama administration?,Is this information based on data from independent sources?
Has the national senior certificate increase from 45% to 56%?,Has the number of students who have obtained the national senior certificate increased between 45% to 56%?,Is the average percentage of students who have received the national senior certificate increasing from 56% to 56%?,Does the average percentage of students who have achieved the national senior certificate have increased between 45% to 56%?
"Did Biden teleprompt remind him to leave before or after his Aug. 16, 2021, speech about the Taliban and Afghanistan?","Has Biden's teleprompter reminded him to leave before or after his Aug. 16, 2021, speech about the Taliban and Afghanistan?",Is Biden's teleprompter referring to the Taliban or Afghans?
Did this initiative reduce the 85% fatality rate since April?,Is this approach the only innovation?,Did this initiative reduce the fatality rate?,Is the team that developed this approach working now?,Is this approach a general practice?,Is the approach unique to cancer a common practice?,Is the research that this organization has developed significant?
Does this comment verify that one's Facebook account is safe?,Is the verification on a Gg comment arbitrary?,Can this comment verify that one's Facebook account is safe?,Is there evidence of a link between Gg comments and good security on Facebook?,Is it possible to link commenting with good security to safe and good security?
Are AR-15 rifles used in every major mass shooting in the United States?,"Did every mass shooting in the United States since a 2012 attack in an Aurora, Colorado movie theater use AR-15 rifles?",Were there fewer gun deaths in 2013 compared to 2011?,"Did every mass shooting in the United States since a 2012 attack in Aurora, Colorado use AR-15 rifles?"
Is the Feds notifying anyone about the illegal releases?,Are ICE releases in Huntersville North Carolina at big box retail locations at 3 am?,Are the Feds notifying anyone about the illegal releases?,Is the ICE release illegally in Huntersville North Carolina?,Is the ICE release illegally in Huntersville North Carolina?
"Did Clinton vote to raise taxes on workers earning as little as $41,500?","Did Clinton raise taxes on workers earning as little as $41,500 after 9/11?","Do any other taxes raise as little as $41,500 before 9/11?",Are other taxes raised in 2016?,Has any other political party voted to raise taxes before 9/11?
Did the 200 pound woman sue the NC Zoo for not being adequately protected?,Was the hippo attacked by the hippo?,Did the 400-pound woman take any kind of violence from the hippo?,Was the 400 pound woman's case brought to light in an open record?
Is there a record for only eight states to lose jobs?,Are these eight states in the majority of states to lose jobs?,Is there a record for a majority of states to lose jobs?,Is the United States the sole country to lose jobs?,Is New Jersey the only nation to lose jobs?
Is there data to support this claim?,Have there been allegations of child labor?,Are there any statistics for this type of activity in South Africa?,Is there any evidence to suggest that this type of practice is widespread or widespread?,Is the amount of child labor estimated in this country or figures like this one available for comparison?
"Is this government going to provide aid worth Rs 15,000 to temple priests every month?",Has this aid been provided for more than 6 years?,Has this money been disbursed since this has been initiated?,Does this money have a tax liability?,Are these payments eligible for payment by the general public?
Is this a percentage based on age?,Is this percentage based on money in the bank?,Do older workers typically have fewer assets in the bank than younger workers?,Do young workers have fewer assets in the bank as they enter retirement?,Do older workers ages 55 to 64 have zero money in the bank?
"Did Biden call for eliminating the ""stepped-up"" basis for capital gains tax?","Did Biden call for eliminating the ""stepped-up"" basis for capital gains tax at all?","Was Biden's call for eliminating the ""stepped-up"" basis for capital gains tax considered valid?","Did Biden call for eliminating the ""stepped-up"" basis for capital gains tax in the 2020 election?"
"Would it be illegal to possess marijuana in Corpus Christi starting April, 20th 2017?",Was it possible for the city to decriminalize marijuana before?,"Was it possible for the city to decriminalize marijuana in Texas before April, 20th 2017?",Does Corpus Christi also have an ordinance to decriminalize cannabis in a state other than Texas?
Could the current solar minimum last for longer than 3 decades?,Could this cause the temperature to plummet across the globe?,Does this increase in the global temperature coincide with the current solar minimum?,Would a reduction in global temperatures cause economic problems?,Has global economic downturn contributed to the current solar minimum?,Could this effect of decreased global temperature be reduced by global warming?
Do Covid-19 symptoms start by a sore throat?,Exactly how does Covid-19 cause pneumonia?,Is it possible to get pneumonia if you are infected with Covid-19?,Is pneumonia the only symptom of Covid-19?,Is there a cure for Covid-19?
Did people in that group play the system to gain insurance for nine months?,Did people play the system to earn insurance for twelve months?,Was there any evidence of this system operating in any other way?,Was this policy legal?,Would the Affordable Care Act allow people to get insurance for several months in a year?
Does the death of a 4-year-old in vaccination campaign posters have any link to vaccines?,Does a 4 year-old in vaccination campaign posters have any connection to vaccines?,Can an adult in vaccination campaign posters not have any connection to vaccines?,Did the death of a 4-year-old in vaccination campaign posters cause an increase in vaccine-related deaths?
Did the research found the test are in good shape?,Did the researchers use unbiased analysis of test data?,Is the researcher positive that the tests are being very accurate?,Does the researcher claim that they are doing more than anyone else?,Did the research found that the tests were highly accurate?,Does the researcher claim that the tests are completely accurate?
Did the White House illuminate purple on Prince's passing?,Did Prince die before five officers were killed in Dallas?,Was there any response from the White House on the day of Prince's death?,Were there any additional actions taken by the White House on the day of Prince's death?,Did President Obama say anything about the Dallas incident?
"Did Obama receive 106,258 votes in one county in Ohio?",Did Obama receive more eligible voters in one county than eligible voters overall?,Is Obama's percentage of the vote for Ohio based on that poll?,Did Obama receive more votes in Ohio overall than other states?,Is Obama's percentage of the vote in Ohio based on the poll?,Is Ohio also the most populous county?,Is Obama's percentage of Ohio votes based on that poll?
"Has Rahul Gandhi suggested that school should be re-opened from June 1, 2020 on an odd / even basis?","Has Rahul Gandhi suggested that school should be re-opened from June 1, 2020 on an odd / even basis?","Has Rahul Gandhi suggested that school should be re-opened from June 1, 2020 on an even / odd basis?"
Did this poll indicate that 75 percent of Americans have said either don't do anything or start over on health care reform?,Is this survey in the public domain?,Is this poll being used as another poll question?,Was this poll conducted in the US?,Did these data come from any other sources?,Is this poll a form of advertising or a marketing campaign?
Is it safe to purchase vaccines from Wal Mart in Canada?,Will this require proof?,"Will this require proof of vaccination after the November 1, 2021 date?",Will the government charge people with the mandate to show vaccination?,Will proof of vaccination be required for each visa type?,Will this require proof of vaccination in every visa application?,Will this requirement require proof of vaccination in every visa type?
Does the agency advise people to revert back to using their food benefits if they cannot get them soon enough?,Will SNAP benefits not be available in March?,Are the SNAP benefits reverting to their original status with benefits?,Is the SNAP food benefits not available in March?,Does this statement reflect a change in government policy in regards to food benefits?
Is Barnes an advocate for increased gas taxes?,Is Barnes against increased gas taxes?,Is Barnes supportive of increasing gas taxes?,Is Barnes aware of any research?,Is Barnes a vocal supporter of a 20% gas tax increase?,Is Barnes considered the most respected leader of the Democratic Party?
Was Iowa’s unemployment rate low in the country before COVID-19?,Was Iowa’s unemployment rate high in the country before COVID-19?,Did Iowa employers need to find qualified workers to fill job openings before COVID-19?,Are employers in Iowa being made to pay higher wages to fill job openings than before COVID-19?
Did Pfizer's COVID-19 vaccine have the worst abortion rate in a generation?,Are 82-97 percent of people who received COVID-19 vaccine lost their babies?,Is it true Pfizer's COVID-19 vaccine is associated with obesity in a generation?
Does this school district stop giving milk to children during snack time?,Did the school district lose state funding during the school year?,Was the school district concerned that this decision will make it lose money?,Does the school district have more money left after a year?,Does the school district have to make a budget after this year?
Did protesters that desecrate the Indian national flag?,Was there any protest against the farm laws?,Did protestors from this region of the country protest the Indian national flag?,Was this protest organized to destroy the Indian national flag?,Did this protest group engage in peaceful protest?,Is this protest against the farm laws in the United States?
Did Bashar al-Assad receive the majority of votes?,Did the entire population of Jordan participate in the elections?,Did Bashar al-Assad receive the majority of votes?,Did Bashar al-Assad receive more than 540 thousand votes?,Did Bashar al-Assad receive the majority of votes in all of the polling stations?
Did GOP cut taxes on utilities for heating households?,Did Democrats not cut taxes on utilities for heating households?,Did democrats cut taxes for heating households?,Was this a Republican policy?,Did both parties cut taxes?,Did both parties share similar positions?,Has the federal government cut taxes in the last few years?
Does air droplets travel up to 25 feet?,Do air droplets travel over a distance of 10 - 25 feet per second?,Does social distancing work for a distance of over 10 - 25 feet per second?,Does air droplets travel through densely populated areas?
Do state's election rules typically require signatures for ballots to be taken?,Is the figure inaccurate?,Is this number accurate in other states?,Do all early ballots in the state require signatures?,Is this number inaccurate in other states?,Are state polls a common method of determining early voter numbers?
Are the cases of hepatitis in children mostly affecting children aged one month to four years old that have been actively breastfed in the last 12 months?,Are the babies of all the children breastfed by vaccinated mothers?,Has there been a significant rise in cases of hepatitis in children in the last 12 months?
Can women use menstrual blood as a face mask if they do this at home?,Are menstrual blood menstrual blood masks available in the US?,Can women use menstrual blood as a face mask if they do this at home?,Do women think menstrual blood is safe to use as a skin mask for a medical issue?
Did DeSantis raise taxes on the middle class by more than $1.5 billion?,Did DeSantis give $624 million to big corporations?,Did DeSantis raise taxes on the middle class while giving away millions to big corporations?,Did DeSantis raise taxes on the middle class while giving away millions to big corporations?
Did Hindus rape a half burned body in the Sikar district?,Was there one Hindu who was arrested for this crime?,Was the body burnt or in any way damaged?,Did any other Muslims come forward to inform the police of this crime?,Was it reported that any other people were also involved in this crime?
Did Rep. Bruce Braley skip an important VA reform hearing to attend fundraisers?,Did Braley skip the VA reform hearing in Iowa to attend fundraisers?,Were any other fundraisers that Braley missed taking place?,Did Braley miss other VA reform hearings?,Did Braley skip the VA reform hearing in Iowa to attend fundraisers?
Is Deepak Chaurasia a person of interest?,Did the 9-year-old girl meet Chaurasia?,Did Chaurasia raped the 9-year-old girl?,Is it true that the 9-year-old girl did not meet Chaurasia?,Was it true that Chaurasia is an interviewer?
Do the homes owned by Senator John Kerry reportedly have valuable real estate?,Is any part of a real estate property belonging to a Senator worth more than a million dollars?,Are all of these properties owned by Senator John Kerry?,Can anyone tell me how much the real estate property owned by Senator John Kerry is worth?
Did the children named after either presidents die in Idlib?,Did the children die in Idlib due to this attack?,Have there been any reports of this kind in the last few years?,Has the U.S. had any links with this murder?,Do any investigations into this alleged murder in Idlib have any conclusive evidence?
Did $21T in Pentagon accounting errors exist before Medicare for All was funded?,Does 66% of Medicare for All currently cost from the Pentagon?,Is Medicare for All the most expensive healthcare bill since 2009?,Is Medicare for All considered a waste of money by Congress?,Does the amount of money for Medicare for All already exceed the Pentagon's budget?
Did McCain vote against tax cuts of 2001 and 2003?,Did McCain vote against tax cuts of 2001 and 2003?,Did McCain vote against tax cuts of 2001 and 2003 in good faith?,Is McCain a Republican?,a Republican or a Democratic politician?,Did McCain have a negative attitude towards the tax cuts of 2001 and 2003?,a Democratic politician?
"Can it be stated that under 400,000 dollars, most people would not have their taxes raised?","Are people earning more than 400,000 bucks going to have their taxes raised?","Can someone earning under 400,000 dollars benefit from higher taxes?","Does this statement apply to those earning under $50,000 per year?","Would anyone above the level of $50,000 per year pay higher taxes?"
Did more than eight countries lead the United States in the percentage of college graduates?,Did a majority of the United States college graduates are from a primarily white region?,Did any of the countries that lead the United States in the percentage of college graduates have a high percentage of whites?,Did any country in the United States lead a high percentage of whites?
Are there any justices that have either found the new health care law constitutional or unconstitutional?,Has any justice found the new health care law unconstitutional?,Has any justice found the new health care law constitutional?,Has any justice found the new health care law unconstitutional?,Has any justice found the new health care law constitutional?
Did Aldi offer a free bag to people who shared a Facebook post?,Did each bag that had a coupon have a value of $50?,"Did Aldi offer a free bag for every 1,000 people who shared a Facebook post?",Did Aldi offer a free bag for everyone who shared a Facebook post?
Are 40 percent of Americans under age 35 afraid of using their First Amendment rights?,Are 40 percent of Americans under age 35 willing to speak out about their beliefs?,Are there different opinions under which the First Amendment is not dangerous?,Are there different views from those under age 35 on the First Amendment?,Are there different opinions in different age groups from those under age 35?
Is there any other information that this author publishes?,Did this author make any lists in promoting this book?,Did the author make any lists about reducing unemployment?,Did this author propose any new measures to reduce unemployment?,Did this author support Trump's policies on immigration?,Did the author propose any new initiatives to reduce unemployment?
Did doctors who disagreed with Boris Johnson's diagnosis refuse to sign the Official Secrets Act?,Did a doctor who acquitted himself of a wrong diagnosis sign the Official Secrets Act?,Was the hospital required to sign the Act in any case?,Were two doctors who did not sign the Act acquitted?
"Are British pensioners entitled to £6,000 a year in benefits, while illegal immigrants and refugees are entitled to £29,900?",Is it true that benefits are not awarded to people who are immigrants or refugees?,Are these benefits based on income?,Does this data show people receiving these benefits are financially less fortunate than people outside of the country?
Does 26 percent of Oregonians oppose the death penalty?,Does only 25% of Oregonians oppose the death penalty?,Are 25 percent of Oregonians opposed to the death penalty?,Does Oregon have a strong preference for the death penalty?,0 percentage points did voters oppose the death penalty.?
Could the structurally deficient bridges in America collapse?,Are the bridges structurally deficient?,Are there a lot of bridges in America that could collapse at any point?,Have any bridges collapsed in America during the last 40 years?,Has the structurally deficient bridges collapsed in the past 40 years?
Did this video state that COVID-19 vaccines are responsible for breast cancer deaths in women under age 45?,Did the average age of the women in the video who received the video raise above 50.00?,Did this video show a higher amount of breast cancer deaths in women under age 45 in general than in women in their 30s?
Did there violent video about the 2022 FIFA tournament in the Democratic Republic of Congo?,Did the 2023 protests occur in Kenya?,Is this footage related to the protests?,Is the video being released in a country that hosts the tournament?,Is this footage in another country than the Democratic Republic of Congo?,Is the video related to other events than the football tournament?
"Do Facebook pages impersonating Kenyan churches solicit prayers for KSh1,000?","Have these people come to me asking for prayer for KSh1,000?",Are these people impersonating the Kenyan church?,Is the content of these fake Facebook posts accurate?,Are these users acting on behalf of the Kenyan church?
Are 20 million people who have told the government they aren't participating in a program paying a penalty?,Can individuals pay more than $50 per year for unused coverage under the Medicare Program?,Is the percentage of Americans that are not enrolled in the Medicare Program from the previous year higher than that of the previous year?
Did Tate receive a public restraining order against him following the video being broadcast?,Does Tate have a history of racism?,Can Tate be seen trolling reporters after being arrested?,Has Tate been incarcerated before this video?,Did Tate attempt to attack reporters before the video?
Did Portland Schools spend $500K on racist labels for PB&J sandwiches?,Did Portland Schools spend any money on racist labels for PB&J sandwiches?,Did Portland Schools spend any money on racist labels for PB&J sandwiches?,Did Portland Schools spend any money on racist labels for PB&J sandwiches?
"Did the Modi government distribute 35,000 crore LED bulbs?",Did any of the bulbs contain fluorescent lighting?,Did any of the bulbs contain any mercury?,Did the government distribute any bulbs containing mercury?,Did any of the bulbs contain mercury vapor?,Did any of the bulbs contain mercury water?,Did any of the bulbs contain mercury or a combustible?
Has the violent crime rate risen by more than 20 percent in two years?,Does the homicide rate have increased by more than 20 percent in just two years?,Has violent crime in Virginia decreased in the past 30 years?,Are the trends seen in Virginia and the rest of the country due to a decline in violent crime?
Did police wash blood stains off of the street after the Lathicharge in Karnal?,Did the police lathicharge result in a significant loss of lives?,Does this lathicharge incident represent a significant public health threat?,Did the police lathicharge take place during protests?,Was there a large number of protests on the day of the laticharge?
Did the Aam Aadmi Party secure all 138 seats in Gujarat election?,Was the Aam Aadmi party a minority party at the election?,Did the Aam Aadmi party win the election?,. What was the outcome of the election?,. Is the Aam Aadmi Party a smaller party than it was in 2001?
Did she vote to raise her pay?,Is there any evidence to support Buono's claim?,Was Buono paid at full pay?,Did Buono raise her own pay?,Was the raise for Buono approved?,Did any other individuals vote for the raise?,Is this information reliable?
Does the U.S. support natural gas pipeline in Afghanistan?,Has the U.S. supported the natural gas pipeline in Afghanistan prior to Keystone XL's cancellation?,Has the U.S. supported the natural gas pipeline in Afghanistan prior to Keystone XL's cancellation?,Does the U.S. support natural gas pipeline in Afghanistan prior to Keystone XL's cancellation?
Did Nigeria earn US$383 billion from oil revenues in the four years preceding our government?,Did Nigeria earn US$383 billion from oil revenues in the four years preceding our government?,Did Nigeria earn US$383 billion from oil revenues in the four years preceding our government?,Did Nigeria earn US$383 billion from oil revenues in the four years preceding our government?
Did Obama's financial support come from Exelon?,Did Obama's financial support come from Exelon?,Did Exelon spend money on trying to make Yucca Mountain a waste depository?,Does Exelon have any relationship with Obama?,Do Exelon and Obama work together?
"Did data from 2020 and 2018 show that the ""Intensive Treatments and Auslastung"" figures were virtually unchanged over the past two years?",Was it true the figures were pretty unchanged?,"Did data from 2020 and 2018 show that the ""Intensive Treatments and Auslastung"" figures were virtually unchanged over the past two years?"
Are CPS students learning and growing faster than 96 percent of students in the US?,Does CPS have a lower ratio of male and female students?,Are these students able to read in an average of 11 hours a day?,Does CPS have more resources to help these students than average?,Does CPS provide guidance to families in a nontraditional setting?
Did the government of India state that a shutdown would take place from April to June due to the coronavirus outbreak?,Did the government of India have a plan to shut down the country by 15 April?,Is there a timeline for the closure of India by the 15th of April?,Does the government of India support closing down the country by 15 April?
"Did there exist 130,000 glaciers when Al Gore was born?","Did there exist 130,000 glaciers when Al Gore was born?",Have the glaciers gone over an increase?,Has there been an increase?,Have glaciers dropped in number since Al Gore was born?,Has any decrease occurred in the number of glaciers?
Are these reports true?,Have these reports been based on information that has not been proven?,Did the National Guard storm the Mexican border in the first week of January?,Was this action taken by U.S. units?,Did the actions of the National Guard affect the Trump administration?,Did this force make any direct gains through actions from border-crossing forces?
"Does the average maize yield have been stagnant at 8.5 bags per acre, against a potential of 30 bags per acre?",Does this reflect the low yields among smallholders?,Has the average maize yield remained below or equal to 30%?,Do smallholders produce 80% of our maize?
Does KMC collect daily 1 million KShs - this is translated to KSh30 million monthly in KMC and KSh3.6 billion annually in one outlet - does this translate to 1 million in daily KShs as a one outlet?,Is KMC collection the highest collection ever in KShs daily?,Do all KMC outlets collect this daily amount?
Did the CLAT have to be postponed?,Is the date of the postponement accurate?,Does the postponement pertain to an entire date of the CLAT?,Is the date of the CLAT not specified?,Did the CLAT have to be reschedule?
Did Carter receive any stitches after falling in his head and eye?,Did Carter fall and receive any stitches after helping build houses for Habitat for Humanity?,Was Carter ever injured in the wake of this fall?,Did Carter attend the events he took part in while on this job?,Did Carter assist in any other community events on the following day?
Did the OMB uncover $350 million in waste and fraud?,Did OMB lead to 40 criminal charges?,Did OMB reveal any fraud in the OMB's fiscal year?,Did the OMB discover any waste in the fiscal year?,Did the OMB uncover any fraud in the fiscal year?,Did the OMB uncover fraud in the fiscal year?
Did Anurag Poddar's mother suffer a heart attack?,Is it true that Anurag Poddar's mother died following the police clash in Munger?,Was Anurag Poddar's mother arrested after the clash?,Is Anurag Poddar's mother a resident of the area?
Is the Ukrainian corruption up by 500% over the last year?,Is US aid not meeting its goals?,Is the current level of corruption comparable to that of the first year?,Is the current level of corruption similar to last year?,Is the Ukrainian corruption increase in correlation with the US aid level?
Are there any other members of the family seeking to see the man?,Is there any other information that could help in the search for the 80 year-old?,Was the missing person accompanied by his family?,Was the search for the missing man organized?,Have any other members of the family reached out to the missing person?
Did Nancy Pelosi donate a total of $30.000 to boost #LizMathis1’s campaign?,Did Pelosi give the donation specifically to the campaigns of one or more people?,Was there any connection between Pelosi and Madison?,Did Pelosi give more funds than Madison?,Did Pelosi give more money than Madison?
Has Koster taken $8 million from unions?,Are the unions Koster took money from?,Is Koster in favor of right to work?,"Have there been any other ""right to work"" efforts?",Are there any other right to work issues?,Has Koster actually opposed right to work legislation?,Is there evidence Koster actually opposes right to work legislation?
"Did the nation add 194,000 jobs in September?",Did Florida contribute to this labor force increase?,Does Florida have an unemployment rate more than 20%?,Did Florida add more jobs in the last year?,Did Florida contribute to the nationwide jobs gain?,Did Florida job gains take place before or after the hiring increase?,Did the jobs expansion help Florida increase its unemployment rate?
Did Obama hold the biggest Democratic majority in Congress since Lyndon Johnson?,Was a larger Democratic majority in Congress before Barack Obama took office?,Is Obama's majority in Congress greater than the Democratic majority since Lyndon Johnson?,Was a larger Democratic majority in Congress after Obama took office in 2009?
Did BuzzFeed report on a personal account for Biden on the cash-sharing app Venmo?,Was the account reported as Biden's or that of another person in the US?,Were Biden's donations not authorized in the report?,Have Biden's donations been approved by the Venmo system?,Have Biden's donations been approved in the report?
"Is it true that stabilizing the recent financial crisis will cost less than 1 percent of GDP, which is less than 2.5 percent to fix the savings and loan crisis of the 1980s?","Is it true that stabilizing the recent financial crisis will cost less than 1 percent of GDP, which is less than 2.5 percent to fix the savings and loan crisis of the 1980s?",Is the financial crisis of the recent time essentially non-existent?,Is it true that stabilizing the financial crisis of the recent time essentially non-existent?
Did Indian Army personnel punish people who raised Pro-Pakistani slogans in Kashmir?,Did Indian Army personnel punish people who raised Pro-Pakistani slogans in Kashmir?,Did Indian Army personnel punish people who raised Pro-Pakistani slogans in Kashmir?,Did Indian Army personnel punish people who raised Pro-Pakistani slogans in Kashmir?
Did the Blackstone Valley Mayoral Academy become the first public school in Rhode Island history to have 100% of its elementary-age students proficient in reading on state assessments?,Did the Blackstone Valley Mayoral Academy achieve this despite not having a high percentage of students proficient in reading?,Did the Blackstone Valley Mayoral Academy achieve this despite not having a high percentage of students proficient in reading?
Did the robbers steal jewelry from a couple?,Did the robbers steal from the Muslim community?,Was the robbers from an ethnic community?,Was the robbers from a religious community?,Did the robbers steal from other ethnic groups?,Did the robbers do so in a hazing scene?,Did the robbers go on an extended spree?
Did the UP police crack down on students who were protesting against a non-technical Popular categories exam?,Did students who were protesting were arrested?,Did the students in question have any injuries?,Did the students protest in a group?,Did the students have any injuries?,Did police arrest the students?
Did it take legislative action to pass these reforms?,Is the Senate's proposal based on a study published in the New York Times?,Did the state issue in question save taxpayer dollars?,Is the State Issue in question likely to lead to more budget cuts in the future?,Does the proposed legislative stance support cutting government?
Did all of these countries participate in Khelo India school games?,Was it only India that participated in the Khelo India school games?,Did all of these countries participate in the Khelo India school games?,Were any of these countries affiliated to the Khelo India schools?
"Was Starr the person who voted to throw 6,000 people off unemployment?","Was Starr the person who voted to throw 6,000 people off unemployment?","Was Starr the person who voted to throw 6,000 people off unemployment?","Did Starr vote to put 6,000 people off unemployment?","Did Starr vote to throw 6,000 people off unemployment?"
Do all Filipinos need to register on Facebook before receiving free housing?,Do DSWD 4PS Update 2023 All Region need to register in order to receive free housing?,Would DSWD 4PS Update 2023 All Region be affected by the Facebook campaign?,Will this campaign be effective after 2020?,Does DSWD 4PS Update 2023 All Region have an official Facebook page?
Could the COVID-19 got worse after taking Ibuprofen?,Are there any other causes of the COVID-19?,Was Ibuprofen effective at treating COVID-19?,Was there any other causes of COVID-19?,Are COVID-19 vaccines available to people?
"Is the author correct to say that with all the regulatory changes that will have to be made in tandem with the tailpipe emissions rules, the temperature could be cut in half to nearly five centigrade?","Are all the regulations that will have to be made in tandem with the tailpipe emissions rules, expected to reduce emissions significantly by 2050?"
Does the video claim that the movie I Am Legend was set in 2021?,Does the movie feature people turning into zombies because of the wrong vaccines?,Was the video filmed in an actual city?,Does this video claim to be true?,Did the director of the video claim it was set in 2021?
Did this report originate from the Daily Times?,Was this report poorly photoshopped?,Did Odinga attend this birthday party?,Did the newspaper report this event?,Did Odinga receive any gifts?,Did this party take place on an official date?,Did Odinga attend this birthday party?,Did Odinga attend this party?
Did voters support the idea of a library district?,Did voters approve the concept of creating a library district?,Did voters have any issues with creating a library district?,Did voters accept the idea of creating a library district?,Did voters have any negative opinions about creating a library district?,Have people expressed negative opinions about establishing a library district in the state of Wisconsin?
Was the video recorded after the presidential election?,Will the election be held on Aug. 9?,Is Ruto eligible to run for another term?,Is the video representative of the final election?,Is Kenya's next leader a potential candidate in this election?,Do the current president and deputy president share the same party?
Are there currently 115 tasers that use more tasers than is prescribed by the laws of Kenya?,Is Kenya's total taser use above the recommendations and stipulated laws?,Is Kenya's total taser usage above the recommendations and stipulated laws?
Did Canada pass the Digital Existence Act?,Did the government pass the Digital Existence Act as part of a broader government response to COVID-19?,Did Canada pass the Digital Existence Act in response to COVID-19?,Does Canada have a Digital Existence Act?,Was the Digital Existence Act related to an attack by COVID-19?
Does rinsing the mouth with hot water prevent COVID-19?,Does the amount of time hot water takes to wash the mouth help reduce COVID-19?,Does rinsing the mouth with hot water for 30 minutes prevent COVID-19?,Is there evidence that rinsing the mouth with hot water for 30 minutes helps prevent COVID-19?
Was there any other similar evidence supporting this claim?,Was the meme circulated widely?,Is it true that opossums are immune to rabies?,Were there any other scientific records supporting this claim?,Was the claim made by this meme legitimate?,Has this claim been proven by any other means?
Was Sherrod Brown a proponent of the $1.17 trillion health care law?,Did Sherrod Brown back the health care bill if it also added a new tax on Ohio manufacturers?,Did the health care bill add a new tax on Ohio manufacturers?,Did Sherrod Brown vote for the health care bill?
Can you count how much time and money your tax dollars will have gone to?,Is this money intended for politics?,Will the funds be used to hire political campaigns?,Will some of the money be spent for television ads?,Does this money come from state spending?,Is there anyone else involved with the campaign?
Was this deep-sea anglerfish photographed in May 2021?,Did this anglerfish wash ashore in southern California?,Does this anglerfish have a name?,Is this anglerfish described as a yellow or white color?,Is this anglerfish a common species?
Is the Pope Francis assertion that God instructed him to rewrite the Ten Commandments true?,Was Pope Francis’ statement that God instructed him to revise the Ten Commandments a statement that is in accordance with his official statements in this regard?,Was Pope Francis’ statement made in response to an editorial regarding the ten commandments written by the prophet Muhammad?
Is George Stinney still being sentenced to death?,Was George Stinney legally executed?,Did a judge from the same court have the same opinion on George Stinney’s execution in 1944?,Is George Stinney still serving a jail term?,Did the judge who declared George Stinney innocent in 2014 agree with the previous sentence he made in 1944?,Is George Stinney still on death row?
"Did the Bush administration revive a long-standing law when it ""decided to charge those that crossed the border with criminal violations, rather than civil ones""?",Did the Bush administration initiate an immigration policy that allowed criminal charges for crossing the border?,Was any bill passed in the Bush administration to reinstate this law?
Did Trump tweet He Would “Never Let Thousands Of Americans Die from A Pandemic” in 2009?,Did Trump ever say that he would not allow a pandemic to kill Thousands of people?,Did Trump tweet Trump would never let a pandemic kill Thousands of people?
Are there other books besides The Art of the Deal?,Is The Art of the Deal currently the No. 1 selling business book of all time?,Did The Art of the Deal ever hit number one on Amazon?,Are there any other books that have had the same effect?,Was the book The Art of the Deal released in the last decade?
Does the Lisbon treaty require states to give up their sovereignty by 2022?,Does the treaty require states to give up their sovereignty in 2022?,Does the treaty provide for a transitional period for states to give up their sovereignty?,Is there evidence that the Lisbon treaty provides a transitional period for states to give up their sovereignty in 2022?
Is it true that families now pay 40 percent of their income to taxes?,Are families required to pay tax in part on their income?,Are income taxes the one time expense most families would be willing to pay in the long run?,Are the costs of taxes high enough for most people to pay the financial debt in full?,Do more people have to pay their income tax on the side of the paycheck?
Did 7 people die?,Did the accident occur on a holiday?,Does this person exist?,Did this person have any family members?,Was this person a tourist?,Did this person have a family in his photo?,Did this person have any other information?,Did this person have relatives?,Does this person's photo appear on a public website?,Is this person a traveler?
Has the state of New York changed in this regard?,Is the State of New York taking these measures to protect the children?,Is the State of New York requiring all parents to receive vaccinations?,Are unvaccinated babies in this state not able to be released from the NICU?
Does one study show that milk-bone treats cause cancer in one-third of the dogs who eat them?,Do studies that compared Milk-Bone treats to other dog treats support this claim?,Are there any studies that do not support this claim?,Do milk-bone treats have any adverse side effects?,Are there any data on how many dog treats cause cancer?
Did Bloomberg donate to Toomey's re-election?,Did Bloomberg spend $12 million to re-elect Toomey?,Did McGinty win by 1.5 points?,Did McGinty defeat Toomey by 1.5 points?,Was Toomey's victory in 2016 a result of a re-election?
Did President Obama travel in Air Force One in 2008?,Did Air Force One use tax payer money to fund campaign expenses?,"Did American taxpayers spend more than $200,000 per hour on campaign expenses for Obama?",Is the price of using Air Force One an expense to taxpayers?,"Does it cost less than $200,000 per hour to use Air Force One during campaigns?"
Did no voter in the state voted for a candidate with no record of them being sent?,Did there appear to be more mail in ballots mailed than received during the audit in Arizona?,"Did 74,243 of these mail in ballots result in voter fraud?",Were any of these ballots withdrawn as a result of fraud?,Did Arizona audit the voter voting numbers?
Did Hemingway ever win a bet on a six word short story?,Did Hemingway write several short stories?,Did Hemingway always write short stories?,Did Hemingway ever write more than one story?,Did Hemingway write multiple short stories?,Did Hemingway ever write a multi-story short story?,Did Hemingway write a single story in all of his novels?,Did Hemingway write multiple short stories in all of his novels?
Are there any records of any felony charges for any members of Congress?,Has any member of Congress been arrested for drunk driving?,Has anyone charged with spousal abuse in this year?,Is any member of Congress suspected of being a domestic violence offender?,Has the previous year in this country has a record for drunk driving?
Did Mother Teresa convert Delhi CM Arvind Kejriwal into Christianity?,Did Arvind Kejriwal volunteer for Missionary of Charity for 6 months?,Has Arvind Kejriwal actively encouraged people to become Christians?,Is there any evidence that Mother Teresa converted Arvind Kejriwal into Christianity?
Was Kaine Chairman of the DNC during his time as Governor of Virginia?,Did Kaine serve as a member of the DNC while governor of Virginia?,Did Kaine participate in the 2016 election?,Is it true that Kaine put partisan ambitions first?,Are there multiple ways to put partisan ambitions first?
Did photo show protests against student's death in 2021?,"Was this protest occurring on August 19, 2021?",Was this protest taking place at the time of Pakistani student's death?,Did this protest have immediate effect on Pakistan's security?,Did this person report this protest to police?,Was the person that took the photo from an area where these students were not present?
Are there a higher percentage of counties with no abortion provider in Texas?,Are 92 percent of all counties with no abortion provider in Texas?,Does Texas have higher than half of all counties with no abortion provider?,Does 92 percent of all counties with no abortion provider have zero?,Is there any evidence that states 82 percent of counties with no abortion provider in Texas have zero abortion providers in 2008?
Is Title 42 the last tool Border patrol has to stop the overwhelming flood of illegal immigrants pouring into our country?,Does Title 42 contain any provision which will help the Border Patrol stop this flood of illegal immigrants?,Does Title 42 have the capacity to end the flood of illegal immigrants pouring into our country?,Does Title 42 contain any provision which will help the Border Patrol stop this flood of illegal immigrants?
Are small business making up 98.9% of all businesses in the state and employ nearly half of the state's private sector workforce?,Do small businesses almost never receive a penny of government money?,Do large businesses make up 99% of all businesses in the state?,Is it true that small businesses make up 98.9% of all businesses in the state?,Is this the same number as the percentage of all small businesses and the percentage that employ 45% of the state's workforce?
Did Biden's comments about climate change come from a live stream?,Did Biden's remarks come from a livestream about wildfires?,Was Biden's comments in the clip leaked?,Was Biden's remarks about climate change leaked in general?,Did Biden make comments on climate change in general?
Did there exist a man who supported the flawed strategy in Iraq?,Did the man have the courage to call for change?,Did the man not play politics with the truth?,Did the man have courage to stand up to the special interests?,Did the person who had the courage to oppose the flawed strategy in Iraq speak up for change?
Was this a man that had been kidnapped in Telangana?,Did they engage in this act for three days?,Was this an act of terrorism?,Was this a serious crime?,Did the attackers get away with this act?,Was the victim fully compensated for the sexual assaults?
Did Chidambaram claim monthly rent from the government for 10 years?,Did Chidambaram claim monthly rent from the government for 10 years?,Did Chidambaram claim monthly rent from the government for more than 10 years?,Was the house owned by Chidambaram owned?,Did Chidambaram claim monthly rent from the government for more than 10 years?,Did Chidambaram claim monthly rent from the government for less than 10 years?
Did the majority of child abuse and neglect reports in the state in 2010 be made by those required to report by law?,Does Oregon have an average percentage of child abuse and neglect reports in all counties?,Do all counties in Oregon have an average percentage of child abuse and neglect reports?,Is any data for all counties on the number of child abuse and neglect reports?
Has Russia deployed two bombers in the Caribbean since Putin put nuclear forces on alert?,Has Russia deployed two bombers in the Caribbean since Putin put nuclear forces on alert?,Have Russian bombers been located in the Caribbean before?,Has the Russian nuclear forces been deployed before?,Has the Russian nuclear forces been placed on alert?
Was the vaccination campaign successful?,Was the target date for vaccination met?,Are there any other vaccination campaigns?,Do people around the world still receive vaccinations from measles and rubella?,Are there any other vaccination campaigns in the UK?,Have other countries introduced measles and rubella vaccinations?,Are there any other vaccination campaigns in the US?
"Will reversing the Iran nuclear deal cost 100,000 Boeing jobs?","Will reversing the Iran nuclear deal costs 100,000 Boeing jobs?","Will Trump's decision to reverse the Iran nuclear deal cost 100,000 Boeing jobs?",Is this estimate based on an estimate made by a survey?,Was this estimate based on a survey of Boeing employees?
Is Akhil Sibal an Actor?,Is Disha Ravi hired by Akhil Sibal?,Is Akhil Sibal paid 5 to 7 lakhs per appearance?,Does Disha Ravi work with Akhil Sibal?,Are Akhil Sibal and Disha Ravi married?
Did Aaj Tak credit Narendra Modi for Indias first Olympic medal win?,Was there an official photo of Aaj Tak claiming Modi for this medal win?,Is there a statement stating that Aaj Tak is proud to support Modi in this election?,Is this official photo showing Aaj Tak stating that Aaj Tak credited Modi for this Olympic medal win?
Did the 17 intelligence agencies conclusively determine the hacking was carried out by the Kremlin?,"Has the Kremlin worked with the 16 intelligence agencies to determine the hacking was not carried out by the hacker, or was it intentional?","Did the Kremlin work with the 16 intelligence agencies to determine the hacking was not intended for use by the hacker, or was it intentional?"
Did Obama say there were no rules for the 2016 Republican Convention?,Is there any record of Obama being in favor of the 2016 Republican Convention?,Has there been an investigation of any such investigation into the 2016 Republican Convention?,Did Obama state that there were no rules for the 2016 Republican Convention?,Is the 2016 Republican Convention likely to have rules set for it?
Is there a law in Texas that says it's illegal to own more than six dildos?,Is it illegal to own six dildos?,Is there a law in Texas that states it's illegal to own more than six dildos?
Is Eastwood right to claim that Barack Obama was the biggest fraud perpetrated on the American people?,Was this statement based on Eastwood's public words?,Was this statement based on Eastwood's public words?,Is it true that Eastwood said that Barack Obama's presidency was the biggest fraud ever perpetrated on the American people?
Was this soldier part of the Mahar-Peshwas battle?,Is this soldier known as Mahar in this photo?,Was this soldier known as a Peshwas?,Is this soldier a Mahar?,Is this soldier a Peshwas?,Is this soldier known to have been in this battle?
Did the economy grow less than 1 percent a year under Reagan?,Was economic growth worse under Reagan?,Does Reagan start economic growth with a deficit?,Did Reagan come in before the recession?,Did Reagan reduce the deficit in a year?,Did Reagan reduce economic growth after the recession?,Was Reagan's economic growth similar to today's?
Did Republicans vote in mixed ballots?,Did the votes mix?,Did the ballots be counted in the final election?,Did any ballots get counted in the final election?,Does this election have any correlation to other elections in the year before this one?,Does this election have any correlation to other elections in the year before this one?
Did Biden's Treasury Department declare that the IRS would monitor all accounts that are over $600 in 2015?,Does the IRS need to know the amount of money in each account?,Was the Treasury Department's statement given to the IRS only after the election?,Will this surveillance affect individual elections?,Will this enforcement action affect all elections?
Did the video of people evacuating a beach date to 2021?,"Was the video from 2021 related to the Israel-Palestine unrest in May, 2023?","Are there videos related to the Israeli-Palestine unrest in May, 2023?","Was the video related to the Israeli-Palestine unrest in May, 2023?"
Do the police officers have the right number of officers for 100k citizens?,Are 900 police officers needed to serve 100k citizens?,Are 300 police officers needed to serve 100k citizens?,Do some people consider 400 police officers needed to serve 100k citizens?,Have any other reports like this been released by the police agencies to discuss the situation with the citizens in Nigeria?
Are all of these arrests for panhandling related offenses involving the same people?,Do these arrests imply that panhandlers are repeat offenders?,Has this evidence been presented to evidence about panhandlers?,Are these arrests indicative of ongoing panhandling?,Are these arrests evidence of panhandlers re-involving themselves in panhandling?
Did the 2019-21 budget produce a positive general fund balance since 2000?,Did Gov. Walker’s 2021-23 budget include an increase in the General Fund deficit?,Is the 2021-23 budget budget similar to Gov. Walker’s 2021-23 budget?,Is the governor’s budget budget similar to Gov. Walker’s 2019-20 budget budget?
Did Modi’s name appear in the video?,"Was the name chanted on October 29, 2018?","Did Gandhi give his speech at Ujjain, Madhya Pradesh?",Did Gandhi receive any of the applause from the crowd?,"Is there any evidence that Gandhi actually gave a speech at Ujjain, Madhya Pradesh?"
Is there any evidence that Biden's advisor would recommend this type of lockdown?,Does Biden's advisor have any recommendations related to any other measures?,Does Biden's advisor recommend a 6-week lockdown?,Is there any evidence that Biden's advisor would recommend this type of lockdown?
Do you need to copy and paste the viral post to circumvent Facebook's algorithm to avoid seeing posts from 26 Friends?,Does the algorithm require a certain user profile information?,Does the algorithm require information from 26 Friends as well?,Does the algorithm require a certain user profile information?,Was this method tested on a device?
Is there evidence to suggest that this is true?,Does this policy allow for the elimination of mud schools?,Did this policy cause the removal of mud schools in the Eastern Cape?,Does this policy support the elimination of mud schools in South Africa?,Has this policy been implemented in a number of other parts of the country?
Did Milwaukee County have a parks capital budget that’s bigger than it’s been in the last 10 years?,Did Milwaukee County allocate an amount of money for park capital plans?,Did Milwaukee County allocate an amount of money for park capital plans for the past 10 years?,Was the park capital budget for the previous 10 years larger than it was in the prior year?
"Did VAERS data prove COVID-19 vaccine deaths exceeded 12,000?","Did VAERS data prove COVID-19 vaccine deaths exceeded 12,000?","Did VAERS data prove COVID-19 vaccine deaths exceeded 12,000?","Did COVID-19 vaccine deaths exceed 12,000?",Did VAERS data confirm COVID-19 vaccine deaths?
Does Bernie Sanders oppose the requirement of all children to have a K-12 education?,Is this statement true or false?,Does Sanders support the requirement that all children have a K-12 education?,Is Bernie Sanders against the requirement that all children have a K-12 education?,Is it true that Bernie Sanders opposes the requirement that all children have a K-12 education?
Did Boebert make an announcement about a ban on Biden in a September 2021 announcement?,Is the phrasing on this announcement erroneous?,Was this announcement related to Biden?,Did Biden and Biden sign a memorandum announcing Biden's impeachment?
Does Kasich's budget increase taxes on the wealthy?,Do Ohio's working and middle class families pay more taxes?,Does Kasich's budget increase income taxes on the poor?,Does Kasich propose to lower the income tax rate on the poor?,Does Kasich propose lowering income tax rates on the poor?
Was Barry Goldwater the candidate Clinton campaigned and voted for in 1964?,Is it true that Goldwater promised to re-segregate America?,Was Barry Goldwater the first person Clinton and Goldwater both voted for?,Did Goldwater claim to re-segregate America?
Did any farmers die of suicide in Modi's rule?,Did any farmers die of suicide in the last 8 years of Modi's rule?,Did any farmers die of suicide in the previous 8 years of Modi's rule?,Is it true that some farmers have died of suicide during the previous 8 years of Modi's rule?
Does Bill Gates claim to be a proponent of the Depopulation Plan?,Was Gates a proponent of the Depopulation Plan prior to his statement?,Was Gates a proponent of the Depopulation Plan prior to his statement?,Was Gates involved in the Depopulation Plan prior to his statement?
Did the Saudi man survive?,Did the Saudi man survive by eating two of his four wives?,Was the Saudi man's wife alive?,Does the Saudi man's wife have any children?,Did the Saudi man survive?,Have other people survived by eating two of their wives?,Did this person survive by eating one of his wives?,Was this person's wife alive?,Did this person's wife give birth to multiple babies?
Did Perdue support the 2014 farm bill?,Did Isakson and Chambliss support the 2014 farm bill?,Did Perdue not support the 2014 farm bill?,Is there evidence that Perdue supported the 2014 farm bill?,Are there other records indicating that Perdue supported the 2014 farm bill?
"Has today's study increased the percentage of black children raising in two-parent, monogamous families?","Are there any studies that demonstrate that a higher percentage of black children today have been raised in two-parent, monogamous families in 1960?","Do most parents believe that a higher percentage of black children now raised in two-parent, monogamous families in 1960 was due to a greater percentage of women?"
Have Florida voters not been told of their right to vote?,Have there been attempts to contact a Florida governor about the right to vote?,Have voters been blocked from voting because of their lack of representation in the legislature?,"Do Florida voters not have the right to vote, as they are able to do according to state law?"
"Did Tennessee create more than 28,000 new jobs?",Did Tennessee invest more than $4 billion in capital projects in 2011?,Did Tennessee create job creation and capital investment?,Was Tennessee a successful location for jobs in 2011?,Did the Jobs4TN plan work?,Did these jobs create a positive climate of economic growth?
"Have all city of Chicago, including Milwaukee, exhibited the same level of taxation power?",Do all cities in this category charge sales taxes?,Does Milwaukee have more local income tax?,Is Milwaukee the only city in the United States that does not charge sales taxes or income tax?,Is Milwaukee the only city with a sales tax?
"Does this mean the EPA wants to hire 230,000 new government regulators that will cost $21 billion to the taxpayer?",Has this job creation increased the overall cost for the government?,Has this job creation increased the overall cost for the government?,"Does the EPA want to hire 230,000 new government regulators that will cost $21 billion to the taxpayer?"
Are Argentine fans seen in the video?,Will a final of the 2018 FIFA World Cup be played at Wembley Stadium?,Does Wembley have an outdoor arena?,Did Argentine fans gather outside the stadium?,Do Argentine fans attend these games?,Has a World Cup final been held at Wembley Stadium?
Was President Trump present for the raid?,Was it his first visit to the course where the raid was carried out?,Does this incident have any relation to previous attacks?,Can Trump voluntarily abandon his role in a major foreign event if they are not comfortable?,Is the Trump-Dawson controversy an election-related issue?
Did the city elect a majority of precincts?,Is there a big problem with the election being called?,Does the city have elections that have been called?,Is it possible that this is intentional?,Do all precincts know the election has been called?,Does the city want to take back their rights to vote?
Did the Boston Globe release any newspaper clippings showing the son of former Prime Minister of India?,Did any of the clippings show the son being arrested for misdemeanor charges?,Did The Boston Globe report this as true?,Did the clippings show the son being arrested?,Was there a misdemeanor charge for the son?
Was the Venus symbol removed from Procter & Gamble menstruation products?,Was the Venus symbol removed from Procter & Gamble women's products?,Did trans activists force Procter & Gamble to remove the Venus symbol from Menstruation products?,Was the Venus symbol removed from Menstruation products prior to 2019.?
Was there legislation in the New York State Senate that called for the establishment of COVID-19 “detention camps?,” Was the legislation intended to put people on death row?,Did the legislation in the New York State Senate require people to be arrested?,Did the legislation call for the establishment of detention camps for COVID-19?
Is it true that Hillary Clinton has promised to raise taxes by $1 trillion?,Does a $1 trillion tax increase raise taxes?,Is it true that Hillary Clinton will be imposing a $1 trillion tax increase on America?,. Are the tax increases likely to increase taxes by many billions of dollars?
Does Virginia spend less per student than it did in 2008?,Did Virginia spend less per student than it did in 2008?,Does Virginia budget less per student than it did in 2008?,Does the amount spent on public schools in Virginia in 2009 amounted to less than Virginia spent in 2008?,Did Virginia spend less money than it spent in 2008?
"Did he say that 130,000 ballots in Fulton County, GA are likely ineligible and would potentially have a Trump vote?","Did he say Trump might win the election due to the ineligibility of 320,000 ballots in Fulton County, GA?","Is it possible Trump would win the election due to the ineligibility of 132,000 ballots in Fulton County, GA?",Is the percentage of voters who did not vote eligible due to the ineligibility of the ballots?
Did this building wobble in May 2021?,Is there any evidence this swimming pool was in the building?,Is this building safe?,Is this building large enough to support a swimming pool?,Was this building unsafe at the time of the collapse?,Was the swimming pool not fully elevated to the ground?
"Did Scott Walker give back over $370,000 of his salary?",Did the amount of money he gave back come from the appropriations he voted for?,Does Scott Walker also give back salary to county departments?,Was this grant made before or after Walker was elected?,Would this have been done with an appropriation that was included with the appropriations?
Did Perry have any contacts with Democratic legislators who fled Texas in 2003?,Did Perry use any of the names of these lawmakers?,Did Perry track down these legislators?,Did Perry help track down these legislators?,Does Perry support the current Republican Governor?,Does Perry support this position in the legislature?,Does Perry support the state's attorney general?
Was the 911 call placed in San Antonio?,Does the truck contain migrant refugees?,Did the migrant refugees in San Antonio are being helped by police?,Was the migrant caravan in San Antonio made up of individual individuals?,Did the migrant caravan have a vehicle registered in San Antonio?
Is there a coal plant project in 8 countries?,Is there a coal plant project in the USA?,Is there more than 1 coal-powered plant in the USA?,Is there a coal-powered plant in the EU?,Is there a coal-powered plant in all EU countries?,Is there a coal plant project in all EU countries?
Did the Commission on Presidential Debates write a letter apologizing to Trump?,Did the Commission on Presidential Debates write a letter apologizing to Trump prior to the 2016 debates?,Did the Commission on Presidential Debates write a letter apologizing to Trump before the 2016 debates?
Did the video originate in India?,Did a Muslim ask people in Delhi to chant Allah o Akbar if they wish to live in India?,Did the video mention the protestor's ethnic origin?,Is there evidence that this video took place in India?,Do any of the Muslims in this video claim political stances?
Are there certain tests that would be used to see whether inflammation contributes to cancer progression?,Is there information that could indicate that inflammation triggered cancer?,Can people with cancer receive augmentation vaccinations?,Is there sufficient information available to determine whether augmentation vaccination caused cancer?,Are there certain tests that can provide information on whether vaccination triggered cancer?
Is this a complete list of potential new taxes in all states?,Did this study reveal additional taxes in all states?,Will Florida increase the taxes in any other states besides Florida?,Is this income in Florida worth about $813 a year yearly?,Is this income based on a real estimate?
Did the two people fall into the collapse?,Were the two people seriously injured?,Was the couple from a medical condition?,Was there any reason for the floor to collapse?,Were the two people from a mental health condition?,Was there any other medical condition involved?,Were there any witnesses to this incident?
Did the man steal money from tech giants by sending random bills?,Is global fraud far more sophisticated than spam?,Does the man swiping credit card bills send any personal information to tech giants?,Did the man swiping credit card bills send any personal information to tech giants?,Did the man swiping credit card bills send any personal information to tech giants?
Did the RBI withdrew more banknotes from circulation than they expected?,Is there evidence that this withdrawal made the currency more valuable?,Was this incident the first to occur with Indian banknotes?,Does this appear to be a video taken after this withdrawal?,Are these notes in circulation at this time?
Was the suraga bird captured in multiple locations?,Did the photographer's efforts last for more than one day?,Did this bird's video last for more than one day?,Was there a bird shot directly after the Suraga bird remained in view?,Did there exist any other Suraga birds?,Did photographers record this Suraga bird in multiple locations?
"Did Roque say that Duterte is like Jesus Christ, Allah and Buddha?","Did Roque state that Duterte is like Jesus Christ, Allah and Buddha?",Did Roque compare Duterte to these 3 religious figures?,Did Roque call Duterte like these religious figures?
Is the Austin City Council member living south or north of Lady Bird Lake?,Was the Austin City Council member voted from any section of the county south of Lady Bird Lake?,Is the Austin City Council member endorsed by any county south of Lady Bird Lake?,Did any Austin City Council member live near either Lady Bird Lake or north of 45th Street in Austin?
Are there any documented cases of the coronavirus being killed by exposure to the sun for 2 hours?,Does exposure to the sun kill coronavirus?,Does exposure to the sun kill coronavirus?,Would exposure to the sun kill the coronavirus?,Has this information not been validated?
Did walkers enjoy the walking back to Guwahati airport?,Did walkers get off the bus before they could walk home?,Was there any bus load of walkers traveling from the airport?,Did walkers walk back home on foot?,Did there come more than one bus?,Were walkers returning after the walk?
"Would increasing the minimum wage to $15 an hour reduce spending on food stamps, public housing and other programs by over $7.6 billion a year?",Would increasing the minimum wage to $15 an hour reduce spending on food stamps?,"Is there evidence that increases in the minimum wage would reduce spending on food stamps, public housing and other programs by over $7.6 billion a year?"
Did Pelosi drunkenly slur her speech at an event in May 2019?,Is it clear when Pelosi drunkenly slurred her speech?,Is there anything that confirms Pelosi drunkenly slurring her speech?,Would there be any slurred speech claims if this occurred?
Did independent analysts state that Trump's tax plan would rack up 30 trillion in debt?,Did independent analysts state that Trump's tax plan was designed to benefit the wealthy and big corporations?,Is Trump's tax plan based around taxing corporations?,Is Trump's tax plan designed to benefit the wealthy and big corporations?
Did Barr take any money from payday lenders?,Did Barr take money from payday lenders?,Does Barr support or oppose allowing payday lenders to take advantage of our troops?,Has Barr ever violated any judicial guidelines for taking money from payday lenders?,Did Barr receive more money from payday lenders than any other Kentucky lawmaker in 2018?
Did Lowes advertise this offer?,Did Lowe's claim this was a promotion?,Did this offer cover the check costs?,Are Lowe's discount coupons good for cash?,Is this discount available for cash or checks?,Do these stores have any rewards programs that offer these types of deals?
Has the US spent $2.5 trillion on rebuilding the military?,Has Trump spent $2.5 trillion on this rebuilding?,Did Trump use the military for this purpose in the past?,Did Trump specifically mention these issues?,Would Trump be willing to use this money for these purposes in the future?,Would the United States be willing to commit to the military in this way?
"Was ""2,000 Mules"" a documentary about Democrats that cheated on the 2020 elections?","Was the documentary about Democrats who ""cheated on the 2020 elections""?","Was ""2,000 Mules"" a documentary about Democrats that didn't cheat on the 2020 elections?","Was the documentary about Democrats that ""cheated on the 2020 elections""?"
Did Buhari ask Nigerians to vote for Obi in the 2023 election?,Did Buhari ask Nigerians to vote for Obi in the 2023 election?,Did a Buhari poster ask Nigerians to vote for Obi in the 2023 election?,Does this image imply that there will be a general election in 2023?,Does this image imply that there will be a general election in 2023?
Did the girl challenge the Russian soldier to go back to his country?,Did the girl teach the soldier how to do so?,Has Russian soldiers encountered a Ukrainian girl?,receiving Russian soldiers from Ukraine?,rising Russian ties to Ukraine?,arring Ukrainian involvement in the conflict?,ring any other incidents between Russians and Ukrainians?
Did President Trump lead the reduction in food stamp use?,Do the numbers on food stamps appear to be declining due to Republican leadership?,Is food stamp use on average increasing as a result of Trump's presidency?,Do the percentage of people receiving food stamps decrease in 2017 compared with 2017?,Is the decline in food stamp use a result of Trump's tenure?
Is there an estimated 1.49 million residential homes in Lagos?,Is there any evidence that this estimate is accurate?,Is there any evidence that this estimate is not accurate?,Was it determined by a government stator?,Is there any evidence that this estimate is accurate?,Is there any evidence to support this claim?
Did this ambush kill any people?,Did this incident happen outside of the state of Manipur?,Are there any other photos related to this situation?,Was there a significant impact in this incident?,Have the following events in this matter contributed to the deaths of 7 people?,Were any of these incidents responsible for the death of the victims?
Did the North Polar Ice Cap lose all of its ice within the next five to seven years?,Was the North Polar Ice Cap lost entirely within the next five to seven years?,Was the North Polar Ice Cap lost entirely within the next five to seven years?,Did Al Gore’s comments about the North Polar Ice Cap actually exist?
Did Biden say Americans can have two beers a week?,Did Biden say Americans can have only two beers a week?,Exactly how many beers do Americans drink each week?,Is Biden's statement the definitive definition of alcohol?,Did Biden say Americans have a choice between alcohol and alcohol consumption?,Is Biden in favor of limiting alcohol consumption?,Does Biden claim to support limiting alcohol consumption?
Has there been any legislation done on lowering unemployment for the last four years?,Has the Legislature done anything about lowering unemployment for the last four years?,Does this article support the statements made by the author?,Are there any negative consequences to unemployment from lowered spending?,Does this article contain information that may indicate the current employment situation is less than ideal?
Did The Simpsons predict that the Canadian PM will run away from truckers?,Did the episode of the Simpsons portray Trudeau as a trucker?,Did this episode predict Trudeau's political action in the real world?,Were any of the episodes from the Simpsons accurate?,Are any of the episodes of the Simpsons accurate?
Is there evidence that the president campaigned against me 12 times?,Is there proof if the president campaigned against me 12 times?,Is it hard to believe that the president did campaigns against me 12 times in the past?,"If the president did campaigns against me 12 times, did the president ever campaign against me?"
Is there a video showing Lithuania removing railway track against Russia in 2022?,Is there a video circulating to show Lithuania removing railway track against Russia in 2022?,Is there a video circulating to show Lithuania removing railway track against Russia in 2022?,Is there a video circulating to show Lithuania removing railway track against Russia in 2022?
Was Rahul Gandhi arrested at the Boston Airport in 2001?,Did Rahul Gandhi own any drugs?,Did Rahul Gandhi carry any other cash while arrested?,Did Rahul Gandhi attempt to steal money at the Boston airport?,Did Rahul Gandhi accept the charges against him in court?,Does the sentence associated with these charges constitute evidence of Gandhi's innocence?
Did Netanyahu change his position in relation to the two state solution?,Is Netanyahu still a favor of the two state solution?,Did Netanyahu make any changes to this position in relation to the two state solution?,Did Netanyahu specifically make any changes to this position in relation to the two state solution?,Did Netanyahu make any changes to this position in relation to the two state solution?
Was this figure of death associated with the COVID-19 pandemic?,Does this figure hold a needle at this event?,Was this figure of death in this event part of an event of the 2008 Olympics?,Are there any other interesting stories associated with this figure of death during the 2008 Olympics?,Does this figure of death have any other ties to this disease?
Did Joe Biden fall asleep during the live TV interview he was appearing on?,Did the video have multiple witnesses?,Was Biden asleep in the interview he was sitting on during the live interview?,Did Biden wake up after the interview he was on?,Was Biden still awake after the live interview he was in?,Was Biden awake prior to the interview he was in?
Is the photo from February 14?,Does the photo feature troops burying civilians that were killed in this massacre?,Can we use this photo to support other images of civilian killings in Cameroon?,Are there many documented civilian killings in these incidents?,Is it known that this picture was taken in the town of a civilian village?,Is the image from this photo authentic?
Do 85 percent of people with masks catch COVID-19?,"Is the COVID virus only transmitted through clothing, and not by rashes?",Did more people get COVID-19 in 2012 than any other year?,Does wearing masks help to prevent COVID-19?,Are there any other health concerns people with masks have?
Was the man whipped to death?,Was the child abused?,Was there anything in the video that implied the child might be abused?,Is the video clearly showing the abuse?,Is there any information on the video that supports the murder?,(4) Does this video portray what was portrayed?,(5) Are there any comments on the video pertaining to the actions that were taken?
Is one-fourth of rural Missourians unable to purchase high-speed internet?,Is the lack of high-speed internet an overall disadvantage in rural Missouri?,Are disadvantages in rural Missouri due to lack of high-speed internet?,Is rural Missouri a country?,Do rural Missourians have fewer resources to attend educational institutions?
Did Pfizer promise to incorporate Pluton processor into the COVID-19 vaccine?,Does the FDA approve the development of the COVID-19 vaccine?,Will the COVID-19 vaccine have fewer complications?,Does Pfizer expect the FDA to approve the development of the COVID-19 vaccine?
Is a press release issued by the Indigenous Tribal Leader’s Forum by the time the 22nd of July?,"Do the Kuki people misguide themselves, misguide other people, or have a conflict with the Meitei people?",Is the press release issued by the Indigenous Tribal Leader’s Forum after the 22nd of July?,Is the press release in the form of a press release?
Did 20 million Chinese convert to Islam after it was proved that the coronavirus doesn't affect Muslims?,Has it been proven that the coronavirus doesn't affect Muslims?,Has it been proven that 20 million Chinese converted to Islam after it was proven that the coronavirus doesn't affect Muslims?
Did police discover 218 embalmed penis?,Was the mortician's name omitted from the search warrant?,Did the mortician want to charge the mortuary with murder?,Was the mortician's home searched for items that did not belong in his home?,Is the property currently under investigation?
Did the uninsured male die after being refused care due to a lack of medical insurance?,Was the uninsured male's death attributed to COVID-19?,Is the uninsured male's death related to COVID?,Is the uninsured male's death related to COVID-19?
Did the policies of Modis help 300 million people come out of poverty in a decade?,Did the policies of Modis have a long-term effect in reducing poverty in India?,Have Indian policies on poverty alleviation helped people out of poverty?,Has India been able to help more people out of poverty than most other countries?
Does the Congressional Budget Office rate the cost of unemployment benefits at $1.90 per $1 spent on them?,Were the estimated costs for unemployment benefit to increase over the past 20 years?,Is the estimated cost of unemployment benefits a net result of all the spending by the government on job creation?,Were the estimates about benefits a net result of all the spending by government on job creation?
Does he claim that 6.5 million jobs and 3 trillion will be lost because of climate change?,Is there evidence that climate change will cost the US economy?,Do Trump and the Trump administration agree on how he will act on climate change?,Can Trump's team suck money out of the US by saying that climate change will lead to a loss in jobs?
Are there any people in your age range who have won more Grammys than you?,Have any of your age range won any Grammys against white people?,Has any of your age range won any Grammys against any other race?,Do you have any other awards that you might need a list of?,Are any of your awards won against any group/category?
"Did 100,000 Ukrainian soldiers die in the Russian - Ukrainian war?",Did Ukrainian troops die in the Russian - Ukrainian War?,Was there a lack of information regarding the number of Ukrainian soldiers killed in the Russian - Ukrainian war?,Could there be multiple reasons for the loss of Ukrainian soldiers?,Can statistics for all Ukrainian soldiers in the Russian - Ukrainian war be available?
Was the federal data specific in their estimates?,Were the statistics correct when we made that claim?,Did the federal data verify that there is a rate of one out of four illegal immigrants entering the country?,Did the federal data have additional sources of data?,Did the federal data provide some information about the rate of illegal immigration?
Was this video pre- Burning Man 2023?,Was this video related to a jeep stuck in mud?,Is the date of this video after 2023?,Did this video lead to an injury?,Are there any pending injuries after this video?,Is it uncommon for people to be unable to steer due to this type of driving?
Did Central Park shelter thousands of abused children?,Did Central Park house children previously locked up underground?,Did Central Park have housing for kids released from underground captivity?,Do Central Park shelter children from underground captivity?,Is Central Park host to children from underground captivity?,Is there evidence that Central Park is host to children from underground captivity?
Was Democrats better at winning votes during the election?,Did Republicans win more than Democrats during the election?,Is the election fair for all parties?,Did Republicans win more than Democrats at the election?,Did Republicans win more than Democrats during the election?,Does there appear to be a larger divide in Republicans than Democrats in the House?
Do most people who are infected with HIV develop AIDS?,Do most people with HIV who develop AIDS become sick long after they became infected?,Does this percentage rise after developing AIDS?,Are there any significant differences in the time people with HIV have become sick compared to those who are not infected with HIV?
Did 22 employees of the Clinton Foundation receive arrests?,Did the investigation involve activities related to Hillary Clinton?,Did the FBI arrest 22 employees of the Clinton Foundation?,Did the investigation involve allegations of illegal activities?,Did the FBI arrest employees of the Clinton Foundation from October 2016 - January 2016?,Is there evidence to support the allegations contained in the FBI investigation?
Do German biker gangs beat out Muslims?,Are Muslim immigrants in the country being assaulted?,Is the action being taken by biker gangs on behalf of women?,Is this assault taking place in the home of the bikers?,Is this action being taken to protect women?
Does McDonald's hamburgers contain meat filler in 85%?,Is ammonia used to cleanse hamburger meat?,Has ammonia been used on beef in animal testing before?,Is any meat in this 85% of hamburgers being removed from McDonald's?,Do these claims support the claims by Irwin?
Was Rahul Gandhi married to a Colombian?,Are Rahul Gandhi and Columbian people related?,Did Wikileaks disclose that Rahul Gandhi was married to a Colombian?,Do they have any children from any of the marriages?,Is any part of this Marriage documented by Wikileaks correct?
Do HIV-19 vaccines select for more virulent variants of the virus that causes HIV?,Will greater resistance to the vaccines lead to a greater likelihood of severe disease?,Is the high frequency of vaccine-induced immunity associated with the increased risk of disease?,Can mass vaccinations of influenza cause a greater risk of death?
Did Burr vote against the Insider Trading ban for Congress members?,"Was Burr ""brave"" regarding his vote?",Has Burr ever called for a ban on insider trading for congressional members?,Has Burr ever called for a ban on insider trading for congressional members?,Has Burr ever called for a ban on insider trading for congressional members?
Is it accurate to say that the private sector has lost 8 million jobs since January 2008?,"Do local, state and federal governments add 590,000 jobs?",Did the private sector lose more jobs than the state and federal governments?,Are the private sector and the federal government overlapping?,Did the private sector lose more jobs than the state and federal government?
Was there a mass attack on a school bus involving a 14 year old boy wearing a MAGA hat?,Was the person who attacked the boy from above?,Did the person who attacked the person from above have a prior history of violence?,Is it clear who attacked the person from above?
Did Trump say that Americans should stop congratulating President Obama for the killing of Osama bin Laden?,Was Trump's statement on Obama's role in the killing of Osama bin Laden accurate?,Did Trump say that people should stop congratulating Obama for the killing of Osama bin Laden?
Did the road man picture appear in South Africa in 2020?,Is this picture similar to the road man picture in Kenya in 2023?,Is this photo similar to the man image in South Africa in 2020?,Does this picture compare to the man image in Kenya in 2023?,Is this photo the same as the man photo in South Africa in 2020?
Was the second far-right website created by David DePape or someone else?,Is the second far-right website created by a person associated with David DePape. Does DePape appear on both of these websites?,Does the second far-right website created by DePape have ties to other leftist sites?
Did Republicans authorize changes to Ohio elections?,Does this change have any effect on election results?,Is this change intended to increase voter turnout?,Is this change consistent with other Republican-approved changes?,Is this change intended to make it more difficult to participate in Ohio elections?,Is this change due to changes in voting procedures?
Did this video show a US army band playing Jana Gana Mana during India's Independence Day celebration?,Did this video include India's 74th Independence day?,Did the US army band participate in this event?,Is this video representative of a particular part of India's Independence Day celebration?
Did Meesha Shafi have a defamation claim against Ali Zafar?,Has Shafi ever been charged in a defamation case?,Did Shafi take the case seriously?,Do Defamation laws in Pakistan permit obtaining sentences in prison?,Is the sentence for Shafi in jail due to misrepresented facts?
What is the difference in the cost of the 2000 and 2010 Censuses?,Does the 2010 Census have to cost $14.5 billion?,Would the 2010 Census be less expensive than the 2000 census?,Can the 2010 Census costs be more than the 2000 Census?,Can the 2010 Census costs be more than $14.5 billion?
Have the women who were named William been elected to statewide office?,Are there many men that have been named William?,Has the number of women named William surpassed the number of men?,Identify some data sources to confirm this?,Have any women named William been elected to statewide office?,Identify any other notable names that have been elected to statewide office?
Does California's top income tax rate have an average of 13.3%?,Is California's top income tax rate a fair value?,Does California's top income tax rate attract people?,Is California's top income tax rate a fair value?,Is California's top income tax rate a fair value?
Did Congress Minister DK Shivakumar receive a video of the alleged treasure trove found at his residence?,Is there evidence of the Treasure trove found at the residence of the Congress Minister DK Shivakumar's aide?,Are these videos of the Treasure trove found at the residence of the Congress Minister DK Shivakumar's aide available for public viewing?
Did the tariffs surpass the taxes from the Affordable Care Act?,Did the tariffs raise more of the national debt on American taxpayers than the Affordable Care Act?,Does the tax increase from the tariffs increase the total income of American taxpayers?,Does the tax increase from the tariffs exceed that from the Affordable Care Act?
Did Rahul Gandhi pose for photo with a girl who yelled Pakistan Zindabad slogans in Bengaluru in 2020?,Was the girl named in the photo?,Is the girl named in the photo Pakistan Zindabad?,Did the girl yell Pakistan Zindabad slogans in the photo?
Did Yellowstone officials close Yellowstone park after claiming that the volcano could be exploding?,Was Yellowstone park closed due to volcano activity?,"Did Yellowstone park officials say that the volcano could be exploding by December 18, 2022?",Did Yellowstone officials close Yellowstone park due to the volcano exploding?
Did the law pass in North Carolina?,Did they pass the law for more than 5 miles?,Was there a law passed before the new law was passed?,Was the law passed before the new law was passed?,Was the law passed before the new law was passed?,Was the law passed before the new law was passed?
"Did 60,000 jobs create since Walker was governor?","Did Wisconsin have a specific location for 60,000 jobs?","Did 40,000 jobs create in Madison?","Did 40,000 jobs create in Madison before Walker was governor?","Did 60,000 jobs create in Wisconsin before Walker and Scott took office?","Did 60,000 jobs create in Wisconsin before Scott Walker took office?"
Did Clinton sign these bills?,Are these bills signed into law?,Are these bills considered bipartisan?,Can this bill be considered bipartisan for a year?,Do these bills belong to Democrats?,Did this bill receive passing by Clinton?,Are these bills similar to other bills?,Did this bill achieve success in both Senate and House?
Did Rampyari Gurjar lead an army of 40000 soldiers?,Did Rampyari Gurjar defeat Timur?,Was this victory accomplished by Rampyari Gurjar?,Did Rampyari Gurjar's victory depend on the support of the local populace?,Did this victory occur within the confines of a town?
Does the COVID-19 SARS-CoV-2 virus come from nature?,Did the COVID-19 SARS-CoV-2 virus come from lab testing?,Can the COVID-19 SARS-CoV-2 virus be traced to any other virus?,Can the COVID-19 SARS-CoV-2 virus be traced to any other human disease?,"Is the COVID-19 SARS-CoV-2 virus the only virus to be traced to ""MANMADE"" by scientists?"
Does the Nigeria Osun state have 5 mining licences operated by the Chinese?,Are any of these mining licences owned by China?,Are any of these mining licences operated by the Chinese?,Do any of the mining licences in the state are owned by Nigeria?,Are any of these mining licences operated by Chinese?
"Did Donald Trump say Mike Pence was ""weak"" for not reversing the 2020 election?","Did Donald Trump call Pence ""weak"" for not reversing the 2020 election?",Was Donald Trump's statement posted on the Trump Twitter account?,"Are there other instances in which Pence would have been considered ""weak"" for not reversing the 2020 election?"
Has this campaign been conducted by an Indian government affiliate?,Does the call for this boycott pertain to political propaganda content?,Is this boycott based on this campaign?,Has the campaign targeted political propaganda content?,Has this campaign reached or had an impact on any specific political content?,Have political propaganda content posted by this campaign had any effect on electoral outcomes?
Did more GOP bills receive a public hearing while Democratic bills received fewer public hearings?,Did the GOP allow less than 2% of Democratic bills to have a public hearing?,Did the GOP permit more Republicans bills to have a public hearing than Democrats?,Did the GOP permit fewer Republicans bills to have a public hearing compared to Democrats?
Does the call have a length of time after which you can call back?,Did the call express support for the Uniform Civil Code?,Is the call in the last 10 days for what date?,Have other people called back to express support for the Uniform Civil Code?,iamsanaa@yahoo.com?
Is BioNTech CEO refusing to be vaccination?,Is BioNTech CEO refusing to be vaccination?,Is BioNTech CEO willing to take responsibility for not vaccinating?,Is BioNTech CEO a confirmed provider?,Were BioNTech CEO vaccinated during the year 2020?
Is this election a win for Congress?,Was the poll conducted before the election?,Is the poll highly positive for Congress?,Are any other political parties in the race?,Is the poll completely accurate?,Would this election be very close?,Has a similar poll been conducted for all other political parties in the region?
Is this a policy regarding masks?,Do healthcare workers / caregivers need to use masks?,Do people with fever and cough need masks?,Has this policy been in effect for any time in the last 24 hours?,Has this policy been in effect for any time in the last 24 hours?
Did the UK say that COVID-19 could be managed “like the flu”?,Is Chris Whitty's words taken out of context?,Have Whitty's comments been taken out of context?,Was the UK's government denying that COVID-19 could be managed “like the flu”?
Did this increase in greenhouse gas emissions result in the loss of 575 Texas dairy facilities?,Did this increase in greenhouse gases result in the loss of 58 swine operations?,"Did this increase in greenhouse gases result in the loss of 1,300 corn farms?","Did this increase in greenhouse gas emissions result in the loss of 28,000 beef cattle operations?"
Did there over 2.2 million people at the People's Vote march on October 19th?,Did most people at the march come from Germany?,Did the march coincide with other large protests in the capital?,Is this the largest crowd at the People's Vote?,Did any other protests take place on October 19th?
Did Italy take down the EU flag after the 2022 election?,Did the Italian flag change from the EU to the Italian flag?,Does the flag in question have the same name as the Italian flag?,Did the people who took down the EU flag replace it with the Italian flag?,Did the people who took down the EU flag replace it with the Italian flag?
Has The White House Address Changed to 1600 Black Lives Matter Plaza?,Is there proof that there was a change in address?,Do people agree that the building's address change happened at the time of the shooting?,Would it change the building's address if the shooting was from a white person?
Did an employee of IHOP post a flyer blaming Biden for staffing problems and curtailed opening hours in 2021?,Did Biden fail to respond to a call for a restraining order against Biden on the day of the flyer?,Did Biden publicly thank IHOP employees for their cooperation in managing his employees?
Did this claim come directly from the government?,In which cities did this claim come from?,Was this claim tied to a specific study?,Did this claim make a logical link?,Did the population of this population have higher levels of success in college than the general population?,Did this claim make a logical link between this demographic and college graduation?,Did this claim make any relation to the number of students in high school failure?
Does the last quarter of GDP ever have the negative number zero?,Was GDP in the previous quarter below zero?,Does GDP ever have the negative number zero?,Does GDP ever have the positive number zero?,Is the negative number zero?,Is the average GDP below zero in this period?,Is the average GDP over this period high or low?,Is this statement based on any other data?
Was the video produced by NASA?,Did it have real footage of the moon landings?,Are there any clips from 'Capricorn One'?,Was this film directed by NASA?,Was the Moon landing footage from this film genuine?,Did this film show the actual moon landing footage?,Did this film have real astronauts?
Is there more than 52 free horses needed for rehoming in Ohio?,Is the owner of all the horses diagnosed with Covid-19?,Is there any connection between the Covid-19 and the horses' deaths?,Is a large majority of the horses' deaths in Ohio associated with Covid-19?
Has a poll been published where Reid is trailing in any poll?,Has the poll result been identical?,Have there been other polls with Reid trailing in any poll?,Has the poll come in different sizes?,Has a poll came in different formats?,Has the poll come in different formats for other candidates?
Did Home Minister Amith Shah say that Modi sleeps for 24 hours for the welfare of the poor of the country?,Was Shah referring to the welfare of people in India?,Did Shah claim that Modi sleeps 24 hours for the welfare of the poor of the country?,Whether Shah said this was a fact is unknown.?
Is this picture of a boy infected with coronavirus?,Is this picture public record?,Does this image have medical information?,Is this photo on Facebook?,Is this picture for public display?,Does this photo have any additional information?,Is this picture public record?,Does this photograph have any background information about coronavirus?
Has 70% of ISIS territory in Iraq been liberated?,Is 70% of the ISIS territory that was originally captured part of Syria?,Has there been a re-conquest of ISIS territory in Syria?,Does it have any effects from ISIS attacks in Syria?,Does 70% of ISIS territory in Syria have any effects from ISIS attacks in Syria?,Does ISIS have any effect from ISIS attacks in Syria?
Did Donald Trump inherited a surplus or a deficit?,Did Donald Trump spend over $2.3 billion when he was President?,Did Donald Trump use any surpluses to reduce his deficit?,Did Donald Trump receive an electioneering surplus when he began his presidency?,Did Donald Trump use surplus funds to reverse his deficit?
Is Mel Gibson secretly releasing a 4 part docu series about child sex trafficking?,Is this a true story?,Have these children been trafficked in some way in the years since Gibson made his documentary film?,Is a major part of the proceeds from this documentary going to the governments of these countries?
Have German crime figures increased since migrants were accepted?,Does Germany have a higher crime rate for the same period after migrants were accepted?,Does crime increase in Germany because of migration?,Does immigration contribute to an increase in crime in Germany?,Is there a difference in crime rates between Germany and other countries?,Are these countries better for crime than Germany?
Does he pledge not to raise taxes four times?,Is he a Republican?,Has he signed a pledge to not raise taxes four times?,Is this pledge permanent?,Has he made an agreement to do so?,Has he made any commitments to keep this pledge?,Has the pledge been violated?
Does this event occur in the same time frame as Najib Razak's arrest?,Was the date of Najib Razak's arrest based on the date of his arrest?,Was Najib Razak charged with a crime or a misdemeanor in this event?
Did police warn about the number that began with 140?,Do police still have a record of this call?,Was this call in any of the video's shows?,Are police currently monitoring calls from this number?,Is this call in the video?,Is this call the main reason for police to issue a warning about this call?
Did the Obama administration expect more people to gain coverage under the Obama health care law than the Trump administration did?,Did the Trump administration claim that three million Americans would be able to get coverage under the new law?,Did Trump claim that the new health care law would make it more difficult for people in Florida to purchase coverage?
Did the ECB ever submit a list of accounts relating to Indian citizens?,Did the CBI ultimately agree to submit the list of accounts relating to Indian citizens?,Does the ECB submit a list of accounts relating to Indian citizens after a lengthy process?,Did the CBI finally agree to submit the list of accounts relating to Indian citizens?
Are all people who are vaccinated dead in 2 years?,Has vaccines created more variants?,Do vaccines create more deaths?,Are vaccines creating more variants than can be expected?,Is Montagnier quoting from the scientific literature?,Did Montagnier agree with Montagnier on vaccines?
Do all the states with the lowest unemployment rates have Republican governors?,Is the Republican approach to lowering unemployment rates successful?,Has the Republican approach worked for other states?,Are any Republican governors in all 10 states with the lowest unemployment rates?,Are any of these states with the lowest unemployment rates?,Do any Republicans have a governor for all 10 states with the lowest unemployment rates?
Was Gates Foundation funding a vaccine for coronavirus?,Did Gates Foundation raise more funding for this vaccine?,Is Gates Foundation funding this vaccine on a large scale?,Is Gates Foundation funding this vaccine with a small scale?,Are there any other grants that Gates Foundation has sourced funding for?
Was this man's pelting charge a class B offence?,"Did this man get Rs 1,50,000 for this violation?",Did this man report this violation?,Did this government initiate this incident?,Did the Government receive any other violations from the person?,Was this man disciplined for this violation?,Did this person violate any laws?
Was the SARS-CoV-2 virus engineered in a laboratory?,Did the SARS-CoV-2 virus originate in South America?,Did the SARS-CoV-2 virus originate in Europe?,Did the SARS-CoV-2 virus originate in North America?,Did the SARS-CoV-2 virus originate in South America?
Did the study show vaccines were dangerous?,What are other injuries that kids at 12-17 are more likely to be hospitalized for?,Can vaccines be used to avoid this medical problem?,Did this study prove that COVID vaccines were more dangerous than the virus?,Do these health risks still exist today?
Did the episode of “Mister Rogers’ Neighborhood” have a black police officer?,Did the episode break color barriers in the area?,Did Fred Rogers invite a Black police officer to bathe with him?,Did Fred Rogers invite a Black police officer to bathe with him?,Did Fred Rogers invite a Black police officer to bathe with him?,Did the episode break color barriers in the area?
Did Pelosi on Aug. 31 blocked members of Congress from reading aloud on the House floor the names of the 13 U.S. service members killed in Afghanistan?,Did members of Congress read aloud on the House floor the names of the 13 U.S. service members killed in Afghanistan?,Did Pelosi have any prior conflicts with President Barack Obama in regards to this issue?
Did the New York City Department of Transportation report that black and brown people are 9 times more likely to be stopped and frisked in the city. Did the Department of Transportation report that black and brown people were 9 times more likely to be stopped and frisked in the city?,Have black and brown people in New York City been fined for violating laws?
Did Reulla free De Lima in February 2023?,Did Remulla release De Lima in the next year?,Did De Lima escape from prison during his release from prison?,Was Remulla a member of the Peruvian government?,Did Reulla participate in Lima’s release from jail in January 2023?
Did Biden try to limit alcohol consumption by an individual?,Can Biden limit alcohol consumption per individual?,Has Biden had any alcohol restrictions for this year?,Did Biden try to limit alcohol consumption by specific person?,Will Biden restrict alcohol consumption per individual based on the event in question?,Were Biden’s views on alcohol consumption influenced by the event?
Did the Democratic Party in Ohio raise $1.1 million since the November election?,Was the Democratic Party funding raised from organized labor?,Did the Democratic Party use the money to fund their staff?,Would the Democratic Party use the money to fund their staff if organized labor did not contribute?,Did the Democratic Party have more money in November than in the November election?,Did the Democratic Party raise more than the 1.1 million needed to fund their staff in November?,Would the Democratic Party have increased the amount in November if organized labor had not contributed?
Do the bans come into effect from the day after May 26?,Do all of the bans only apply to the 4am-10pm time period?,Have the government banned telecasting condom ads on TV all day?,Has the ban on telecasting condom ads ever been repealed?
Is there proof of the BBMP spraying medicine in the air?,Did the BBMP use any vaccine in order to combat COVID-19?,Is there a good reason to expect the BBMP to use this medicine?,Will BBMP use this medicine in the past?,Is this medicine safe?
Are prescription drugs at least 20 percent of the total cost of health care?,Do hospital prescription drugs account for 20% of medical costs?,Are prescription drugs an incredibly common part of medical care?,Is the total number of prescription drugs presently constituted only by hospital prescription drugs?,Is the total number of prescription drugs at least 20 percent of medical expenses?
Are the jobs offered by the notification for Scheduled Caste Converted Christians?,Are the jobs available for Scheduled Caste Converted Christians?,Are the jobs available for Scheduled Caste Converted Christians?,Are the jobs offered for Scheduled Caste Converted Christians?,Do Kerala government agencies offer jobs to Scheduled Caste Converted Christians?
Was the Bayerische Staatsregierung aware of Corona pandemie before 2019?,Did the Bayerische Staatsregierung anticipate Corona pandemie before 2019?,Did the Bayerische Staatsregierung make any apologies?,Did the Bayerische Staatsregierung support the apologies of the apologies?,Has the Bayerische Staatsregierung been acquitted of the corona pandemie?
Was this pilot pissing in his cockpit in response to Allah's suggestion?,Was this pilot doing this during his training period?,Did this pilot ever tell an official he had this dream?,Was this pilot pissing in his pilot's cockpit during his training period?,Did the airplane captain of this pilot think pissing increased efficiency of the jets?
Did 86% of Americans and 82% of gun owners support requiring a background check on all gun buyers?,Did 86% of gun owners support a background check on all gun buyers?,Did 86% of gun owners support a background check on all gun buyers?,Did 86% of gun owners support a background check on all gun buyers?
"Has Canada criminalized all CV19 measures requiring masks, distancing, quarantining & vaccines?","Do all CV19 measures requiring masks, distancing, quarantining & vaccines require masks?","Are any CV19 measures requiring masks, distancing, quarantining & vaccines considered to be illegal?"
Did Heineken create a bottle that could also function as a brick?,Did Heineken create a bottle that could also function as a brick?,Was the bottle built to function as bricks?,Did Heineken sell the bottle as a brick?,Did Heineken sell the bottle as a brick?
Did the video exist prior to the crash in Indonesia?,"Did it contain the song ""La paz iba""?",Was there video of a flight attendant meditating?,Did the passengers have a loud voice and were they crying or praying?,Did the footage feature any particular passengers?,Was this footage taken in the near future?,Did the video have footage of the passengers screaming?
Is the BJP the largest party in the world?,Can 2-4 rapes happen if the BJP is the largest party?,Is a BJP leader likely to be the one who is attacked?,Will a BJP attack happen if multiple rapes occur?,Have there been at least 4 rapes in India as of this date?
Is it true that 90% of children who change their gender regret it?,Is there any data to support this claim?,Are there other factors that may negatively affect a child's gender choice?,Did this study conduct multiple studies?,Did this study investigate the effects of gender change on children?,Would this result in a negative outcome if a child's gender choice was in the end completely up in the air?
Is the Simpson-Bowles deficit reduction proposal called for a $2 trillion revenue increase?,Is the Simpson-Bowles deficit reduction proposal a budget proposal?,Are the Simpson-Bowles deficit reduction proposals based on a specific revenue increase?,Do the Simpson-Bowles deficit reduction proposals involve increased funding for the military?
Did the lawsuit involve an injured fan?,Did an umpire blown an important call in this game?,Was the game called in a regular game?,Did anyone witness this incident?,Did this individual sue for damages?,Was this specific player the plaintiff in the lawsuit?,Was this particular umpire well known to the public?
Did this percentage of facilities with the military be reduced?,Did this percentage decrease significantly when the military implemented the FAR?,Did this percentage decrease significantly when the military implemented the FAR?,Did this percentage decrease significantly when the military implemented the FAR?,Are 32% of military's structures at the lowest level of quality?
Does Mitt Romney have facts?,Does the spending under Obama accelerate at a pace without precedent in recent history?,Is the trend in spending in the last 60 years slower than it has been in the last 60 years?,Is it true Romney is wrong to claim that spending under Obama has accelerated at a pace without precedent in recent history?
Was Waters smiling in front of the Trump 2020 sign?,Is this picture unclassifiable?,Was the picture taken on a sunny day?,Is this photo included in a statement?,Can we know this person is an actual Trump supporter?,Was this photo taken in December 2015?,Was this photo taken before the election?,Is this photo associated with the election?
Is the increase between 2001 and 2012 a higher percentage than for the previous two years?,Are these increases comparable to the change between 2001 and 2014?,Is the change a larger trend than for the prior two years?,Can this be measured against trends over time?,Is this change relative to any broader trends in the past?
Are there any records of humans calling the moon from a landline phone in 1969?,Are there records of humans using satellites to call the moon from a landline phone in 2023?,Are there any records of humans using submarines to contact the moon from a landline phone in 1923?
Is the video of the 737 spinning in strong winds from a typhoon?,Did the 737 get some heat after the typhoon?,Will the 737 get some heat after the typhoon?,Would the 737 have suffered minor injuries if the wind from the typhoon were less strong?
Are 36% of Latino kids enrolled at high school unemployed or underemployed?,Are African-American kids enrolled at high school unemployed or underemployed?,Are 51% of African-American kids unemployed or underemployed?,a href=http://www.cbsnews.com/a/story/20060815/bba-n-l-returns-on-the-mba-n-a-s-results/bba-n-l-returns-on-the-mba-?
"Did the total number of cases of coronavirus that were recorded in Ghana increase to 6,989?",Did deaths from the coronavirus increase in Ghana?,Did the deaths from the coronavirus increase in Ghana?,Did the deaths in Ghana increase in Ghana from previous months?,Have total numbers of cases of coronavirus increased in Ghana from previous months?
"Has AAP chief Arvind Kejriwal praised Bhagwant Mann for his decision to quit drinking from January 1, 2022?",Is Arvind Kejriwal the chief of AAP?,Will AAP chief Arvind Kejriwal recommend a CM for Punjab?
Has the measles vaccine killed 108 people in the last decade?,Have people died of measles from the vaccine?,Have 109 people died from the measles vaccine?,Have 108 people died from the measles vaccine?,Is the measles vaccine effective?
Did this picture originate in 2014?,Is the subject in this photo deceased?,Is this event in a public burial?,Was this person involved in the shooting?,Were any of the scenes in this photograph not real?,Is this incident from this past year?,Does this photograph show any resemblance to this event in general?
Is there proof of this claim?,Is this claim based on any evidence?,Is this claim based upon an estimate?,Is this claim supported by data?,Is this claim based on data that is based on data that is outdated?,Is this report based on statistics that are outdated?,Is this report based on the opinions of multiple sources?
Will state not take money for high-speed rail due to the job loss?,Will any jobs disappear if state takes money for high-speed rail?,Will the jobs die if state fails to take money for high speed rail?,Would there be more jobs in the state if state took money for high-speed rail than if the state took money for high speed rail?
"Does Reuters state that Sun Jisu is responsible for shutting down Facebook, WhatsApp and Instagram?",Did Jisu create this hacker account on GitHub?,Did Jisu make this account on another network?,Did Jisu's actions on multiple networks violate international standards?,Has Jisu been responsible for shutting down these services previously?
Is Delhi Public School (DPS) selling face masks?,Is the cost of a face mask at the DPS?,Is there any other cost associated with the face mask?,Are the face masks produced by DPS and sold in Delhi?,Does the DPS sell the face masks to students?
Does Seattle Police Chief Carmen Best ever make such an omission?,Was Best always an enforcer for this law?,Did Best's statement about a law which he does not enforce necessarily relate to these people?,Does Best cite this as a reason for this omission?,Did Best say this omission in his letter?
Was the victim 9 years old?,Was the victim arrested once before?,Did the victim commit the act of rape?,Were there witnesses to the assault?,Did the perpetrator get caught after the attack?,Was the victim released?,Are there any other details regarding the attack?,Were there any witnesses to the assault?
Was Obama interviewed by American reporters in Asia?,Did Obama discuss any Asian affairs in interviews in Asia?,Has Obama discussed the economy in interviews in Asia?,Has Obama discussed any economic issues in interviews in Asia?,Has Obama mentioned any financial issues in interviews in Asia?,Did Obama say any specific issues in Asian interviews?,Was Obama interviewed by American reporters in Asia before the election?
Did this announcing of roads a promise that was kept?,Is this a statement of fact attributed to the President?,Is this a statement of truth attributed to the President?,Has this a statement of facts attributed to the President?,Is this a statement of evidence attributed to the President?
Did the money spent on this race in general be less than for incumbent Milwaukee County Executive Chris Abele?,Did all the money spent on this race total 2 dollars a pop?,Did this campaign spend a total of 42 bucks on this race?,Did this campaign spend more than $90 on this race?,Did this campaign spend $70 on this race?
Are mask mandates insufficient to stop COVID?,Did there have an overriding scientific support for masks?,Has the number of mask users in the United States decreased since 2011?,Are masks more effective in stopping COVID?,Have many mask users found evidence of mask effectiveness?,Have other experts reported evidence of mask effectiveness?
Did Khan spend 27 months in jail for the Samajwadi Party and this statement was made during this period?,Did Khan say Lord Rama and Krishna were his ideals?,Did Khan mention any religion?,Does Khan cite any historical figures as his inspiration?,Did Khan say that it was his ideals to be Lord Rama and Krishna but not Mughals?,Did Khan claim that Lord Rama and Krishna are his ideals?
Is the article true that Iqra was burned after two years in Mandsaur?,Did the couple marry?,Are Iqra's parents Hindu?,Did the couple live together for two years?,Did Iqra burn her husband's home?,Did Iqra burn her husband's house?
Did a Pakistani supporter dancing and teasing fans at the stadium lead to violent clashes between fans of the two teams in the Asia Cup 2022?,Did the Pakistani supporter dance and tease supporters at the stadium when they viewed the teasing on Instagram?,Did the Pakistani supporter dance and tease fans inside the stadium when they viewed the teasing on Instagram?,Did this Pakistani supporter dance and tease fans in the stadium in the day of the teasing on Instagram?
Are all patients who took the COVID-19 vaccine that developed Bell's palsy?,Is this vaccine approved for use?,Are all people with Bell's palsy who took the vaccine that developed Bell's palsy currently in treatment?,Is the potential benefit of this vaccine greater than the risks associated with it?
"Did this study estimate that requiring photo ID would prevent around 200,000 people from voting?","Did this study estimate that requiring photo ID would prevent around 200,000 people from voting?","Did this study assume that requiring photo ID would prevent around 200,000 people from voting?","Did this study determine that requiring photo ID would prevent around 200,000 people from voting?"
"Did China cancel more than 9,000 flights at the same time?","Did China cancel more than 9,000 flights across the country?","Was there no flight movement over China as China cancelled more than 9,000 flights at the same time?",Is there any indication that flight movement was canceled at the same time?,Did this affect multiple flights in China?
Did Joan Crawford have a slogan in the 1970s?,Did Joan Crawford live beyond 7 inches?,Did this ad feature this slogan?,Did the ad feature a quote about the 70's?,Did this ad feature this quote?,Did the actress mention this quote in this ad?
Did this claim come from an interview with an economist?,Did a study compare these penalties between married heterosexual couples and gay couples?,Did the study compare these penalties to married heterosexual couples?,Does this claim also apply to married married couples?,Would each of these couples pay a lower cost over the course of their lives?
Does the Tokyo Olympics have medals for volunteers that mention the word Swayamsevak?,Does the word Swayamsevak appear in the medals given to volunteers?,Has the word Swayamsevak appeared on any books?,Have the people who endorse Swayamsevak come to rely upon these books as their guide to success?
Did the United States shut down domestic oil production a year ago?,"Are 206,000 barrels of oil a day purchased from Russia?",Are there any other countries that the U.S. buys oil from?,Was this a major change from previous years?,Has Russia increased their use of crude oil over the past few years?
Did the media cover up news about the death of the protester?,Did the media report that the victim is an 11 year old girl?,Does the media cover stories regarding police brutality at protests?,Did the media report on an 11 year old girl that was shot and killed by a police sniper during a protest?
Did Clinton send this email to Obama?,Did Clinton send this email to Obama for his birthday?,Does this email contain any information on the pizza arrangement?,Did Clinton email to Obama about the pizza arrangement?,Did this email contain any information about the pizza arrangement?,Did Clinton send this email to Obama with any other information?
Did Sukanya Devi die?,Was Rahul Gandhi involved in any crimes?,Did Rahul Gandhi murder his girlfriend?,Did Sukanya Devi suffer any injuries from the gang rape?,Did Sukanya Devi face jail time?,Did Sukanya Devi experience gang violence?
Do Republicans want to cut Social Security as much as 50%?,Are there any estimates of how much Republicans will cut Social Security?,Are there any estimates of how much Republicans would cut social security?,Is there any estimate of how much Republicans would cut Social Security?,Are there estimates of how much Republicans would cut Social Security?
Did the Obama administration gut the Secure Communities Program and 287(g) immigration programs?,Did the Obama administration completely gut the Secure Communities Program and 287(g) immigration programs?,Do the Obama administration rethink these immigration programs?,Does the Obama administration have a history of failing to implement immigration policies?
Do we know from the passage that everyone in America will pay more in taxes in 2013?,Do we know who paid more in taxes in 2013?,Did this article say that most people will pay more taxes?,Do all people pay higher taxes in 2013?,Does this article say that 85% of Americans will pay higher taxes in 2013?,Do any other people pay more in taxes in 2013?
Did Roque say the poor have no right to be fussy in picking the COVID vaccine brand they will receive from the government?,Was Roque's statement correct in stating that the poor have no right to be fussy in picking the COVID vaccine brand they will receive from the government?
What is the basis of the 2019 report?,Did the World Economic Forum fund this report?,Will fashion be abolished?,Will humans all wear a uniform by 2030?,Will people ever stop wearing clothes?,Will there ever be a worldwide uniform?,What does WWF stand for?,Would WWF fund this report?
Did the official responsible for implementing Daylight Saving Time apologize to Norwegians for making 2020 one hour longer?,Did the official responsible for implementing Daylight Saving Time apologize to Norwegians for making 2020 one hour longer?,Did the official responsible for implementing Daylight Saving Time apologize to Norwegians for making 2020 one hour longer?
Is this a video that shows a fisherman having a sea creature capture?,Did this video show the fisherman taking the video during a photo shoot?,Is this a video showing the fisherman trying to catch a sea creature at Coney Island?,Is this a video showing the fisherman trying to catch a sea creature at Coney Island?
Is this post about an elderly woman seeking to share a post 210 times?,Is this post about an elderly woman seeking to share a post 210 times?,Did this post ask people to share the post 210 times?,Is this post about an elderly woman seeking to share a post 210 times?
Is a sexuality ratio improved in 104 identified districts?,Did these districts have a change in sex ratio?,Have any of these districts seen the same change as the data indicates?,Did this improve in any of these districts?,::0 ::1 ::1 ::1?
Is there a lab for every state?,Do all labs have to have the CLIA certification to test for human patients?,Is there a lab for every state?,Is this a general list of labs?,Can labs without CLIA certification be tested on human patients?
Did the photo show the actual conversions?,Was it done by an official?,Was it documented under any circumstances?,Was the photograph taken within a country?,Was this a natural phenomenon?,Do Muslim families in Uttar Pradesh convert?,Are there any official records or indications about this?,Is it true that there are a number of Muslim families in Uttar Pradesh convert to Hinduism?
Did Tata say that human motivation and determined efforts will make experts' predictions go wrong regarding the fall of the Indian economy during the COVID-19 crisis?,Did Tata say that human motivation and determined efforts will make experts' predictions go wrong regarding the fall of the Indian economy during the COVID-19 crisis?
Did Russia stop the war for six hours?,Did Russia stop war for nine hours?,Did Russia stop the war for six hours?,Did Russia stop the war for five hours?,Did Russia stop war for one hour?,Did Russia end the war?,Did Russia stop the war for eight hours?,Did Russia stop the war for more than eight hours?
"Did Thurmond ""authored major legislation that has provided more than $250 million in tax relief to Georgia's senior citizens and working families""?",Did Thurmond's tax relief bill bring in more than $250 million?,Did Thurmond's tax relief bill bring in more than $250 million in tax relief to Georgia's senior citizens and working families?
Did Vermont regulate people under 21 from owning cellphones?,Did Vermont ban people under 21 from owning cellphones?,Did Vermont make it illegal to have cellphones at age 21?,Did Vermont make any laws about this?,Was this ban legal in Vermont in 2017?,https://fraser.southernia.edu/home/statewide/states_and_provinces/states/vermont-phone-bans/?
Is it true that Bill Gates intends to kill at least 3 billion people?,Is there evidence to suggest that Gates will kill 3 billion people?,Would Gates intentionally do something to kill 3 billion people?,Is the death of 3 billion people inherently a waste of time?,Are there reasonable grounds to believe that Gates will kill at least 3 billion people?
Did Iranian mullahs take American hostages?,When did Iran release hostages?,When did Ronald Reagan take the Oath of Office?,Did Iranian mullahs release American hostages at the same time as Ronald Reagan taking the Oath of Office?,"Was the Oath of Office on August 11, 2001?"
Could Obama add more than $8 trillion to the national debt?,Is Obama the first president to add more than $8 trillion to the national debt?,Does Obama's reliance on the debt for future funding of his programs have anything to do with his future role in Washington?,Will Obama be successful in making a debt repayment?
Does Obama overruled Trump's victory in 2016?,Does Obama need to order a revote to rule Donald Trump out of office?,Does Obama need to order a vote to re-elect Donald Trump?,Is Donald Trump out of office now?,Is the 2016 election in America now in a dead heat with the republican party?
Did Tulfo agree with scrapping the plan?,Was the 4P plan found ineffective in alleviating poverty?,Was the 4P plan effective in aiding poverty alleviation?,Will the 4Ps be scrapped?,Did Tulfo say he was in favor of the 4P plan if it was found ineffective in alleviating poverty?
"Did 10,000 Chinese soldiers die and 150 fighter jets were destroyed in Taiwan?",Was Taiwan considered a safe haven for the Chinese and Japanese soldiers?,Is the Taipei-Taiwan conflict known by any name?,Is the Taiwan conflict known by any name?,"Does Taiwan formally host a country with allies of a similar size, nationality, and origin?"
Did Subianto attend college age 12?,Was Subianto known to be an academic prodigy?,Did Subianto receive an advanced education?,Did Subianto receive advanced education after attending college?,Did Subianto receive a university education prior to running for president?,Did Subianto study in university when he was 14?
Is the poster holding by the men the same as the poster used by protesters?,Are the men protesting the farmer's choice in the enactment of Article 370 or Article 35A?,Are the protesters arguing with the amendments or actions of the article?,Are all protesters members of this group?
Has anyone been penalized for violating the curfew?,Will anyone get incarcerated if they violate the curfew?,Has anyone been prosecuted for disobeying the curfew?,"Hopefully no people in Zimbabwe will be targeted for disobeying the curfew, but if they are, will any of them be going to prison?"
Did Marcos accept the verdict when he contested the election in 2017?,Did Marcos reject the outcome of the Presidential Electoral Tribunal?,Did Marcos accept the decision to reject the election?,Does Marcos have any convictions under the Penal Code?,Does Marcos have any convictions of criminality?
Did Pakistan use US-made F-16s to attack India?,Has the US fined Pakistan $500 million?,Did Pakistan use F-16s to attack India?,Was the US fine more than $500 million?,Did Pakistan know this was a US fine for using the F-16's to attack India?,Did Pakistan fight back against this fine with their own military?
Did the Koch Brothers sponsors a study which shows Medicare for All would save the American people $2 trillion over a 10-year period?,Did the Koch brothers research this study?,Has the study shown that Medicare for All would save the American people $2 trillion over a 10-year period?,Is this study funded by the Koch brothers?
Has metal production in the US always remained constant?,Has the number of workers in this industry fallen steadily since 1990?,Does this include people that are involved in other industries?,Is there any evidence to suggest metals employment decreased since 1990?,Has the percentage of people employed in this industry decreased since 1990?
Would Mitt Romney's tax plan offer millions more tax breaks than under his current plan?,Would the tax increase for middle class families be significant?,Are middle class families going to pay a higher tax for Romney's tax plan?,Would the tax increase for a middle class family be significant?
"Was the Act expired on September 30, 2018 by the Obama administration?",Were the restrictions of the Act repealed by Trump?,Did Trump use the Act as a basis to address an issue of gender violence?,"Did Trump's administration allow the Violence Against Women Act to expire on September 30, 2018?"
Was Biden a leader in a effort to keep out Vietnamese refugees?,Was Biden fighting to keep Vietnamese refugees out of the U.S.?,Was Biden involved in any other efforts to keep Vietnamese refugees out of the country?,Was Biden involved in any action related to keeping Vietnamese refugees out of the country?
Is it true that vote spike charts from 2022 illustrate American election fraud?,Is it true that voting spike charts from 2022 illustrate American election fraud?,Is voting spike charts from 2022 reliable in making elections legitimate?,Does it support the general argument that voting spike charts from 2022 illustrate US election fraud?,Is voting spike charts from 2022 reliable in making elections legitimate?
Did this picture show Parliament Members arguing during elections?,Was it a true image of Parliament Members fighting?,Was this election in October 2020?,Did the image include a woman?,Did this image contain a woman fighting?,Does this image contain a woman fighting in the U.K.?,Did this image include any politicians?
Would increasing the minimum wage increase the wages of these employees?,Do the costs of raising minimum wages compare to the benefits?,Will a higher minimum wage increase have a greater impact on public spending?,Would raising the minimum wage result in a reduction in state and local government funding for state employees?,Would this increase not affect the state and local government budget?
Are any transgender individuals in the U.S. at a higher risk for being murdered than others?,Are any transgender individuals in the U.S. less likely to be killed?,Are any transgender individuals in the U.S. at a lower risk for being murdered than others?
Did New Jersey rank 50th in job creation as a result of the veto?,Is the veto a significant factor in job creation?,Are job creation rates generally higher in New Jersey than in the overall nation?,Are job creation rates in New Jersey low?,Did the Governor of New Jersey veto any job creation bills?
"Did Netflix announce that the fourth season of ""Stranger Things"" would be released in 2022?","Did Netflix announce the fourth season of ""Stranger Things"" would be released in 2022?","Did Netflix announce that the fourth season of ""Stranger Things"" would be released in 2022?","Does Netflix have a production schedule for the 4th season of ""Stranger Things""?"
Is Carolina Panthers quarterback Cam Newton arrested for fixing Super Bowl 50?,Is Cam Newton a member of the Carolina Panthers?,Was Cam Newton arrested before Super Bowl 50?,Is Cam Newton involved in any investigations related to Super Bowl 50?,Is Carolina Panthers quarterback Cam Newton arrested for fixing Super Bowl 50?
Are there any other law of the same type in the country?,Does Florida HB 697 punish sanctuary cities?,Is this legislation identical to previous laws?,Will this be the first law of its kind in the nation?,Are there precedents in the country for this law?,Would this be the first law of its kind?
Is it true that Canadians are spending 12 times less on insulin than U.S. travelers?,Does the insulin they pay in Canada equal the insulin they pay in the U.S.?,Does Canada offer the same medication at lower prices than the U.S.?,Does the price of the medication in Canada equal the price in the U.S.?
Is it accurate to claim that We spend less than 2 percent more every year?,Is it true that this is the lowest increase in spending since they have been keeping numbers?,Is this the first year in which they have been keeping numbers?,Are these numbers accurate?,Is the increase in spending that we have seen most recently accurate?
Does Dick's Sporting Goods offer travel reimbursements for abortion procedures?,Would an employee living in a state with restrictions on abortion procedures be reimbursed?,Does Dick's Sporting Goods offer abortion reimbursements for a state with restrictions?,Is there any other information about abortions that Dick's Sporting Goods should be aware of?
Did Satyajit Ray pose for an Aston Martin?,Did Satyajit Ray pose for an Aston Martin?,Did Satyajit Ray pose before Bond?,Has Satyajit Ray ever been credited with a movie?,Does Satyajit Ray have a history with Bond?,Did Ray pose with an Aston Martin prior to Bond?,Did this person wear an Aston Martin during this time period?,Did this person's image reflect this time period?
"Did the U.S. create 500,000 jobs as of two months ago?",Has the U.S. created jobs at any given time since this statement?,Did Ford and General Motors create jobs since this statement?,Did it take a significant amount of time for this statement to be issued?,Did this statement come at an inopportune time for Ford and General Motors?
Did the World Health Organization approve the Indian student's home remedy for COVID-19?,Did the Indian student need to take the medicine?,Were the symptoms of COVID-19 treated with the prescribed medicine?,Does the Indian student's home remedy for COVID-19 contain any other ingredients?,Does the World Health Organization support the Indian student's home remedy for COVID-19?
Did the Covid-19 vaccine cause more than 40 deaths?,Has the Covid-19 vaccine prompted recalls in response to this outbreak?,Were the Covid-19 vaccines recalled only for this outbreak?,Were there sufficient numbers of deaths from the Covid-19 vaccine to warrant recalls?,Was the Covid-19 vaccine recalled solely for this outbreak?
Did voters of color constitute more than 25% of the electorate in the 2008 election?,Is the percentage of African Americans growing by a significant amount between 2008 and 2013?,Are African Americans making up more than 20% of all voters?,Was the 2008 election a success in terms of the percentage of African Americans voting?
Did antifa flyer encourage activists to disguise as patriots and Trump supporters?,Was the antifa flyer posted online?,Was the antifa flyer distributed to activists on Nov. 4?,Was the antifa flyer circulated among members?,Did the antifa flyer receive a response from the antifa?
Did Abbott leave a tip after dining with a party of 20 people at Rainforest Cafe?,Did Abbott leave a tip after dining with a party of 20 people?,Did Abbott leave a tip after dining with a party of 20 people?,Did Abbott win an election to be governor before leaving a tip after dining at Rainforest Cafe?
Do people drive over Route 66 every day?,Is Route 66 in New Mexico used on special occasions?,"Does Route 66 play ""America the Beautiful"" every day?",Is there any evidence to support this claim?,Is it true that it is popular?,Is the specific location of the part of Route 66 that plays America the Beautiful mentioned?
Did John McCain tell us war could be continuing for 100 more years?,Does McCain suggest war could be continuing for 100 more years?,Is McCain making claims that war can continue for another 100 years?,Are the current leaders in this war happy with the current state of affairs?,Would McCain not support a war that can last another 100 years?
Did the company's health insurance program result in the company going out of business?,Is it likely the health insurance program contributed to the company's need for 20 employees?,Was the requirement required by the health insurance program significant to the company?,Did the health care law require employers with 20 employees to cover all or part of the company's employees?,Did the health insurance law restrict the amount of coverage provided by employers?
Did a number of states claim these numbers?,Did there actually exist any states that possessed these numbers?,Is welfare a better way to make money in the U.S. than employment?,Does welfare benefit higher incomes overall than income in the U.S.?,Was the overall increase in welfare in any state that is mentioned?
Was this event part of the Celebration of Coca-Cola's 125th anniversary?,Is this event the first time this was done?,Are there any other interesting aspects of this article?,Is this event happening on a specific date?,Have this events been held previously?,Is the reason for this event being part of this year's celebration?
Did Trump endorse the act before condemning flag burning in November 2016?,Did Trump endorse the act before condemning flag burning in November 2016?,Was Trump a member of the group that promoted flag burning in February 2011?,Was Trump a member of the group that endorsed the act in February 2011?,Did Trump endorse the act in February 2011?
Was the video circulated with a claim that the policewoman has COVID-19?,Did the policewoman experience a short period of depression?,Did the policewoman appear to be self-conscious while she struggles to stand up?,"Was there evidence that it was impossible to stand up, even after the officer was medicated?"
Did Scott cut education by $1.3 billion in his first year?,Did Scott decrease funding for state universities in his second year?,Was Rick Scott responsible for decreasing funding for state universities in his second year?,Did Scott change or discontinue any of the programs he cut funding for in his first year?,Has Rick Scott been responsible for raising taxes on students at schools?
Did Trump support any specific repeals of Obama era regulations?,Was Trump concerned that repeals of Obama era regulations will cost the economy $890 billion?,Are there any other examples of recent repeals of Obama era regulations?,Did Trump support repealing Obama era regulations?,Was the Trump administration formally supportive of repealing Obama era regulations?
Was DMX arrested for dogfighting in 2014?,Was DMX arrested for other crimes during 2014?,Was DMX arrested for animal abuse in 2014?,Was DMX arrested for animal cruelty in 2014?,Was DMX responsible for killing a dog in 2014?,Did DMX own a dog fighting operation?
Did DEQ's budget decrease 18.5 percent in 2011 legislative session?,Are DEQ's budget reductions on par with other natural resource agencies?,Was DEQ's budget cut before or after other natural resource agencies?,Did other agencies have budget cuts prior to DEQ?,Does DEQ's budget decrease with other natural resource agencies compared to other natural resource agencies?
Is a vaccine for COVID-19 in clinical trial?,Do Dr Mikovits and her colleagues think the vaccine will kill?,Did Dr Mikovits and others say the vaccine will kill?,Did Dr Mikovits claim the vaccine will kill the virus?,Are there any vaccine safety concerns?,Would this five year moratorium help test the vaccine?,Is Mikovits open to making comments based on this content?
"Does this statement require payment every year, also required by statute?",Does this statement cover how much the members pay for a new union?,Is this the same for members of this union?,Is this a clear breakdown in terms of the fees involved in this union?,Is this the only article of this type to be released?
Is this picture a true representation of Barack Obama?,Is the quote on this shirt true or false?,Does this quote reflect Barack Obama's personal endorsement?,Is the quote true or false?,Did Obama formally endorse this quote in a book?,Was this quote taken from a photo of Obama?
Did Rolling Stones perform in Austin city park?,"Did the Stones pay $25,000 to the city of Rollingwood?",Did the Stones perform in Austin city park?,Are there any other aspects of this article that are unclear?,Has this article been reviewed by any other organizations?
Will $50 million of the Robin Hood payment go to public education in Texas?,Will the rest of the Robin Hood payment go to private education?,Will the remaining Robin Hood payments go to other programs?,Is the Robin Hood payment coming from the private sector?,Is there a timeline for when the Robin Hood payments will be restored to taxpayers?
"Did Pelosi consider capturing bin Laden ""making us any safer"" in 2006?",Did Pelosi think bin Laden's killing was historic in 2011?,Did Pelosi claim bin Laden's death was historic in 2011?,Did Pelosi say bin Laden's death was historic in 2011?
Was Trump wearing a protective mask while visiting Ford?,Was Trump wearing a mask for protection?,Did Trump have the mask on for this visit?,Was Trump wearing a protective face mask after this visit?,Did Trump wear a protective face mask when this visit?,Did Trump wear a mask after this visit?
"Could 23,000 chemicals enter the market in 40 years?",Did regulated chemicals account for 40% of chemicals entered the market?,"Could more than 17,000 chemicals enter the market in 40 years?",Does the amount of chemicals entering the market increase over time?,Are some chemicals still on the market?,Does any increase in the quantity of chemicals entering the market lead to a decrease in the number of chemicals entering the market?
Did House of Representatives introduce a marijuana bill titled 420?,Did H.R. 420 address marijuana culture?,Are marijuana culture references used in marijuana bills?,Is the 420 bill referred to a specific culture of marijuana?,Has marijuana culture been mentioned in H.R. 420?
"Is Pennsylvania alleged to have registered over 1,500 defunct people in 2020?","Is Pennsylvania alleged to have registered over 1,500 defunct people in 2020?","Was Pennsylvania alleged to have registered over 1,500 defunct people in 2020?","Was Pennsylvania alleged to have registered over 1,500 defunct people in 2020?"
Did the United States give $8 million a day to Israel?,Did the United States give Israel a blank check?,Do any other countries receive money from the United States?,Did Israel receive a blank check from the United States?,Would any other country in the world receive the equivalent of $8 million a day in United States aid?
Is there any confirmation about Epicurious stopping publishing new beef recipes in 2021?,Was this announcement announced by Epicurious?,Are there any articles about this?,Is it known if Epicurious is stop publishing new beef recipes in 2021?,Is this information available?,Does this article include the name of Epicurious?
Was Stein charged with embezzling money raised for recount efforts to throw a marijuana dinner party?,Was Stein arrested for embezzling money raised to throw a marijuana dinner party?,Was Stein arrested for embezzling money raised to throw a marijuana dinner party?,Is Stein considered to be a high risk for embezzling money?
Did Johnson Controls seek a bailout from the government?,Did Johnson Controls gain a bailout from the government?,Did this story relate to any other company?,Did Johnson Controls get a bailout from the government?,Did Johnson Controls request a bailout from the government?,Did Johnson Controls have a bailout from the government?,Did Johnson Controls receive a bailout from the government?
Did the Office of the President release a memo to all government workers about a 2-day salary deduction for aid for the earthquake victims of Turkey and Syria?,Is there a statement in the memo providing a background about the memo in general. Is there any evidence or indication that the memo was released by a government entity?,Is there an indication that the memo was a release from a public office?
Did all members vote in 2010?,Did some members vote in 2010?,Did any members go to vote?,Did any members vote?,Did any members vote in 2010?,Did any members vote in 2010?,Is there any evidence of any members voting in 2010?,Will any members vote in 2010?,Was this true?
What happened to this individual?,Has the Buffalo protester been arrested 300 times?,Has the Buffalo protester been arrested 82 times for incitement?,Has the Buffalo protester previously been arrested for something other than inciting riots?,Has the Buffalo protester previously been arrested for drug or weapons charges?
Does this plan offer a $5 reward per baby that is born in the U.S. each year?,Does this plan give each baby $5 to stimulate the economy?,Would this plan contribute $20 billion to this economy in four years?,Is the proposal specifically designed for babies born in the U.S. every year?
Does the Sub-Sovereign have the first ever rail funds in the world?,Does the Sub-Sovereign have any rail fund from its balance sheet?,Has the Sub-Sovereign been funding a rail for over 7 years?,Do any other countries have this arrangement?,Is the Sub-Sovereign the only one in the world to fund a rail that is longer than 7 kilometres from its balance sheet?
Was this a video of a Hindu MP?,Has any other videos of Hindu MPs in Pakistan were made?,Did this video show all members of Pakistan's parliament with folded hands?,Is this a news article about a Hindu MP?,Is this a political article?,Is this a religious article?
Did the BJP condemn the Time magazine in 2012?,Did the BJP condemn the Time magazine in 2019?,Did the Congress party back the foreign media in 2019?,Have any of the parties in the US endorsed the foreign media?,Have any of the political parties in the US supported the foreign media?,Have any of the leaders in the US supported the foreign media in 2019?,Have any of the leaders in the US supported the foreign media in 2019?
Did Obamacare remain the law of the land despite efforts to repeal it?,"Does Georgia have less than 300,000 residents below the poverty line who will not have access to insurance under Obamacare?",Was this report based upon any fact?,Is this report a statement attributed to a source?
Did 14 US cities sign climate treaty?,Did US cities sign climate treaty?,Will the cities eliminate meat and dairy consumption?,Does this climate treaty prohibit meat and dairy consumption?,Does the climate treaty require all cities to eliminate meat and dairy consumption?,Was there agreement in the climate treaty?,Are there any comments from cities that signed the climate treaty?
Did 62% of small businesses go under because of health care costs over the last five years?,Could the health care costs be attributed to many small businesses that failed?,Did the health care costs contribute to the failure of many small businesses?,Was this type of reporting true from the data?,Is this information considered reliable by the government?
Is this CDC recommendation from Februrary 2021 valid?,Is this CDC recommendation valid from february of 2017 to Februrary of 2020?,Is this CDC recommendation valid from february of 2011 to february of 2020?,Is this CDC recommendation valid from february of 2009 to february of 2015?,Is this CDC recommendation valid from february of 2012 to february of 2020?,Is this CDC recommendation valid from february of 2014 to february of 2020?,Is this CDC recommendation valid from february?
Are average union wage amounts $950 per week?,Are non union wage levels $750 a week?,Is non union wages the same as union wages?,Does federally mandated average union wage amounts imply union salaries are higher than non union wage amounts?,Is government recommending that union wage levels be lower than non union wages?
"Did the government start the 'Rashtriya Sikshit Berojgar Yojana' to provide relief package of Rs. 50,000 to all ration card holders?",Is the relief package part of any other relief package for ration card holders?,Were any other relief packages for ration card holders started by the government?
Did snow fall in Ain Sefra from December 19 to December 21?,Did the snow have any relation to the Sahara Desert?,Did snow occur in Ain Sefra in December 21?,Do all snowfalls in Algeria involve the Sahara Desert?,Does the Sahara Desert have snowfalls each year in December?
"Are there 33,000 deaths from guns a year?",Does gun ownership contribute to gun deaths?,Is there a correlation between gun deaths and gun-related deaths?,Approximately how many Americans die in gun incidents annually?,Does gun ownership contribute to gun deaths?,Are there any studies that indicate gun deaths cause gun deaths?
Did Rothschild agree with this claim?,Does the 3rd world war to exterminate 90% of the world's population exist?,Was Rothschild's claims true?,Did Rothschild support this claim?,Did Rothschild think it necessary to exterminate 90% of the world's population?
Is this survey related to any other election?,Does this survey predict that 185 seats will be decided by the BSP in December?,Is the survey based on any other polling?,Does this survey suggest that the BSP has a large enough lead to beat the JD(S)?
Did Congress get to keep as much money as the Obamacare industry did?,"Did Obamacare allow Congress to keep up to $11,000 in taxpayer subsidies?","Did Congress actually get to keep $11,000 in taxpayer subsidies?","Did the amount of money spent by Congress in 2011 fall within the $11,000 a year limit per year provided for in Obamacare?"
Was there evidence to support using the legal tactic described in My Cousin Vinny in this case about 2020 voting?,Was this a specific scenario that the US president suggested using?,Does Trump have any siblings?,Did this specific tactic appear in a film?,Did this specific tactic happen in the actual 2020 presidential campaign?
Do all ten tax brackets have a maximum tax bracket?,"Is a $10,000 income level above the top tax bracket?",Is it legal to be in the top tax bracket for income below $9000?,Are there any alternative tax brackets outside of the top tax bracket?,Are any alternative tax brackets inside of the top tax bracket?
"Did Ben Shapiro receive more than $20,000 in Paycheck Protection Program loan forgiveness?",Was Ben Shapiro in any denials of the Paycheck Protection Program loan forgiveness?,Did Ben Shapiro receive a retaliation for filing against the Paycheck Protection Program loan forgiveness?,Did Ben Shapiro receive any retaliation for filing against the Paycheck Protection Program loan forgiveness?
Did Reagan make the deficit bigger or smaller?,Did Clinton get the deficit smaller or larger?,Did Obama fix the deficit in his first administration?,Did Trump make the deficit larger or smaller?,Is Trump’s GDP higher or lower than Obama’s in his first administration?,Is Trump’s GDP higher or lower than Obama’s in his first administration?
"Did the judge determine that 274,000 ballots must be thrown out?",Was the judge’s decision a violation of election laws?,Did voters in Arizona have to vote to overturn the election?,Was the voter registration law in Arizona deemed to violate election laws?,Does this ruling have any impact on voting?
Did Marco Rubio control funds for this campaign?,"Did the amount of $600,000 that were raised went to candidates to improve their chances to be elected?",Is this amount of money sufficient?,Did Rubio control funds for the 2016 race?,Did Rubio control funds for the 2016 race?,Is Rubio responsible for deciding who is approved to be elected?
"Did beachgoers litter Florida beaches with 13,000 pounds of litter after reopening?",Did beachgoers have more litter on reopened beaches after reopening?,Were beachgoers more likely to litter Florida beaches after reopening?,"Were beachgoers less likely to litter Florida beaches with 13,000 pounds of litter after reopening?"
Did Pfizer have a claim of negligence?,Did Pfizer file for a fine for this medical fraud?,Is there any evidence for this medical fraud?,Did Pfizer file a complaint for this medical fraud?,Was Pfizer a party to this medical fraud?,Did Pfizer's actions affect other parties?
Did Enzi give about 84 percent of his campaign funds from PACs?,Did Enzi raise more than any senator of either party in 2009?,Was Enzi's funding from PACs more than any senator of either party?,Is Enzi getting more than any senator in 2009?,Was Enzi's funding from PACs less than any senator in 2009?
Was Saxena arrested in order to help the ISI?,Has any other BJP officials been arrested for helping the ISI?,Did Saxena receive an EC certificate?,Did Saxena subsequently plead guilty or not to any charge related to the ISI?,Has Saxena been given a release date in connection with the bail hearing?
Is there evidence of this child abduction?,Is there evidence of this child found in this trailer?,Is this child accounted for?,Is this a fatal mistake?,Is this child believed to have been involved with drug dealing and/or narcotics trafficking?,Is this child known to have been involved in drug-related activities?
Does voting in both places provide you with more voter choices?,Do you have to be registered to vote in both places if you want to vote for elections?,Does voting in both places require you to register as a citizen?,Does the voter have to be of legal age to vote in both places?,Does registering to vote in two places provide you with more voter choice options?,Does this state have a voting rights checkpoint?
Was CBO's prediction of Medicare cost $9 billion 10 years later in 1964?,Is CBO's prediction correct in regards to medicare cost?,Is CBO's prediction a valid one?,Approximately how much would CBO have predicted the cost of Medicare if you were still in school?
"Did the owner of a hotel in Arosa, Switzerland post signs imposing restrictions on Jewish guests, including asking them to shower before using the hotel swimming pool?","Is the hotel swimming pool located in the city of Arosa, Switzerland?",Are there any signs or notices on the front of the hotel stating that Jewish guests should shower before using the swimming pool?
Is the tourism in West Virginia growing for a second consecutive year?,Has the tourism increased by 58 percent in a year?,Has the tourism in the region grown by a more than 60% in a year?,Is the tourism in the region growing as a whole?,Does the tourism in West Virginia outpace national growth?
"Has the federal government added 200,000 new jobs during the last two years since Obama took office?",Is this claim true?,Were the jobs created at a lower cost than those previously created?,Is this claim based upon actual data from the Census Bureau?,Is this claim true?,Do the numbers for Obama's administration primarily indicate the increased hiring from a new administration or the federal economy in general?
Is there evidence that a mob stormed a poll station in West Bengal during the 2021 state election?,Is there evidence that the mob stormed a poll station during the 2021 state elections?,Is the video of the mob storming a poll station in West Bengal part of a larger alleged riot?
Is it true that 13 Democratic senators have voted against cheaper medicines?,Did any of these senators take money from big pharma since 2011?,Is it true that thirteen Democratic senators have voted against cheaper medicines since 2011?,Did any of these Democratic senators pay for the manufacture of cheaper drugs?
Did Lindsey Graham ever talk about the Republican Party?,Was Lindsey Graham a Republican?,Did Lindsey Graham attend 2016 events during which he badmouthed the Republican Party?,Did Lindsey Graham attend any of the 2016 event he was banned from?,Did Lindsey Graham attend any of 2016 events he was banned from?
Did Trump receive a cease and desist letter from Pharrell?,Did Pharrell win any other legal battles in this context?,Was Trump in violation of the letter?,Is Happy the same title as the song Trump played before the speech?,Did the Trump administration issue the cease and desist letter?
Did Bono make this statement in an interview with Rolling Stone?,Is Bono correct to say Trump is destroying America?,Was Bono correct to say Donald Trump is destroying America?,Are there other examples of Bono making this statement in a Rolling Stone interview?,Did Bono imply that Trump is destroying America?
Did we have a large enough population to sustain a community?,Would we need at least 2 people to accommodate this population?,Would there be 2 population categories?,Would the population be larger in a village?,Would there be a much fewer amount of common traits?,Would there be fewer common traits?
Is this estimate based on actual data from Americans or surveys?,Can this estimate be based on current data?,Does this amount of deaths come from not having health care?,Do these numbers apply to individuals under 40 years of age?,Are there multiple reasons for not having health care?,Is there some evidence to support these claims?
Did WWE sell to Walt Disney Company for $5 billion?,Did Vince McMahon confirm this was true?,Was WWE a competitor to Disney?,Did Disney have the right to purchase WWE?,Can you list other wrestling related entities that had a deal with Disney?,Did McMahon publicly certify this deal?
Did the West Bengal chief minister announce that students of classes 10 and 12 will not have to appear for state board exams in 2021?,Will students of classes 10 and 12 be promoted automatically due to the pandemic?,Does the West Bengal chief minister say that students of classes 10 and 12 will not have to appear for state board exams in 2021?
Are any countries in the developed world spending less on children between ages of zero and five than the United States?,Are any countries in the developed world spending less on children between the ages of zero and five than the United States?,Are any countries in the developed world spending less on children between the ages of zero and five than the United States?,Are any countries in the developed world spending less on children between the ages of zero and five than the United States?
Did the police officer mistook Malik Gibson's pacifier for a gun?,Does the Baltimore police department have a lawful police force?,Did the police officer in Baltimore shoot and kill the child?,Did the police officer shoot Malik Gibson alone?,Did the police officer shoot and kill multiple people at the same time?
Did lawmakers who approved collective bargaining restrictions on public employees exploit a loophole for themselves?,Does the bill directly exempt politicians from collective bargaining restrictions?,Does the bill actually mandate that politicians adhere to collective bargaining restrictions?,Do any politicians have experience in working with collective bargaining?,Does the bill require politicians to adhere to collective bargaining restrictions?
Did the Republican majority a decrease Georgia's voting strength to 32% due to gerrymandering?,Did all of the electoral districts in Georgia go to Democratic?,Did Republicans sway in Georgia's voting strength due to gerrymandering?,Was there a larger Democratic majority due to gerrymandering than Republican influenced elections?
Do people in Karnataka want to vote for the BJP?,Do people in Karnataka want to vote for the BJP?,Do the elections of the 2023 Karnataka state require voter participation?,Are voter turnout rates in Karnataka low?,Have voter turnout rates been higher in the elections in recent years?
Did the Indians attack the fuel station?,Did the Indians attack the fuel station due to a price hike?,Did the Indians attack the fuel station because of a price hike in 2021?,Was there a video of the Indians attacking the fuel station?,Have any charges been filed against the Indians?
Was Prof. H C Verma a member of the Prime Minister's Relief Fund?,Is it true that Prof. H C Verma donated one crore rupees to the PM's Relief Fund every year?,Is Professor H C Verma an Indian?,Did he donate money from his IIT Kanpur education?
Did the nurse in Alabama receive this vaccination in December 2020?,Did the nurse have a CDC-reported death from COVID-19?,Are there any other coronavirus related cases or illnesses that could have contributed to the nurse’s death?,Did this nurse die from COVID-19?
What kind of laser systems does Raese want in the sky?,Did Raese support laser systems?,Does Raese support laser systems?,"Does Raese disagree with a claim of 1,000 laser systems in the sky?",Did Raese make specific statements about laser systems?
Did protesters use saffron flags?,Did protesters use anti Pakistan slogans?,Was this event a protest?,Are there a number of different protests at Jawaharlal Nehru University?,Was this protest event witnessed by any political parties?,Did the protesters use anti Pakistan slogans?
Do many Chinese Confucius Institutes operate in South Korea?,Do all of these Chinese Confucius Institutes exist in South Korea?,Was the German closing 66 Chinese Confucius Institutes in South Korea misrepresented?,Are there many Chinese Confucius Institutes in South Korea?,Are these Chinese Confucius Institutes located in South Korea?
Did this video occur in November of 2022?,Did this video happen after the Feb. 6 earthquake in Turkey?,Did this video occur after the Feb. 6 earthquake in Turkey?,Did this video occur before?,Was this video taken in November of 2022?,Are these cats male or female?,Did this video occur after the Feb. 6 earthquake in Turkey?
Has there been a decrease in wait time on NC school waiting list?,Are 61k children on waiting list in North Carolina?,Does every state have waiting list for school?,Did state leaders try to reduce wait time on waiting list?,Will state lawmakers review waiting list policies and actions to reduce wait time?,Do state leaders know if waiting list policies or actions have led to increase in waiting time?
Did the consent decree approved by Gov. Brian Kemp invalidate all voter ID law?,Did the consent decree allow for fraudulent ballots to be accepted in the 2020 election?,Was the consent decree effective on election day?,Is this election being affected by any voter identification laws?,Did the consent decree allow fraudulent ballots to be accepted in this election?
Do people from abroad count as'semi-essential people' under this definition?,Do Germans work at least 35 years to earn the equivalent of this amount?,Do foreign nationals actually earn as much as the amount of their domestic workers in Germany?,Are people from abroad actually paid in Germany more than the German nationals who earn them?,Are people from abroad paid more than the average worker?
Did the image show a bird dead or injured in the fire?,"Was the fire in this area a ""forest fire""?",Has there ever been a forest fire in this area?,Was a bird dead or wounded in this fire?,Did the fire start or start close to the area?,Are there any other types of fires currently burning in this area?
Does Japan offer the best vaccines for infants?,Are most children not vaccinated under two?,Are American's the highest infant deaths rate?,Do most children in the US receive any vaccines?,Does Japan have the lowest infant death rate?,Is the US the lowest - infant death rate?
Did the elderly woman train her 65 cats to steal from her neighbors?,Did the elderly woman have any illegal activities?,Did the elderly woman know anyone who might have had illegal activity with her cats?,Is there evidence that the elderly woman was indicted on charges of committing crimes?,Was the elderly woman involved in any type of illegal activity with her cats?
Can >70% of the population get vaccinated to reach herd immunity?,Would this be sufficient population numbers to get vaccinated?,"Was the goal of this vaccination plan to ensure that ""herd immunity"" does not occur?",Could this vaccination plan achieve herd immunity by vaccinating the population that were not vaccinated?
Did the ACLU opposition to H.R. 1 cite the threat to freedom of speech?,Are the ACLU and its members committed to free speech?,Were ACLU supporters of H.R. 1 in agreement with ACLU's stance?,Would a majority vote against H.R. 1 constitute a victory for ACLU?
Is there any documentation to show Obama congratulated Putin?,Do any records indicate Obama congratulated Putin?,Did Trump have criticisms for this diplomatic move in 2018?,Did Obama congratulate Putin for Russia's election results in 2012?,Did Obama have criticisms for this diplomatic move in 2018?
Did a corruption involving Broward County result in election fraud?,Did Trump arrest an officer involved in the election?,Did Trump use his power to stop the election?,Did Trump help solve the election fraud?,Whether the election was harmed did Trump use his power to stop the election?,Will Trump receive a credit for preventing the election from being harmed?
Is it true that Muslims and Orthodox Christian Churches agree on all the rules for Coronation celebrations?,Has the police found a reason to believe that these rules apply for Muslim people?,Is it true that Muslime in Coronation celebrations must follow all the rules for Coronation?,Can the police prove that this claim is true?
Did CNN use the same girl in 3 different Refugee Crisis pictures being saved by 3 different men?,Was the girl in any of these pictures from a refugee crisis?,Was this girl's background different from any other refugees?,Did this girl in any of these pictures belong to another woman?,Did these men perform this rescue?
Did Sanders say that he has nearly 200 delegates bound to support his candidacy at the Republican National Convention?,Did Sanders declare that he is awaiting a quorum in Congress?,Did Sanders say that there are 200 delegates that will support his candidacy?,Did Sanders say that there are 200 delegates bound to support his candidacy at the Republican National Convention?
Did 50 percent of the kids who came out of college cannot find a job?,Did the percentage of jobs they were able to find go down with age?,Did the percentage of students who were able to find jobs go down with age?,Did the percentage of jobs that are available go down with age?
Is Facebook's flagship products shutting down for seven days?,Has the Facebook products been shutting down before for this event?,Has Zuckerberg previously stated his products were shutting down for this event?,Has Zuckerberg previously stated his products were shutting down for this event?,Does Zuckerberg hold ownership of Facebook?
Did Clinton and the other Democratic Party leadership supporters of universal health care get the support of most others?,Does the government support universal health care for all children?,Are there any other health care options available for children under age 18?,Has universal health care increased in popularity?,Does the Congressional record show that most other politicians backed universal health care?
Do the Marlins win in the 1997 World Series?,Would the Cubs face the Marlins in the 2015 World Series?,Was Back to the Future II based on real facts?,Was the film The Future II based on real facts?,Had the 1989 film The Future II been made based on real facts?
Did Trump unleash anti-Semitism?,Did 90% of bomb threats come from an American Jewish kid living in Israel?,Was 10% of those bomb threats called in by a black radical?,Did these calls involve an American Jewish kid living in Israel?,Did 70% of bomb threats come from Black radicals?
Was there any other media coverage about this protest?,Did any other incidents occur after this one?,Are there any other antifa related incidents currently taking place?,Does this event have any other controversies?,|||||||||||||||||||||||||?
Did the percentage increase dramatically between 2007 and 2013?,Do they estimate the increase to be at least 4 times larger than 2008?,Did the percentage increase to 17% from 2007?,Have any households in any state experienced a decrease in the percentage from 2007 to 2013?,Are more households getting water services in New York City?
Did the aforementioned report note unemployment will average 10 percent for the rest of the year?,Did the aforementioned report praise the economic stimulus?,Does the aforementioned report call for unemployment to stay 10 percent throughout 2013?,Did the aforementioned report conclude that the aforementioned report was positive?,Does the aforementioned report support the aforementioned claim regarding the impact of the stimulus?
Did the United States C-130 military aircraft crash in Farah Province?,Did the United States C-130 crash in a city in Afghanistan?,Did the plane crash in a province in Afghanistan?,Did the plane crash in Afghanistan before heading to Qatar?,Was the plane carrying more than 300 people when it crashed in Afghanistan?
Are there any information in the article regarding a payment to everyone who shares the post?,Did Paul Allen make this statement publicly?,Will this payment be to the entire party?,Will anyone receive this payment for themselves?,Did Allen make this announcement publicly?,Will Allen receive any funds for this donation?,Is this payment to everyone who shares this post legitimate?
"Does Valley Regional Medical Center in Brownsville, Texas, have patients on staff who are being looked for possible coronavirus infections?",Are any patients on staff suspected to have coronavirus infections?,Does this incident seem to have an impact on the health care sector in this state?,Are the patients on staff suspected of having coronavirus infections?,Does this incident seem to have an impact on the cost of medical care in this state?
Did Nunn run a nonprofit that laid off 90 employees?,"Was Nunn paid more than $130,000 in total for her work in the nonprofit?",Did Nunn make money on the nonprofit while in office?,"Did Nunn earn $310,000 in total per year for her work as a political campaign consultant?",Was Nunn a member of any political committees when she was running for the Senate?
Did they say that the money is in the budget?,Would it be provided to everyone?,Would the tax break be available to people who make more than $1 million?,Was it provided for all people?,Are people making $1 million and above eligible for the tax break?,Was the budget for the tax break provided?,Is it clear whether any of the people making more than $1 million eligible for the tax break would receive it?
"Does the team try to ""reincarnate"" the woolly mammoth by 2027?",Is the team's goal to reincarnate the woolly mammoth the same as the Woolly Mammoth?,Are there any other ways to reincarnate the woolly mammoth?
What are the seven hand exercises?,How do these hand exercises work?,Is there any substantiation for this claim?,Is this claim based on the research or an opinion?,Is the study supported by the Gwalior CMHO?,Can this exercise guarantee a lifetime protection against coronavirus?
Did 150 million people on private insurance?,Does 50 million of those people lose their private insurance every year?,Do 50 million of those people go unemployed or undergo employer changes of private insurance every year?,Are those people under insured?,Are the costs associated with insurance higher than the cost of providing private insurance?
Did Biden say that the filibuster had existed before Biden entered the Senate?,Did Biden say that filibusters existed when Biden came into the Senate 120 years ago?,Did Biden say that filibusters exist when Biden came into the Senate?,Were there filibusters until Biden was president of the United States Senate?
Is violence in Bengal after TMC win the 2021 Assembly Election documented?,Does violence in Bengal after TMC win the 2021 Assembly Election depicted?,Is the image showing violence in Bengal after TMC win the 2021 Assembly Election included?,Does the image include a red colour scheme?
Was the photograph taken during or after the execution of the politicians?,Was the photograph taken at a time when corruption was rampant in China?,Did anyone die of as a result of the crime?,Did the photo appear to show only the corruption of the politicians?,Were there any other types of crimes by the politicians?,Did any of the corruption of the politicians result in execution in China?
Did News Networks cancel the Jan 6 hearing?,Was it confirmed that news networks were no longer going to air the hearing?,Did the hearing end abruptly?,Was it announced that the hearing would be rescheduled?,Was the hearing cancelled after announcement that it would no longer be rescheduled?
"Did Obama vote in the Senate to increase taxes on people who make as low as $42,000 a year?","Was the increase in taxes specifically to people making less than $42,000 a year?",Have any of the individuals who voted to increase taxes in the Senate made at least this amount?,No Answer>?
Did the economy expand by 7.6% in 2021?,Did the economy contract by 0.3% in 2020?,Is it likely the economy would have expanded by 7.6% in 2021?,Are all of the forecasts for growth based on 2020?,Will 2020's results be as strong as 2021's forecasts?
Has the salary increase for teachers in the past 25 years been $29?,Is the salary increase for teachers within the last 25 years correct?,Has the salary increase for teachers in the last 25 years been accurate?,Is the salary increase for teachers in the last 25 years?,Does the statement that the salary increase for teachers in the last 25 years is accurate?
Are the dividends of savings and credit co-operatives taxed at 5% rather than 15% as they are typically taxed?,Do most people agree with these assertions?,Does the report of the Kenya Finance Ministry state that dividends earned from savings and credit co-operatives in Kenya will still be taxed at 5%?
Has the U.S. job market been strong in the last 22 months?,Has putting a large number of small businesses and other companies onto the job market created the most jobs since 2005?,Has the U.S. overall job market been resilient?,Have the number of small businesses and other large employers created the most jobs since 2005?,Has the employment of business owners increased over the past three years?
Did all the missing Hindu men or just some?,Has all the bodies of the missing Hindu men been recovered?,Has a body of one Hindu victim been recovered?,Has any other Hindus been found dead?,Has this massacre occurred in a small village in the city of Kolkata?,Does this have any connection with other attacks in the past week?
"Did Johnson receive a 10 million ""sweetheart corporate payout""?","Was Johnson part of a political party that gave themselves a 10-million ""sweetheart corporate payout""?",Did Johnson receive another 10-million dollar payout from his corporate employer?,Was Johnson actually given 10 million dollar payouts from his corporate employer?
Does this assertion imply that wearing face masks is more harmful to your health than going without one?,Does this assertion imply that it is necessary for people to wear face masks?,Was this statement taken out of context?,Does this claim make any sense?,Do I have a choice in this?,Did this statement come from a respected scientist?
Did Biden endorse Ryan's proposed cuts to Social Security and Medicare?,Is Ryan a senate member?,Was Ryan a senator during Biden's tenure?,Is Ryan a senate member?,Was Biden a senate member in 2018?,Was Biden a senate member in 2016?
Are there other statistics about the number of hospital visits and/or deaths due to not getting vaccines?,Are there any other statistics about the numbers of death and/or hospital visit due to not getting vaccinations?,Are all the stats accurate?,Are all estimates based on the total number of hospital visits and/or deaths due to not getting vaccinations?
Was an internal investigation conducted in respect to the claims against Moore?,Was Moore’s decision consistent with his obligations as an agency officer?,Did the investigation find that Moore’s actions were in accordance with his obligations?,Are these comments related to an internal investigation of the claim?,Is this claim regarding the investigation related to a political incident?
Was A.C. Moore able to close all its stores?,Did A.C. Moore announce it would be closing all stores in November 2019?,Did the store closures affect all stores?,Did A.C. Moore announce it would be closing stores before the shutdown?,Does A.C. Moore have stores in the United States?
Did Modi consume mushrooms imported from Taiwan?,Did Modi's clothes cost around 8-10 lakhs?,Did Modi undergo a full body checkup every day?,Did he undergo a physical examination every day?,Did Modi do any full body work during this time?,Did Modi eat mushrooms imported from Taiwan?
Is the fact that Adani was involved in several Agri companies that are not farming company a statement about the new Farm Bills?,Did Adani have any other companies that were associated with farming companies that could help with the new Farm Bills?,Are any Agri companies associated with Adani that are farming?,Is there any evidence that the new Farm Bills introduced by Adani was influenced by the farmers and their farms.?
"Did NASA scientists declared that Mexico's ""Our Lady of Guadalupe"" artifact is ""living"" in August 2017?",Did NASA scientists make a statement that it is living based on their statements?,"Are NASA scientists aware that ""Our Lady of Guadalupe"" is living?"
Did the teacher pinning down the student 'fart' in his mouth?,Was the teacher responsible for pinning down a student?,Was the Iowa teacher suspended for a prohibited oestrid?,Did the Iowa teacher have any children in his class?,Did the Iowa teacher say that the student did not know it was his fault?
Did Microsoft intentionally introduce a specific font?,Did Microsoft intentionally include hidden anti-Semitic content on the Webings and Wingdings fonts?,Has Microsoft tried to remove the hidden anti-Semitic content?,Is Microsoft working on creating a font that does not contain the anti-Semitic message?
Did two Hillary Clinton employees destroy evidence relating to a uranium probe?,Did each of the employees involved in these criminal investigations have any criminal record?,Did these cases result in any charges against any of the Clinton employees?,Is it possible for Hillary Clinton employees to lose their jobs?,Did the Clinton administration hire these individuals to destroy evidence?
Did Vukmir claim the open records law didn't apply to her?,Did Vukmir lose in the lawsuit?,Did Vukmir spend any money to legalize her own records?,Does the lawsuit involve more expenses than Vukmir's legal fees?,Does Vukmir seem to have avoided a lawsuit?
"Is there a false message that the Nigerian police force is not recruiting 10,000 constables for 2023?","Does the Nigerian police force presently have 18,000 constables available for recruitment?","Is there any evidence that these 10,000 constables are currently available for recruitment?","Does the Nigerian police force have 10,000 constables available for recruitment?"
Will health reforms in Wisconsin reduce workers’ access to employer-sponsored insurance?,Does Obama's health reform plan raise premiums in Wisconsin?,Will Medicaid coverage decrease in Wisconsin under Obama's plans?,Is the increase in dependency a result of Obama's health reform?,Is the reduction in Medicaid coverage an impact of Obama's health reform?
Does Missouri have laws to ban powdered alcohol?,Is Missouri one of those states to ban powdered alcohol?,Does Missouri have legislation to ban powdered alcohol?,Postscript>/postscript> Is Missouri a state to ban powdered alcohol?,/postscript>?
Did the Department of Energy spend $737 million on SolarReserve to create 45 jobs and benefit Ron Pelosi?,Did the Department of Energy spend $737 million on SolarReserve to create 45 jobs and benefit Ron Pelosi?,Did the Department of Energy spend $737 million on SolarReserve to create 45 jobs and benefit Ron Pelosi?
Did the West Midlands Police agree that Adam Ali was killed with a Covid-19 vaccine?,Is Adam Ali a 17 year old child?,Was Adam Ali's death brought about by the Covid-19 vaccine?,"- The West Midlands Police said that Adam Ali was ""murdered"" with a Covid-19 vaccine.?"
Is she against name calling?,Is she against name calling as a form of harassment?,Would she consider a boycott if a name was called out?,Would I be able to rebuff a name being called out?,Would a boycott have affected the relationship between her and the person that called her out?
"Has the U.S. lost 60,000 factories?","Is it true that the U.S. lost 60,000 factories as a result of the WTO?","Did the U.S. lose 60,000 factories as a result of the WTO?","Is it true that the U.S. lost 60,000 factories since the WTO was created?"
Did Clinton personally receive any payment for email classified as campaign emails?,Was Clinton's campaign emails classified as campaign emails?,Did any of Clinton's campaign emails contain any classified memos or other content?,Did this email contain any classified memos or other content related to Hillary Clinton's campaign?,Did Hillary Clinton have any classified correspondence classified as campaign emails?
Did the Japan government re-establish a strict lockdown in mid-May 2020?,Did China re-enact a strict lockdown in mid-May 2020?,Did the Japan government re-enter a strict lockdown in mid-May 2020?,Has the Japan government re-entered a strict lockdown in mid-May 2020?
Is it true that it took 15 years to uncover Chantix's carcinogenic effects?,Are there reasons for being skeptical of something that hasn't even been established/approved for a full 12 months?,"Did the author use the term ""skeptical"" to describe this article?"
Is it true that the Western Cape has the lowest expanded unemployment rate in South Africa?,Is the unemployment rate in the Western Cape lowest in the country?,Is the unemployment rate of the Western Cape lowest among South African provinces?,Is the unemployment rate of the Western Cape lowest in the country in terms of gender?
Does Barbie make more money in one day than Ron DeSantis?,Can Disney's earnings exceed that of DeSantis?,Did DeSantis raise more than Barbie's sales?,Was DeSantis involved in a campaign for Barbie?,- How did DeSantis' campaign perform during the election?
Has a Japanese treasure site been found?,Did people claim the Japanese treasure site has enough gold to load 100 trucks?,Did a Japanese treasure site find enough gold to load 100 trucks?,Has any evidence been provided to support a claim from Facebook?,Is this claim correct?,Has anything been published about the claims about the Japanese treasure site?
"Can ICE Detention cost taxpayers over $50,000 each year?",Does the federal government spend four times as much on each child in our public schools?,"Does ICE Detention cost taxpayers over $50,000 each year?",Does it cost taxpayers four times what the federal government spends on each child in our public schools?
"Has this prototype driverless car traveled more than 300,000 miles without an accident?",Has the prototype driven in this state without an accident?,Are these reports accurate?,Have other states had crash free drives in this state with this technology?,Do these reports support the claim of a driverless car being available in California?
Did Trader Joe's randomly draw a $250 coupon?,Has Trader Joe's given away this $250 coupon before?,Are there any Trader Joe's coupons that are not listed?,Did Trader Joe's randomly draw a $250 coupon?,Is there a limit to how many coupons will Trader Joe's give away?
Was there a reduction in deaths after getting the COVID-19 vaccine compared to flu vaccine?,Were adverse events reported more widely?,Did any of these adverse events result in a death?,Was there a decrease in deaths compared to the flu vaccine?,Did this vaccine increase risk in general?
Did Lee Leffingwell raise property taxes by 20% in the three years he was mayor?,Is Leffingwell affiliated with any political parties?,Did Leffingwell raise property taxes by 20%?,Did Leffingwell raise property taxes by 20% in any of the following year?,Is Leffingwell associated with any political parties?
Could a ban on the Electoral College make Los Angeles County stronger than 43 states?,Are there any existing laws in place for the Electoral College to be abolished?,Do any law prohibit the Electoral College from being abolished?,Would a ban on the Electoral College make Los Angeles County stronger than 43 states?
Did these cops use massive amounts of force against unarmed Trump supporters?,"Was the footage from police released on Jan 6, 2018?",Does this video show officers using force against unarmed women?,Is this video a part of an ongoing surveillance effort by the Department of Justice?,Can you comment on the evidence?
Did Chaudhary want to earn money from politics?,Did Chaudhary announce his intent to be an Independent?,Does Chaudhary want to earn money from other sources besides politics?,Does Chaudhary have any other plans besides becoming an MLA?,Does Chaudhary appear to support all other ideas besides making money in politics?
Is it true that COVID-19 vaccinations will cause kids to become walking factories of spike proteins?,Have there been any epidemiologic studies to show a direct link between COVID-19 vaccines and the spread of COVID-19?,Are there any evidence that COVID-19 vaccinations can contribute to a decrease in the availability of vaccines?
Is the new Cadbury logo identical to the previous one?,Is this logo used on Cadbury products?,Can Cadbury products be bought with this logo?,Has Cadbury had similar logos throughout history?,"i.e., did Cadbury invest in a new logo?","ii.e., has Cadbury partnered with any other products with this logo?"
Did the Florida legislature file a lawsuit against Amendments 5 and 6?,Did the Florida legislature do anything that would retaliate?,Did the Florida Legislature file a lawsuit in response to the amendments?,Has Florida taken any action to oppose these amendments?,Did the Florida legislature file a lawsuit against Amendments 5 and 6 in response to this amendment?
Is the speech in Goa specifically about corruption before the 2022 assembly election?,Does the speech target Congress specifically?,Did Modi personally target BJP specifically?,Did the speech include comments related to corruption before the 2022 assembly election?,Is the speech in Goa specifically about corruption prior to the 2022 assembly election?
Did five conservative Supreme Court justices dishonestly suggest that Roe v. Wade was beyond overturning?,Did any of these justices cite specific instances of dishonest statements?,Did any of these conservative justices vote against overturning Roe v. Wade?,Did any of these conservative justices vote for overturning Roe v. Wade during the confirmation hearings?
Did Uttar Pradesh government pay 19 lakhs to Rajasthan for a UP ad?,Did Uttar Pradesh government pay 19 lakhs to Rajasthan for a UP ad?,Did UP government pay 19 lakhs at midnight to Rajasthan for a UP ad?,Did UP government pay 19 lakhs to Rajasthan for a UP ad?,Did UP government pay any for a UP ad?
Was the man caught and raped by the woman?,Did the woman catch and raped the man?,Was the woman able to identify the man?,Was the woman arrested?,Did the woman respond to the rape victim by setting the man on fire?,Are there any remaining pieces of evidence that support this claim?,Did the man become a suspect?
Was President Trump's announcement true?,Did this official report involve any specific issues?,Does this statement suggest a problem with U.S. border security?,Is this article based on facts or anecdotal information?,Is the story based on accurate information?,Would this statement have been made by another official?
Was Clinton able to get jobs for upstate NY?,Did Clinton promise jobs for upstate NY?,Did upstate NY lose many jobs?,Did Clinton give up on a promise to create jobs for upstate NY?,Did Clinton promise jobs for upstate NY?,Did Clinton want to create jobs for upstate NY?,Did Hillary Clinton promise jobs for upstate NY?
Is it true that Roy Barnes is part of a team that has run up trillions of dollars in debt that Americans will spend years paying off?,Is Barnes's economic policy considered a burden for America?,Is Barnes's economic policy considered a burden for America?,Is Barnes's economic policy considered a burden for America?
Did COVID get worse the year prior?,Were the Hurricanes they blamed for the COVID not mentioned in the article?,Does the article support this statement?,Are there any other examples of the same claim being made about COVID?,Are any other sources out there confirming this claim?
Did Fonda suggest Barron Trump should be kidnapped as a protest?,Did Fonda suggest Barron Trump should be kidnapped as a protest against the president's immigration policy?,Did Fonda tweet about a protest against immigration policy in June 2018?,Did Fonda tweet about a protest against immigration policy in June 2018?,Did Fonda post a tweet about Barron Trump in June 2018?
Did the earmarks be included in the final federal spending bill?,Did the earmarks directly benefit potato pest management in Wisconsin?,Did this bill include any additional federal funding?,Did the earmarks take part in a joint legislative program or legislative process?,Did the earmarks result in the bill's passing?
Did Carter hold a town hall in 5 years?,Did Carter hold a town hall in 5 years?,Was Carter not able to hold a town hall in 5 years?,Does Carter hold a town hall in the next five years?,Has Carter held a town hall in the next 5 years?
Is middle class defined to include those with income between 20 and 60k?,Are middle class definitions considered as comprehensive?,Are there other definitions that are slightly less specific?,Can middle class definitions be more expansive than this one?,Is the middle class defined to include individuals with income between 20 and 60k?
Has there been any investigation into the purpose of the Renuzit can design?,Has there been any evidence of phallic depictions in the design?,Has Renuzit taken a position against phallic depictions in designs?,Have there been any additional studies conducted on the use of phallic images in Renuzit?
Is 7 Eleven offering a $100 coupon for a survey?,Does 7 Eleven want to give away $100 in coupons?,Is 7 Eleven giving away coupons in exchange for surveys?,Does 7 Eleven offer any other incentive to sign surveys?,Is 7 Eleven providing a $100 coupon as a reward?
Does a school year have to last from April until October?,Is $50k a typical salary for teacher in NC?,Does special session have to occur every day?,Does it generally cost less than a year?,Do teachers receive a pay raise for special session?,Are there benefits to special session?
"Did Bill Gates claim the COVID-19 vaccine would kill or disable 7,000,000 people?",Is COVID-19 the only COVID that can be vaccinated?,Can this vaccine have any long-term effect on anyone?,"Is Bill Gates claiming that COVID vaccine kills and disables 7,000,000 people?",Is Bill Gates not opposed to using vaccines to prevent COVID?
Did the flag created in Kerala commemorate Yogi Adityanath?,Did the flag also include people of other political parties?,Are people in Kerala associated with this party?,Has the formation of this flag been documented?,Does the flag have images?,Did the formation of this flag occur in any other state?
Did Putin stop the war for six hours to evacuate Indian students?,Did the war last for six hours - for how long?,Did it last more than one hour?,Did Putin help the Indian students evacuate - for how long?,Was the Indian students evacuated in - for how long?,Did Putin take action as a result of the Indian students' evacuation - for how long?,Did Putin stop the war for 6 hours to evacuate Indian students?
"Is there any evidence that the Tanzania president sent fruit, quail, and goat samples to the lab?",Can the Tanzania president be considered to be responsible for this incident?,Is there any evidence the Tanzania president was involved in the case?,Did this happen to any other human specimens as well?
Was the NAACP's Ohio chapter supportive of Issue 2?,Did a majority of the voters in Ohio endorse Issue 2?,Does the NAACP support racial equality in Ohio?,Has the NAACP endorsed Issue 2 in Ohio?,Has the NAACP endorsed Issue 2 in Ohio?
Was DMX caught smoking crack at age 14?,Was DMX aware he smoked crack in class?,Did DMX use crack in class?,Did DMX use crack in class?,Was DMX known for using crack in class?,Did DMX mention that he used crack in class?
"Is there any evidence Nunn saved 2,000 Americans abandoned in Afghanistan?",Was Nunn known to have an interest in private rescue missions in Afghanistan?,Did Nunn participate in the rescues of these Americans?,Did Nunn conduct the rescues himself?,Does Nunn have a prior record with rescuing people that he has saved?
Is student loan income on target between 2007 and 2012?,Is Student Loan income on target from 2007 to 2012?,Does federal government loan income on target between 2007 and 2012?,Does student loan income on target between 2007 and 2012?,Is the student loan income on target for the government?,Is the federal government making profits on student loan income between 2007 and 2012?
Did the aid given to 31 districts come from the state budget?,Did the aid come directly from the state budget?,Does the state support more districts than states?,Does the state support any district more than 1 percent of funding from the budget?,Did the state support any district more than one percent of funding?,Did the state support any district more than one percent of funding from the budget?
Would water in Waterplace Park in Providence and Wickford Village flood due to climate change?,Will sea levels in Waterplace Park in Providence and Wickford Village flood due to climate change?,... Would water in Waterplace Park in Providence and Wickford Village flood due to climate change?,... Will water in Waterplace Park in Providence and Wickford Village flood due to climate change?
Do 90 geretteten dogs from a veterinary veterinary laboratory get to be sprayed?,Do 90% of gersüchtete dogs from veterinary veterinary laboratories get sprayed?,Does sprayed urine become the primary veterinary chemical for a veterinary animal?,Is the total number of griesüchtete dogs in a veterinary laboratory less than 90?
Has Amul fired any employees that consume beef?,Is Amul responsible for the firing of these employees?,Is Amul responsible for hiring workers for these businesses?,Has Amul fired employees for employing these businesses?,Can Amul be sued for retaliatory actions against these businesses?,Can Amul be sued for retaliation for hiring these companies?
Did notices be sent to all Jewish residents of one Ukraine city?,Are these notices intended to get people to identify themselves as Jews?,Was this particular Ukrainian city mentioned in the article?,Are these notices intended to force people to identify themselves as Jewish?,Have other similar Jewish communities experienced the same notices?
"Did Romney propose a tax cut that gave an average of $250,000 to every millionaire in this country?",Did Romney proposal tax cuts for every millionaire in the country?,Was Romney's plan for a tax cut different than those proposed by President Trump?,Does Romney's plan offer tax cuts to every millionaire in the country?
Is one in five of our children on food stamps?,Are food stamps only used for certain items?,Can one person with food stamps access all food stamps?,Is one out of five children on food stamps?,Is it more common for one person to access food stamps than for several people?
Did Trump increase child migration by 28% in Trump's administration?,"Did Trump increase migration by 31% in 2019. Did Trump increase migration in January, February, and March every year?","Was the growth rate in January, February, and March in Trump's administration?",Was Trump's 2016 administration viewed as lenient towards children?
Will mail in ballots lead to massive electoral fraud in 2020?,Will postal ballots result in ballot fraud in 2020?,Is there any evidence that mail-in ballots result in election fraud in 2020?,Have these allegations been proven in actual polling?,Was it alleged that mail in ballots result in voter fraud in 2020?
Was the January 6 committee disbanded right after the release of the new footage?,Did the February 1st video show that the New Mexico Board of Education was disbanding?,Is there more evidence to show that the January 6 board disbanded right after the release of the new footage?
Is it true that consuming 3 carrots provides enough energy to walk 3 miles?,Can eating 3 carrots provide more energy?,Is it possible for me to walk 3 miles if I eat 3 carrots?,Is it necessary to take 3 carrots every day if I walk 3 miles?
Does the video show Wasim Rizvi getting thrashed in Punjab?,Did Rizvi's PIL seek removal of 26 verses from Quran?,Has Wasim Rizvi been thrashed in Punjab previously?,Did Wasim Rizvi's PIL request have any positive effect on the Supreme Court?
Did job growth under Republican president Barack Obama peak at 9.2% at the time of his election?,Has unemployment decreased by more since Johnson's election to governor?,Did Johnson's economic agenda contribute to this decline?,Is Obama's political career in jeopardy?,Will the Democratic governor's support for President Obama's economic policies continue to increase?
Was there any evidence of a racial attack on christians?,Are there any instances of mass crimes against christians?,Is there any evidence of racial attack against christians?,Will 10 years jail be given to those guilty?,Did the Supreme Court pass a court emergency?,Was it unanimously in support of this judgement?,Is there any evidence of a racial attack against christians?
Is it true police are advising people not to pick up calls from number starting with 140?,Has there been a report of such calls?,Is it true all calls to number starting with 140 are made by police?,Does this report have any context to them?,"Is this report about people receiving these calls, or is it just a general warning?"
Did Biden visit ground zero after 9/11?,Did Biden visit the Twin Towers on 9/11?,Did Biden attend the New York City Olympic games on 9/11?,Did Biden visit the New York City Olympic pool on 9/11?,Did Biden attend the New York City Olympic pool on 9/11?,Did Biden hold a conference about 9/11 on 9/11 on the morning of 9/11?
Is it true that Brazil used Smartmatic voting machines to “steal” the 2022 election?,Did Brazil’s voting machines steal the election?,Did the U.S. election vote with Smartmatic voting machines?,Is it true that the 2022 presidential election was manipulated like the 2020 election?
"Are there 2,000 graduates per year?",Do many people graduate every year?,Are the numbers reported based on an average of 5 graduates per year?,Is the percentage of graduates based on a typical cohort of students/seniors?,Are people who graduate typically from school in general?,Do high school graduation rates have an effect on college access/prices in general?
Was the light visible the night sky before the 7.1 earthquake?,Was there an earthquake before the 7.8 earthquake?,Have there been other tremors before the earthquake in Turkey?,Has there been a similar event in Turkey in the past year?,Did people in Turkey get hit with a 6.4 earthquake prior to the 7.2 tremor?
Did the Russian annexation of Crimea significantly affect a million residents of Ukraine?,Does the Russian annexation of Crimea reduce the Ukrainian population as a result?,Did this annexation cause the margin of victory of the pro-Moscow Prime Minister?,Does the Russian annexation of Crimea have any positive or negative effects on the citizens of Ukraine?
Did they stop the traffic going through the road that morning?,Was the traffic the same after that afternoon?,Would there be more traffic by the afternoon?,Were the traffic in the area less clogged than before?,Did the traffic in the area that morning be the same before that afternoon?,Were the people that were going to the area who were driving the vehicles when they came to stop?
Was this claim supported by official records?,Did these records reflect the circumstances of these states' experiences?,Did this claim appear in the media?,Did this claim make it into the New York Times?,Did this claim reflect the circumstances of California's history?,Did these actions appear in the Times?,Does this claim reflect California's experience?
"Did Radcliffe announce that he would reprise his role as Harry Potter in the new movie called ""Harry Potter and the Cursed Child?",""" Did Radcliffe announce that he would reprise his role as Harry Potter in the new movie called ""Harry Potter and the Cursed Child?",""" Did Radcliffe announce that he would reprise his role as Harry Potter in the new movie called ""Harry Potter and the Cursed Child?",""" Did Radcliffe announce that he would reprise his role as Harry Potter in the new movie called ""Harry Potter and the Cursed Child""?"
Did these six people get listed in the book?,Is there a specific name or nationality of the Indians that were listed?,Did these six Indians have any significant contributions in the world?,Is any of the Indians listed in the book in any way related to war?,Is there any other article associated with these Indians?
Did Baalu boast about demolishing 100-year old temples?,Is this statement true?,Does Baalu deny that the temples were destroyed?,Relevant of the law  Can this statement be used in the context of the present situation?,Can Baalu make these claims in other instances?,Do these people still believe the claim to have been made?
Did people lie and fight in Paris videos from 2016?,Was this video from the year 2016?,Did there are people in this video from the year 2016?,Was the video filmed in or near Paris?,Did it show people in Paris lying and fighting?,Does this video show people in Paris in 2016?
Did Abercrombie make a late night visit to Kinko's?,Did Obama reveal Obama's birth certificate?,Did Abercrombie make a late night visit to Kinko's forging his birth certificate?,Did Obama reveal the birth certificate to the media?,Did Abercrombie make a late night visit to Kinko's to forge Obama's birth certificate?
"Was the reference to ""6MWE"" referring to the 6 million Jews murdered during the Holocaust?","Did ""6MWE"" have its origin in ""6 million wasn't enough""?","Is there evidence that ""6MWE"" stands for ""6 million wasn't enough""?",Was there data showing that there were 6 million Jewish deaths during the Holocaust?,"Did the sentence on the ""6MWE"" page have a reference to this specific group of people?"
Did antifa injure anyone in a violent clash with police?,Did any members of antifa join the police?,Did any members of antifa have political affiliations?,Did any members of antifa commit terrorism?,Did any members of antifa support President Trump?,Did any members of antifa commit crimes with police?
Did the community of Rabbit Hash elect a French bulldog named 'Wilbur Beast' as its mayor in 2020?,Was the community of Rabbit Hash incorporated in 2020?,Did the French bulldog named 'Wilbur Beast' represent the community of Rabbit Hash?
Do more white families have children if the government doesn't require one child if white families have kids?,Has this policy been in place for a long time?,Is this policy only in place for specific white families?,Does this policy include non-white families?,Does this policy ring true for African Americans?
Was Tejashwi CM or deputy CM?,Will Tejashwi make this promise?,Does Tejashwi have other promises that he might make when he is CM?,Will Tejashwi actually fulfill these promises?,Will Tejashwi's promise of 10 lakh jobs be fulfilled?
Did Ocasio-Cortez think 9/11 photos were triggering?,Is the response to Ocasio-Cortez's statements similar to other media outlets?,Do the images Ocasio-Cortez cites tamper with her viewpoints?,Does Ocasio-Cortez's position imply there should not be photographs of 9/11?,Is the response to Ocasio-Cortez's statements similar to the current media outlets?
Did the administration create and retain an amount of jobs in Ohio?,Does this total number of jobs have come from the workforce that the administration has created?,Is this number a total of jobs in Ohio?,Has this number of jobs produced a benefit for the economic development of the state?,Can this number be analyzed in the context of unemployment overall?
Has Democratic leader Sen. Sanders fought to prevent the use of ACT/SAT testing standards under her leadership?,Did Democrats work on the 2011 HOPE bill?,Are ACT/SAT testing standards not included in the HOPE bill?,Did Democrats work on the 2011 HOPE bill?,Did Democrats fight to prevent the use of ACT/SAT testing standards under her leadership?
Did Hitler say that he will start world war 3?,Did Hitler make this remark before he died?,Was there any evidence that this remark was made after his death?,Is this specific quote representative of all of Hitler's statements?,Has this quote been verified?,Did Hitler state this remark in an interview?
Did Russian and Ukrainian retaliatory actions against the Ukrainians exacerbate the Russian war in Ukraine?,Was the US involvement in the Russian war less significant than the War with Ukraine?,Was the US involvement in Russia less than the War with Ukraine?,Did lowering electricity bills make any sense for the Russian and Ukraine war?
Are there any restrictions in place to ban barrel racing in 2018?,Is there any legislation to ban barrel racing in 2018?,Does any law in place to ban barrel racing prohibit people from racing in 2018?,Are any restrictions in place to ban barrel racing on a national level?,Does any law prevent people from racing in 2018?
Did Clinton testify in court?,Was Clinton forced to testify?,Did Clinton admit to doing all the wrong things?,Did Clinton testify at the 1999 Senate impeachment trial?,Did Clinton testify in court for the rest of the trial?,Did Clinton testify for the rest of the trial?,Did Clinton testify in the Senate trial?
Is there no evidence swimmer Reka Gyorgy tweeted that trans athlete Lia Thomas stole her NCAA finals spot?,Was there any proof Gyorgy tweeted that Lia Thomas stole her NCAA finals spot?,Was Gyorgy referring to Lia Thomas in her tweet?,Did Gyorgy report this incident to anyone?
Is it true that Fauci believes Americans should continue to be vaccinated?,Does Fauci say full vaccinated Americans are recommended for a booster shot?,Does Fauci offer any evidence that booster shots are required?,Does Fauci mention the issue of booster shots?,"Was Fauci's statement made on Feb 16, 2022?"
Did Democrat nominees wait three times longer to receive confirmation votes than GOP predecessors?,Did the democrat nominees waited longer to receive confirmation votes than the Republican predecessors?,Are there any other factors that could have prevented democrat nominees from getting confirmation votes?,Are there other factors that could have prevented democrat nominees from getting confirmation votes?
Did the customer receive payment for the delivery?,Is there proof of fraud in this case?,Did the person use Zomato to take a payment?,Can this guy claim this was a scam or just an accident?,Is this food delivery guy connected to any crime?,Has this alleged transaction been reported in any newspaper?
"Did Clinton say in this quote ""We're all going to hang from nooses""?",Was Clinton's statement the first time to claim he said this in this phrase?,Was the sentence attributed to Donald Trump?,Does this claim represent a generalization in regards to Donald Trump?,"Did Hillary Clinton specifically speak of hanging ""all of us from nooses"", even though she did not specifically say so?"
Are the people charged in the assault in solitary confinement for six months?,Are the people charged in the attack in solitary confinement for a total of eight months?,Do the people charged in the assault in solitary confinement have any prior record of trespassing?,Do these trespassers have a record of non-violence?
Did London close 500 churches in 2014?,Did London open 423 new mosques in 2014?,Did London close 500 churches in 2014?,Did London close 500 churches in 2014?,Did the cities close 500 churches in 2014?,Did the cities open 423 new mosques in 2014?,Did the cities close 500 churches in 2014?
"Did Pelosi use $15,000 worth of pens to sign the articles of impeachment?",Did Pelosi have any items of personal value from the articles of impeachment?,Was the items of personal value from the articles of impeachment valuable?,Did the articles of impeachment contain any items of personal value?,Did the articles of impeachment contain any items of personal value from the articles of impeachment?
Did Barack Obama propose one thing that would change the lower tax rate of Warren Buffett?,Did Obama plan to lower the tax rate of his own staff by raising the rate of the tax brackets he proposed?,Did Obama propose one thing that would change the lower tax rate of Buffett?,Did Obama change his proposal so that the tax rate is lower for Buffett?
Could less than 10% of Atlanta's transportation needs be covered by a 1 cent sales tax?,Are only 10% of Atlanta's transportation needs covered by the sales tax?,Would a 1 cent sales tax increase cost Atlanta one-tenth as much as other tax revenues?,Will the sales tax increase support a reduction in other income taxes?,Is the city's transportation plan adequately funded by other revenue sources?
Did a majority of Americans support keeping Title 42 in place?,Was the majority of Americans in favor of keeping Title 42 in place?,Were the majority of Americans in favor of maintaining Title 42?,Was it hard to find evidence that Americans approved of keeping Title 42 in place?,Was there a significant majority of Americans in favor of keeping Title 42 in place?
Is the right to work bill approved in the state of Texas?,Does the right to work bill require employers to hire additional workers to fill these positions?,Is the right to work bill currently being debated in Texas?,Do the rights to employment and wage equality bills that the state is pursuing are the same bill?
"In August 2023, Disney canceled the live-action ""Snow White"" movie starring Rachel Zegler and Gal Gadot. Is Snow White still being produced?",Is a third Snow White movie in development?,"Did Disney cancel the live-action ""Snow White"" movie in August 2023?"
Are we currently spending more than 40% of every dollar on U.S. debt?,Does the United States currently borrow more than 40% of every dollar?,Are federal debt payments a significant percentage of our federal debt?,Do federal government debt payments primarily contribute to U.S. debt?,Do current government debt payments contribute to U.S. debt?
Is there a link to their letter?,Does this person want the money back?,Did these people ever give me money?,Is this person affiliated with this company?,Were the people referred to here to be an authentic source?,Was this person not charged with money laundering?,Have these people contributed any money to this project?
"Did the state add 135,000 jobs last year?",Did the state create more jobs than any other state in 2010?,Was the number of jobs created by the Florida workforce higher than any other state in the country?,Did the Florida workforce create more jobs in the first 11 months of 2011?,Did the total number of jobs created for the first 11 months of 2011 exceed the total number created in the first 11 months of 2010?
Is it true that Kashmir lit fireworks to celebrate Pakistan's victory over India?,Was the event in Kashmir held within a week of Pakistan's victory?,Did the incident take place outside a hotel on the same day?,Is the event in Kashmir considered a national holiday?,Did it occur outside of a hotel on September 4?
Can Obama's plan cut rates while still bringing revenue to the middle class?,Does Obama's plan reduce middle class income taxes?,Is Obama's plan based on research?,Does Obama's plan include raising middle class income taxes?,Does this tax plan help middle class?,Is Obama's plan based on research?
Does this minimum wage create prosperity?,Will workers be able to get out of poverty?,Would there be any other benefit to this minimum wage?,Will the minimum wage increase in the future?,Would an increase in the minimum wage provide more money for an entire family?,Are the proposed minimum wage increases in the future expected to lead to wealth creation?
Did Khrushchev bring an extra shoe to a United Nations session?,Did Khrushchev bang on a desk during a UNO session?,Does Khrushchev say that the extra shoe he brought in protest was a shoe from a pair of white shoes?,Did Khrushchev bang on a desk during a UNO session in 1960?,Did Khrushchev bange on a desk during a UNO session?
Did the Reagan Recovery create 25 million jobs?,Would the Trump era economy have created 25 million new jobs?,Would the GOP recover the economy to the Reagan recover rates?,Would the Reagan era economy have had a significant effect on the government?,Would the Trump era economy have a significant impact on the federal revenue?
"Is the Centre offering 3,500 per month?","Is the Centre offering 3,500 per month to unemployed youth?","Will the scheme provide  3,500 per month to unemployed youth?",Will this initiative provide youth the opportunity to work towards a better life?,Will this program be implemented under any other government plans?
Is the current cost of health care cheaper than it was 50 years ago?,Are the current costs of healthcare higher than they were 50 years ago?,Does current state of health care affect the affordability of health care?,Does the current state of health care affect the cost of health care?,Is the current state of health care cheaper than it has been in 50 years?
Did Kolkata Police arrest 63 madrasa children?,Did 63 madrasa children attend terrorist training schools in Kolkata?,Was Kolkata police training terrorists?,Was the amount of terror training in Kolkata related to terrorist training?,Did police arrest all the alleged terrorists?,Did the alleged terrorists attend training in terrorist schools?
"Did anyone ever search ""How to Hit a Woman So No One Knows""?",Did there ever actually have a spike in the use of this term?,Was this topic of interest more popular during this period?,Was the amount of popularity for this topic higher during this time period?,Does this mean that the phrase How to Hit a Woman So No One Knows was used on a larger basis then this?
Did the passenger have a bad vagina odor?,Was the plane forced to make an emergency landing?,Did the plane need to go out of the plane to get to the airport?,Did the airplane need to make a stop?,Was the plane able to make a run after the landing?,Was the plane flying on a budget airline?
Did Prince invest in Nike in 1971?,Did Prince recruit Michael Jordan to Nike in 1983?,Did Prince design the first Air Jordan?,Did Prince not recruit Jordan in the year of 1983?,Is there evidence to substantiate Prince investing in Nike?,Is there any indication that Prince was involved in the designing of Jordan shoes?
Did poster saying Modi was popular put up before G-20?,Did posters showing Modi's popularity put up before G-20?,Was there anyone who actually had poster showing Modi's popularity before the G-20?,Did anyone give out posters showing Modi's popularity before the G20?,Did any posters show Modi's popularity before the G-20?
Was Goa the first state in India to achieve 100% vaccination?,Was Goa the first state to achieve 100% vaccination?,Did Goa achieve 100% vaccination?,Has Goa achieved 100% vaccination in any other state?,Have other states in India achieved 100% vaccination in recent years?,Has Goa achieved 100% vaccination in any other state?
Did the article in The Lancet prove COVID-19 mRNA vaccines are increasing people’s chances of contracting the disease after seven months?,Did the article present information about COVID-19 mRNA vaccines by means of a study?,Does the article argue that COVID-19 mRNA vaccines increase people's chances of contracting the disease after seven months?
Is it true that I was forced to vote for Shiv Sena?,Was I forced to vote for Shiv Sena during 2019 Lok Sabha elections?,Did this election happen while my mother worked with Shiv Sena?,Did Shiv Sena win this election?,Did this election result in any losses to S&B?
Did Dugan murder his wife?,Did Dugan commit suicide?,Did Dugan have children?,Did Dugan commit suicide?,Are there any other aspects of this story consistent with Dugan's description?,Are there any other significant characteristics of this man?,Was Dugan at fault in any aspect of this murder?
Is Donald Trump's donation to ensure that Dylann Roof was transferred to a safer prison?,Did Donald Trump donate the amount required to transfer Roof to a safer prison?,Did Trump donate funds to ensure that Roof was moved to a safer prison?,"Do Trump's donors use their donation to ensure that ""safer prisons"" are made?"
"Would there be 500,000 jobs created by purchasing $10 billion in goods from Walmart?","Would there be 500,000 jobs created by purchasing this products from Walmart?","Would Walmart employ 500,000 jobs?","Does Walmart employ 500,000 jobs?","Do Walmart hire 500,000 jobs?","Do Walmart employ 500,000 jobs?","Do Walmart employ 500,000 jobs?"
Did federal employees owe $3.3 billion in back taxes?,Is the government in violation of the 'Do As I Say Not As I Do' policy?,Did Congress consider the possibility that the IRS could file a tax bill against the federal employees?,Is the Department of Justice involved in the IRS investigation of the federal employees?
"Did the West Virginia Department of Education report over 10,000 children and youth who have been identified as homeless during the 2018-2019 school year?","Did the West Virginia Department of Education report that more than 10,000 children and youth had been identified as homeless during the 2018-2019 school year?",Was the West Virginia Department of Education the source of the reported number of children and youth who had been identified as homeless?,Did any of the children who were identified as homeless travel to a school?
Are Canadian dairy tariffs a fair policy?,Has Canada been charging the US a 250% tariff on dairy products?,Has Canada had any tariff reductions on dairy products?,Has the Canadian tariff on dairy products been lowered?,Have Canada's dairy tariffs been lowered since 2005?,Have Canadian dairy tariffs been lowered since 2012?
Did this promotion require anyone to type ‘Morrisons’ under the post and share it?,Was this promotion limited to just one post and one sharing?,Did this giveaway require anyone to type ‘Morrisons’ under a post and share it?,Was this promotion related to other companies?,Did this offer involve multiple posts and shares?
Did a coal miner survive?,Did a coal miner die as a result of an earthquake in China?,Were there other mines in China?,Is this coal miner's death a result of an earthquake in China?,Did the coal miner die in this mine or in an other mine?
Is this illustration included in the 1962 Italian magazine?,Did the author of the illustration work for The Italian Magazine in 1962?,Did the magazine advertise a 2022 life in the future?,Did the illustration cover any of the 2022 events?,Is the illustration part of an original art collection from The Italian Magazine?,Is a copy of the illustration available to the public?
"Did the border wall and ""Remain in Mexico"" policy reduce illegal immigration by 90 %?","Did the border wall and ""Remain in Mexico"" policy reduce illegal immigration by 90%?","Did the border wall and ""Remain in Mexico"" policy reduce illegal immigration by 90 %?","Did the border wall and ""Remain in Mexico"" policy reduce illegal immigration by more than 90 %?"
Did the dog saved the koala from the bushfires in 2019-2020?,Is the dog white?,Did the koala get hit by the dogs?,Is there any evidence of the dog rescuing the koala?,Is the dog a pet?
Did any people get million in PPP loans?,Did any people receive million in PPP loans?,Does any politician get million in PPP loans?,Did any politician receive million in PPP loans?,Did any politicians get millions in PPP loans?,Did any politician receive millions in PPP loans in the past?
Has the Robb Elementary School mass shooting been staged?,Did two different individuals interviewed by Fox News report that the Robb Elementary School mass shooting was staged?,Does Uvalde's mayor have the right to terminate the contract if he thinks the shooting was staged?,Do two individuals who identify as Uvalde's fathers report that the Robb Elementary School mass shooting was staged?
Did Elon Musk offer to test solar panels with their owners?,Will homeowners be paying over $2500 to test solar panels?,Is there any reason for Musk not offering his own company money to test solar panels?,Has any company offered this kind of money before?,Is there any reason for Musk to not offer this kind of money in the past?
Is the tour date the same as the original show?,Is the name of the tour changed?,Did Segura announce a new tour date?,Has Segura announced a new tour date?,Have any cities on the tour yet been confirmed?,Has Segura announced any new tour dates?,Will Segura's show have a new name?
Has there been a FDA approval of COVID-19 vaccines on the U.S. market as of May 2023?,Is COVID-19 vaccine currently available?,Does the FDA approve COVID-19 vaccines?,Is COVID-19 vaccine currently available to the American public?,Is there any way to purchase COVID-19 vaccines?
"Did MS-13 members say ""we are getting them out of our country by the thousands""?",Did MS-13 members say this while speaking of their decision to leave their country?,Is the MS-13 movement resulting in a lot of people leaving their country?,Is this organization's ideology a reason to leave the country?
Did Biden receive this call?,Did Biden and Jill receive this call when Biden was President?,Did Biden receive this call from people on Maui?,Did a video of this call exist?,Is this call authentic?,Does the video involve Biden's first lady?,Is this call false?
Did the two elections for Milwaukee County Clerks occur within one week of each other?,Did Nickolaus claim to screw up the count in the elections?,Was Nickolaus accused of improperly counting the vote?,Are there any other similar issues with Nickolaus' counting in the elections?,Have all other elections occurred in Wisconsin during this time period?
Did the senator report on this issue?,Is this incident not consistent with his statements?,Did this person try to vote more than six times?,Did this person attempt to vote more than twice?,Was this person isolated?,Do these people not actively seek out voter suppression?,Did these people fail to vote?,Did this person have a record of voting?
Did the total percentage increase from the original campaign?,Did the revenue increase from the game result in the return of $500 million?,"Did the revenue increase from the game result in job creation, schools, state parks, and watersheds?",Are other Oregon games supported by money made at the Mercer game?,Has the return of the money on the Mercer game impacted the economy?
Did Bush Jr. hand Obama a $1.4 trillion deficit in 2008?,Did Obama reduce Bush Jr.'s deficit to just $492 billion?,Did Obama reduce the deficit by $1.4 trillion?,Did Obama reduce Bush Jr.'s deficit to just $492 billion?,Are there any other sources of this information?
Did Disney lose these reservations?,Will Disney be able to recover all of these reservations?,Did Disney lose more revenue than it expected?,Did Disney recover all of these reservations?,Does this information prove that Disney lost revenue?,Is this information true?,Would the value of Disney lost in revenue be able to be recovered?
Did the woman's head get trapped between the vehicle door and its frame in her parking garage?,Did the woman die in her garage after a crash with a payment machine?,Was the woman's vehicle door and frame safe?,Has there been a significant increase in injuries in parking garages these days?
Can one cow give birth to 100 calves a year?,Has Girida Singh been talking about this technology?,Has Girida Singh shown this technology to anyone?,Would it be possible for a cow to give birth to 100 calves a year?,Does Girida Singh support this concept?
Does the sun not lie 150 million kilometres away from Earth?,Does Earth have a sky dome that covers it?,Does a sky dome cover Earth?,Has any telescope recorded earth from space?,Is Earth covered by a sky dome?,Is the Sun not 150 million kilometers away from Earth?
Did Walker cut the taxes for wealthier people?,"Did Walker raise the taxes for 140,000 Wisconsin families?",Did Walker cut the taxes for wealthier people?,Are these two numbers the same?,Is Scott Walker the only candidate who is reported to have cut taxes for wealthy people?,Is Scott Walker the only candidate who is reported to have cut taxes for wealthy people?
Did Obama run more negative ads in a given election cycle?,Did Obama run more negative ads overall than any other president in history?,Does this list include Obama ads in all polling cycles?,Did Obama run more negative ads in other states than in 2008?,Does this list include Obama ads in other presidential election cycles?
Did students in Texas lose 45 days a year on testing?,Did the educational systems in Texas lose 45 days a year on testing?,Was the education system in Texas involved in some form of testing?,Were those schools participating in any testing?,Was the education system in Texas involved in any testing?
Did the exit poll survey predict that Trinamool would win 23 - 26 seats out of 30 seats in Bengal?,Was the exit poll survey in accordance with any other exit poll findings?,Was the exit poll survey conducted prior to the March 26 elections?,Did the exit poll survey predict any changes in voting patterns in Bengal?
Is the Karnataka government reconsidering its decision to reopen schools from Jan. 2021?,Has it ever implemented reopening schools in Karnataka?,Is there any record of the Karnataka government revoking its decision to reopen schools from Jan. 2021?
Does each Republican budget have the same impact on federal spending?,Did the Democrats and Republicans spend much on government in any unified form?,Have all of these budgets cut government spending in some unified form?,Are any other spending reductions not the result of the Congressional budgeting?,Would it have a negative impact on federal spending if there are no budgeting changes?
"Was the woman arrested for calling her ex-boyfriend over 27,000 times in a week?","Did the woman call her ex-boyfriend over 27,000 times in a week?","Has it been established that the woman contacted her ex-boyfriend over 27,000 times in a week?","Did the woman call the ex-boyfriend more than 27,000 times in a week?"
Do 9 U.S. consulates and 1 U.S. embassy in Mexico allow asylum applicants?,Is it safe to apply for asylum in these places?,Are asylum claims made at any of these sites safe?,Is there a risk that non-U.S. citizens are separated from their children at these places?
Did the Zambezi Army enforce the 9:00pm curfew?,Will people in Zambezi facing jail time for disobeying the curfew risk to go to military jail?,Will anyone in Zambezi going to military jail for disobeying the curfew be given any other option?
Can anyone eligible for this grant receive a fuel voucher with less than £4 on a prepaid energy meter?,Is this grant open to households without prepaid energy meter?,Can prepaid energy meter owners claim the voucher free of charge?,Is this grant available to all prepaid energy meter owners?
Are unusual cancers ‘exploding right into stage 4'?,Are spike protein cancer cells responsible for these aggressive cancers?,Are spurt protein cells a threat to the growth of spurt protein cancer cells?,Does this data show that these types of cancers are exploding right into stage 4?
Does Vermin Supreme support the free pony policy?,Does Vermin Supreme have the financial means to finance this policy?,Does Vermin Supreme promise to pay for the horses?,Has Vermin Supreme run with a similar plan?,Is Vermin Supreme related to any other political topics?,Can any previous political candidates support this policy?
Is there any evidence that President Zelenskyy's Kyiv office was blown up by Russian forces around 10 October 2022?,Is it true that video shows President Zelenskyy's Kyiv office being blown up by Russian forces around 10 October 2022?,Is there any evidence that President Zelenskyy's Kyiv office was blown up by Russian forces around 10 October 2022?
"Did it take 10 years of job losses for manufacturers to add 500,000 jobs?","Did it take 10 years of job losses for manufacturers to add 500,000 jobs?",Did this increase in jobs reflect the job losses that occured over this span?,Will this increase in jobs be accompanied by an increase in job losses?
Did all brothers from Gaza want to kill the other one of them?,Did the other brother want to kill the other of them?,Did the other brother kill their brother?,Did all three brothers want to kill each other?,Was one of the brothers in the photograph killed by the Israeli bombing?,Did Israel cause any damage in the other brothers' life?
Did Trump anticipate that the 2008 housing crash would help him scoop up more real estate?,Did Trump think that the 2008 housing crash would help him scoop up more real estate?,Did Trump believe that the 2008 housing crash would help him scoop up more real estate on the cheap?,Did Trump have any information about how this happened?
Was Singh cited for saying that India became the first country in the world to administer 100 crore vaccine doses?,Was Singh quoted saying that India became the first country in the world to administer 100 crore vaccine doses?,Was Singh mentioned for speaking about the significance of India becoming the first country in the world to administer 100 crore vaccine doses?
Did the video show money recovered from corrupt politicians?,Did the video show money recovered from corrupt politicians in Brazil?,Is the video from a source listed on the site?,Is the video public?,Was the video released prior to the day of the incident?,Did the video show corruption in Brazil?,Is there a statement or any documentation in this video?
Are some studies of insects raising to be eaten contributing to disease in humans?,Is there evidence one third of insects raised to be eaten cause disease in humans?,Is there evidence any insects raised to be eaten are responsible for disease in humans?,Is one third of insects raised to be eaten causing disease in humans?
Was a video showing Pakistani citizens fighting over flour sacks in 2023?,Did any of these Pakistani citizens end up in a violent incident because of the inconvenient location of the flour sacks?,Did these citizens participate in a violent confrontation with the sacks in their local area?
Is the photo of Ugandan prison from 2013?,Is the photo a prison break from 2022?,Is this picture of a prison show riot or jailbreak?,"Is the prison image from 2013, or before 2013?",Is this photograph a prison break photo?,Is the photo of an inmate from 2013?
Did the US-Mexico border have footage of people crossing it in May 2023?,Have any migrants tried to cross the border in Mexico?,Did there appear to be migrants attempting to cross the border in Mexico in May 2023?,Did any of these migrants attempt to cross the border in Mexico?,Is there any video showing migrants trying to cross the border in Mexico?
Has health insurance premiums increased 105 percent under Obamacare?,Did Obamacare increase premiums by 105 percent?,Do other government agencies or insurers have some form of health insurance premium increases under Obamacare?,Has the Obamacare law had a impact on health insurance premiums?,Has insurance premiums increased 105 percent under Obamacare?,Have government agencies or insurers made changes under Obamacare to health insurance premiums?
Is this the first time that this has happened in this country since World War II?,Does 70% of us are earning less than we were 12 years ago?,Is the average income for American workers now the same or less than it was 12 years ago?,Is this the first time in American history that we have seen this?
Was this minor killed in a mosque?,Is this Rohingya Muslim?,Was the 10 year old victim of this attack in Shravasti?,Was Ali a Rohingya Muslim?,Did Ali do this on the day of the 11th day of January 2017?,Was Ali a Rohingya Muslim?
Did protesters set up fires in this video?,Did this video show cars being set on fire?,Did these demonstrations take place in France?,Was this video released in July of 2023?,Do any videos of protests take place in France?,Have any videos made in France yet?,Are any protests in France likely to have been planned?
Did McCain have any prior support for George Bush's policies?,Did McCain support or strongly support Bush's policies during his term?,Did McCain ever support Bush policies prior to the passage of the bill?,Has McCain ever supported Bush's policies after he left office?,Did McCain support Bush policies prior to the passage of the bill?
Was 1.3 million net jobs created during the eight years she was governor of Florida?,Did this increase surpass the original goal of creating more net jobs in Florida?,Did this increase exceed her original goal of creating more net jobs in Florida?,Did she increase the net number of net jobs created over her previous efforts?
Did this man purchase all he could with his cell phone?,Did this person buy 10000 SIM cards in total?,Did the man use this phone to spread hate?,Did this person buy these phones for his own use?,Has this person ever claimed responsibility for his actions?,Have there been any similar actions by this person?
Have 183 people been arrested for deliberately starting wildfires?,Have all of the wildfires started by people arrested for deliberately starting fires been contained?,Did 183 people take part in the 184 arrests for starting wildfires in Australia?,Have 183 people been arrested for deliberately starting fires in Australia?
Are men 18-65 years old prohibited from purchasing ticket with a Russian airline?,Are Russian airlines not legally bound to not sell tickets to men under 18 years of age?,Is it possible to determine from the Russian airlines rules if a man in the age of 18-65 years of age should not travel with a Russian airline?
Did Pence begin work at the school that bans LGBT teachers?,Is the school where Pence began working known to have LGBT teachers?,Does the school that Pence worked at allow LGBT students?,Does Pence work at a school that doesn't allow LGBT students?,Did Pence work at a school that grew apart from the LGBT students?
Have autism rates increased over time due to increased vaccines?,"Was the autism rate from 1 in 10,000 to 1 in 36?",Has the autism rate increased by 2% since 1970?,Are there many vaccines that lowered autism rates?,Are vaccines that lowered autism rates in the past?,Does the increased vaccination for autism affect children's health?
Does every day of a special session cost taxpayers $40k?,Did the bill require all members of the special session to give their consent?,Did the bills require voter approval?,Do bills require voter approval?,Has the bill made changes to the bill to increase revenue?,Is the bill in future drafts of future bills required by the bill?
Do employers have to keep their coverage for at least 5 years?,Can you transfer your coverage to the public plan?,Would my employer be obligated to keep coverage for at least 5 years?,Did the employer have to keep your coverage?,Is there a limit to the number of times the employer can keep coverage for at least 5 years?
Did Florida choose a company that has a significant history of promoting identification of the GLBT lifestyle?,Is this company's GLBT community testing based on the same practices employed in the education system?,Can this company serve as an educational testing tool for LGBT children?,Has this company's GLBT community testing amounted to significant gains in LGBT awareness and acceptance?
Does Oregon have a gender wage imbalance in terms of wages for people of the same income level?,Is Oregon's gender wage gap as higher as men's wage gap?,Does women earn an average of 79 cents for every dollar for doing the same job in Oregon?,Has a change in wages in Oregon contributed to a significant gender wage imbalance?
"Did Thompson vote against $250,000 caps on damages?",Did Thompson vote against almost anything that would make the legal system fairer?,Was there one specific proposal that voted against $50000 damages?,Did this proposal involve a judicial system that is biased?,Did Thompson vote against this particular proposal?,Did Thompson believe that the judicial system should be more fair?
Did Obama double the national debt?,Did Obama's debt double after completing one year of service?,Did Obama pay more in tax dollars than the rest of the debt?,Did Obama spend more in a month as the president's secretary of finance?,Did Obama pay more in any other category than the debt?
Was Keene supposed to speak at a fake graduation?,Did the parents of the person who died in the Parkland shooting trick Keene?,Did Keene ever speak at a fake graduation?,Did the victims of the Parkland shooting die?,Did Keene speak at a fake graduation?
Was the photo in San Francisco taken on Jan 6?,Did the picture show protesters inside a government building?,Is this photo from San Francisco taken by the same person?,Did the photo appear on social media?,Did the person holding the flag in the photograph support a government stance?,Did any protesters leave the scene at this point?
Did Hallie Biden tweet during the election?,Did Jill Biden phone election workers to 'rush in fake ballots'?,Did Jill Biden tweet during the election?,Did Hallie Biden tweet during the election?,Did Jill Biden call election workers on election night to stop counting ballots?,Did Jill Biden call election workers on election night to stop counting ballots?
"Did Tennessee ban Plan B and make ordering it a crime punishable by a $50,000 fine?",Did Tennessee order Plan B under an administrative ban?,Was Tennessee's ban related to Plan B?,Did Tennessee implement this criminal act?,Does Tennessee's ban of Plan B apply to any other types of marijuana?
Is Ryan's budget plan to repeal Medicare completely?,Are there any plans to restructure Medicare?,Are the plans to restructure Medicare currently in progress?,Is Ryan proposing to restructure Medicare in 10 years?,Is it expected that Ryan will restructure Medicare in 10 years?
Did Harris's opponent receive a larger than expected percentage of ballots?,Did the outcome of the Harris race affect McCready's election results?,Are there more ballots in question for Harris in CDC9?,Are there more ballots in question in Harris's district than McCready's district?
Did this GoFundMe raise $6B in two hours?,Did the money used go toward a privacy hedge?,Did this GoFundMe cover a border between Canada and the US?,Is there any reason not to support this GoFundMe?,Does the Privacy Hedge along the US border cause any concerns for privacy?
Is it true that China contributes about half of the US' borrowing?,Is there any indication the US' borrowing from China is higher than that from other countries?,Is there a way to estimate the actual rate of US borrowing based on this article?,Are China and the United States involved in some way in the borrowing from China?
Do the COVID-19 patients Johnson helped need blood?,Did Johnson donate his own blood during this event?,Did Johnson have HIV in August of 2018?,Did Johnson donate blood in this event?,Did Johnson donate blood in this event?,Did Johnson donate blood for the COVID?,Did Johnson donate blood for the COVID in this event?,Did Johnson donate blood during this event?
Did the government know before the Covid-19 vaccines roll-out that they would kill and maim and issue a tender for a surveillance system to monitor deaths?,Did the government know before the Covid-19 vaccines roll-out that they would kill and maim and issue a tender for a surveillance system to monitor deaths?
Is this sentence the first that a 19-year-old girl has faced after she was sentenced to prison for a crime?,Is there evidence that the 19-year-old girl violated laws across the state?,Does it appear that she travelled across state lines to get an abortion?
Did the proposal direct more of the education budget to teacher salaries?,"Was the raise expected to exceed $10,000?",Is this a new proposal?,Is this a new proposal?,Is this proposal currently in the legislative process?,Is this a new proposal?,Is this a new proposal?
Did this cut go towards public schools?,Was this cut of $15 billion a total cut to overall spending?,Was this cut significant?,Did this cut increase spending in general?,Did the Democrat propose a new bill to increase overall spending in public schools?,Did this bill actually have a direct impact on public schools?
Did Rittenhouse show up to Kenosha protests in full armed status?,Was Rittenhouse crossing state lines for Kenosha protests?,"Did Rittenhouse wear anything that was deemed ""armed"" by police?",Did Rittenhouse participate in Kenosha protests wearing a knife?,Did Rittenhouse have a weapon at any point in the protests?,Did Rittenhouse's arrest for criminal mischief stem from armed participation?
Was the child forced to marry the older man who raped her?,Was the child forced to marry a much older man who raped her?,Was the child forced to marry the older man who raped her?,Was the child forced to marry the older man who raped her?
Did Trump open an investigation into Obama's finances?,Did Obama purchase this plane?,Did Trump initiate a legal investigation into Obama's finances?,Is it true that Trump opened an investigation into Obama's finances?,Do either of these statements have any direct relation to Trump's investigation?,Is there any other information that might be helpful?
Would HR 1313 allow employers to force workers to disclose their genetic information?,Would this bill allow workers to disclose their genetic information?,Does this bill require employers to provide genetic information when hired?,Does this bill require employers to make genetic information available to potential employees?,Does this bill require employers to provide genetic information?,Did this bill require employers to provide genetic information when hired?
Did scientists state that this map represents the US in 30 years if we do not reverse climate change?,Are climate change scenarios that predict the upcoming US in 30 years different from climate scenarios in the 2040s?,Can we predict what will happen if we fail to reverse climate change?,Were people impacted by these climate change scenarios in the 2040s?,Is there any evidence for climate change in the 2030s?
Did the import of Cheetahs come from Namibia?,Did the cheetahs migrate to India?,Did they survive in India?,Are there any known captive cheetahs in India?,Can the cheetahs live in zoos?
Did Saudi Arabia increase oil prices at least a fifth of the amount that they originally commanded?,Were Saudi Arabia's previous peaks due to inflation or global economic downturn?,Will Saudi Arabia's recent peaks be triggered by continued economic turmoil?,Will Saudi Arabia's previous peaks be triggered by economic revival or global economic downturn?,Is Saudi Arabia planning on reducing the oil price as much as possible in the coming days?
Did Biden vote for 700 miles of fence in 2006?,Did Biden talk about immigration in some entirely different ways than he does today?,Did Biden support 700 miles of fence in 2006?,Has Biden voted for any other measures?,Does Biden support any other measures?,Was the immigration proposal approved by Biden at the time of the 2006 presidential election?,Was the immigration proposal approved by Biden in 2006?
Does donation to charities amount to 5% of donations?,Does it pay out a percentage of donations?,Does gift aid take money from charities?,Has the increase in donations impacted the treatment of charities?,Have charities lost money as a result of the increase in giving?,Does gift aid affect a charity's ability to provide services?
"Does the author support the bill, Is the bill effective?",Is there a bill in the House that could improve the situation?,Do a majority of spies report to this House?,Do a majority of spies report to the House?,Are these bills approved by the House?,"Having said that, does this House have any bill that is approved by the House?",Is there anything else on the table for this country that would make it a more viable country for spies to conduct business?
Is there a shortage of males in Iceland?,Will Iceland give these male immigrants a monthly grant?,Will males who marry Icelandic women get a monthly grant?,Is there an explanation for why Iceland offers a monthly grant to male immigrants?,Does the Iceland government do anything to help this problem?
"Is it true Kurt Cobain said that he would be surprised if his generation eventually elected an outsider, like a business tycoon who can’t be bought, like Donald Trump?","Was it true Kurt Cobain said that he would be surprised if his generation eventually elected a true outsider, like a business tycoon who can’t be bought, like Donald Trump?"
Did Govinda make the comments?,Did Govinda indicate that schools and colleges should reopen on an odd-even basis?,Would Govinda’s comments about schools and colleges in June reflect any change in policy?,Was Govinda’s statement in response to one question about school reopening?
Did Kentucky put $148 billion more than any other state?,Did the state that took out more than the federal government put in money?,Did Kentucky have less money to put into the federal budget than any other state?,Was Kentucky able to put more money into the federal budget than any other state?,Did Kentucky put less money into the federal budget than any other state?
Did Clinton leave American citizens in harm's way in Benghazi?,Did Clinton claim the Americans were in harm's way in Benghazi?,Did Hillary Clinton leave American citizens in harm's way in Benghazi?,Did Clinton say the Americans had suffered significant loss of life in Benghazi?
Did New Jersey lose 50 football fields of open space each day?,Does the increase in development in NYC have a direct impact on flooding?,Did the increase in development in NYC increase flooding?,Was the increase in development in NYC related to flooding?,Have all New Jersey municipalities implemented floodplain regulations?,Can we expect to see floodplain regulations implemented for NYC?
Does North Carolina require an absentee ballot to be signed by two witnesses or a notary public?,Does North Carolina require an absentee ballot to be signed by two witnesses or a notary public?,Are absentee ballots required to be signed by two witnesses or a notary public?
Is there a total of 86 languages spoken at Miami Dade College?,Was there any language that was not spoken at Miami Dade College?,Were there any languages that were spoken in other schools?,Did any other Miami schools have similar language rates?,Are there any other cities that have similar student student language rates?
Did Biden approve a Card to provide free health insurance for Americans 25 and older?,Did Biden approve the card by means of a phone call?,Did Biden approve the Card?,Did Biden approve this card on a phone call?,Did Biden approve this card in person?,Did Biden approve the card on a phone call?,Did Biden support the card?
"Did Democrats spend $40,000,000 of your tax dollars trying to impeach Trump?","Did Democrats spend $40,000,000 of your tax dollars trying to impeach Trump?","Did Democrats spend $40,000,000 of your tax dollars trying to impeach Trump?",Did Democrats spend any of your tax dollars on impeaching Trump?,Was Trump impeached before he was impeached?
How many children are currently enrolled in early childhood development facilities?,Are the facilities run by the Department of Health and Human Services?,Have all children who are enrolled in these facilities participated in classes?,Did the federal government fund these facilities?,Are there more children enrolled in early childhood development facilities based on income than there are currently?
"Did Sharpton say "" blacks should kill police "" in 1992?","Was Sharpton referring to "" killing police "" or something else?",Was Sharpton's 1992 speech an affirmative action speech?,Were Al Sharpton's words in 1991 considered a non-promoter?,Did Sharpton hold these beliefs for a decade?
"Is it true there are 20,000 jobs without skilled workers in West Virginia?",Does West Virginia have many schools with no skilled workers?,Was West Virginia's GDP and job growth in 2011 comparable to that of other states?,Are all of the workforce in West Virginia skilled?,Is there any evidence that skill shortages are a widespread problem in West Virginia?
Did you claim that there are 15 different fuel taxes?,Did you mention any specific reason why you believe there are 15 different fuel taxes?,Do you have any evidence that there are 15 different fuel taxes?,Do you understand any of the specific ways in which there are 15 different fuel taxes?,Are you able to say for certain that there are 15 different fuel taxes?
Can Florida's fingerprint identification system increase its rate of solving cold cases?,Will Florida's fingerprint identification system increase the rate of solving cold cases?,Will Florida's fingerprint identification system increase the rate of solving cold cases?,Can Florida's fingerprint identification system increase the rate of solving cold cases?,Will Florida's fingerprint identification system increase the rate of solving cold cases?
Has unemployment increased due to Obama's policies?,How many jobs have amounted to disappearance since Obama took office?,Have those jobs disappeared in the past year?,Did Obama's economic policies change jobs?,Has Obama's policies increased the number of jobs lost?,Have jobs lost in the past year been more than expected?
Was a video of one Cheetah being relocated to India from Namibia?,Did the video show a first look of the Cheetah?,Was the video of the Cheetah being relocated to India from Namibia?,During which year was the video produced?,Did any other Cheetahs move to Namibia?
Is it true that the NFL fined Pittsburgh Steelers players $1 million each for staying in their locker room during the national anthem?,Do the Steelers have any other fines on the books?,Do the Steelers pay fines under a different league?,Is it true that the NFL fined Pittsburgh Steelers players $1 million each for staying in their locker room during the national anthem?
Is Holperin democratic?,Did Holperin vote against a property tax freeze in 2009?,Did Holperin vote for a $1.5 billion property tax hike in 2009?,Does Holperin support a $15 billion property tax hike in 2010?,Is Holperin on the Democratic side of state government?
Was there any agreement with Abbott Laboratories?,Was this incentive deal a specific proposal?,Were the job creation goals met?,Would the taxpayers be protected in the event of this mishap?,Would the Abbott Laboratories incentive be worth any money?,Will Abbott Laboratories be required to continue this work in the future?
Did 64 million people take advantage of the Eat Out to Help Out scheme?,Did 64 million people participate in the 'Eat Out to Help Out' scheme?,Did this scheme benefit any organizations?,Did 64 million people take advantage of the Eat Out to Help Out scheme?,Has this scheme worked for any organizations?
Can you receive 36 gifts in this social networking exchange?,Are there other discounts associated with this exchange?,Is it okay to pay $10-15 to participate?,Is this exchange safe?,Is this exchange good for the whole family?,Has this exchange been well-received in the past?,Will this exchange be a recurring event?
Is there evidence that this video is showing the February 2019 India air strike killing 300 people?,Is it a false statement to state that this video shows the air strike killing 300 people?,Did the Pakistani diplomat in the video act alone or does this video show multiple people fighting the Pakistani military?,Did any of the people killed in the February 2019 strike come from the Pakistani military?
Are these currency notes to be denotified from 1st Jan 2023?,Will they be replaced with the actual currency?,Will these currency notes be used in India or elsewhere?,Do these currency notes use the same design and format as existing currency notes?,Does putting these currency notes into circulation in India require approval from the government?
Was there a claim from the Pentagon that there were 46 US biolabs in Ukraine in 2015?,Has the Pentagon confirmed that there are 46 US biolabs in Ukraine?,Is the U.S. government responsible for funding these US biolabs?,Did the Pentagon say that they were responsible for funding US bio labs?
Is it true that Obama's refusal to grant offshore drilling permits was one reason for high gasoline prices?,Do offshore drilling permits help protect the environment?,Is denying drilling permits good for the environment?,Is Obama's refusal to grant offshore drilling permits good for the environment?,Is Obama's refusal to grant offshore drilling permits good for the environment?
Is Kerry's personal wealth as well as his official estate?,Is Kerry known for his wealth?,Is Kerry known for his private iia?,Is Kerry the president-elect for the State of a US?,Is Kerry the owner of more than a dozen cars?
"Did Butterball recall fewer than 14,107 pounds of turkey produced on Sept. 28?",Is Butterball recalling more ground turkeys than any other manufacturers?,Did Butterball recall ground turkeys from all manufacturers on Oct. 7?,Is butterball recalling turkeys from the same manufacturers as they did on Oct. 2?,Is Butterball recalling turkey from all manufacturers on the same day as their first recall?
Has insurance profit increased 400% since 2001?,Is this the first year when insurance profits are higher than 400 percent?,Does this year present another rise in insurance profits?,Are the gains in 2001 still being recorded?,Has the increase in 2005 been the same?,Can insurance companies still record profits of less than 400 percent in the near future?
Did Schneider have to spend time in jail after he assaulted a hitchhiker?,Did Schneider still face jail time for assaults he committed after he strangled the hitchhiker?,Was the hitchhiker in Anchorage convicted of assault?,Was Schneider still going to jail after the assault?
Did the debt of this US president exceed that of other presidents combined?,Did any presidents have more debt than this US President combined?,Is there any record of US debt growing over the years?,Does this statement cite any government statistics showing these debts growing?,Are any of these statistics from a non-government source?
Do the Common Core standards use the same time limits in teaching students how to add nine plus 6?,Is the time limit for teaching students how to add nine plus 6 more than the typical 15 minute time limit?,Are the current standards sufficient to allow time for teaching students how to add nine plus 6?,Does the time limit in any of the standards vary according to the content or the students?
Was there a US increase in the $500 million a year commitment to fighting global AIDS?,Is there a US increase in a double digit in amount of money to fighting global AIDS?,Can this increase be attributed to any of the other actions that Obama took in first 17 months?
Did they lose over $1 billion in not taking Medicaid expansion money?,Is it true that we have lost over $1 billion in not taking Medicaid expansion money?,Were any of the losses due to Medicaid expansion not being taken?,Is the reason for the loss over $1 billion that we are not taking Medicaid expansion money?
When will you need to have a negative Covid-19 test taken?,Will you need to be vaccinated to travel to Spain in 2017?,Will the negative test be done in 24 hours prior to travel?,What does the negative test test look like?,Does the test have a negative result?,Is there a vaccine to avoid Covid-19?
"Since 1961, what has the private economy produced?",Is it true that Republicans have had an increase in jobs by 24 million?,Has the democratic jobs score decreased since 1961?,Is there any evidence that Democrats have had an increase in job openings since 1961?,Is it true that the Democratic jobs score dropped by 42 million?
Does speculation push up crude prices?,Did a report say excessive speculation is increasing crude prices?,Does excessive speculation cause a pumping of gas?,Does excessive speculation affect the global price of fuel?,Is this speculation increasing oil prices?,ARE there additional effects on gasoline prices from speculative driving?
"Did this program air pornographic photographs on April 8, 2021?",Did this program cover any controversy with the laptop computer that featured Biden's sexual partner?,"Did this show air any pornography on April 8, 2021?",Did this show contain any sexual partners?,Were there any other sexual partners depicted in this photo?,Did this program have some other sexual partners?
Did Sotomayor's previous rulings get thrown out by the court a troubling four times?,Did Sotomayor's previous rulings get thrown out by the court twice?,Are these previous rulings thrown out twice?,Did Sotomayor's past rulings get thrown out 4 times?
Are today more than 17.1 million Kenyans covered by the National Hospital Insurance Fund?,Are there any estimates from 2013 that this increase in coverage will occur?,Is there a general decrease in the number of hospitalizations due to the increasing coverage of NIFB?,Are there any estimates on the increase in hospitalizations due to the increase in coverage of NIFB?
Did the Council on American-Islamic Relations fall under federal jurisdiction?,Did 9/11 result in the creation of the Council on American-Islamic Relations?,Does the Council on American-Islamic Relations represent the views of individual citizens?,Is the Council on American-Islamic Relations a non-governmental organization?
Is it true that a drug test is only $4 or $5?,Is it true that a drug test is only $4 or $5?,Is it true that a drug test is only $4 or $5?,Is there any proof that this is true?,Are there any other sources that validate this claim?
Has Clinton changed her position on guns each election year?,Has Clinton campaigned against Obama and said there are no national gun standards?,Has Clinton supported all gun control efforts in a single election?,Has any previous speaker suggested that gun control should not be a matter of law for individual states?,Do any of the statements above support the use of federal standards?
Did these Iraqis enter the US legally and commit a plot to kill civilians?,Did this group radicalize themselves?,Did these individuals commit the Bowling Green massacre?,Did these individuals commit any crimes?,Did this group act independently?,Did this group have any political affiliation?,Do these individuals have any affiliation with the Bowling Green massacre?
Did a fake graphic display the information on Raila's deputy?,"Did Raila's deputy quote it, or attributed it to the president?",Do the two facts are on par?,Is this evidence based upon truth?,Did Raila's deputy quote it on fake graphic?
Did Bill Gates say 3 billion people need to die?,Did Bill Gates say 3 billion people needed to die?,Are there other reasons that Bill Gates could not explain?,Was 3 billion people needed to die in the United States because of devastation of natural disasters?,Would the United States be able to make these sacrifices?,Is the United States unable to make those sacrifices on its own?
Can you purchase COVID Vaccine in U.S. for Rs 5500 and UK for Rs 3000?,Is Covid vaccine available in US?,Is Covid vaccine available in U.K.?,Is Covid vaccine available in US?,Is Covid vaccine available in EU?
Is one diet drink a day the minimum amount of drinking to triple the risk of dementia?,Does drinking diet drinks increase risk of strokes?,Is drinking diet drinks in the general population more likely than not to increase risk?,Is drinking diet drinks in general harmful?,Do diet drinks increase stroke risks?
Did Miller have a memo about DC's National Guard disarmed in January of 2021?,Did Miller's memo describe a number of actions the D.C. National Guard took prior to the riots at the Capitol?,Was Miller's memo a memo that was distributed to the media prior to the riots?,Did Miller's memo state that DC's National Guard was disarmed a month prior to the riots?
"Did the picture taken on September 5, 1977, and not 1975?",Did Irshad Gandhi enter JNU in 1975?,Did Jehuary not resign or apologize?,Did Irshad Gandhi enter JNU in 1975?,Did Jehury resign or apologize?,Did Jehury resign in 1975?
Did Trump claim voter fraud in the 2020 Presidential election?,Was Trump's assertion based upon a factual assessment or untrue?,Was Trump's assertion based upon a statement made by a person who is not a presidential official?,Did Trump's claim include evidence of voter fraud?
Did the candidate have 35 years' experience making change?,Did the candidate work with a lot of political entities and work with the state government?,Would the candidate's work contribute to a positive political outcome?,Does the candidate have a large amount of political experience?,Has the candidate worked extensively with the state government?
"Are 80,000 soldiers who applied for sick leaves fearing China?",Has India fired on China since the ladakh standoff?,Did the firing on LAC occur more recently?,Did India fire on Ladakh after the firing on Ladakh?,Did Ladakh standoff occur first in 45 years?
Is it true that Rodrigo Duterte says he can still do something to reduce corruption before his term ends in June 2022?,Is it true that Rodrigo Duterte says he can still do something to reduce corruption before his term ends in June 2022?,Is it true that Rodrigo Duterte claims he can still do something to reduce corruption before his term ends in June 2022?
"Did the European Court of Justice require ""Jewish-made"" products to be labeled as such?","Was the European Court of Justice set to require that ""Jewish-made"" products to be labeled as such?",Did the European Court of Justice receive advice from an advocate general prior to the release of this press release?
Did National Guard members turn their back on a flag-stomping protest?,Did members of the National Guard turn their back on a flag-stomping protest in 2015?,Is the National Guard response to flag-stomping protests consistent with a video?,Is the National Guard response to flag-stomping protests consistent with a video?
Does this temple date back to the 1500's?,Did the temple have numerous structural problems?,Did the temple have numerous structural problems?,Is this temple related to the Hindu gods?,Is this temple in Japan?,Is this temple in China?,Is this temple located in France?,Would this temple be classified as an ancient building?
Did the top 10 most well-paid CEOs receive an amount of $770 million total in 2010?,Did the average wage increase in 2010 be 2%?,Was the total amount of money in 2011 equal to or greater than the total money in 2010?,Do the top 10 highest paid CEOs receive more than a combined $770 million in total salary in 2010?
Was the practice deemed to be ok by public welfare officials?,Was a 3-year-old a good age to do the habit?,Does the act of smoking a cigar have legal consequences?,Does the law permit smoking a cigar?,Did Quigley's mother smoke before this incident?
Was the governor’s budget proposal for 2016 reduced the state austerity cut to education to less than $500 million?,Is the governor’s budget proposal a complete repeal of the state austerity cuts?,Is the governor’s budget proposal for 2016 an end to this state austerity cut?
Was the person not wearing a mask coughing on the petri dish?,Was the person wearing a mask coughing on the petri dish?,Was the person not coughing on the petri dish coughing on the same person?,Was the person wearing a mask coughing on the same petri dish?
"Did Massachusetts lose 40,000 manufacturing jobs during Mitt Romney?",Did Massachusetts lose jobs at a rate twice the national average?,Did Massachusetts fall to 47th in job creation when Mitt Romney was Governor?,Is there evidence that Mitt Romney would have more job creation under his regime?,Has Mitt Romney lost a large percentage of manufacturing jobs under the Trump administration?
Is there a one in a hundred chance that you'll die from covid-19?,Is it an absolute certainty that you will die from covid-19?,Do researchers know how many people die from covid-19?,Is this information based on current research?,Are there other factors that could result in a fatality associated with this illness?
Did Biden give Putin a donation?,Did Biden claim she gave Biden a $3.5 million gift?,Has Biden made a donation to Putin?,Should Biden release any information from Biden's donations to Putin?,Will Putin release the answer?,Does Biden think Biden should release information on Putin's donation to Biden?
Did Rihanna tweet that her show pays her dancers more than her films?,Did Rihanna's show earn Rihanna more money than her films?,Did Rihanna's show have a gross amount over their films?,Did Rihanna pay dancers more than a film?
Did McCaskill receive $131 million in federal subsidies as a senator?,Did the subsidy help McCaskills pocket up to $22 million?,Did McCaskill receive federal subsidies when she was a senator?,Was McCaskill aware of the tax benefits of receiving federal subsidies?
Was the COVID-19 pandemic declared to be over?,Did the German Bundesrat withdraw COVID-19 from the Infections Protection Act?,Was COVID-19 a public health emergency?,Was the COVID-19 pandemic declared to be a public health emergency in the German Bundesrat?
Did it donate 100k to celebrate Modi victory?,Did the giveaway happen in New York?,Did any other items get given away in New York?,Does any other entity donate any money?,...Is any organization involved in this giveaway?,Will it be donated after New York elections?,...How much was donated to celebrate Modi win?
Did hitz have a much larger effect on weather media at the time of these pictures?,Was the weather map of 2015 less dire?,Is the current weather map also more negative in outlook?,Did the former weather map have much less drama than the present one?,Are any of the present weather cards the same?,Are these images in a common format?
Are communal riots recorded on social media?,Was a video on social media showing communal riots in Bengaluru?,Are the communal riots recorded by media outlets?,Did video of the communal riots exist?,Did video of the communal riots have a specific release date?
Did Tinubu spend more than two weeks outside Nigeria?,Did Tinubu spend more than two weeks outside of Nigeria?,Were there other events Tinubu took part in?,Were other events that Tinubu took part in outside of Nigeria?,Did Tinubu attend other events outside of Nigeria?,Were there other events that Tinubu attended outside of Nigeria?,Did Tinubu attend other events outside of Nigeria?
Did Trump support a separatist group in Nigeria?,Does Biden know Trump supported separatists?,Is Nigeria funding Biden's campaign because of Trump's support?,Is Biden's campaign funding going to the separatist group?,Is Trump support for Biden a factor in Biden's funding?
Does the image depict migrants at or approaching the US border in May 2023?,Are migrants known to be entering the US in May 2023?,Are migrants identified in a photo of the migrant population in May 2023?,Has a photo of migrants in a picture of the migrant population in May 2023 been found?,Does the photo depict migrants who are entering the US?
Was a video recorded of a 74 year old woman dancing?,Did the woman have grandson to dance with?,Were the women joking around?,Did the couple make fun of each other?,Does the video capture the couples' emotions?,Did the couple smile at the end of the video?
Did PRC determine the difficulty of the next LEPT?,Will the difficulty of the next LEPT be reduced?,Is the difficulty of the next LEPT expected to be reduced?,Will the difficulty of the next LEPT in 2024 be reduced?,Has PRC already said the difficulty of the next LEPT has been reduced?,Is the next LEPT scheduled for in 2024?,Will the difficulty of the next LEPT in 2024 be reduced?
"Did the image first originate with ""Call of Duty: WWII?",""" Did the image originate with Call of Duty: WWII?",Was the image first introduced in Call of Duty: WWII?,Did the image originate in the game?,Did this image appear in Call of Duty: WWII?,Did this image originate in a different game?
Did Hochul have a board of parole that has released 20 cop killers during the last two years?,Was Hochul's system for parole effective?,Do the parole numbers reflect this fact?,Are there any witnesses to this case?,Does Hochul's parole system result in these parole numbers?,Is Hochul in any way linked to this case?
What happened to the couple that day?,Did they return home?,Was their stay in Chicago prolonged?,Is this person currently living in Arizona?,Was this person in the city of Chicago?,Is this person currently living in Chicago?,Are these individuals legally?,Did this person leave this city?,Did this person return home after this incident?
"Did the Supreme Court rule that COVID-19 vaccines cause ""irreparable"" damage?",Did the Court find that mRNA vaccines cause COVID-19?,Is there any record that the Supreme Court had ever ruled against tobacco companies?,Did this ruling in the case come under the same aegis as the Supreme Court?
Was the £20 note depicting a 5G tower?,Was the £20 note depicting a coronavirus symbol?,Did the note bear the signatures of a 5G tower operator and a coronavirus impostor?,Is the £20 note depicting a 5G tower operator or a coronavirus impostor?
Is there evidence Perdue took money from the federal stimulus program created by Obama?,Does Perdue's company take money from Obama's stimulus program?,Has Perdue raised funds from this government program?,Did Perdue receive money for this tax-exempt project?,Does the resulting tax code reflect the intent of the Obama tax code?
Does Jean-Pierre mean Biden won't visit Maui after the August 2023 fires?,Did Jean-Pierre say that Biden wouldn't visit Maui after the fires?,Did Jean-Pierre say Biden wouldn't visit Maui after the fires?,Did Biden say Maui was a swing state?
Could 89 million Americans be denied coverage under Romney?,Is Mitt Romney's plan based on health insurance?,Can Romney revers this pre-existing condition ban on insurance?,Would Romney's plan exclude all uninsured children?,Is Mitt Romney seeking to expand insurance coverage to the uninsured?
Did models predict about three times the amount of warming the world experienced since 1988?,Did the climate models predict about three times the amount of warming?,Did the models forecast about three times the amount of warming the world experienced since 1988?,Did the models not forecast the global temperature increase?,Did the models accurately reflect climate change?
Was a pastor arrested?,Was the pastor involved in the election fraud conspiracy?,Do these 18 defendants face any charges related to the election?,Did these 18 co-defendants cooperate in their cases?,Did these 18 co-defendants testify against Trump in these cases?,Is this case related to the 2020 presidential election?
Did Bilkis Bano join the Singhu protest?,Was Bilkis Bano convicted in jail?,Was Bilkis Bano arrested by the police?,Did Bilkis Bano leave the Singhu protest after his conviction?,Have authorities detained Bilkis Bano?,Have any other Singhu protestors been arrested after the Singhu protest?
Did Disney reject Allen as the voice of Buzz Lightyear in the 2022 movie?,Were Allen's conservative beliefs a factor in Disney's decision?,Would Allen be eligible to voice Buzz Lightyear in 2022?,Would Disney ever consider a similar casting of Allen in a 2022 flick?
Did this play occur in Lucknow?,Does this play feature a Mother India?,Did Bharat Mata remove her crown and wear a hijab?,Was this play held on August 15th?,Was Bharat Mata replaced with a Hijab?,Were there other events that took place during this play?
Did Ranaut receive funds from the Ambani family?,Did the Ambani family help Ranaut with the cost of construction?,Was Ranaut happy with the Ambani family's offer to pay for the building of the studio?,Was the Ambani family willing to pay for the building of the studio?
Did the number of restrictions in the past three years surpass the number in the previous 10 years combined?,Did states pass more restrictions on abortion in the past three years than in the previous 10 years combined?,Did any state legislatures enact more restrictions on abortion in the last three years compared to the previous 10 years combined?
Has water levels not risen significantly over the last 402 years?,Has the temperature of the water been higher for any of these 402 years?,Has there been any significant temperature increase for this period of time?,Have the sea levels decreased for any of these 402 years?,Have any of the sea levels increased or decreased over the 402 years?
Is there a record for the last GOP to win the popular vote?,Was the previous Republican to win the popular vote from Indiana?,Is it possible to find this record?,Is there evidence to support this claim?,Is the claim based on a poll that analyzed votes across Indiana and Indiana?,Was the previous Republican to win the popular vote based around the polling states?
Is there any proof that the photos shown in the article do not reflect France's civil unrest in 2016?,Can someone identify the photograph?,Are any of the photographs featured in the article taken by anyone associated with the pro-refugee movement in Belgium?,Do any of these photos have any representation of France?
Is this a first time a party has picked up multiple seats during a regular election since the mid 1980s?,Is this a record number of primary gains for any party?,Is this the largest majority of any party in more than 25 years?,Does this election bring the majority?,Is this the largest majority of any party in more than 25 years?
Does the total amount of money coming from the Mexican drug trade in US equal that of Walmart?,Does the total amount of money coming from the Mexican drug trade in US equal that of Walmart?,Does the Mexican drug trade come more into US than Walmart?,Does the US drug trade total more money than Walmart?
Did at least a couple of individuals are brought into the United States due to a family connection?,Do any of these people have family connections to the suspect in the NYC terrorist attack?,Did these people arrive at the US for economic reasons?,Did a few of these people visit the US solely based on a family connection?
Is it true that a fever flushes out infection in the body?,Is it true that you should not drink medicine in the first 24 hours of a fever?,Is there any evidence that suggests drinking medicine during a fever flush may decrease the number of bacteria in your body?,.?
"Did Postmaster General Louis DeJoy, a political ally to President Trump, order postal carriers to ""slow the mail down""?","Did the UPS President request postal carriers to ""slow the mail down""?",Does DeJoy directly have ties to Trump?,Did DeJoy's stance help Trump win the 2020 election?
Has Jeff Greene ever owned a mansion?,Has Jeff Greene ever had two mansions?,Did Jeff Greene have any other mansions for sale?,Is Jeff Greene the owner of a mansion?,Is Jeff Greene a known figure in real estate?,Is Jeff Greene famous in real estate?
Does a temperature range of 26 - 27 degrees celcius kill the virus?,Does the temperature range of 26 - 27 degrees celcius kill other viruses that might be asymptomatic?,Are the odds of the virus being killed higher after temperature of 26 - 27 degrees?,Are other viruses that could be symptomatic after temperature of 26 - 27 degrees celcius?
"Did Michigan find 138,339 votes for Biden?",Did all of the votes go to Biden?,Did Michigan vote overwhelmingly for Biden?,"Did Michigan find 138,339 votes for Biden?","Have other states found 138,339 votes for Biden?",Would some of these votes have been used to vote for Biden?
"Did Biden promise fewer fires, floods, and hurricanes if he won the election?",Did Biden promise more fewer hurricanes?,"Did Biden promise less fires, floods, and hurricanes if he was elected president?",Did Biden promise more hurricanes?
Are the top 25 hedge fund managers making more than all of America's kindergarten teachers combined?,Are these hedge fund managers making more than all of America's kindergarten teachers combined?,Are these hedge fund managers making a higher income than the average teacher?,Are the top 25 hedge fund managers making a higher income than most teachers?
Did all three labs have COVID tests not showing positive results during the period from March to July 2020?,Were all three labs busted for cooking the books?,Are there any examples of labs not reporting COVID results?,Was the labs involved in this shady operation found to have violated the lab code of ethics?
Did the two commentators appear on the site that banned them from the Women's Premier League?,Did the commentators make offensive remarks about women's teams?,Did the commentators comment on controversial topics about women's team?,Did the commentators receive disciplinary notices for their comments?,Has any other commentary on Women's Premier League teams been banned?
Do the IRS audit wealthier people at a higher rate than rich people?,Is there no evidence that the IRS audits poor people at an increasing rate?,Would a large number of new IRS agents focus on Venmo transactions?,Does the IRS audit billionaires at an increasing rate?,Is the IRS more likely to audit people who make less money than $1 million?
Does this video show two of the eight cheetahs who were brought to Madhya Pradesh?,Do these animals have the male vocalization?,Do these animals sing?,Will all the cheetahs at this facility be neutered?,Does this facility allow breeding of cheetahs?
Was there evidence that a Ukrainian soldier blew up Russian tanks?,Did a Ukrainian soldier blew up 50 Russian tanks?,Was there any evidence that any of the Russian tanks were being blown up?,Was there any evidence that any of the Russian tanks were being blown up?,Did the Russian tanks have any witnesses?
Did Heffernan say that Medicare will go away in less than 10 years if there are no changes?,Would Heffernan change his opinion?,Does Heffernan claim to have no plans to change Medicare because the government is not forcing a change?,Does Heffernan believe Medicare is too expensive to have a change?
"Is the Bihar girl that cycled 1,200 km carrying her injured father during a lockdown in the US a good example to criticise the Donald Trump for his role in this issue?",Is this woman's story an example to criticise for her role in this issue?,Is this woman being criticized for her role in this issue?
Did Maxine Waters make a $ 12 million donation to her husband?,Did Maxine Waters serve a term in prison?,Were there any reports of Waters misconduct in relation to her indictment?,Were there any reports of Waters misconduct in relation to her TARP conviction?
"Did the group identify 12,547 illegal votes in Georgia's 2020 election?",Is the margin of victory higher than that reported by the group?,Was the margin of victory greater than the number attributed to the group?,Was the margin of victory greater than the claim that the group identified illegal votes?,Was the group's claim that they identified illegal votes in Georgia exceed accurate data?
Was it on March 23?,Does this law apply to any technology?,Did it pass quickly?,Was there a negative reaction to this law?,Does this law apply to any other technology?,Does the law not allow for unlimited data coverage?,Does this law include penalties?,Are the new laws related to this technology regulated?
Does Hernandez's father have any rights towards the remainder of his $15 million NFL contract?,Is there a court precedent that dictates this?,Is it true that Hernandez's mother is entitled to the remainder of her own $15 million contract?,Would Hernandez's mom be entitled to the $15 million of her NFL contract if she committed suicide in his appeal?
Did Clinton cite any specific numbers from which he was referring?,Did Clinton cite any specific figures from which he was referring?,Did Clinton cite specific numbers from which he was referring?,Did Clinton propose any specific figures from which he was referring?,Did Clinton explicitly call for an increase in Syrian refugees?
Did Ticketmaster's announcement of requiring attendees to test for the coronavirus take place in 2020?,Did Ticketmaster plan to require attendees to test for the coronavirus within a 72 hour time frame?,Did Ticketmaster plan to require attendees to test for the coronavirus within a 72 hour time frame?
Has corporate revenue declined by about half over the last 30 years?,How large was this decline?,Is the tax mix that represents corporate revenues an accurate account of corporate revenues?,Does corporate revenue represent about half of overall revenue mix?,Have corporate revenues in the last 30 years risen?,Did this decline occur in the last 30 years or is this decline ongoing?
Is the border reopening video expected to be released by 2022 or 2023?,"Did the video show the border closing as planned, and is it true that the border will reopen by 2022?",Has the border closure been formally announced?,Is the video released by the Nigeria Customs Service on a regular basis?
Did people die by suicide after SP lost UP polls?,Have SP leaders had ties with SP in previous elections?,Did suicide deaths in Prayagraj occur after a UP election loss?,Did the people that died commit suicide in this UP election?,Had SP leadership ties with SP prior to winning elections in this election?,Did these candidates decide to commit suicide before a UP election victory?
Did Renato Reyes Jr. and others contract COVID-19?,Were six people infected with COVID-19?,Did one person die from COVID-19?,Did this incident happen during the rally hosted by Reyes Jr.?,Were there any other events at the University of the Philippines Diliman?
"Did UV-C lamps kill 99.99% of all bacteria, viruses, and mold?","Did UV-C lamps kill 99.99% of all bacteria, viruses, and mold in ten seconds?","Did UV-C lamps kill 99.99% of all bacteria, viruses, and mold?","Did UV-C lamps kill 99.99% of all bacteria, viruses, and mold?","Did UV-C lamps kill 99.99% of all bacteria, viruses, and mold on any surface you want to disinfect?"
Did the Pennsylvania Supreme Court rule the election was rigged?,Was the Pennsylvania Supreme Court ruling on the election based on an issue?,Did the Pennsylvania Supreme Court rule the election was rigged?,Did all of the states involved in the election attempt to rig the election?,Did the Supreme Court rule the election was rigged?
Is there any data about how many people are killed by gunfire in America every day?,Is it known the number of people killed each day?,Is the number of people killed each day consistent?,Is there any information available to support this claim?,Did this claim have any basis in fact?,Was the estimated death rate in this country accurate in 2017?
Do Nike customers have rights to demand an end to Nikes support for US-based campaigns if they resign?,Can Nike afford to let off customers that support American campaigns?,Has Nike's stated position amounted to a lack of funding for US campaigns if they resign?,Can Nike be a customer with a US campaign that does not resign?
Was this video posted outside the Myanmar border?,Are these Rohingya Muslim men known to attack Hindus in broad daylight?,Did the Rohingya Muslim men racialize the Hindu?,Have these Rohingya Muslim men since been arrested?,Has this video been widely distributed and cited in the media?
Did Musk say journalists with ‘They/them’ pronouns would pay more for Twitter verification?,Are the journalists with ‘They/them’ pronouns likely to pay more for Twitter verification?,Did Musk say journalists with ‘They/them’ pronouns would pay more for Twitter verification?
Did Australia and the United States send a hundred warships to help the Philippines drive away 220 Chinese ships in the South China Sea?,Has the United States ever sent warships in this vicinity?,Did the United States and Australia dispatch a hundred warships for this incident?,Did the United States and Australia deploy warships for this incident?
Did Gosar defend himself in March of 2022?,Has Gosar been called stupid for his whole life?,Did Gosar tweet that Gosar had been called stupid?,Did Gosar defend himself in March of 2022?,Are there any other notable tweets by Gosar?,Does Gosar speak in a country other than English?
Did Romney meet his fiscal targets on his tax cuts?,Did Romney raise his proposed tax cuts by more than $8 billion?,Did Romney use his tax cuts as an excuse to increase funding levels?,Did Romney agree to the tax cuts in his state budget?,Is this information accurate?,Is the amount of taxes Romney has increased?
Did Kirk lie about at least 10 times in his military service?,Were Kirk’s wartime actions justified in his stated mission?,Approximately how many times did Kirk lie about his wartime activities?,Did Kirk lie in any other places in his time?,Is Mark Kirk unjustly held to be a national security expert?
Did water use in Georgia decrease between 1980 and 2010?,Did population increase impact water use between 1980 and 2010?,Did water use decrease by less than the average from 1980 to 2010?,Was water use reduced from 1980 to 2010?,Did population increase impact water use between 1980 and 2010 in Georgia?,Did water usage drop even as Georgia’s population grew?
"Is it true that three digit numbers followed by ""new cases"" on Google are proof that the COVID-19 pandemic was manufactured?","Is it true that search for any three digit number followed by ""new cases"" on Google is evidence that the COVID-19 pandemic was manufactured?"
Did Mars release a product shortly after the Tide Pod Challenge went viral?,Did Mars release a product shortly after the Tide Pod Challenge went viral?,Was Mars' Tide Pod Challenge viral?,Did Mars released a product shortly after the Tide Pod Challenge?,Are there any other publications that mention that Mars released a product shortly after the Tide Pod Challenge?
Did CBO estimates change by more than 100% in 2017?,Did Obamacare coverage numbers increase by more than 100% in 2017?,Was there a larger drop-off in coverage estimates in 2017 than the original estimates in CBO?,Are there any other factors that contributed to the decrease in coverage estimates in 2017?,Are there other policies that could have contributed to the decrease in coverage estimates in 2017?
"Was Schottland just in the midst of global warming, have 14 millions trees been cut down?",Did Schottland use all the trees cut down for a new wind plant?,Was it difficult to acquire these trees from the local community?,Was Schottland forced to use these trees?
Did Indian wrestlers who won medals in the 2022 Commonwealth Games participate in the farmers' protest?,Has the Indian wrestler who won medals in the 2022 Commonwealth Games participated in the farmers' protest?,Has the Indian wrestler who won medals in the 2022 Commonwealth Games participated in the farmers' protest?
Has Mitch McConnell blocked every bill intended to prevent foreign interference in the 2020 election?,Has McConnell blocked any bill intended to prevent foreign interference in the 2020 election?,Is there anything that is likely to have prevented foreign interference in the 2020 election?,Is there any evidence that any bills would have prevented foreign interference in the 2020 election?
Can an average human undergo more labor than a mother?,Can the human undergo more birth labor than a mother?,Does it cause mothers to feel 57 del in pain during childbirth?,Does one in five mothers experience a greater level of pain during childbirth compared to another human body?,Does the higher level of pain during childbirth result in lower rates of pain?
"Did Hertz sell 10,000 Tesla e-vehicles?",Did Hertz have Tesla in its inventory during this time?,"Did Hertz purchase 100,000 e-vehicles during the October 20, 2021 Hertz announcement?","Did Hertz purchase 10,000 Tesla e-vehicles?","Has Tesla delivered 100,000 e-vehicles in the past?"
Did suffragettes wear bathing suits and eat pizza in large groups?,Was this custom prevalent at the time?,Was this a custom in 1921?,Has there ever been proof that this custom existed?,Did suffragettes eat pizza in large groups in 1921?,Has there been any evidence that this practice is common at this time?
Are there people that died from H1N1 based on Biden's claim?,Are there records of people that died of H1N1 based on Biden's claim?,Did Biden provide a number of people that died from H1N1 based on Biden's claims?
Did this study specifically study COVID-19 vaccines?,Does this study confirm this report?,Did this study find evidence that COVID-19 mRNA vaccines are toxic?,Do these vaccines cause COVID-19?,Does the spike protein in the vaccine cause this disease?,Does this vaccine cause health complications for people?
Has a kidney been stolen in this scenario?,Did organ thieves steal the kidney from the hikers?,Did the hikers who were robbed have any injuries?,Did the hikers who are robbed are portrayed as homicidal people?,Did the hikers who were robbed in this scenario a rapist?
Did the current trend result in a positive increase in earnings of business owners over health insurance for the first time in 17 years?,Are current health insurance expenses higher than wages and salaries for the first time in 17 years?,Are salaries and wages increasing faster than health insurance in the economy?,Is the increase in payrolls from employers due to increasing cost of medical care?
Is it true that the man in question was armed and took 27 people to play Yahtzee?,Is the man in question an adult?,Have the children all escaped?,Were all the people arrested or convicted in the case?,Did all of them spend the time in an isolated location?
Is CNN's Crap polling so bad that it shows that no one under the age of 50 has an opinion of Hillary Clinton?,Was the CNN's Crap polling so bad that it shows that no one under the age of 50 has an opinion of Hillary Clinton?,Is the CNN's Crap polling so bad that it shows that no one under the age of 50 has an opinion of Hillary Clinton?
Did a tsunami occur in Turkey in February 2023?,Is it true a tsunami caused by the asteroid?,Did the tsunami occur as a result of the earthquake?,Was the tsunami caused by the earthquake?,Did people survive the tsunami in Turkey?,No Answer>No Response>No?
"Did it say "" 300 people ""?","Did he say "" bad people were there in that caravan ""?",Is it true the 300 people in the caravan were bad people?,Was there any evidence of that in their conversation?,Did they check to ensure this?,Did they find a resounding no in their story?
Is the man who died having received 14 flu shots in a day with Alzheimer's disease?,Are other reports of men getting flu shots for the same conditions?,Do flu shots decrease the risk of death in people with Alzheimer's disease?,Is it true that the man who died from an Alzheimer's disease died after getting 14 flu shots in a day?
Did the vaccines not study pregnant women?,"Did this vaccine have a 50 - times rate of miscarriages, over all vaccines?","Did this vaccine have a 50 - times rate of miscarriages, over all vaccines?",Were all the vaccines combined tested for the same reasons?
Did Daniels deny relationship with Trump before or after 2018?,Did the statement relate to the Trump controversy?,Was Daniels statement in response to Trump scandal the same year as the Trump scandal?,Did the statement in response to Trump controversy relate to the Trump scandal?,Did Daniels' statement related to the Trump scandal date prior to 2018?
Did the group attack and kill the Shiva Gurjar?,Did the group attack and kill the Shiva Gurjar?,Was there an immediate response to the attack?,Did the group attack and kill the Shiva Gurjar?,Are any other details of the attack available?,Did the group attack and kill the Shiva Gurjar?,Did any of the others involved have guns?,Did the group of 4-5 people from the Muslim community attack the Shiva Gurjar?,Did the group of 4-5 people from the Muslim community shoot and kill the Shiva Gurjar?
Did McDonald's sell a scent that resembled a Quarter Pounder?,Did McDonald's sell a scent that resembled a Beef burger?,Is there a scent from McDonald's similar to a Beef burger?,Does McDonald's sell the same type of scented candles as the Beef burger?
Are people vaccinated with the vaccine advised to abstain from drinking before and 42 days after the vaccination?,Did the officials recommend people abstain from drinking for two weeks before the vaccination?,Is there any evidence of the vaccine causing harm to people?,Do the officials recommend abstaining from drinking before and 42 days after the vaccine?
Is this photograph accurate?,Is Tate's mug shot of him holding the policeman's gun a photo?,Is Tate handcuffed in a police van after his arrest?,Can Tate be seen wearing a police uniform during this arrest?,Is Tate's photograph accurate of Tate in the police van?
Is the amount in the bill mentioned by Sen. Sanders likely in fact?,Do Americans get rebates for health insurance plans after signing the ACA?,Can taxpayers receive a rebate by paying less on their insurance?,Does Sen. Sanders say he was responsible for passing a bill that would reduce the amount in the bill?
Does sneezing with the new coronavirus travel less than 10 feet before it drops to the ground?,Are there any known sources of coronavirus?,Is the new coronavirus present at workplaces?,Have studies shown that the new coronavirus has a high rate of transmitting?
Are there more hurricanes today than there were 100 years ago?,Does the National Oceanic Administration say hurricanes are more common today than 100 years ago?,Has hurricane activity increased 100 years?,Does this research suggest a higher level of hurricane activity since 100 years ago?,Is this information accurate?,Does this research claim that hurricane activity has declined as compared to 100 years ago?
Did a satirical amendment to the state constitution prohibit women from notifying state of pregnancy?,Did any state legislator support this amendment in 2019?,Was a satirical amendment to the state constitution proposed at some point in 2019?,Do any state legislators support this amendment?,Was this amendment implemented at any point in the state constitution?
Was Barrett an anti-racist?,Did Barrett say that being called the N-word did not constitute a hostile work environment?,Did Barrett ever suggest calling the N-word did not constitute a hostile work environment?,Did Barrett ever claim to be anti-racist?,Are there any other statements of this type from Barrett?
Was there a body count in Bucha when the Russian army left?,Was there anyone killed by the Russian army?,Was the Russian army left Bucha at midnight on March 30?,Was the Russian army at Bucha by midnight on March 30?,Was there anyone injured by the Russian army in Bucha?,Did the Russian army have any equipment?
Did Robert Maxwell give Mitt Romney his first $2M investment?,Did Robert Maxwell ever give Mitt Romney any other investments?,Did Mitt Romney start a business?,Does the Maxwell family have any siblings?,Was Bob Maxwell the father of Ghislaine Maxwell?,Was Bob Maxwell associated with any other family members?
Did Biden say this on the same day as 3/22?,Did Biden tweet this on the same day as 3/22?,Was this BS the same in both cases?,Was Biden referring to an audience in the first two cases?,Did Biden have these 2 comments the same day?
Did BJP leader Manoj Tiwari say that if PM Modi was not governing the country petrol prices would have touched Rs 200?,Did the BJP leader say that if PM Modi was not governing the country petrol prices would have touched Rs 200?,Do the petrol prices of India touch Rs 200?
"Did Facebook ban its own page or all news publications on its Australian platform in February, 2021?",Does this ban affect other Facebook pages?,Does this ban affect News publications on other Facebook pages?,Did this ban affect a specific Facebook page or a specific group of pages?,Did Facebook prohibit any news publications on its website in 2021?,Did this ban prevent other Facebook pages from posting news?
Did Woolworths stop accepting cash on May 26?,Is there proof that Woolworths stopped accepting cash?,Is there proof that Woolworths stopped accepting cash on May 26?,Is there any other evidence that Woolworths stopped accepting cash on May 26?,Is there a reason to believe Woolworths will continue accepting cash on May 26?
Did President Duterte ask soldiers not to hesitate to use their guns against a perceived enemy?,Does the statement in the video explicitly call for the destruction of the Communist Party?,Did President Duterte order soldiers to use their guns against a perceived enemy?,Is there evidence that the military order was delivered after the video was shown?
Did Democrats boo children murdered by MS13?,Did Democrats boo the families of children killed by MS13?,Did Democrats boo children killed by MS13?,Did a Democrat boo the children murdered by MS13?,Did Democrats boo the families of children murdered by MS13?,Did Democrats boo families of children murdered by MS13?
Is abortion 94% of the services provided by Planned Parenthood?,Is abortion the most used service provided by Planned Parenthood?,Was the rate of abortions based on population?,Were abortion rates calculated using average percentages?,Was abortion a significant benefit of Planned Parenthood?
Has the total public health workforce increased by 100%?,"Does this increase mean there have been a total increase of 75,000 or more workers?","Has the government recruited additional 36,900 healthcare workers in the last nine years?",Is there an increase in the total public health workforce by any major percentage in the past nine years?
Would this decision apply to election in 2020?,Did the Supreme Court specifically rule on whether box are illegal?,Is this a general ruling and should this include elections?,Does this ruling include elections before 2020?,Is there an 'addition' to this ruling that would require a new vote to have an 'additional vote'?
Did Jacobs receive any funding from the same men facing charges?,Did Jacobs receive any money from any of the individuals in this scheme?,Is there evidence of any direct financial relationship between Jacobs and the men alleged in this scandal?,Is there any evidence that this is a formal government corruption scheme?
Has the Disney theme park canceled their mask requirements?,Does Disneyland have a policy to remove mask requirements for guests?,Did Disney change its policy on mask requirements prior to 2019?,Is it true Disneyland was the first to drop mask requirements?,Did Disney do anything about this decision before 2020?,Do other park chains have similar policies with respect to mask requirements?
Was the picture taken on a helicopter?,Did Trump wear a hat while on Air Force One?,Did Trump have a hat on while boarding Air Force One?,Does Trump wear a hat in every photo?,Do pictures of a bald head have to have a hat on?
Did the photo take place in 2014 or earlier?,Was the photo taken under Obama?,Is there any evidence to support the photo being taken under Obama?,Would this photo have been taken under any other president?,"Regardless of the administration, was this picture taken in 2014?",Is this picture on the Internet?
Did the chemical gas flow to Muslim homes?,Did the chemical gas flow to the Muslim homes?,Did the chemical gas flow to the Muslim homes because of the police violence?,Did the chemical gas flow to the Muslim homes because of the police action?,Was the chemical gas flow to the Muslim homes an isolated incident?,Has the chemical gas flowed to other cities in the country?
Did Lil Nas X perform Jolene in a live recording?,"Did the song ""Jolene"" feature a live rendition of the song?",Did the song perform well on the radio?,Will Lil Nas X perform again on the radio soon?,Did Lil Nas X perform Jolene in a live recording?
Did the man who abandoned his vehicle on train tracks in Los Angeles commit suicide?,Was he sentenced to life imprisonment for the suicide attempt?,Is the train crash responsible for the deaths of 11 passengers?,Is there any evidence that the suicide attempt resulted in a train crash?,Were the victims of the train crash all women?
Did this man start the fire?,Did he do this after a fine?,Does this man smoke or drink while burning his car?,Has this man ever committed any crimes?,Did this man want to avoid a fine?,Does this man have an active criminal record?,Did he have any convictions for criminal acts?
"Did Johnson refuse 50,000 ventilators offered by the European Commission?",Did Johnson give them to many people?,Has Johnson voted to restrict access to breathing aids?,Did Johnson want to allow the introduction of any health care reforms?,Is Johnson open to medical reforms?,Was Johnson a conservative?
Did the two women enter the closed amusement park?,Did these women sue its operators?,Did the operators of the park allow their guests access to a closed amusement park?,Do the operators of the closed amusement park allow its guests to enter a closed amusement park?,Do these women sue its operators?
"Does the average cost of child care in this country exceed $1,030 a month for a child to attend college?",Did the average cost of child care in this country exceed that of a child to go to college for a year?,Did the average cost of child care in this country exceed that of a child to go to college for a year?
Did 14 million Americans lose insurance in year No. 1?,Did CBO report that 14 million Americans lost insurance in year No. 1?,Is it the CBO's job to estimate the number of Americans lost coverage?,Was 14 million Americans excluded from coverage in year No. 1?,Was it the CBO's job to estimate the number of Americans lost coverage?
Has it been reported that 350 people 'accepted' Islam in New Zealand after the Christchurch shootings?,Is this the first time that New Zealand has been seen to accept Islam?,Is this the first time that New Zealand has had so many people 'accepted' Islam?,Did this incident occur in New Zealand?
Did Menendez vote to increase the debt ceiling?,Did Menendez help the US overspend the debt ceiling?,Did Menendez use the money raised to finance the debt ceiling?,Does Menendez have any previous involvement in the debt ceiling?,Does Menendez's political activism continue after he was re-elected to Congress?
Was the release postponed for what date?,Did Radhe Shyam's release date have a later date?,Did UV Creations tweet the information about the release date?,Did Radhe Shyam have a sequel before this release?,Did Radhe Shyam have a sequel before this release?
Did Pakistan donate over 1/4th of its GDP?,Did Pakistan contribute more than half of its GDP during the pandemic?,Did Pakistan do the most during the pandemic?,Did Pakistan donate over half of its GDP?,Does Pakistan donate less than half of its GDP?,Did Pakistan donate all or part of its GDP during the pandemic?
Was Robert Aaron Long a Democrat and a member of Antifa?,Did Robert Aaron Long vote for Republican?,Were there any other facts associated with the murders in Atlanta?,Was Robert Aaron Long a member of antifa?,Was Robert Aaron Long a member of a certain political party?
Is it true that women only earn 80 cents for every dollar a man earns for doing the same job?,Is it true that women only earn 80 cents for every dollar a man earns for doing the same job?,Are women only able to earn 80 cents for every dollar a man earns for doing the same job?
Did a video capture in late May 2021 show a megalodon shark stalking a cruise ship?,Did the video capture include a live view of the megalodon shark?,Did a live video of the megalodon shark capture a live video of the megalodon shark?
Does marijuana lower IQ points?,Does marijuana increase IQs?,Are there any other positive effects of marijuana in teens?,Is the data from this paper valid?,Are these IQ changes spelled out in this study?,Is it true that this study supports a link between marijuana use and IQ loss?
Has the Bank of England spent $65 billion on long-dated UK government bonds due to a mini-Budget?,Has the Bank of England purchased £65 billion in government bonds?,Did the Bank of England buy money from the government as a result of the mini-Budget?,Has the Bank of England ever invested a dollar in a government bond?
Did the Oroville dam fail because of a water bond passed in 2014?,Did Brown not invest any money on new water storage or improved existing infrastructure like Oroville?,Did the Oroville dam fail because of a water bond passed in 2014?,Did Brown make any decisions about a water bond?
Did Burj Khalifa light up with Sri Lankan flag colors for Sri Lanka's 2020 Independence day?,Were the Sri Lanka flag colors being used to celebrate Sri Lanka's 2020 Independence day?,Was the Sri Lanka flag colors used on the Burj Khalifa to celebrate Sri Lanka's 2020 Independence day?
Did the Department of Energy report that average car ownership would save about $70 a year?,Did average car ownership save $70 a year?,Did the Department of Energy report that average car ownership would save $70 a year?,Was the average income generated by car ownership in 2016 lower than in 2017?
Did Obama cut tax rates several times?,Did Obama specifically say he cut tax rates five times?,Does Obama plan to continue increasing tax rates?,Did Obama have any major policies before reducing taxes?,Did Obama cite his tax cuts for the first time after lowering taxes?,Did Clinton use the quote when claiming he cut taxes five times?
"Did 14,000 registered voters lose their vote in 2008?",Was it because voting in the wrong precinct?,Are voter turnout rates for vote in the wrong precinct a significant contributor to voting in the wrong precinct?,Are there any other factors that contribute to voter turnout in the wrong precinct?
Did Samajwadi Party sweep Uttar Pradesh in the 2022 UP poll?,Did Samajwadi Party win a majority in the upcoming 2022 UP poll?,"Was the percentage in the poll from a poll conducted after December, 2018?","Did the UP Polling Committee conduct polls after December, 2018?",Did the UP Polling Committee have any official record of the upcoming UP Poll?
Did the boos occur during Biden's pre-recorded statement in front of Super Bowl XXIV?,Was Jill Biden in attendance during the boos?,Was Biden's wife present for the boos?,Does Biden's performance at this event have an impact on other issues?
Has this new virus been identified?,Has this new virus been confirmed?,Did this new virus have a lifespan of 20 years or more in China?,Has this new virus actually caused any death?,Has this virus caused any other diseases?,Has this virus been reported in the United States?,Have any studies suggested that Hantavirus could be a cause of cancer?
Has income growth been high in any region of the developing world since 1990?,Have individual incomes grown by more than a third in any region of the developing world since 1990?,Was the annual economic growth rate in the developing world above a third in 1990?,Does the average annual income in the developing world during that same period average more than a third of the average annual income in the developed world?
Did Culp introduce legislation in South Africa which would improve wages of more than 6 million workers?,Will the minimum wage increase help many of these workers?,"Is Culp's proposal in South Africa ""precedented""?",Is Culp's proposal an improvement of the minimum wage?
Is it necessary to believe in God in order to be a good person?,Is it possible to be good without belief in God?,Does Pope Francis think he has proof that this is the case?,Does the pontiff agree with Pope Francis on this issue?,Do scholars agree with Pope Francis about this issue?
"Did the German study involve over 25,000 children?",Does this study suggest that these health impacts are more widespread than reported?,Is the extent of the effects of these health impacts in children highly dependent on how well children are taking care of themselves?,Were the findings of this study based on a well-reported study?,Were the findings based on an objective evaluation of children?,Did the authors conduct a cross-sectional study to identify the causes of these health impacts?
Did the press try to make it 2.9?,Did they try to change it?,Did they try to change it with certain months?,Did they try to change it with certain months?,Did they attempt to change it with certain months?,Did they attempt to change it with certain months?,Did they attempt to change it?,Did they try to change it with certain months?,Did they attempt to change it?
Does the deal give Iran $150 billion?,Would the deal create the equivalent of $8 trillion in tax revenue for Iran?,Does the deal provide Iran with tax revenue of $100 billion or greater?,Will this amount be sufficient to fund the state's economy for a few months?,Will this amount be sufficient to support Iran's economy and current financial system?
Did the author say pandemics occur exactly every 100 years?,Was the author referring to events during this time period or another period?,Would a pandemic occur every 100 years based on the author's stance?,Did the author ever make public statements about this type of phenomenon?,Can a pandemic occur every 100 years?
Is Congress approved of a $336 increase in social security?,"Did Congress approve an $8,872 increase in its salary?","Did Congress approve the $8,872 increase in its wages?","Did congress approve the $8,872 increase in its salary?","Did Congress approve of an $8,872 increase in social security?"
Do seven simple hand exercises prevent COVID-19?,Are any other types of hand exercises mentioned in this article recommended to combat COVID-19?,Are any other types of hand exercises mentioned in this article recommended to combat COVID-19?,Has any of these exercises actually been confirmed safe for humans?,Does the majority of these exercises claim to help prevent COVID-19?
Did three migrants have identification numbers written on their forearms?,Did any other migrants have identification numbers written on their forearms?,Did any other migrants have identification numbers on their forearms?,Did any other migrants have identification numbers on their forearms?,Is there any evidence that the United States-Mexico border is prone to undocumented immigration?
Are 98 percent of Americans in favor of a more robust background check system?,Are 98 percent of Americans opposed to expanding background checks?,Are 98 percent of Americans opposed to expanding background checks for gun sales?,Are 98 percent of Americans opposed to strengthening background checks?,Is 98 percent of Americans opposed to expanding background checks?
Was kostet die Hausbeilegung von Flüchtlingen?,Was Flüchtlinge zu rechnen?,Was der Flüchtlinge Hausbeilegung recht hoch?,Do the numbers make a convincing point?,Has there been a successful asylum policy?,Do the figures reflect these points?,Would a 20 euro be enough to refrigerate temporary housing?
Did the skier wobbling in the video of the 2022 Winter Olympics?,Will Venezuelan skiers have better conditions in the future?,Do the 2022 Winter Olympics not include skis?,Do the 2019 Winter Olympics include skis?,Does Venezuela have skis?,Was the video for the 2022 Winter Olympics released?
Has there been any increase in the federal minimum wage in more than 50 years?,Has the federal minimum wage increased at all in the last 10 years?,Can the maximum wage increase be used for calculating income?,Is there any other information regarding the minimum wage that is relevant to this question?,"If I understand correctly, can the federal minimum wage be considered an increase in income?",Is the minimum wage the basis of the Federal Government?
Is marijuana associated with a significant reduction in IQ?,Is marijuana a cause of multiple mental health problems?,Is marijuana associated with the presence of depression?,Is the National Institutes of Health responsible for providing this information?,Does marijuana increase the amount of marijuana used?,Is IQ reduced by the use of marijuana?
Did the Washington Times republish this article 20 years ago?,Did a reprint of this article occur for the period prior to 2001?,Did this news agency release news articles previously from the Washington Times?,Did The Washington Times report that Gore won the presidential election 20 years ago?,Did the Washington Times report that Gore won the US presidential election in 2000?
Is there evidence Young made this remark in a 1985 interview?,Has Young ever spoken against AIDS?,Did Young ever make a remark about the stigmatization of AIDS or gay men?,Can Neil Young's quote about AIDS be attributed to AIDS or to a gay male?
Is there any evidence to suggest 80% of Americans support Dreamers?,Is it true that 70% of Americans think there should be a path to citizenship for Dreamers?,Is the claim based on data from 2014?,Are there any specific statistics from 2014 that support this claim?,Has this claim been refuted by independents?
"Are people born before 1957 getting $1,728 added to their Social Security checks?",Was the amount of the additional amount per year for people born before 1957 the same as the total amount of money in the previous year?,Does the amount of the additional amount per year in a year increase according to the amount in the previous year?
Does the bill allow Virginia to join other states that have ultrasounds before abortion?,Will this bill allow Virginia to join 23 other states in having ultrasounds before abortions?,Will this bill allow Virginia to join other states in having ultrasounds before abortions?,Are there any restrictions in this bill for this bill?,Will this bill allow Virginia to join other states in having ultrasounds before abortions?
Was Carlson partnered with Anthony in a lawsuit?,Did Anthony sue Fox?,Does Carlson have any criminal records?,Were any of the plaintiffs' assets in the suit?,Did the lawsuit claim the loss of any of the plaintiff's assets?,Was this lawsuit filed on a different record than the original?
"Was the CDC Revised Death Count of COVID-19 to show that only 9,210 people actually died?","Did the CDC Revise Death Count of COVID-19 to show only 9,210 people actually died?",Was COVID-19 a widespread COVID-19 outbreak?,"Did the CDC revise Death Count of COVID-19 to show that only 9,210 people actually died?"
Do I have to pay to view this clickbait post?,Can I use it on my phone to smuggle money?,"If someone paid me to smuggle money, can I use it to pay for my purchase?",Can I use this to pay for my shipment?,Is there evidence of online fraud?
Did Michael J Fox die from complications related to Parkinson's disease?,Did Fox die from complications related to Parkinson's disease in August 2018?,Was Michael J Fox the age of majority in his profession?,Was Fox diagnosed with Parkinson's disease in August 2018?,Did Michael J Fox die from complications related to Parkinson's disease at the age of 57?
Did Madagascar find a coronavirus medicine that could wipe out the virus in 6 days?,Did Madagascar develop a coronavirus medicine that could wipe out the virus in 6 days?,Have there been any other viral outbreaks?,Do coronavirus vaccines exist?,Did Madagascar research coronavirus vaccines?
Did McCain imply that we would have troops in Iraq for 100 years?,Did McCain make this statement as part of a speech to a US audience?,Did McCain offer specific details on how long they would have troops in Iraq?,Did McCain say that in general people would have troops in Iraq for 100 years?
Did Congress hike the national debt ceiling to $14.3 trillion?,Was this new budget more than $5 trillion in debt over the next five years?,Did this previous budget contain the debt ceiling figure?,Will this budget amount to over $5 trillion in debt over the next five years?,Does this budget contain a debt ceiling figure greater than $15 trillion?
Does 50 Cent buy Murder Inc Records?,Does 50 Cent own the RIAA?,Did 50 Cent buy Murder Inc Records at a lower price than the actual recording company?,Do all of the artists on Murder Inc Records own the label?,Is Murder Inc Records one of the few notable music publishers?
Did the fashion of sagging one's pants start because of a prison facility?,Did the fashion of sagging one's pants originate from prison?,Was the prison institution involved in the development of the fashion of sagging one's pants?,Can this style of garment be seen today as a fashion trend?
Did the girl get into the washing machine?,Did the father put the washing machine in close proximity to his home?,Did the boy wake up in the morning?,Was the washing machine functioning normally when the girls body was in the washer?,Was the washing machine running frequently when the girls body was in the washing machine?,Has the family of the girl ever called the police relating to this incident?
"Did Morgan Carroll ""rake up $11 billion in new spending"" in the state Legislature?",Did Colorado Democratic congressional candidate Morgan Carroll record $11 billion in new spending in the state legislature?,Did Morgan Carroll have any significant budget deficits during the 2008 and 2009 election cycle?,Were any of the campaign contributions Morgan Carroll received used to finance any campaign activities?,Was any of the campaign donations used for any purpose besides fundraising?,Did Morgan Carroll work with local Democrats to fund campaigns?
Is there a 0.442% chance that an asteroid will hit Earth on 2 November?,Does this amount of chance differ from previous surveys?,Would an asteroid strike in 10 years from now?,Are there any other issues in the study?,Are there any ways to improve the results?,Will this outcome occur sooner or later?
Did Azerbaijan attack Armenia with their S-300 air defence system?,Did Armenia use S-300 air defence systems during Azerbaijan attacks?,Did Azerbaijan's S-300 air defence systems kill Armenians?,Did Azerbaijan destroy any S-300 air defence systems by attacking Armenia?
Did the Congressional Budget Office say the cost to buy a private health insurance policy in these exchanges would be 10 percent higher than in private markets?,Will the cost to purchase private insurance with the exchanges be about 2 to 3 thousand more?,Will people who are currently buying private insurance within these health care exchanges be paying more on a daily basis?
"Is the Philippines experiencing 10 million COVID-19 cases despite 10,000 people dying?","Did President Roque say ten million cases in the Philippines “will not be a loss” even if 10,000 people die?","Did Roque say that 10 million cases in the Philippines will not be a loss despite 10,000 deaths?"
Do victims of rape qualify for a permit to have abortions?,Is there a provision that makes it illegal for rape victims to have abortions?,Is there any law restricting rape victims to aborted children?,Is there an exception for rape victims to have abortions?
Did Clinton recite this quote based on actual data?,Did Clinton give details of who was against her being a candidate?,Is reciting this quote inaccurate or nonsensical?,Would it be possible to assume that there are 45% of Americans that say they will not vote for Clinton?
"Was it 80 percent of North Carolinians who support the concept that men should not be in women’s restrooms, changing rooms, bathrooms, etc.?",Has the number of men in women’s restrooms increased in the past few years?,Has the percentage of men in women’s restrooms increased in the past several years?
Did the Republican caucus help pass 25 tax cuts last year?,Were most of the tax cuts aimed at the middle class and small businesses?,Was the majority of the tax cuts aimed at the middle class and small businesses?,Have the tax cuts been in place for over a decade?,Is the tax cut being a failure due to Republicans causing conflicts between the tax cuts and Republicans?,Does Congress have the capacity to pass tax cuts without Republican help?
Did this house survive Ike?,Did this house's exorcism result in the house being damaged during Ike?,Did this house survive Ike?,Did this house's exorcism result in the house being damaged during Ike?,Did this house survive Ike?,Does this house's image include the house's exorcism?
"Have there been any ""real evidence"" that tax cuts have made up lost revenue?",Have tax cuts made up lost revenue over the last 20 years?,Have tax cuts helped with recoupment from lost revenue?,Is there other evidence that tax cuts helped?,Has the recoupment of lost revenue from tax cuts been recouped from tax cuts?
Did Amitabh Bachchan thank health care workers after he was hospitalised for COVID-19 in July 2020?,Does this video show the following statements about Amitabh Bachchan?,Is the video of Bachchan thanking healthcare workers and praising them?,Is the video titled 'thanks healthcare workers after being hospitalised for COVID-19'?,Did Bachchan thank healthcare workers after his hospitalization for COVID-19?
"Did Time magazine call Obama ""one of America's best governors""?",Does Time magazine endorse Obama for any office?,Is there evidence to indicate that Obama was not well liked among his supporters?,Did Time magazine give Obama many credit for his efforts as governor?,Did Time magazine publish an article that praised Obama?
Did CBS News attempt to pass off a picture taken in Ukraine as a picture of a U.S. child afflicted with a coronavirus-related disease in 2020?,Was this claim made in response to a photo allegedly taken from Ukraine?,Did CBS attempt to pass off this photo as a picture of a U.S. child afflicted with a coronavirus-related disease in 2020?,Did CBS attempt to pass off this photo as a picture of a U.S. child afflicted with a coronavirus-?
Does this video portray a single woman in a relationship?,Did the single woman marry multiple men?,Do you believe this video shows a single woman in a relationship?,Did this person have children?,Was this woman married to multiple men?,Did the woman marry multiple men?,Would this person's child be the child of multiple men?
Did COVID-19 claim 2.9 million U.S. deaths in 2020?,Did the death rate for COVID-19 fluctuate in 2018?,Are deaths a result of COVID-19?,Did COVID-19 cause 2.9 million deaths in 2020?,Is there evidence to support these claims?
Did Manhattan DA resign and drop Trump investigation?,Did this rumor stem from edited video?,Was Manhattan DA responsible for the Trump investigation?,Did Trump investigation stem from an edited video?,Have articles published about this rumor come out after the Trump investigation?,Was this rumor true or false?
Is it true Stanford rejected all applicants for the Class of 2020?,Has Stanford University ever rejected any applicants for the Class of 2020?,Has Stanford rejected any applicants for the Class of 2020?,Did Stanford reject any applicants for the Class of 2020?,Did Stanford reject any applicants for the Class of 2020?,Did Stanford reject all applicants for the Class of 2020?,Did Stanford reject any applicants for the Class of 2020?
Has Eskom been guaranteed R350 billion?,Is SANAR guaranteed R38.9 billion?,Is Denel guaranteed R1.8 billion?,Is the Road Accident Fund guaranteed R8.5 billion?,Is the state guaranteed R350 billion of Eskom debt?,Does this financial situation not make the State financially viable?,Is this economic situation not sustainable in any way?
"Did Biden mention that if Haiti sunk into the Caribbean or rose 300 feet, it wouldn't matter in terms of America's interests?","Did Biden say that if Haiti simply sunk into the Caribbean or rose 300 feet, it wouldn't matter in terms of America's interests?"
Have unemployment rates in Oregon declined since Governor Brown's takeover?,Did a recent survey indicate a significant drop in unemployment rates in Oregon?,Has Oregon's unemployment rate stayed the same or dropped for several years?,Are Oregon's unemployment rates below their long-period average for the state?
Was it true that the number of executions was decreased by at least two thirds in the past generation?,Did executions increase due to increasing awareness?,Was it accurate to say the number of executions has decreased due to increased awareness?,Does the reduction in executions result from increased crime?,Is it possible that these changes could be attributed to a larger reduction of executions?
Who is Sun Jisu?,Is he a 13-year-old?,Did Sun Jisu have to hacked to get the Facebook crashing on?,Can a 13-year-old hacker hack into a public Facebook account?,Can a 13-year-old hack into a public Facebook account?
Is this the first time Modi was recognized as the World's Most Powerful Person in this context?,Did this recognition occur prior to the COVID-19 outbreak?,Was this accolade based on the fact that Modi has the largest bank accounts in the world?,(4) Is the world's largest bank account the biggest bank account of any country?
Is Roque currently working towards a Senate run?,Is there any confirmation that Roque plans to run for a Senate seat in 2020?,Will Roque have to fill out an application for the Senate run?,Would Roque have to formally declare that he plans to run for a Senate seat?
"Was there a reason employees at Five Guys refused to serve police officers in Daphne, Alabama?",Was this a racially motivated incident?,Was this event a threat?,"Are police officers allowed to bring their own food in restaurants that offer ""free food"" in the first place?",Did the restaurant have this policy in place?
Does the following prevents the virus from spreading?,Is this information accurate?,Are there other measures I can take to prevent coronavirus?,Is this information based on actual data?,Is this information based on a standardized list of best practices?,Are these guidelines based on data from the medical literature?,Does this information include any information that is not attributed to the medical literature?
Do 50 Cent and Ice Cube wear Trump 2020 Hats?,Is this statement true?,Has Ice Cube also worn Trump 2020 hats?,Do 50 Cent and Ice Cube have Trump 2020 hats?,Will 50 Cent or Ice Cube wear Trump 2020 hats in 2020?,Did 50 Cent and Ice Cube wear Trump 2020 hats in 2020?
"Did a pro Trump mob chant 'Hang Mike Pence' on Jan. 6, 2021?",Did a pro Trump mob chant 'Hang Mike Pence' on Jan. 6?,"Is there evidence of a pro Trump mob chanting 'Hang Mike Pence' during a January 5, 2019 storm of the U.S. Capitol?"
Has Sahar Tabar undergone any facial surgeries to make her face resemble that of Angelina Jolie?,Did Sahar Tabar undergo any other body surgeries to make her face resemble that of Angelina Jolie?,Did Sahar Tabar undergo any facial surgeries before or after making her face resemble Angelina Jolie?
Did Russia place Black Lives Matter on an official terrorist list?,Was Black Lives Matter placed on an official terrorist list in July 2016?,Is it true that Black Lives Matter was placed on an official terrorist list in July 2016?,Was Black Lives Matter placed on an official terrorist list in July 2016?
Did Robredo solicit donations for the 2022 elections?,Are Robredo's donations included in Robredo's disqualification from the 2022 election?,Does Robredo have any criminal records?,Are there any criminal records on Robredo?,Will Robredo receive any punishment from the Philippine Commission on Election?
Are there 65 soldiers that died?,Did this increase the popularity of the PM?,Are there any people that believe that this increase in popularity will help the country?,Is anyone from India or another country that has lost soldiers able to save this country?,Will this increase in popularity result in some major problems in the country?,Has Tata criticized any politician that has shown this concern?
Did any of the Marines standing behind Biden during the speech edit the speech?,Is it known if any of the Marines stand behind Biden during the speech?,Did this move affect the perception of the message?,Is the speech being edited in any way?,Are any of the Marines standing behind Biden during the speech portrayed in the media?
Are there nearly 800 million citizens in India who live in extreme poverty — less than $1.90 per day — yet every citizen is required to have a valid form of ID to vote in national elections?,Is it true that all 1.4 billion Indian citizens are required to have a valid form of ID to vote in national elections?
Did the photo show Trump shaking hands with Osama bin Laden?,Did the photo support Trump's claim of shaking hands with Osama bin Laden?,Does the picture support Trump's claims of shaking hands with Osama bin Laden?,Did the poster of the image agree that Trump could do no wrong by shaking hands with bin Laden?
"Does she claim that she got unions to agree to ""about $10 million in reduction"" of salary and health benefits while serving as Dane County executive?","Did she get unions to agree to ""about $10 million in reduction"" of salaries and health benefits while serving as Dane County executive?","Does any of these reductions were due to ""no union pay""?","Does anyone else claim to have gotten unions to agree to a ""no union pay"" reduction?"
Has David Cassidy been diagnosed with Organ Failure?,Did David Cassidy die of Organ Failure?,Has David Cassidy died of Organ Failure for any reason?,Has David Cassidy been given a death notice?,Has this situation been investigated by any official agency?,Is there any evidence that David Cassidy died from Organ Failure?
Did Biden's income increase over 2 years from 2016-2019?,"Did Biden make more than $15,000,000 per year in 2017-2019?","Did Biden earn more than $1,000,000 per year?","Did Biden make more than $15,000,000 in 2016?","Did Biden make more than $1,000,000 in 2016?"
"Did the stock market set a record on March 13, 2020?",Did the stocks record any records during this conference?,"Did the stocks set any records on March 13, 2020?",Did the NASDAQ reach any new records during this time period?,"Did this stock market make any new records in March, 2020?","Did this stock market have any new record in March, 2020?",Did this market release record any new records during this time period?
Was the constable attacked by a Muslim mob for trying to stop three inebriated Muslim men from abusing women?,Was the constable arrested for trying to stop three inebriated Muslim men from abusing women?,Was the constable arrested for being a police officer and not a Muslim citizen?
Did this ranking increase after a four-year period?,Has this ranking increased since this list was set?,Did this ranking increase following publication of the list?,Has this ranking increased since this list was last published?,Did this list include business friendly states or ranked business friendly states?,Was this list in 2017?
Was the U.S. Navy responsible for this recovery?,Was it the first time an aircraft carrier resurfaced?,Was this vessel the first to appear 90 years after it went missing?,Was the original U.S. Navy ship responsible for this recovery?,Did this U.S. Navy ship return on time?
"Do Americans lose more than 100,000 jobs from the delay?","Did Senator Sanders say the six year delay on approving Keystone is costing more than 100,000 jobs?",Does the delay on approving Keystone result in new jobs creating?,Does the delay on approving Keystone result in new jobs creating?
Are there any exit polls showing NDA getting 177 seats?,Is the NDA in the lead?,Are there any exit polls that show NDA getting 177 seats?,Is this NDA getting 177 seats?,Do any exit polls show that NDA is in the lead?,Do exit polls show NDA is getting 177 seats?
Is there a chance to increase the positivity rate?,Does the 5% positive rate mean a total reopening of the economy and country?,Does 5% positivity rate make a total reopening of the economy and country?,Is there a chance to increase the positive rate?
Was a 3 story caravan made for Ram Mandir darshan in Ayodhya?,Was a 3 story caravan made for Ram Mandir darshan in Ayodhya?,Was a 3 story caravan made for Ram Mandir darshan in Ayodhya?,Was there a third story caravan made for Ram Mandir darshan in Ayodhya?
Are there records of all the farmers who stayed silent during the auction?,Did a young man participate in the auction?,Was the young man buying a house?,Did the young man win the auction?,Were any of the farmers present in the auction?,Did all the farmers who stayed silent win an auction?
Did Sarah Palin get exactly zero support for calling on the resignation of Senator Begich?,Did Senator Begich's conviction for corruption be overturned?,Does Senator Begich have a choice now?,Did Palin get any other support for her call for Begich to resign?,Did Sen. Palin actually do this?,Was the response to Palin's call for Begich's resignation from her supporters neutral?
Did 80 percent of bills passed in this Congress have bipartisan support?,Has there been a bipartisan support for bills during this Congress?,Has a nonpartisan support for bills during this General Assembly?,Did the general Assembly have a bipartisan support for bills during this year?,Did this general assembly pass all bills during this year?
Did Berejiklian receive $65 million in bribes?,Did Berejiklian receive the bribes from AstraZeneca or Pfizer?,Did Berejiklian have to pay to make any payments to AstraZeneca or Pfizer?,Did Berejiklian accept any additional bribes?
Did the cop arrest a police officer for bribery in 2019?,Did the officer arrest another police officer for detonating teargas during a rally in 2021?,Was the police officer involved in the detonation of tear gas at the rally?,Does the police officer in question pose a security risk?
Did a 1992 outbreak of mad cow disease occur in any of the EU member states that voted to leave?,Did the ERW member states elect to join the EU?,Is it true that the ERW member states were geographically isolated?,Is the evidence supporting that a 1992 outbreak of mad cow disease occurred in any of the EU member states that voted to leave?
Are there exactly 96 million jobs that people can't get?,Are jobs available at all?,Is there evidence of unemployment being high in certain segments of the economy?,Is this number accurate?,Is unemployment being in the lowest state in the nation?,Is this a real number?,Are there any other factors that account for the fact that some jobs are not being created?
Did Milwaukee Public Schools increase the amount spent on employee benefits in 2011?,Did Milwaukee Public Schools provide $77 per dollar of wages in 2011?,Did Milwaukee Public Schools pay for employee benefits in 2011?,Did Milwaukee Public Schools allocate money to employee benefits in 2011?,Did Milwaukee Public Schools provide employee benefits for every dollar of wages in 2011?
Did this janitor collect these benefits on teenagers?,Did the janitor then murder the teenagers?,Did the insurance company pay the money to the janitor?,Did the janitor have any other income streams?,Was this janitor successful in collecting insurance payments from young people?
Are there more than 46 million Americans living in poverty today?,Is poverty today the largest number in 54 years?,Can we count this population as a larger group than it was in 1921?,Is this population a larger category than it has been in the past?,Does the population of fewer Americans increase in 1921 than it did in 1921?
"Did the flag presented by Zelenskyy contain Nazi ""SS"" runes?",Was the flag given by Zelenskyy to U.S. House Speaker Pelosi and Vice President Harris?,Did both the flag and the SS runes be used together at the same time?
Did a man claim to be President Clinton's illegitimate son have a heart attack?,Did he die from injuries sustained in a car accident?,Did he have a history of psychological issues?,Is he a US citizen?,Is he known internationally in this case?,Does he hold a US passport?
"Does the Texas Leg of the Keystone pipeline create 4,800 jobs in one year?","Has the Texas Leg of the Keystone pipeline established more than 4,800 jobs in the year it has been in operation?",Is the Texas Leg of the Keystone pipeline a threat to the security of the United States and its economy?
Is Mixed Cap the name used to honour the best all-rounder of the IPL 2022?,"Does the ICC have the power to appoint ""Mixed Cap""?",Is the cap new?,Is it available for a fee?,Will it be used by the selectors?
Is this report a direct result of borrowing billions of dollars to run these projects?,Are the estimated totals of these funds out of reach?,Can this situation be corrected with a more careful analysis?,Do these funds go into programs that have yet to be developed?,Is the report from this audit based on evidence that these projects are in progress?
Can someone name the Chick-fil-A restaurant that opened on a Sunday?,Did the restaurant open on a Sunday?,Did the restaurant follow the law in this area?,Would this happen again?,Would the restaurant be shut down on Monday?,Finished?,Are there any restrictions on the establishments closing on Monday?
Did the World Bank purchase COVID testing kits in 2017 or 2018?,Did countries purchase testing kits for COVID-19 in 2017 and 2018?,Is there any evidence of the kits being used in both 2017 and 2018?,Is there any evidence of purchasing COVID testing kits for COVID-19 in 2017 and 2018?
Was the man who binge-watched The Walking Dead convicted of murder?,Did the man go on a killing spree after watching The Walking Dead?,Was the person who binge-watched the Walking Dead convicted of murder?,Did the person who binge-watched The Walking Dead commit a crime involving multiple individuals?,Did any of the victims die in this killing spree?
Did guests at a White House event have to sign NDAs?,Are the guests at this event paid $150?,Did anyone at this event leave the event in breach of this NDA?,Was anyone else at the event forced to sign this NDA?,Did a White House event pay the guests $150?
"Is Jolly's donation $30,000?",Is Jolly supporting his former congressman?,"Is Jolly contributing $30,000 since 2007?",Is Jolly supporting Democrats in Congress?,"Is Jolly contributing $30,000 since 2007?",Is Jolly a Democratic politician?,Is Jolly a political donor?
"Do working class men likely to be drunk, criminal, aimless, feckless and hopeless?",Did Johnson write that working class men are likely to be drunk?,Did Johnson write that working class men are likely to be drunk?,Did Johnson write that working class men are likely to be drunk?,"Was there a specific article written in The Spectator in which Johnson said that working class men are likely to be drunk, criminal, aimless, feckless and hopeless?"
Did the UFOs depicted in the video originate in New Mexico or Nevada?,Was this video authentically depicted by another person?,Was the UFOs depicted in the video on the ground or observed in the air?,Did the video of the UFOs depicted in the video cite any other places that are mentioned in the UFOs' description?,Is the UFO video in question disputed by other people?,Does the UFO video in question have any validity?
Did Vyjayanthimala dance at the age of 99?,Does Vyjayanthimala have a sister?,Has Vyjayanthimala appeared in any films?,Is there any evidence of Vyjayanthimala making a living as an actress?,Is Vyjayanthimala known to be under 40?
"Will the new tax increase the cost of sodas, juice drinks, sports drinks, iced teas, and flavored water by 50%?","Can sodas, juice drinks, sports drinks, iced teas, and flavored water be purchased under this plan?","Do these beverages cost as much as alcohol, tobacco, and tobacco products under the bill?",Will this bill impose a price increase on these beverages?
Did the Democratic House approve H.R. 1 in March 2019?,Was H.R. 1 passed with the majority of Democrats in attendance?,Would a non-citizen vote violate existing laws?,Would a non-citizen vote violate existing laws?,Did this bill introduce a constitutional amendment allowing non-citizens to vote?,Did a non-citizen vote violate existing laws?
Have Republican candidates had an improvement on Democratic candidate numbers in Wisconsin?,Does Republican need to do a point or two better in Wisconsin to win statewide elections?,Did Republicans see voter fraud in the past when Obama ran?,Did Obama say that voter fraud contributed to the decline in Republican presidential candidates' popularity?,-?
Do Hindu verses recited after queen's death in 2022?,Did this video show Hindu verses recited after queen's death in 2022?,Did this video contain religious verses after queen's death in 2022?,"Did this video include the words ""Hijn"" in the title?"
Do the glasses of grape juice a day change stomach acidity?,Are the grape juice glasses a day sufficient?,Is the grape juice safe for pregnant women and would there be any negative side effects of this treatment?,Is the article highly suggestive of any side effects of grape juice treatment?,Would the grape juice be enough for pregnant women?
Did 52 percent of the votes come by mail?,Was the fraud at issue if 52% of votes came by mail?,Did there seem to be fraud at issue?,Was the fraud at issue if 50% of votes came by mail?,Did voting online seem to be a common method of voting in this election?
Are aspirants lying on roads under open sky?,Do aspirants appear to be standing with their eyes closed?,Does the text of the image mention the names of those standing with their eyes closed?,Are there any signs or other sign indicating that aspirants are lying on roads under open sky?,Did the image specifically indicate that aspirants are lying under open sky?
Did the President mention the waitlist for FAFSA?,Does FAFSA apply only to schools?,"Does Obama claim 41,000 people are waiting on his waitlist?",Did Obama claim the waitlist is for only schools?,"Can Obama claim there are 41,000 people waiting for financial assistance in Tech schools?","Can Obama claim there is 41,000 people waiting on his waitlist for financial assistance in tech schools?"
"Did Kevin McCarthy raise congressional pay by $30,000, circumventing the Constitution?",Did all congressmen meet the requirements of the Constitution?,Did all congressmen meet the requirements of the Constitution?,Was the pay increase consistent with the Constitution?,Is the increase within the Constitution?,Can Congressmen meet any of the requirements of the Constitution?
Does drugs make up as much as 75% to 85% of inmate populations?,Has the percentage of drug-related offenses in inmate populations in Wisconsin increased?,Are the percent of drug-related offenses in inmate populations in Wisconsin greater than 17%?,Do drug-related offenses make up an all or a part of all inmate population in Wisconsin?
What event did Hitler want to start his own parliament?,Is there any other historical evidence of Hitler asking to dissolve a parliament?,Was it Hitler's first time asking to dissolve a parliament?,Is it known if Hitler was asked to dissolve a parliament at any point?,Is there any other relevant information about this event?,Is there any other historical evidence to suggest Hitler wanted to dissolve a parliament?
Did Covid-19 vaccine spike proteins accumulate in the nucleus of cells?,"Did Covid-19 vaccine spike proteins destroy DNA repair pathways, paving the way for CANCER?",Did Covid-19 vaccine spike proteins destroy the immune system?,Did Covid-19 vaccine spike proteins accumulate in the nucleus of cells?
Did all of the municipalities in the Western Cape receive clean audits in the 2019/20 financial year?,Did all of the municipalities in the Western Cape govern themselves by DA?,Did all of the municipalities have the DA administration in place during the 2019/20 financial year?,Did all of the municipalities in the Western Cape have the DA administration in place during the 2019/20 financial year?,Did all of the municipalities in the Western Cape have the DA administration in place during the 2019/20 financial year?
Did this rally occur in February of 2020?,Is this rally related to the 1929 Nazi rally held at Madison Square Garden?,Is this rally related to any other events in New York that are happening during this time period?,Is this rally associated with any specific Nazi movement?,Can this rally be found on film?
"Did the Governor General of Canada Say she needed 958,297 emails to remove Justin Trudeau from power?","Is there evidence the Governor General of Canada was saying she needed 958,217 emails to remove Justin Trudeau?","Has Trump ever claimed that he needs 958,217 emails to remove Justin Trudeau from power.?"
Has PMFBY provided resilience to 6.11 crore farmers insured under scheme?,Is there any data regarding the total number of farmers covered in this scheme?,Is there any information relating to the specific policy and program?,Is there a specific metric that specifies the impact on farmers?,Is there data on the overall impact of this scheme in terms of farmers?
Did Sanders win all of his votes in Nevada?,Did Sanders win more votes than his opponent in all of his races in Nevada?,Did Sanders win more votes than the other candidates in Nevada?,Was any of Sanders' votes from the state incorrect?,Did Sanders have more votes than the Republican candidate in Nevada?,Does this information come from the AP?
Did bin Laden stop using satellite phone because of reporting?,Did Bin Laden stop using satellite phone because of reporting?,Did bin Laden stop using satellite phone because of reporting?,Was the reporting accurate?,Was the reporting inaccurate?,Did Bin Laden stop using the satellite phone?,Was the country lost valuable intelligence because of the reporting?
Did the Christmas Day underwear bomber receive a Miranda warning?,Was the Christmas Day underwear bomber given a Miranda warning after 30 minutes of questioning?,Did the federal law enforcement officers tell the Christmas Day underwear bomber a warning after 30 minutes of questioning?,Did the FBI interview the Christmas Day underwear bomber?
Did two men wearing 'I'd Rather Be a Russian Than a Democrat' shirts at the rally?,Are there other people that wore 'I'd Rather Be a Russian Than a Democrat' shirts at a rally?,Are the men at this rally wearing 'I'd Rather Be a Russian Than a Democrat' shirts?
Did a Muslim waitress refused to seat a church group because they are religiously Free?,Did the waitress say they are religious free?,Did the waitress say this reason was for religious freedom?,Did the waitress say this reason was for religious freedom?,Is this the only reason a Muslim waitress refuses to seat a church group?
Did the Makati Business Club and the Financial Executives Institute of the Philippines support amending the 1987 Constitution?,Is it true that these two groups have walked back on their support of amending the constitutional provisions?,Are these two groups in opposition to amending the Constitution?,Are the changes to the 1987 Constitution being considered by these two groups?
Has Tom Ganley been sued more than 400 times for fraud?,"Has a judge called Tom Ganley's business practices ""deceptive and unconscionable""?","Did a judge call Tom Ganley's business practices ""deceptive and unconscionable""?","Is Tom Ganley not a ""truly honest"" person?"
Did the decision to abolish these articles cause the police to brutally beat people?,Was there any evidence that the authorities beat people before this decision was made?,Was the police responsible for the beatings?,Was the government in charge of these decisions?,Was there anything illegal about the decision to abolish these articles?,Did this decision lead to an increase in police violence?
"Does ""67 percent of marriages now wind up in divorce"" reflect this figure based on the year?",Does this percentage reflect the overall percentage of divorces in the US?,Do most divorces involve a death of the spouse?,Did the 66 percent of divorces have a positive effect on people aged 25 and under?
Did Gov. Pat McCrory try to cut education funding to its lowest budget share in over 30 years?,Does McCrory have an ombudsman?,Was McCrory able to reduce education spending?,Did McCrory want to cut education funding?,Did McCrory's office seek to reduce education funding?
Will Domino's offer two free pizzas if you share this post?,Will Domino's offer another deal for this 50th anniversary?,Is it the first time Domino's has announced that it's giving a free coupon?,Will Domino's giveaway coupons work for everyone?,Are Domino's coupons limited to large pizzas?
"Has Allen played the 13-year-old version of Jenna in Garner's ""13 Going on 30""?",Is Allen at the age of 30?,"Is Jenna in the ""13 Going on 30"" film, ""13 Going on 30""?","Are there other acting roles for Allen besides ""13 Going on 30""?"
Did incomes increase 400 percent in the top 400 wealthiest families in 1995?,Did incomes decrease 40% in the top 400 wealthiest families since 1995?,Did the top 400 wealthiest families experience a decrease in tax rates in 1995?,Did incomes increase 400 percent in the top 400 wealthiest families since 1995?
Did model Lotta Volkova wear false blood on the dolls?,Did the model wear fake blood on the dolls?,Does the photograph have a negative connotation?,Did Balenciaga hire an actual Balenciaga stylist for the dolls in the photograph?,Do Balenciaga designers wear false blood on their own dolls?
Did the bill result in 12 abortion clinic closings?,Did the bill cause a reduction in abortion clinics in Texas?,Did the bill allow some state abortion clinics to be closed?,Did the bill cause state abortion clinics to close?,Did the bill allow Texas abortion clinics to be closed?,Did the bill provide for the closure of clinics?
"Was there any information in this photo that showed Thunberg ""aligning herself"" with Antifa?",Was there any proof that Thunberg has done this in the past?,"Was there a photograph of Thunberg posing for the photograph with Soros, one of the members of Isis and Antifa?"
Were multiple vaccination-related deaths eliminated?,Did multiple vaccination-related deaths reduce the population affected?,Are vaccines effective in preventing multiple death?,Were vaccinations associated with other adverse effects?,Is the study based on a total or partial increase in vaccine-related deaths?,Do there data from several studies?
Is Walker financially supported by the oil and gas industry?,Is Walker funded by Big Oil and other energy interests?,Have big oil donations helped Walker gain influence in the public arena?,Is Walker currently receiving money from Big Oil?,Are there multiple sources of money?,Is Walker receiving money from Big Oil?
Has BJP been in power while Tiwari was in power?,Has the fuel price gone up as a result of BJP's inability to govern?,Did BJP leaders make comments regarding fuel prices in the past?,Is BJP's current government financially strong?,Did Tiwari raise fuel prices by the same amount under BJP's control?
Has there been a rematch of this competition?,Has the athlete at this event won gold in any of the past years?,Is the sport mainly seen on T-Series?,Have there been any appearances in CWG 2022?,Is this event the only way to enter the sport?
Did the Hindutva mob beat the Muslim man to death?,Is the Muslim man a Muslim?,Was the Hindutva mob attacked to murder the Muslim man?,Is the Hindutva mob responsible for the death of the Muslim man?,Were there multiple victims of the Hindutva mob during the incident?
"Does Johnson say he said: ""You have to kill him. You have to take him out.""?",Was there evidence that Johnson used this phrase?,Is there evidence that Johnson used these words in this context?,Does Johnson mention al-Qaida in his 2000 book?,Does his book support al-Qaida?
Was this photograph of a stolen police van taken during protests in France in the summer of 2023?,Has this photo been shown in a gallery prior to or after these protests?,Did this photo show the stolen police van?,Are there any other pictures of the stolen police van being used in protests?
Is it true that the gunman was a registered Democrat?,Was he involved in this attack?,Can you establish if he is currently a registered Democrat?,Were any of the victims a teacher or student?,Was the gunman related to someone else in this attack?,Was it true that he was involved in this attack?
Did Banerjee order TMC workers to stop chanting Vande Mataram?,Did Banerjee say Vande Mataram is his foot?,Did Banerjee order TMC workers not to chant Vande Mataram?,Did the CM instruct TMC workers to not chant Vande Mataram?,"Did a CM of West Bengal call Vande Mataram ""my foot""?"
Did Punjab CM Bhagwant Mann claim that sugarcane farmers owe Rs. 294.98 crores to the state government?,Did Punjab CM Bhagwant Mann claim that sugarcane farmers owe Rs. 294.98 crores to the state government?
Is Westpac going to stop accepting cash and cheque deposits by the end of 2020?,Will this be required for Westpac to stop putting cash and cheque in customer accounts by this date?,Will cash deposit withdrawals be the only ones withdrawn by Westpac to this date?,Will cash deposit withdrawals be the only withdrawn in this year?
Has it been 14 years since a president or a vice president or a member of their family has not attended at least one Olympic event?,Has it been a decade since a president or vice president or a member of their family has not attended at least one Olympic event?,Has the number of people who have not attended the Olympics remained around the same?
Are there no deaths due to marijuana?,Are prescription drugs more deadly than marijuana?,Are there no other drugs fatal?,Do both drugs kill the same number of people per year?,Is marijuana legal?,Is there evidence that people die from legal medications if they are narcotics?,Is there any evidence that marijuana does not cause death?
Has Pfizer admitted in a statement that it conducted “gain of function” research in its development of a vaccine and a separate medical treatment for COVID-19?,Has Pfizer in its statement acknowledged in a statement that it conducted “gain of function” research as part of its development of a vaccine and a separate medical treatment for COVID-19?
Did revenues to the Treasury increase after taxes were lowered in 2017?,Did any federal income taxes increase after taxes were lowered in 2017?,"Are federal income taxes used by the treasury to fund public schools, infrastructure, public safety, and other government services?","Are federal income taxes used by the treasury to fund public safety, infrastructure, public safety, and other government services?"
Would Obama's budget amount to about $25 trillion in debt by the end of his term?,Is there any indication that Obama's budget will lead to about $25 trillion in debt by the end of his term?,Did Obama's budget include measures to decrease the debt?,Could Obama borrow money from the government for his budget?
Are Muslim prayers group in Nainital in 2010?,Are there any religious occurrences in Nainital?,Are Muslims praying together in Nainital in 2022?,Are Muslims praying together in Nainital in 2010?,Are there any religious occurrences in Nainital in the 2020s?,Do these religious occurrences appear in Kaadau in 2020?
Did Democrats cut $35 million from the state budget?,Did Democrats cut $35 million from the state budget for Information Technology improvements?,Was any of the money used for other departments?,Finished by an estimated amount of dollars?,Was any of the money spent specifically for Information Technology improvements?,Does this increase in money suggest that Democrats are gaining power in Pennsylvania?
Did the 2017 tax law include tax incentives in New Jersey?,Does Malinowski support the repeal of the tax law?,Did the repeal include any tax incentives in New Jersey?,Did the repeal include any tax incentives in New Jersey?,Was the 2017 tax law repealed?,Did the repeal include any tax incentives in New Jersey?
Did more athletes than died following vaccination for COVID-19?,Did COVID-19 lead to a decrease in blood pressure?,Did COVID-19 lead to a decrease in heart disease symptoms?,Did the vaccine increase the number of clostridium difficile-positive patients?,Is the increase in heart disease caused by the vaccine a side effect?
"Did Lindell blame ""antifa temptresses"" for the Jan. 6, 2021 attack on the U.S. Capitol?","Did Lindell make specific claim regarding who these ""antifa temptresses"" were?",Has Lindell been an active member of the Antifa Front?
Did Biden have pics of his sexual behavior on his laptop?,Was Biden at fault for these abuses?,Does Biden have multiple women pictured on his laptop?,Did Biden have any pictures of child abuse?,Did Biden do any torture in China?,Did Biden torture and rape children?
Did these girls attack on purpose?,Was this a stunt to discourage young voters?,Is the video sped-up?,Are these girls fighting against anyone else?,Can you watch the video online?,Are these videos typically released from countries with strong eve-teaser culture?,Is it possible for these videos to be censored?
Is the practice of eating human flesh illegal in Florida?,Is the practice of eating human flesh illegal in other states?,Is the practice of eating human flesh illegal in any other states?,Has the act of eating human flesh been a crime?,Have any states been prosecuted for a similar practice?
Does the US government have a republic?,Was Oprah raided?,Did Oprah have an Intel raid?,Did 10 Days of Darkness Intel issue a press release?,Did a riot occurred at the home of the Oprah Hodges?,Did a riot occur at the home of Oprah Hodges?
Did Giuliani buy shares of Novartis in early February?,Did Giuliani buy shares of Novartis in early February?,Did Giuliani buy shares of Novartis in early February?,Did Giuliani purchase shares of Novartis in February?,Did Giuliani buy shares of Novartis in February?
Did Obama reference himself a total of 75 times in his farewell speech?,Did Trump use that phrase a total of 3 times in his inaugural address?,Did Obama ever use that phrase more than Trump?,Did Obama reference himself a total of 75 times in his farewell speech?,Did Trump use this phrase a total of 3 times in his inaugural address?
Is it true that Obama said he walked with his husband for several years?,Is it true that Obama spoke publicly about walking with Michael?,Is it true that Obama grew up with Michael?,Is there any evidence that Obama used Michael for sexual escorts before he was elected?
Did Obama save 1 million middle class jobs?,Did Obama save jobs in Wisconsin?,Did Obama save jobs in Wisconsin?,Did Obama save jobs in other states?,Did Obama save jobs in Wisconsin?,Would Obama save jobs in other states?,Is it true that Obama saved jobs in Wisconsin?,Is Obama's auto rescue responsible for the jobs saved in Wisconsin?
Did this photograph show a security check at a Kabul airport?,Did the photo originate in the state of Yemen?,Did the photos were taken before the airport’s checkpoint?,Did the photographs come from Kabul or Yemen?,Are the security checks in this photograph located in Yemen?,Is this photograph of Yemen?
Did 82% of Americans experience a tax increase if Biden were elected?,Did Biden make any decisions regarding taxes during this campaign?,Did Biden support raising taxes as much as people think he is likely to?,Are there other opinions?,Would most people experience tax increases when Biden is in office?
Was the video related to Khan's arrest?,Did people protest outside Sharif's house?,Did Khan appear in a protest before his arrest?,Was there violence during the protests?,Was Khan involved in any incidents during the protests?,Was Khan part of the protests?,Was the protests related to Khan's arrest?
Would hospital employees be rewarded if all beds were renovated?,Would people being rewarded for the renovations be reimbursed for the renovations?,Would people be rewarded if all of the renovations were in the Pandemie?,Would the renovations be reimbursed if they were in a housing estate?,Would any of the renovations be reimbursed by insurance companies?,Would the reimbursements be reimbursed if all of the renovations were in a home?
"Did the illegal immigrant claim children that actually lived in Mexico on income tax forms to collect more than $29,000?","Did the illegal immigrant claim children that actually lived in Mexico on income tax forms to collect more than $29,000?","Did the illegal immigrant claim children that actually lived in Mexico on income tax forms to collect more than $29,000?"
Did some prominent Democrats die within 9 months of the Roswell UFO crash?,Did any UFO crash occur within 9 months of the Roswell UFO crash?,Did any UFO crash within 9 months of the Roswell UFO crash?,Did any UFO crash occur within 9 months of the Roswell UFO crash?
Did the Hindu family embrace Islam?,Did the Hindu family live in Rajasthan?,Was the Hindu family a non-Muslim?,Have any other people embraced Islam in Rajasthan?,Were any of the members of the Hindu family in a photo in the photo?,Was any other family member in a photo in the photo?
Did the federal government provide any funds to the Yaba Psychiatric Hospital's budget in 2018?,Did Yaba Psychiatric Hospital receive money that was only 10% of the budget in 2018?,Did federal funding support the Yaba Psychiatric Hospital's budget in 2018?
Would the Green New Deal cost more than all the total recorded spending since 1789?,Is the proposed Green New Deal a fair comparison to any prior program that has been approved?,Can the Green New Deal be implemented if Congress doesn't approve it?,Will the Green New Deal be in force if congress votes against it?
Was treasonous acts alleged during the 2020 election?,Was Gowdy also convicted of treasonous acts during the 2020 election?,Did Gowdy claim all acts were treasonous?,Was Gowdy considered treasonous during the 2020 election?,Did the actions of Gowdy take place before or after the 2020 election?
Did we have a $160 billion deficit for Bush's first year?,Did any other budget cuts take place in this year?,Were deficits the same as for Bush's year?,Did spending under Bush increase significantly?,Are new deficits expected in 2016?,Has the deficit increased under Obama?,Has Bush had more deficits in the past year?
Did the number of migrants illegally crossing the U.S. border increase in 2020 under President Trump or under President Biden?,"Did more than 100,000 illegal immigrants illegally cross the U.S. border in 2021 under Biden?",Does Biden have a lower number of immigrants illegally crossing the U.S. border than Trump?
"Would high speed rail create 60,000 jobs?",Would high speed rail create jobs?,Would high speed rail have created more jobs than current rail options?,Would high speed rail create more jobs than current rail options?,Would high speed rail create more jobs than current rail options?,Would high speed rail create fewer jobs than current rail options?,Would high speed rail create jobs and create better fares compared to current rail options?
Did Nancy Pelosi do this?,Are any other organizations in this area in favor of MS-13?,Was this statement made prior to January 5th?,Was this statement reported a month prior to February 5th?,Are any other agencies in this area in favor of MS-13?,– Are all these organizations?
Did Aquino's 2016 law have a similarity to the Maharlika wealth fund bill?,Did Aquino's bill impose tax exemptions on wealth funds?,Is it true Aquino's 2016 law was similar to the Maharlika wealth fund bill?,Does Aquino's 2016 law have a similarity to the Maharlika wealth fund bill?
Is there any evidence that this would be true for 2020?,Is there any evidence to suggest Pelosi would assume this role in the absence of an incumbent?,Would Pelosi take this role at the end of 2020?,Are there any reports that a President-elect who is expected to hold office for more than two years would be necessary for Pelosi to assume this role?
Is there any evidence that this speech is lit up every day?,Are there any other buildings in this country that display these lit speeches?,Has there been any evidence to suggest a link to this specific venue?,Has the location in which this event took place been identified by any outside sources?,Has this location been named by any source?
Did Romney invest in an industry that has historically created no jobs?,Did Romney invest in a specific sector of the economy?,Did Romney invest in any sector of the economy that has traditionally created jobs?,Is it true that Romney invested money in manufacturing?,Is it true that Romney invested money in renewable energy?
Has the percentage of shareable revenues increased from 15% to 34%?,Is this increase in income due to increased taxes?,"Does this increase in revenue include state revenue, rather than government revenue?",Is this increase in revenue from the state budget intended to pay for the state's budget deficit?,Is this increase in revenue required by a constitutional clause?
"Did 98,184 Texans have temporary driver's licenses without their photos?","Did 98,184 Texans have a photo on their driver's licenses?",Are the Texas statistics about the total number of Texas drivers that have driver's licenses without their photos accurate?
Was Sandra Bullock associated with the President Trump campaign?,Was Bullock a member of the Republican Party in any way?,Was Hillary Clinton the primary author of the urging to leave the United States?,Did Bullock endorse Trump for the 2016 presidential election?,Does Bullock say Trump was the correct choice for the role of president in her opinion?
Did Cruz only change the location name on his tweets following mass shootings?,Was Cruz affiliated with Twitter during the shootings?,Did Cruz write tweets following the shootings?,Did Cruz endorse any shootings?,Did Cruz change his tweets after the shootings?,Did Cruz endorse any shootings?,Is this claim proven?
Did McCain propose to extend tax cuts for billionaires?,Will there be 100-billion more in corporate tax cuts?,Would tax cuts for a higher income earner make a difference?,Was Obama's fiscal policy a bad idea?,/ Will the economy benefit as a result of his tax cuts?
Would $12 billion more for Ukraine be added to $100+ billion?,Is Jackson Mississippi still holding out for funding to fix their water infrastructure?,Is Ukraine spending more than $100+ billion to fix their water infrastructure?,Is Jackson Mississippi still holding out for funding to fix their water infrastructure?,Is Ukraine spending more than $100+ billion to fix their water infrastructure?
"Is the number of dollars spent on taxes higher than on food, clothing, and housing combined?","Will taxes increase more than food, clothing, and housing combined?","Would the additional spending on taxes offset the increase on food, clothing, and housing?","Will the increased spending on taxes offset the increase on food, clothing, and housing combined?"
Did Trump Burger make a video in March 2021?,Was Trump Burger named after a President?,Was Trump Burger a restaurant in Texas?,Has Trump Burger been referred to as a restaurant in Texas?,Has Trump Burger ever been referred to as a restaurant by any other celebrities?,Has Trump Burger ever been referred to as a restaurant by anyone else?
Did the International Space Station suffer damages after it flipped?,Was the International Space Station damaged after it flipped 540 degrees due to a technical snag?,Did the International Space Station suffer damages after it flipped 540 degrees due to a technical snag?,Did NASA determine whether the damages were a result of space debris?
Did Iceland Foods say they won't have a Christmas TV ad in 2021?,Was the Christmas TV ad in 2021 in favor of other advertising efforts?,Is the Christmas TV ad in 2021 in favor of a different campaign?,Does this announcement reflect anything else regarding a Christmas TV ad?
Is Punya Prasun Bajpai still in the news business?,Has he worked for NDTV before?,Will he be making an announcement about what his new job will be?,Is it still not confirmed if he'll be joining NDTV?,Will he be leaving NDTV as of August 15?
Did Chinese restaurants in one of South Africa's capital cities allow dog meat to be sold?,Is it legal for Chinese restaurants in one of South Africa's capital cities to sell dog meat?,Are there any censorship laws in South Africa that permit Chinese restaurants to sell dog meat?,Are there other restrictions with regard to selling dog meat?
"Did the Dayton, Ohio, shooting suspect die after the shooting?","Does the Dayton, Ohio, shooting suspect die of an undisclosed cause?","Does the Dayton, Ohio, shooting suspect have any criminal record?","Did the Dayton, Ohio, shooting suspect die of an unspecified cause?"
Is white families earning six times more money than black families?,Are white families making 6 times more money than black families?,Is the average annual income for a black family lower than a white family's?,Are white families making 6 times more money than black families?,Is the average annual income for a white family lower than a black family's?
Did Trump use the quote in his statement on January 6?,Did Trump use this quote in his statement on January 6?,Were Trump's statements on January 6 actually being used in his statement on January 6?,Was this quote faked?,Did the image used in this article show Trump flushing notes down a toilet?,Was this image in a collection of multiple images or just one?
Did a family drown in their car after they didn't close their sunroof before a carwash?,Did the family in this accident die due to alcohol?,Did the family lose consciousness while in the carwash?,Did a lot of debris fall out in the pool after the car wash?
"Is there evidence that the video shows a flower that blooms once every 3,000 years?",Is the video describing the flower?,Does this flower grow as a result of aging and/or disease?,Does the flower have a natural color or shape?,Is the flower a monophyte?
Did Clinton's nuclear deal make the world's number one state sponsor of terrorism with your money?,Were any of the Iranian nuclear deal monies used to line the pockets of terrorist entities?,Are terrorists the main source of the money used for the Iran nuclear deal?,Has any of the monies used for the Iran nuclear deal been used to finance terrorism?
Did a satanic leader confess to sacrificing 675 children?,Did this doctor receive donations of children from a satanic leader?,Does this doctor ever deny the donation?,Was this satanic leader a christian?,Was this satanic leader a practicing doctor?
Did the makers of The Kashmir Files donate Rs 200 cr to PM fund?,Did all these donations to PM fund come from the makers of The Kashmir Files?,Is The Kashmir Files a political documentary?,Is The Kashmir Files a political film?,Will The Kashmir Files be released in South Africa?
Did the economy shrink by 70 years for Obama?,Did Obama's economy shrink by 70 years for Obama?,Was Obama's economy shrinking by 70 years?,Was Obama's economy shrinking before Obama took office?,Did Obama's economy shrink in 70 years?,Has Obama's economy shrinked in the previous 70 years?
Does the bill set up a slush fund?,Does the bill specifically call for this fund to be used for failing firms?,Is there a general purpose for the $50 billion funds?,Does the bill set up a slush fund for all purposes?,Is any money available for any purpose by the Treasury Secretary?
Did the police beat two Muslims on Rakshabandhan?,Did the two Muslims act with rudeness towards the Hindu girl?,Did the two Muslims do any such violence?,Did the police beat the two Muslims during the attack?,Did the two Muslims stop the attack for a long period of time?,Was there any violence between the two Muslims and the Hindu girl on Rakshabandhan?,Did the two Muslims in the video retaliate for the attack?
Did the central government propose any health services tax in the Union Budget?,Has the government proposed a health service tax in the Union Budget?,Are there any other initiatives the government has thrown their weight behind in this regard?,Was this budget announced during the term of Prime Minister Modi?,Does this budget contain any other items?
Did Corzine raise tolls 50 percent?,Did the governor of Delaware raise tolls 50 percent?,Is the mayor of Delaware talking about raising tolls 50 percent?,Did the governor of Delaware raise tolls 50 percent?,Have the governors of New York and Pennsylvania embraced tax hikes involving tolls in recent years?
Did the vaccine for coronavirus exist before 2001?,Was the vaccine for coronavirus available 19 years later?,Did the vaccine for coronavirus exist 19 years after 2001?,Are there any vaccines for coronavirus?,Have the vaccines for coronavirus been ineffective over the past 20 years?
Did this video feature any electric vehicles?,Have electric vehicles had any crash injuries?,Have electric vehicles ever crashed?,Did this video feature any electric vehicle collisions?,Do electric vehicles need to be refueling when refueling?,Did this video feature any electric vehicles after they had collided?,Have electric vehicles ever crashed in the US before?
Did a budget-repair bill ask for 13% of workers income in Wisconsin?,Was this bill approved?,Has this bill already been rejected in Wisconsin?,Is this bill related to Obamacare?,Is Obamacare a bad idea?,Were public unions aware of this bill?,Is this bill still being considered?
Is it true about 75% of all felons in Oregon not going to prison?,Are there any other factors that could indicate that 75% of all felons in Oregon do not go to prison?,Are there any other factors that might indicate that some felons do not go to prison?,Are there any other factors that might indicate that some felons do not go to prison?
Did Volkova have a baby doll in blood-colored paint?,Was Volkova in this photograph alone or with other people?,Did Volkova wear this clothing?,Did this photographer document the process of this garment?,Has Volkova used blood-colored paint on this garment in the past?,Do you think this photo is accurate in portraying this garment?
Is Chandrayaan-3 a successful space program?,Did the launch success cause a general increase in budgets?,Does this article provide information regarding whether the budget for the space mission is being boosted?,Is the report based on the US?,Is the cost of Chandrayaan-3 currently lower than it was before?
Did Kenya double the size of its total grid in 8 years?,Were there any major changes from the previous years?,Are there any other numbers that were reported during the years with Kenya's electric grid?,Are there any other numbers that were reported since the 2008 re-model?,"Are the grid levels in any countries that have power grids larger than 2,600 MW?"
Is this clip prior to December 2022 winter storm?,Was the clip taken before December 2022 winter storm?,Was the clip taken before December 2022 winter storm?,Have there been other Walmart runsacks before?,Has this clip been cited in any publications?,Are there any other Walmart runsacks?
Did Arminas Pileckas protect a girl who was sexually harassed?,Is the Syrian refugee charged?,Was the girl in Pileckas' class being sexually harassed?,Are there other ways to find out what happened?,Is this event happening in Sweden?
Is this video in support of the flight?,Does the flight have to charge 3 times the fare?,Is this the first tweet to suggest a different reason for charging more than the fare?,Is the Twitter user also involved in a protest of Air India's departure?,Was this tweet directed at Indians?
Is Walmart increasing starting wage?,Was Walmart granted $400 million in bonuses as a result of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act?,Is Walmart increasing starting wage based on the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act?,Is Walmart increasing start wage based on the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act?,Has Walmart provided $400 million in bonuses as a result of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act?
Are Obama's union buddies currently owned 60% of GM?,Are Obama's union buddies currently owned 60% of GM?,Is Obama's union buddies currently owned 20% of GM?,Are GM's union buddies currently on a 30% ownership of GM?,Is Obama currently holding a 30% ownership of GM?
Did the earthquake occur in Turkey?,Did the earthquake occur in the country at any time on Monday?,Did the video show the rescue of the puppies?,Has any tremors since that date happened in the country?,Is there any other information about this event?,Are there any other earthquakes in Turkey?
Did Floyd's younger brother shoot the mother of six?,Did Floyd shoot at any other white people?,Did Floyd's brother shoot a white couple?,Did Floyd shoot one woman?,Is Dejywan Floyd related to Floyd's sister?,Was Floyd involved in a white car accident?,Is Floyd's brother suspected in a white car accident?
Did James listen to this song?,Did the song exist in a music album?,Did James listen to the song in a video?,Was the song from an artist other than Oliver Anthony?,Was this song popular at the time it was recorded?,Was this song popular the year the video was shot?,Was this song a number one hit?
Can the U.K. government use funds provided by the government to pay farmers to give away their land?,Is the payment made by the government for a specific kind of land?,Is the government paying farmers for land that they already own?,Is it guaranteed that farmers will be able to sell their land to the public?,Is there any indication that the government will use the money to ensure that farmers are able to sell their land?
Did the photo show people executed in Saudi Arabia in 2022?,Will it occur again in the same country in 2022?,Does this funeral include the person executed?,Is there a specific date for this funeral?,Is there an explanation as to why this person was executed in Saudi Arabia?,Is this person executed in a country where executions are carried out every year?
Did Biden executive orders cause price increases in gas?,Did Biden executive orders cause food price increases?,Are these prices still in effect?,Would Biden's executive orders cause the food price increases in general?,Will Biden executive orders cause food price increases?,Does Biden's executive orders cause the food price increases in general?
Does the photo prove the pandemic is fake?,Did the photo include pictures of dead bodies?,Did the photo include photos of the dead body?,Are the medical workers in the photo pointing to the dead body?,Are medical workers in the photo not pointing to the body?,Did the photo prove the pandemic is fake?
Is there any proof of this promise?,Is there any proof of this promise?,Would Akhilesh Yadav be able to fulfill this promise?,Did Yadav promise a minimum of 30% Muslim reservation under this plan?,Was this promise specific to the Samajwadi Party?
Are Saudi Arabia and its allies spending 8 times more than Iran on military spending?,What are some of the key figures in Saudi Arabia's military budget?,"i.e., the Iraq War, Iraqi invasion, and Iraqi defense?","ii.e., all allied countries in Saudi Arabia and its allies spend more than Iran on military spending?"
Was this train lost?,Did this train land in a new place?,Did this train return to its original location?,Was this train originally part of this train?,Does this train usually travel?,Were there any other Shramik trains on this train?,Did this train arrive on time?,Does this train leave this train’s station?
Was the city experiencing a surplus in 2008?,Did Providence have a surplus when I left office?,Did Providence have a surplus in 2008?,Has this city faced a deficit in 2008?,Did any of the previous mayors have a surplus in 2008?,Did Providence suffer from a deficit in 2008?
Are Russian new war machines coming?,Is this an actual new military weapon?,Is it a new type of military weapon?,Is this new equipment able to perform actions in a matter of seconds?,Is this equipment currently being used in combat?,Does this equipment have the same amount of explosives as older ODAB-500P?
Have a large portion of the Medicare payments been paid for by either premiums or payroll taxes?,Are the vast majority of the Medicare payments paid for by deficit spending or debt?,Are Medicare payments paid for entirely by either premiums or payroll taxes?,Is there a large amount of debt related to Medicare?
Would these cost savings be higher for individuals in the individual market?,Would these cost savings also be higher for families?,Is this the same as the CBO's prediction of cost savings?,Is this the same as the CBO's prediction of cost savings in 2016?,Are these the same costs that could be avoided for consumers today?
What is the projected amount that they will spend on Medicaid this year?,Is it the first time they will spend more than $10 billion on Medicaid this year?,Are there any other programs that they are considering funding this year?,Is this the first year that any state has spent more than $10 billion of its budget on Medicaid?
Did COVID-19 trackers have to be installed by Apple and Google?,Did Apple and Google make the tagging apps?,Did the COVID-19 tracking apps do any damage?,Did these tracking apps contain the COVID-19 virus?,Did Apple and Google provide a source for the COVID-19 tracking apps?
Did the House health care bill put forth a requirement for not purchasing a plan?,Does the House health care bill also include a requirement for not purchasing a plan?,Will the government be required to punish citizens for not buying a plan that will cost 15K per family per year?,Do all family size plans in the House health care bill require a minimum of 15K per family per year?,Does the House health care bill have a penalty component for non-purchase of health care plans?
How long after I got sick was Omicron?,Have 8 of the 8 symptoms that they present already occurred?,Are the first eight symptoms that present of Omicron that are on a list as quickly as 48 hours after I get sick?,Are the first 8 symptoms that appear that will lead to losing appetite from Omicron?
"Did the Irish dancers dance to the song ""Samoan One Bite the Dust"", at Buckingham Palace?",Was the queen at Buckingham Palace on the date of her death?,"Did other Irish dancers dance to the song ""Samoan One Bite the Dust,"" at Buckingham Palace?"
Are more states seeing a decrease in revenue compared with 2019?,Does any state record a positive growth rate?,Does any state report negative revenue growth?,Are any states with positive revenue growth?,Was this percentage higher than the national average?,Does this percentage compare to the national average?,Were all states experiencing positive revenue growth?
Did senior staff attend the meeting in East Kilbride?,Did the meeting at East Kilbride include information on whether any elderly residents were to be classified as DNR?,Did all senior staff attend the meeting?,Was the meeting solely about whether residents under 45 were to be classified as DNR or DNR?
Will Oregon be held liable for $450 million for the CRC if Oregon’s legislature authorizes that funding?,Will Oregon be held liable for a great deal more cost responsibility if Oregon authorizes that funding?,Has Oregon already made a decision to authorize this CRC to cover the CRC's cost?
Has the median net worth of American households never changed in the past 10 years?,Has average congressional median net worth more than doubled in the past 10 years?,Has average American median net worth ever changed a lot in the past decade?,Does this claim represent a factual measurement of American wealth?
Did the photographer take this photo during a period of 62 days?,Did the photographer have to wait for over a week to capture this photo?,Does the photographer own the camera?,Did the photographer take many photographs during a period of 62 days?,Is the photograph well lit?,Is it dark enough to be seen through the camera?
Did the SS Cotopaxi vanish in the Bermuda Triangle?,Did the SS Cotopaxi ever come close to being found?,Did the SS Cotopaxi ever have an actual crew member?,Did the SS Cotopaxi ever return to the United States?,Did the Cuban Coast Guard find the SS Cotopaxi?
"Was an Italian doctor arrested for murdering over 3,000 coronavirus patients?",Did he actually commit any murders?,Did it he ever get into any trouble in the country?,Does it seem that any of the cases are connected to Coronavirus?,Did this doctor commit many of these deaths?
Was a scientifically controlled university study done on human light emitted?,Did the study reveal human light emission by meditating?,"Did the study include a conclusion that meditators emit 10,000 photons per second?",Does the claim directly implicate humans in light production by meditators?,Does the claim link human light emitted by meditators to health benefits?
"Did Trump ""put out a $297 million contract to a vendor to show him how to hire Border Patrol""?","Did Trump ""put out a $297 million contract to a vendor to show him how to hire Border Patrol?","Did Trump ""put out a $297 million contract to a vendor to show him how to hire Border Patrol""?","Did Trump ""put out a $297 million contract to a vendor to show him how to hire Border Patrol"" in total?","Did Trump ""put out a $297 million contract to a vendor to show him how to hire Border Patrol for $14.8?"
Does the bill for autism funding come from the same bill President Trump signed into law?,Does this bill provide funding for autism research?,Was Trump in favor of this bill?,Is there evidence this bill will provide funds for autism research?,Does Trump support this bill?,Does this bill make any financial sense for autism research and services?
Did Obama say 22 times that he has the authority to change immigration laws on his own?,Did Obama have any controversies about his power to change immigration laws on his own?,Did Obama publicly support his decision to take executive action on immigration?,Are there other instances when Obama's statement on immigration law could have changed the law?
"Did minimum wage increase by 42%, directly benefiting 55 lakh workers?",Did minimum wage increase by 42% from 2008?,Was minimum wage increased by 42% from 2008?,Did minimum wage increase by 42% from 2011?,Is minimum wage increased by 42% from 2004?,Is minimum wage increased by 42% from 2011?
Did 95% of people in south Belfast own a home?,Did the majority of people in south Belfast own a house?,Did this percentage occur in all areas?,Is there no statistical evidence that this percentage is lower than 95%?,Are there any statistics that suggest this percentage is higher than 90%?,Is there any empirical evidence that this percentage is higher than 98.9%?
Did the Seven-Point list provide evidence that the COVID-19 pandemic was planned?,Did the Seven-Point list give evidence that the COVID-19 pandemic was planned?,Did the Seven-Point list provide evidence that the COVID-19 pandemic was planned?,Would the seven-point list have been utilized to provide evidence that the COVID-19 pandemic was planned?
Does this claim have any validity?,Is the wealth generated by a single household in America going to those in the top 1%?,Do these Americans still work as long as they can?,Does this claim imply that the top 1% of income and wealth is all going to the top 1 percent?,Are Americans working longer hours for low wages despite being paid below average salaries?
Did the lynching take place by people of color?,Did the lynching happen within the city limits?,Did the lynching take place inside the city limits?,Did the police receive any leniency from the media?,Was the lynching of the two black men largely ignored?
Is Trump borrowing money from China?,Is Trump giving a $12 billion bailout to farmers hurt by tariffs?,Is Trump using the $12.4 billion in bailout money for tax purposes?,Is Trump giving the $12 billion to farmers hurt by tariffs?,Is the money being used to pay for tariffs?
Did Hillary Clinton want to raise taxes by over a trillion dollars?,Did Clinton want to raise taxes by over a trillion dollars for the first time?,Does Clinton have any record of raising taxes by over a trillion dollars for the first time?,Is Clinton an advocate for raising taxes?,Is the number of tax increases Hillary is planning to propose more than what the majority of Americans are willing to pay?
Did a commando from Berkut be burned alive?,Did a commando from Berkut refuse to kneel?,Does this incident appear to be true?,Did this incident occur in the city of Lviv?,Did this incident take place at the end of the US-backed invasion of Ukraine?
